Our website uses cookies to make your browsing experience better. By using our site you agree to our use of cookies.
Learn more
Got It!
Blog
Download Privacy Policy
WE'RE HIRING
CROWDFIRE INC.
PRIVACY POLICY
Last modified: February 28, 2024
Introduction
In this policy, “
we
”, “
us
”, “
our
” and “
Crowdfire
” refer to Crowdfire
  Inc. and its subsidiary Codigami Labs PVT Ltd. For more information about
  us and how to contact us, see Section 11.
We respect your privacy and are committed to protecting it through our
  compliance with this Policy.
This privacy policy (“
Policy
”) applies when we are acting
  as a data controller with respect to the personal data of our users. This
  Policy describes how we collect, use and share personal data of consumer
  users across our websites, including
www.crowdfireapp.com
(the “
Website
”), Crowdfire’s mobile application (the “
App
”) and services offered to users (collectively with the
  Website and the App, the “
Services
”), and from our
  partners and other third parties. When using any of our Services you
  consent to the collection, transfer, storage, disclosure, and use of your
  personal data as described in this Policy.
Please read this Policy carefully to understand our policies and practices
  regarding your personal data and how we will treat it. By accessing or
  using the Services, you agree to this Policy. Our Services also incorporate
  privacy controls which affect how we will process your personal data.
  Please refer to Section ‎5 for a list of rights with regard to your
  personal data and how to exercise them.
This Policy may change from time to time. Your continued use of the
  Services after we make changes is deemed to be acceptance of those changes,
  so please check the Policy periodically for updates.
2. Information We Collect About You and How We Collect It
There are three general categories of information we collect.
2.1. Information You Give to Us.
We collect your account data, which may include your name,
        email address (“
Account Data
”). The Account
        Data may be processed for the purposes of providing to you our
        Services and of ensuring their security, maintaining back-ups
        of our databases and communicating with you. This information
        is necessary for the adequate performance of the contract
        between you and us and to allow us to comply with our legal
        obligations. Without it, we may not be able to provide you with
        all the requested Services.
We process information that you post for publication through
        our Services (“
Publication Data
”), including
        the content that you share to your social profiles. The
        Publication Data is processed for the purposes of enabling such
        publication and administering our Services. The legal basis for
        this processing is the performance of a contract between you
        and us and/or taking steps, at your request, to enter into such
        a contract. Without it, we may not be able to provide you with
        all the requested Services.
We process financial information such as credit card or PayPal
        information when you order Services in order to facilitate the
        processing of payments (“
Payment Information
”). The legal basis for this processing is the performance of a
        contract between you and us and/or taking steps, at your
        request, to enter into such a contract and our legitimate
        interests, namely our interest in the proper administration of
        our website and business.
We may process information contained in or relating to any
        communication that you send to us (“
Correspondence Data
”). The Correspondence Data
        may include the communication content and metadata associated
        with the communication. The correspondence data may be
        processed for the purposes of communicating with you and
        record-keeping. The legal basis for this processing is our
        legitimate interests, namely the proper administration of our
        website and business and communications with users.
We may process information included in your personal profile, which may include your location, time zone and website (“
Profile Data
”).
        The Profile Data may be processed for the purposes of providing you a better user experience when using the Services. We may also upload your profile image.
        The legal basis for this processing is your consent.
2.2. Information We Automatically Collect from Your Use of the Services.
When you use the Services, we may automatically process
        information about your computer and internet connection
        (including your IP address, operating system and browser type),
        your mobile carrier, device information (including device and
        application IDs), search terms, cookie information, as well as
        information about the timing, frequency and pattern of your
        service use (“
Service Data
”). The Service Data
        is processed for the purpose of providing our Services. The
        legal basis for this processing is the adequate performance of
        the contract between you and us, to enable us to comply with
        legal obligations and our legitimate interest in being able to
        provide and improve the functionalities of the Services.
2.3. Information We Collect from Third Parties.
You may choose to connect the Services to your accounts on
        third party services such as Twitter, Facebook, Instagram,
        Tiktok, Linkedin, Pinterest, Shopify, Etsy, Twitch, Wordpress and
        Youtube (“
Social Networking Service
”) for the purpose of
        managing your social media presence through our Services. Crowdfire uses a third party vendor
        (Zapier) to facilitate your connection to the Social Networking Services.
        When you do this, we automatically process personal information
        about you on such Social Networking Services, including your
        account and profile data, RSS, lists of followers, social media
        content and your actions with respect to such content (the “
Social Media Information
”). The Social Media
        Information is processed for the purposes of optimizing your
        social media activity on the Social Networking Services and
        administering our Services. The legal basis for the processing
        of Social Media Information is the performance of a contract
        between you and us and/or taking steps, at your request, to
        enter into such a contract.
3. Disclosure of Personal Data
3.1. We may disclose your personal data to any member of our group of
      companies (this means our subsidiaries, our ultimate holding
      company and all its subsidiaries) insofar as reasonably necessary
      for the purposes, and on the legal bases, set out in this policy.
3.2. Financial transactions relating to the Services are handled by our
      payment services providers, Paypal, Braintree and Stripe. We will
      share Payment Information with our payment services providers only
      to the extent necessary for the purposes of processing your
      payments, refunding such payments and dealing with complaints and
      queries relating to such payments and refunds. You can find
      information about the payment services providers' privacy policies
      and practices at
https://www.paypal.com/in/webapps/mpp/ua/privacy-full
,
https://www.braintreepayments.com/leg
and
https://stripe.com/us/privacy/
.
3.3. We may disclose personal data to Social Networking Services insofar
      as reasonably necessary to allow you to manage your social media
      presence through our Services.
3.4. We may disclose Service Data to a variety of third party service
      providers insofar as reasonably necessary to improve the
      functionalities of the Services. For example, we may disclose
      Service Data to obtain useful analytics, provide in-app support to
      mobile app users, determine location data and provide search engine
      functionality to our users.
3.5. We may share aggregated data (information about our users that we
      combine together so that it no longer identifies or references an
      individual user) and other anonymized information for regulatory
      compliance, industry and market analysis, demographic profiling,
      marketing and advertising, and other business purposes.
3.6. In addition to the specific disclosures of personal data set out in
      this Section ‎3, we may disclose your personal data if we believe
      that it is reasonably necessary to comply with a law, regulation,
      legal process, or governmental request; or in order to protect your
      vital interests or the vital interests of another natural person;
      to protect the safety or integrity of the Services, or to explain
      why we have removed content or accounts from the Services; or to
      address fraud, security, or technical issues; or to protect our
      rights or property or the rights or property of those who use the
      Services.
3.7. We offer individuals the opportunity to choose (opt out) whether
      their personal information is (i) to be disclosed to a third party
      or (ii) to be used for a purpose that is materially different from
      the purpose(s) for which it was originally collected or
      subsequently authorized by the individuals. In order to opt out
      from disclosure of your personal information, please email us at
hello@crowdfireapp.com
.
4. International transfers of your personal data
In this Section 4, we provide information about the circumstances in which
  your personal data may be transferred to countries outside the European
  Economic Area (EEA). We and our other group companies have offices and
  facilities in the United States and India. To facilitate our operations we
  may transfer, store, and process your information within those countries or
  with service providers based in Europe, India, Asia Pacific and North
  America. Laws in these countries may differ from the laws applicable to
  your Country of Residence. For example, information collected within the
  EEA may be transferred, stored, and processed outside of the EEA for the
  purposes described in this Privacy Policy. Where we transfer store, and
  process your personal information outside of the EEA we have ensured that
  appropriate safeguards are in place to ensure an adequate level of data
  protection. Please refer to Section Section ‎10 below.
Transfers to our subsidiary in India, to our service providers and other third parties
  will be protected by appropriate safeguards, namely the use of standard data protection
  clauses adopted or approved by the European Commission or applicable certification schemes -
  for example, the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program referred to in Section ‎10 below.
5. Your Rights with Regard to Personal Data
In this Section ‎5, we have summarized the rights that you have under data
  protection law. Some of the rights are complex, and not all of the details
  have been included in our summaries. Accordingly, you should read the
  relevant laws and guidance from the regulatory authorities for a full
  explanation of these rights.
5.1 Your principal rights under data protection law are:
the right to access;
the right to rectification;
the right to erasure;
the right to restrict processing;
the right to object to processing;
the right to data portability;
the right to complain to a supervisory authority; and
the right to withdraw consent.
5.2. You have the right to confirmation as to whether or not we process
      your personal data and, where we do, access to the personal data,
      together with certain additional information. That additional
      information includes details of the purposes of the processing, the
      categories of personal data concerned and the recipients of the
      personal data. Providing the rights and freedoms of others are not
      affected, we will supply to you a copy of your personal data. The
      first copy will be provided free of charge, but additional copies
      may be subject to a reasonable fee. You can access your personal
      data by following the instructions
here
.
5.3. You have the right to have any inaccurate personal data about you
      rectified and, taking into account the purposes of the processing,
      to have any incomplete personal data about you completed. You can
      request correction or modification of your personal data by
      following the instructions
here.
5.4. In some circumstances you have the right to the erasure of your
      personal data without undue delay. Those circumstances include: the
      personal data are no longer necessary in relation to the purposes
      for which they were collected or otherwise processed; you withdraw
      consent to consent-based processing; you object to the processing
      under certain rules of applicable data protection law; the
      processing is for direct marketing purposes; and the personal data
      have been unlawfully processed. However, there are exclusions of
      the right to erasure. The general exclusions include where
      processing is necessary: for exercising the right of freedom of
      expression and information; for compliance with a legal obligation;
      or for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims. You
      can request the deletion of your account by following the
      instructions
here.
5.5. In some circumstances you have the right to restrict the processing
      of your personal data. Those circumstances are: you contest the
      accuracy of the personal data; processing is unlawful but you
      oppose erasure; we no longer need the personal data for the
      purposes of our processing, but you require personal data for the
      establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims; and you have
      objected to processing, pending the verification of that objection.
      Where processing has been restricted on this basis, we may continue
      to store your personal data. However, we will only otherwise
      process it: with your consent; for the establishment, exercise or
      defence of legal claims; for the protection of the rights of
      another natural or legal person; or for reasons of important public
      interest. You can manage your privacy settings and other account
      features
here
.
5.6. You have the right to object to our processing of your personal
      data on grounds relating to your particular situation, but only to
      the extent that the legal basis for the processing is that the
      processing is necessary for: the performance of a task carried out
      in the public interest or in the exercise of any official authority
      vested in us; or the purposes of the legitimate interests pursued
      by us or by a third party. If you make such an objection, we will
      cease to process the personal data unless we can demonstrate
      compelling legitimate grounds for the processing which override
      your interests, rights and freedoms, or the processing is for the
      establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims.
5.7. You have the right to object to our processing of your personal
      data for direct marketing purposes (including profiling for direct
      marketing purposes). If you make such an objection, we will cease
      to process your personal data for this purpose.
5.8. You have the right to object to our processing of your personal
      data for scientific or historical research purposes or statistical
      purposes on grounds relating to your particular situation, unless
      the processing is necessary for the performance of a task carried
      out for reasons of public interest.
5.9. To the extent that the legal basis for our processing of your
      personal data is:
consent; or
that the processing is necessary for the performance of a
        contract to which you are party or in order to take steps at
        your request prior to entering into a contract,
        and such processing is carried out by automated means, you have the right
        to receive your personal data from us in a structured, commonly used and
        machine-readable format. However, this right does not apply where it would
        adversely affect the rights and freedoms of others. You can download your
        account information, by following the instructions
here
.
5.10. To the extent that the legal basis for our processing of your
      personal data is consent, you have the right to withdraw that
      consent at any time. Withdrawal will not affect the lawfulness of
      processing before the withdrawal.
5.11. You may exercise any of your rights in relation to your personal
      data by written notice to us, in addition to the other methods
      specified in this Section ‎5.
6. Retaining and deleting personal data
6.1. This Section ‎6 sets out our data retention policies and procedure,
      which are designed to help ensure that we comply with our legal
      obligations in relation to the retention and deletion of personal
      data.
6.2. Personal data that we process for any purpose or purposes shall not
      be kept for longer than is necessary for that purpose or those
      purposes.
6.3. We generally retain your personal information for as long as is
      necessary for the performance of the contract between you and us
      and to comply with our legal obligations. If you no longer want us
      to use your information to provide the Services to you, you can
      request that we erase your personal information and close your
      account.
6.4. Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Section ‎6, we may
      retain your personal data where such retention is necessary for
      compliance with a legal obligation to which we are subject, or in
      order to protect your vital interests or the vital interests of
      another natural person.
7. Children
7.1 Children’s Privacy & Data Protection
Protecting the privacy of young children is especially important. For that reason, Crowdfire does not knowingly collect, store, process, or maintain personally identifiable information or non-personally-identifiable information on the Site from persons under 13 years of age, and no part of our website is directed to persons under 13 (or the minimum legal age in your jurisdiction). If you are under 13 years of age (or a minor in your jurisdiction), then please do not use or access the Site at any time or in any manner.  No one under age 13 (or the minimum legal age in your jurisdiction) may provide any personal data through the Services.
If you are under 13 (or a minor in your jurisdiction), do not use or provide any information through the Services or on or through any of their features or register an account, make any purchases through the Services, use any of the interactive features of the Services or provide any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, e-mail address or any screen name or user name you may use.
If Crowdfire learns and verifies that personally identifiable information of persons under 13 years of age has been collected on the Site without verified parental consent, then Crowdfire will take the appropriate steps to delete this information.  If a child accesses our services, we advise parents to monitor and restrict their child’s access. In compliance with the Children's Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA) and the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR-K), any personal data identified as belonging to a minor will be deleted upon verification. If you believe that we have unintentionally collected such data, please contact us immediately at
hello@crowdfireapp.com
.
7.2 Reporting Inappropriate Content or Child Safety Concerns
We are committed to ensuring a safe environment for all users. If you encounter content or user behavior that violates our policies, especially concerning child safety, please report it immediately using our in-app/on-site reporting feature or by contacting
hello@crowdfireapp.com
. We take all reports seriously and will investigate promptly, taking appropriate action, including content removal or account suspension.
8. Cookies
8.1. About cookies
A cookie is a file containing an identifier (a string of
        letters and numbers) that is sent by a web server to a web
        browser and is stored by the browser. The identifier is then
        sent back to the server each time the browser requests a page
        from the server.
Cookies may be either “persistent” cookies or “session”
        cookies: a persistent cookie will be stored by a web browser
        and will remain valid until its set expiry date, unless deleted
        by the user before the expiry date; a session cookie, on the
        other hand, will expire at the end of the user session, when
        the web browser is closed.
Cookies do not typically contain any information that
        personally identifies a user, but personal information that we
        store about you may be linked to the information stored in and
        obtained from cookies.
We also use other technologies with similar functionality to
        cookies, such as web beacons, web storage, and unique
        advertising identifiers, to collect information about your
        activity, browser, and device.
8.2. We use these technologies for the following purposes:
to identify you and log you into the Services;
to store information about your preferences and to personalise
        the Services for you;
as an element of the security measures used to protect user
        accounts, including preventing fraudulent use of login
        credentials, and to protect our website and services generally;
to help us display content that will be relevant to you;
to help us analyse the use and performance of the Services ;
        and
to store your preferences in relation to the use of cookies
        more generally.
8.3. Cookies used by our service providers
We use the following service providers to analyse the use of
        the Services. Each service provider gathers information about
        the Services by means of cookies and this information is used
        to create reports about with usage information. You can find
        information about the service providers’ privacy policies and
        practices at the URLs set forth below:
Service Provider - Analytics
Privacy Policy
Google Analytics / Fabric / Crashlytics
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/6004245
Branch
https://branch.io/policies/#privacy
Mixpanel
https://mixpanel.com/legal/privacy-policy/
Clevertap
https://clevertap.com/privacy-policy/
AppsFlyer
https://www.appsflyer.com/privacy-policy/
Freshdesk’s Mobihelp SDK
https://www.freshworks.com/privacy/
Foursquare Labs
https://foursquare.com/legal/privacy
Algolia
https://www.algolia.com/policies/privacy
Honeybadger
https://www.honeybadger.io/privacy/
Superfeedr
https://superfeedr.com/privacy/
Cloudniary
https://cloudinary.com/privacy/
Cloudflare
https://www.cloudflare.com/privacypolicy/
AWS
https://aws.amazon.com/privacy/
Headway
https://headwayapp.co/privacy/
Webhose
https://webhose.io/privacy/
Unsplash
https://unsplash.com/privacy/
Pixabay
https://pixabay.com/service/privacy/
Feedly
https://feedly.com/i/legal/privacy/
Firebase
https://firebase.google.com/support/privacy/
Giphy
https://support.giphy.com/hc/en-us/articles/360020028332-GIPHY-Privacy-Policy/
8.4 Managing cookies
Most browsers allow you to refuse to accept cookies and to
        delete cookies. The methods for doing so vary from browser to
        browser, and from version to version.
Your mobile device may allow you to control cookies through its
        settings function. Refer to your device manufacturer’s
        instructions for more information.
If you choose to decline cookies, some parts of the Services
        may not work as intended or may not work at all.
9. Data Security
9.1. We have implemented measures designed to secure your personal data
      from accidental loss and from unauthorized access, use, alteration
      and disclosure. The safety and security of your information also
      depends on you. Where we have given you (or where you have chosen)
      a password for access to certain parts of the Services, you are
      responsible for keeping this password confidential. We ask you not
      to share your password with anyone.
9.2. Steps taken to ensure data security:
All the user information can only be accessed by authorized
        users;
Users need to authenticate themselves with a username-password
        combination; and
All data is hosted on Amazon AWS servers.
9.3. Unfortunately, the transmission of information via public networks
      such as the internet is not completely secure. Although we do our
      best to protect your personal data, we cannot guarantee the
      security of your personal data transmitted through the Services.
      Any transmission of personal data is at your own risk. We are not
      responsible for the circumvention of any privacy settings or
      security measures contained on the Services.
10. Data Privacy Framework
Crowdfire complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and, as applicable the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF,
  and/or the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the
  collection, use, and retention of Personal Data transferred from the European Union, the United Kingdom and/or Switzerland to the United States, respectively.
  Crowdfire LLC and Crowdfire Limited have certified to the Department of Commerce that they adhere to the Data Privacy Framework
  Principles with respect to such information. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the Data Privacy
    Framework Principles, the Data Privacy Framework Principles shall govern.
For more information about the Data Privacy Framework
  Principles and to view Crowdfire’s certification, please visit the Data Privacy Framework website at
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
. You may also contact us directly at
hello@crowdfireapp.com
to learn more about this certification.
With respect to Personal Data received or transferred pursuant to the Data Privacy Framework, Crowdfire is subject to the regulatory enforcement
  powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission. In some cases, Crowdfire is potentially liable if its agents process your Personal Data in a
  manner that is inconsistent with the Data Privacy Framework Principles, including in cases of onward transfers to third parties.
Crowdfire may be required to disclose personal information in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to
    meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
11. Dispute resolution
Crowdfire will investigate and attempt to resolve complaints and disputes regarding collection,
  use and disclosure of Personal Data in accordance with the principles contained in this Privacy Policy.
  EU, United Kingdom, Gibraltar or Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our Data
  Privacy Framework policy should first contact Crowdfire through the following Form.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF,
  Crowdfire commits to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received
  in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF to JAMS,
  an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States.  If you do not receive timely
  acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your
  DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit https://www.jamsadr.com/dpf-dispute-resolution
  for more information or to file a complaint. The services of JAMS are provided at no cost to you.
Under certain conditions, more fully described on the Data Privacy Framework website,
  you may invoke binding arbitration when other dispute resolution procedures have been exhausted.
12. YouTube
12.1. Please note that in order to provide you with analytics and listening features for YouTube we use the YouTube API Services
12.2. You can find information about Google’s privacy policy and practices at the URL set forth below:
http://www.google.com/policies/privacy
12.3. If at any given time you want to revoke access to your data on Crowdfire you can visit the following link:
https://www.crowdfireapp.com/data-management#delete
.  Additionally you can also revoke Crowdfire’s access to your data via the Google security settings page at
https://security.google.com/settings/
.
13. Google Chrome Extension
By adding the Crowdfire Google Chrome Extension, users can effortlessly manage and post to all their social media accounts from a single platform. Simply sign in with your existing accounts and start sharing content seamlessly. The extension allows you to create and share posts directly from any tab using the toolbar icon, with options to share immediately, schedule for a specific time, or use Crowdfire's "Best Time" feature to post when your followers are most active. Additionally, users can right-click on any web page, image, or selected text to share specific content easily. We are committed to protecting your privacy and ensuring a secure experience while using the Crowdfire Google Chrome Extension.
14. Changes to Our Privacy Policy
It is our policy to post any changes we make to our Policy on this page. If we make material changes to how we treat our user's personal data, we will notify you by e-mail to the primary e-mail address specified in your account. The date the Policy was last revised is identified at the top of the page. You are responsible for ensuring we have an up-to-date active and deliverable e-mail address for you, and for periodically visiting our Website and this Policy to check for any changes.
15. Contact Information
The data controller responsible for your personal data is Crowdfire Inc. Please contact us by email at hello@crowdfireapp.com or by post at:
Crowdfire Inc.
16192 Coastal Highway
Lewes, DE 19958
United States
16. Privacy Notice For California Residents
This section applies solely to consumers who reside in the State of California.
If you are a California resident, and you wish to access your personal data,
    request from us that we delete your personal information, or require information
    about our disclosure practices, you can choose to send us a verifiable consumer
    request by email at
hello@crowdfireapp.com
, in addition to using the means set forth above.
In our assessment, we do not “sell” your personal information to third parties for monetary or other valuable consideration.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.crowdfireapp.com/assets/pdf/PrivacyPolicy.2413b05b.pdf:

Sub-policy 1
https://www.paypal.com/in/webapps/mpp/ua/privacy-full:
Back To Home Page
Privacy Statement
1. Overview
2. What Personal Data Do We Collect?
3. Why Do We Retain Personal Data?
4. How Do We Process Personal Data?
5. Do We Share Personal Data?
6. How Do We Work with Other Services and Platforms?
7. How Do We Use Cookies and Tracking Technologies?
8. What Privacy Choices Are Available To You?
9. How Do We Protect Your Data?
10. Can Children Use Our Services?
11. What Else Should You Know?
12. Contact Us
13. Definitions
14. Additional Information
Download Printable PDF
Privacy Statement
Last updated on 16 March 2022
1. Overview
PayPal
has developed this Privacy Statement to explain how we may collect, retain, process, share and transfer your
Personal Data
when you visit our
Sites
or use our
Services
.  This Privacy Statement applies to your Personal Data when you visit Sites or use Services, and does not apply to online websites or services that we do not own or control, including websites or services of other PayPal
Users
.
This Privacy Statement is designed to help you obtain information about our privacy practices and to help you understand your privacy choices when you use our Sites and Services. Please note that our Service offerings may vary by region.
We have defined some terms that we use throughout the Privacy Statement.  You can find the meaning of a capitalized term in the
Definitions
section.
Please
contact us
if you have questions about our privacy practices that are not addressed in this Privacy Statement.
2. What Personal Data Do We Collect?
We may collect information about you when you visit our Sites or use our Services, including the following:
Registration and use information –
When you register to use our Services by establishing an Account, we will collect Personal Data as necessary to offer and fulfill the Services you request.  Depending on the Services you choose, we may require you to provide us with your name, postal address, telephone number, email address and identification information to establish an Account.  We may require you to provide us with additional Personal Data as you use our Services.
Transaction and experience information –
When you use our Services or access our Sites, for example, to make purchases from merchants, to receive money, to process payments, or to send money to friends and family, we collect information about the transaction, as well as other information associated with the transaction such as amount sent or requested, amount paid for products or services, merchant information, including information about any funding instruments used to complete the transaction, Device Information, Technical Usage Data, and Geolocation Information.
Participant information –
When you use our Services or access our Sites, we collect Personal Data you provide us about the other participants associated with the transaction.
Send or request money:
When you send or request money through the Services, we collect Personal Data such as name, postal address, telephone number, and financial account information about the participant who is receiving money from you or sending money to you.  The extent of Personal Data required about a participant may vary depending on the Services you are using to send or request money.
Pay or request someone else to pay a bill:
If you use our Services to pay a bill for the benefit of someone else, or if you request a User to pay a bill for you, we collect Personal Data from you about the account holder such as name, postal address, telephone number, email address, and account number of the bill that you intend to pay or request to be paid.
Add value to your accounts:
If you use our Services to add value to your Account or any other account you may have, or if you ask a User to add value to any of these accounts, we may collect Personal Data from you about the other party, or from the other party about you to facilitate the request.  For example, if you use our Services to reload a mobile phone, or to request value be added to your mobile account, we may collect Personal Data and other information including mobile account number from the other participant.
Information about your friends and contacts –
It may be easier for us to help you transact with your friends and contacts if you choose to connect your contact list information with your Account.  If you establish an account connection between your device or a social media platform and your Account, we will use your contact list information (such as name, address, email address) to improve your experience when you use the Services.
Information that you choose to provide us to obtain additional Services or specific online Services –
If you request or participate in an optional Site feature, or request enhanced Services or other elective functionality, we may collect additional information from you.  We will provide you with a separate notice at the time of collection, if the use of that information differs from the uses disclosed in this Privacy Statement.
Information about you if use the Service “Checkout without a PayPal Account” –
Certain limited Services are available without being required to log in to or establish an Account, also referred to as Checkout without a PayPal Account. We will collect Personal Data, information about any funding instrument used, Device Information, Technical Usage Data, and Geolocation Information as necessary to complete the transaction. If you are an Account holder and choose to engage in a Checkout without a PayPal Account, we will collect information about the transaction and may associate it with your Account.  If you are not an Account holder and choose to engage in a Checkout without a PayPal Account, we will collect and store all information you provide and use and share such information in accordance with this Privacy Statement.
Information about you from third-party sources –
We obtain information from third-party sources such as merchants, data providers, and credit bureaus, where permitted by law.
Other information we collect related to your use of our Sites or Services –
We may collect additional information from or about you when you communicate with us, contact our customer support teams or respond to a survey.
Non-Account holders
If you use our Services without creating or logging into an account, we’ll still collect personal data, which may include your payment information, device information, and location. When you use our Services without creating or logging into an account, we will use this information to process transactions, prevent fraud and comply with the law. We may connect this information with your account, if you have one or if you create an account at a later date.
3. Why Do We Retain Personal Data?
We retain Personal Data to fulfill our legal or regulatory obligations and for our business purposes.  We may retain Personal Data for longer periods than required by law if it is in our legitimate business interests and not prohibited by law.  If your Account is closed, we may take steps to mask Personal Data and other information, but we reserve our ability to retain and access the data for so long as required to comply with applicable laws.  We will continue to use and disclose such Personal Data in accordance with this Privacy Statement.
4. How Do We Process Personal Data?
We may
Process
your information for the following reasons:
To operate the Sites and provide the Services
, including to:
initiate a payment, send or request money, add value to an account, or pay a bill;
authenticate your access to an Account;
communicate with you about your Account, the Sites, the Services, or PayPal;
create an account connection between your Account and a third-party account or platform;
perform creditworthiness and other financial standing checks, evaluate applications, and compare information for accuracy and verification purposes; and
keep your Account and financial information up to date.
To manage our business needs
, such as monitoring, analyzing, and improving the Services and the Sites’ performance and functionality.  For example, we analyze User behavior and perform research about the way you use our Services.
To manage risk and protect the Sites, the Services and you from fraud by verifying your identity
. PayPal’s risk and fraud tools use
Personal Data
,
Device Information
,
Technical Usage Data
and
Geolocation Information
from our Sites and websites that offer PayPal Services to help detect and prevent fraud and abuse of the Services.
To market to you
about PayPal products and Services and the products and services of unaffiliated businesses. We may also Process your Personal Data to tailor the marketing content and certain Services or Site experiences to better match your interests on PayPal and other third-party websites.
To provide personalized Services offered by PayPal on third-party websites and online services.
We may use your Personal Data and other information collected in accordance with this Privacy Statement to provide a targeted display, feature, Services, or offer to you on third-party websites.  We may use cookies and other tracking technologies to provide these online services and/or work with other third-parties such as merchants, advertising or analytics companies to provide these online services.
To provide you with location-specific options, functionality or offers
if you elect to share your Geolocation Information through the Services.  We will use this information to enhance the security of the Sites and Services and provide you with location-based Services, such as advertising, search results, and other personalized content.
To comply with our obligations and to enforce the terms of our Sites and Services,
including to comply with all applicable laws and regulations.
To make it easier for you to find and connect with others,
we may use your information you have shared with the Service to suggest connections between you and people you may know.  For example, we may associate information that we learn about you through your and your contacts’ use of the Services, and information you and others provide to suggest people you may know or may want to transact with through our Services.  Social functionality and features designed to simplify your use of the Services with others vary by Service.
To respond to your requests,
for example to contact you about a question you submitted to our customer service team
.
5. Do We Share Personal Data?
We may share your Personal Data or other information about you with others in a variety of ways as described in this section of the Privacy Statement.
We may share your Personal Data or other information for the following reasons:
With other members of the PayPal corporate family:
We may share your Personal Data with members of the PayPal family of entities to, among other things, provide the Services you have requested or authorized; to manage risk; to help detect and prevent potentially illegal and fraudulent acts and other violations of our policies and agreements; and to help us manage the availability and connectivity of PayPal products, Services, and communications.
With other companies that provide services to us:
We may share Personal Data with third-party service providers that perform services and functions at our direction and on our behalf. These third-party service providers may, for example, provide you with Services, verify your identity, assist in processing transactions, send you advertisements for our products and Services, or provide customer support.
With other financial institutions:
We may share Personal Data with other financial institutions that we have partnered with to jointly create and offer a product, such as with Synchrony Bank in connection with the PayPal Extras credit card. These financial institutions may only use this information to market and offer PayPal-related products, unless you have given consent for other uses. We may also share Personal Data to process transactions, provide you with benefits associated with your eligible cards, and keep your financial information up to date.
With the other parties to transactions when you use the Services, such as other Users, merchants, and their service providers:
We may share information about you and your Account with the other parties involved in processing your transactions. This includes other Users you are sending or receiving funds from merchants and their service providers. The information includes:
Personal Data and Account Information necessary to facilitate the transaction;
information to help other participant(s) resolve disputes and detect and prevent fraud; and
aggregated data and performance analytics to help merchants better understand Users and to help merchants enhance Users’ experiences.
With other third parties for our business purposes or as permitted or required by law:
We may share information about you with other parties for PayPal’s business purposes or as permitted or required by law, including:
if we need to do so to comply with a law, legal process or regulations;
law enforcement, regulators, government officials, or other third parties (in Singapore or elsewhere) in relation to a subpoena, court order, or other legal process or requirement under Singapore law or regulation, or the laws and regulations of other jurisdictions that are applicable to PayPal or one of its affiliates; when we need to do so to comply with such law or credit card rules; or when we believe, in our sole discretion, that the disclosure of Personal Data is necessary or appropriate to prevent physical harm or financial loss; or to report suspected illegal activity or to investigate violations of a user agreement;
to protect the vital interests of a person;
to protect our property, Services and legal rights;
to facilitate a purchase or sale of all or part of PayPal’s business;
in connection with shipping and related services for purchases made using a Service;
to help assess and manage risk and prevent fraud against us, our Users and fraud involving our Sites or use of our Services, including fraud that occurs at or involves our business partners, strategic ventures, or other individuals and merchants;
to banking partners as required by card association rules for inclusion on their list of terminated merchants;
to credit reporting and collection agencies;
to companies that we plan to merge with or be acquired by; and
to support our audit, compliance, and corporate governance functions.
With your consent:
We also will share your Personal Data and other information with your consent or direction, including if you authorize an account connection with a third-party account or platform.
In addition, PayPal may provide aggregated statistical data to third-parties, including other businesses and members of the public, about how, when, and why Users visit our Sites and use our Services.  This data will not personally identify you or provide information about your use of the Sites or Services.  We do not share your Personal Data with third parties for their marketing purposes without your consent.
6. How Do We Work with Other Services and Platforms?
A significant benefit and innovation of PayPal’s Services is that you can connect your Account with a third-party account or platform.  For the purposes of this Privacy Statement, an “account connection” with such a third-party is a connection you authorize or enable between your Account and a non-PayPal account, payment instrument, or platform that you lawfully control or own.  When you authorize such a connection, PayPal and the third-party will exchange your Personal Data and other information directly.  Examples of account connections include:
linking your Account to a social media account or social messaging service;
connecting your Account to a third-party data aggregation or financial services company, if you provide such company with your Account log-in credentials; or
using your Account to make payments to a merchant or allowing a merchant to charge your Account.
If you choose to create an account connection, we may receive information from the third-party about you and your use of the third-party’s service.  For example, if you connect your Account to a social media account, we will receive Personal Data from the social media provider via the account connection.  If you connect your Account to other financial accounts, directly or through a third-party service provider, we may have access to your account balance and transactional information, such as purchases and funds transfers.  We will use all such information that we receive from a third-party via an account connection in a manner consistent with this Privacy Statement.
Information that we share with a third-party based on an account connection will be used and disclosed in accordance with the third-party’s privacy practices.  Before authorizing an account connection, you should review the privacy notice of any third-party that will gain access to your Personal Data as part of the account connection.  For example, Personal Data that PayPal shares with a third-party account or platform such as a social media account may in turn be shared with certain other parties, including the general public, depending on the account’s or platform’s privacy practices.
7. How Do We Use Cookies and Tracking Technologies?
When you visit our Sites, use our Services, or visit a third-party website for which we provide online Services, we and our business partners and vendors may use cookies and other tracking technologies (collectively, “Cookies”) to recognize you as a User and to customize your online experiences, the Services you use, and other online content and advertising; measure the effectiveness of promotions and perform analytics; and to mitigate risk, prevent potential fraud, and promote trust and safety across our Sites and Services.  Certain aspects and features of our Services and Sites are only available through the use of Cookies, so if you choose to disable or decline Cookies, your use of the Sites and Services may be limited or not possible.
Do Not Track (DNT) is an optional browser setting that allows you to express your preferences regarding tracking by advertisers and other third-parties.  We do not respond to DNT signals.
Please review our
Statement on Cookies and Tracking Technologies
to learn more about how we use Cookies.
8. What Privacy Choices Are Available To You?
You have choices when it comes to the privacy practices and communications described in this Privacy Statement. Many of your choices may be explained at the time you sign up for or use a Service or in the context of your use of a Site. You may be provided with instructions and prompts within the experiences as you navigate the Services.
Choices Relating to the Personal Data We Collect
Personal Data
. You may decline to provide Personal Data when it is requested by PayPal, but certain Services or all of the Services may be unavailable to you.
Location and other device-level information
. The device you use to access the Sites or Services may collect information about you, including Geolocation Information and User usage data that PayPal may then collect and use. For information about your ability to restrict the collection and use of such information, please use the settings available in the device.
Choices Relating to Our Use of Your Personal Data
Personalized Services offered by PayPal on third-party websites and services
. You may manage your preferences for other PayPal Services that are personalized and offered to you on third-party websites from your Account. We may also provide you with instructions and prompts on how to manage your preferences within the Service experience.
Finding and connecting with others
. If available, you may manage your preferences for finding and connecting with others from your account of the Service you use.
Choices Relating to Account Connections
If you authorize an account connection to a third-party account or platform, such as a social media account, you may be able to manage your connection preferences from your Account or the third-party account or platform. Please refer to the privacy notice that governs the third-party platform for more information on the choices you may have.
Choices Relating to Cookies
You may have options available to manage your cookies preferences.  For example, your browser or internet device may allow you delete, disable, or block certain cookies and other tracking technologies. You can learn more by visiting AboutCookies.org. You may choose to enable these options, but doing so may prevent you from using many of the core features and functions available on a Service or Site.
You may have an option regarding the use of cookies and other tracking technologies when you use a Service or visit parts of a Site.  For example, you may be asked if you want the Service or Site to “remember” certain things about you, and we will use cookies and other tracking technologies to the extent that you permit them.
You can learn more about our cookies and tracking technologies by visiting the Statement on Cookies and Tracking Technologies page.
Choices Relating to Your Registration and Account Information
If you have an Account, you generally may review and edit Personal Data by logging in and updating the information directly or by contacting us.
Contact us
if you do not have an Account or if you have questions about your Account information or other Personal Data.
Choices Relating to Communication
Notices, Alerts and Updates from Us:
Marketing:
We may send you marketing content about our Sites, Services, products, products we jointly offer with financial institutions, as well as the products and services of unaffiliated third parties and members of the PayPal corporate family through various communication channels, for example, email, text, pop-ups, push notifications, and messaging applications.  You may opt out of these marketing communications by following the instructions in the communications you receive. If you have an Account with us, you may also adjust your communication preferences in your Account settings.  For messages sent via push notifications, you may manage your preferences in your device.
Informational and Other:
We will send communications to you that are required or necessary to send to Users of our Services, notifications that contain important information and other communications that you request from us. You may not opt out of receiving these communications.  However, you may be able to adjust the media and format through which you receive these notices.
9. How Do We Protect Your Data?
We maintain technical, physical, and administrative security measures designed to provide reasonable protection for your Personal Data against loss, misuse, unauthorized access, disclosure, and alteration.  The security measures include firewalls, data encryption, physical access controls to our data centers, and information access authorization controls.  While we are dedicated to securing our systems and Services, you are responsible for securing and maintaining the privacy of your password(s) and Account/profile registration information and verifying that the Personal Data we maintain about you is accurate and current.  We are not responsible for protecting any Personal Data that we share with a third-party based on an account connection that you have authorized.
10. Can Children Use Our Services?
The Sites and Services are not directed to children under the age of 13.  We do not knowingly collect information, including Personal Data, from children or other individuals who are not legally able to use our Sites and Services.  If we obtain actual knowledge that we have collected Personal Data from a child under the age of 13, we will promptly delete it, unless we are legally obligated to retain such data.
Contact us
if you believe that we have mistakenly or unintentionally collected information from a child under the age of 13.
11. What Else Should You Know?
Changes to This Privacy Statement
.
We may revise this Privacy Statement from time to time to reflect changes to our business, the Sites or Services, or applicable laws.  The revised Privacy Statement will be effective as of the published effective date.
If the revised version includes a substantial change, we will provide you with 30 days prior notice by posting notice of the change on the “Policy Update” page of our website.  We also may notify Users of the change using email or other means.
Transfers of Your Personal Data to Other Countries
Our operations are supported by a network of computers, cloud-based servers, and other infrastructure and information technology, including, but not limited to, third-party service providers.  We and our third-party service providers store and Process your Personal Data in the United States of America and elsewhere in the world.  We will protect your information as described in this Privacy Statement if your Personal Data is transferred to other countries.  By using our Sites and Services, you consent to your Personal Data being transferred to other countries, including countries that have different data protection rules than your country.  We do not represent that our Sites and Services are appropriate or available in any particular jurisdiction.
12. Contact Us
You may contact us if you have general questions about our Privacy Statement and practices or questions about your Account information or Personal Data.
We want to make sure your questions go to the right place:
Click
here
to contact us about your PayPal account
Click
here
to contact us about your Xoom account
13. Definitions
Account
means a PayPal or Xoom member account.
Device Information
means data that can be automatically collected from any device used to access the Sites or Services.  Such information may include, but is not limited to, your device type; your device’s network connections; your device’s name; your device’s IP address; information about your device’s web browser and the internet connection being used to access the Site or Services; Geolocation Information; information about apps downloaded to your device; and biometric data (e.g., Touch ID/Fingerprint to verify your identity).
Geolocation Information
means information that identifies with reasonable specificity your location by using, for instance, longitude and latitude coordinates obtained through GPS, Wi-Fi, or cell site triangulation.  Some of our Services may ask you for permission to share your current location.  Some of the Sites and Services require this information to provide a specific product or online Service.  If you do not agree to our collection of the geolocation information, our Sites or Services may not function properly when you try to use them.
Checkout without a PayPal Account
means a person’s use of the Services without logging into and/or establishing an Account.
PayPal
means PayPal Payments Private Limited and subsidiaries or affiliates.  In this Privacy Statement, PayPal is sometimes referred to as “we,” “us,” or “our,” depending on the context.
Personal Data
means personal information that can be associated with an identified or identifiable person.  “Personal Data” can include name, postal address (including billing and shipping addresses), telephone number, email address, payment card number, other financial account information, account number, date of birth, and government-issued credentials (e.g., driver’s license number, national ID, passport, Social Security number and Taxpayer ID).  Personal Data does not include information that does not identify a specific User.
Process
means any method or way that we handle Personal Data or sets of Personal Data, whether or not by automated means, such as collection, recording, organization, structuring, storage, adaptation or alteration, retrieval, and consultation, disclosure by transmission, disseminating or otherwise making available, alignment or combination, restriction, erasure or destruction of Personal Data.
Services
means any products, services, content, features, technologies, or functions, and all related websites, applications and services offered to you by PayPal or Xoom.
Sites
means the websites, mobile apps, official social media platforms, or other online properties through which PayPal offers the Services and which has posted or linked to this Privacy Statement.
Technical Usage Data
means information we collect from your phone, computer or other device that you use to access the Sites or Services.  Technical Usage Data tells us how you use the Sites and Services, such as what you have searched for and viewed on the Sites and the way you use our Services, including your IP address, statistics regarding how pages are loaded or viewed, the websites you visited before coming to the Sites and other usage and browsing information collected through Cookies.
User
means an individual who uses the Services or accesses the Sites and has established a relationship with PayPal (for example, by opening an Account and agreeing to the PayPal or Xoom User Agreement) or otherwise uses the Services as a buyer, seller or other type of participant to a transaction, including a Checkout without a PayPal Account.
14. Additional Information
The information provided in this section may be specific to customers depending on your region or how you use the Services. This information is provided to PayPal from third parties whom you may interact when using the Services.
Google ReCaptcha
PayPal uses ReCaptcha on the Sites and Services. Your use of ReCaptcha is subject to the Google
Privacy Policy
and
Terms of Use
.
ReCaptcha is only used to fight spam and abuse.
Sub-policy 2
https://stripe.com/us/privacy/:
Stripe Services Agreement
Stripe Connected Account Agreement
Stripe Payments Company Terms
Acquirer Terms
Acquirer Disclosure
Cross River Bank
Deutsche Bank
Goldman Sachs Bank USA
PNC Bank
Issuing Bank Terms
Payment Method Terms
User Bank Debit Authorizations
Prohibited & Restricted Businesses
Other Products and Programs
Stripe Terminal Device EULA
Stripe Terminal Purchase Terms
Stripe Terminal Reseller Terms
Stripe Atlas Agreement
Stripe Climate Contribution Terms
Stripe Partner Ecosystem
Stripe Apps
App Developer Agreement
App Marketplace Agreement
Privacy
Privacy Policy
Cookies Policy
Privacy Shield Policy
Service Providers List
Data Processing Agreement
Data Transfers Addendum
Stripe Privacy Center
Intellectual Property
Intellectual Property Notice
Marks Usage
E-SIGN Disclosure
Licenses
Consumer Terms
Last updated: January 16, 2025
This Privacy Policy includes important information about your personal data and we encourage you to read it carefully.
Welcome
We provide financial infrastructure for the internet. Individuals and businesses of all sizes use our technology and services to facilitate purchases, accept payments, send payouts, and manage online businesses.
This Privacy Policy (“Policy”) describes the Personal Data that we collect, how we use and share it, and details on how you can reach us with privacy-related inquiries. The Policy also outlines your rights and choices as a data subject, including the right to object to certain uses of your Personal Data.
Depending on the activity, Stripe assumes the role of a “data controller” and/or “data processor” (or “service provider”). For more details about our privacy practices, including our role, the specific Stripe entity responsible under this Policy, and our legal bases for processing your Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
Defined Terms
In this Policy, “Stripe”, “we”, “our,” or “us” refers to the Stripe entity responsible for the collection, use, and handling of Personal Data as described in this document. Depending on your jurisdiction, the specific Stripe entity accountable for your Personal Data might vary.
Learn More
.
“Personal Data” refers to any information associated with an identified or identifiable individual, which can include data that you provide to us, and that we collect about you during your interaction with our Services (such as device information, IP address, etc.).
“Services” refers to the products, services, devices, and applications, that we provide under the Stripe Services Agreement (“Business Services”) or the Stripe Consumer Terms of Service (“End User Services”); websites (“Sites”) like Stripe.com and Link.com; and other Stripe applications and online services. We provide Business Services to entities (“Business Users”). We provide End User Services directly to individuals for their personal use.
“Financial Partners” are financial institutions, banks, and other partners such as payment method acquirers, payout providers, and card networks that we partner with to provide the Services.
Depending on the context, “you” might be an End Customer, End User, Representative, or Visitor:
End Users.
When you use an End User Service, such as saving a payment method with Link, for personal use we refer to you as an “End User.”
End Customers.
When you are not directly transacting with Stripe, but we receive your Personal Data to provide Services to a Business User, including when you make a purchase from a Business User on a Stripe Checkout page or receive payments from a Business User, we refer to you as an “End Customer.”
Representatives.
When you are acting on behalf of an existing or potential Business User—perhaps as a company founder, account administrator for a Business User, or a recipient of an employee credit card from a Business User via Stripe Issuing—we refer to you as a “Representative.”
Visitors.
When you interact with Stripe by visiting a Site without being logged into a Stripe account, or when your interaction with Stripe does not involve you being an End User, End Customer, or Representative, we refer to you as a “Visitor.” For example, you are a Visitor when you send a message to Stripe asking for more information about our Services.
In this Policy, “Transaction Data” refers to data collected and used by Stripe to facilitate transactions you request. Some Transaction Data is Personal Data and may include: your name, email address, contact number, billing and shipping address, payment method information (like credit or debit card number, bank account details, or payment card image chosen by you), merchant and location details, amount and date of purchase, and in some instances, information about what was purchased.
1. Personal Data that we collect and how we use and share it
2. More ways we collect, use and share Personal Data
3. Legal bases for processing data
4. Your rights and choices
5. Security and retention
6. International data transfers
7. Updates and notifications
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
9. Contact us
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
1. Personal Data we collect and how we use and share it
Our collection and use of Personal Data differs based on whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, and the specific Service that you are using. For example, if you're a sole proprietor who wants to use our Business Services, we may collect your Personal Data to onboard your business; at the same time, you might also be an End Customer if you've bought goods from another Business User that is using our Services for payment processing. You could also be an End User if you used our End User Service, such as Link, for those transactions.
1.1 End Users
We provide End User Services when we provide the Services directly to you for your personal use (e.g., Link). Additional details regarding our collection, usage, and sharing of End User Personal Data, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Users
Using Link or Connecting your bank account
. Stripe offers a service called "Link," which allows you to create an account and store information for future interactions with Stripe’s Services and Business Users. You may save a number of different kinds of Personal Data using Link. For instance, you may save your name, payment method details, contact information, and address to conveniently use saved information to pay for transactions across our Business Users. When you choose to pay with Link, we will also collect Transaction Data associated with your transactions.
Learn More
.
You can also share and save bank account details to your Link account using Stripe’s
Financial Connections
product. When you use Financial Connections, Stripe will periodically collect and process your account information (such as bank account owner information, account balances, account number and details, account transactions, and, in some cases, log-in credentials). You can ask us to cease the collection of such data at any time.
Learn More
.
Finally, you can use Link to store your identity documents (such as your driver’s license) so that you can share them in future interactions with Stripe or its Business Users.
Paying Stripe
. When you purchase goods or services directly from Stripe, we receive your Transaction Data. For instance, when you make a payment to Stripe Climate, we collect information about the transaction, as well as your contact and payment method details.
Identity/Verification Services
. We offer an identity verification service that automates the comparison of your identity document (such as a driver’s license) with your image (such as a selfie). You can separately consent to us using your biometric data to enhance our verification technology, with the option to revoke your consent at any time.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Users, including about your online activity and your engagement with our End User Services, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Users
Services
. We use and share your Personal Data to provide the End User Services to you, which includes support, personalization (such as language preferences and setting choices), and communication about our End User Services (such as communicating Policy updates and information about our Services). For example, Stripe may use cookies and similar technologies or the data you provide to our Business Users (such as when you input your email address on a Business User’s website) to recognize you and help you use Link when visiting our Business User’s website. Learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies in Stripe’s
Cookie Policy
.
Our Business Users.
When you use Link to make payments with our Business Users, we share your Personal Data, including name, contact information, payment method details, and Transaction Data with those Business Users.
Learn More
. You can also direct Stripe to share your saved bank account information and identity documents with Business Users you do business with. Once we share your Personal Data with Business Users, we may process that Personal Data as a Data Processor for those Business Users, as detailed in Section 1.2 of this Policy.  You should consult the privacy policies of the Business Users’ you do business with for information on how they use the information shared with them.
Fraud Detection and Loss Prevention
. We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect fraud and prevent financial losses for you, us, and our Business Users and Financial Partners, including detecting unauthorized purchases. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those that use our fraud prevention-related Business Services (such as Stripe Radar), with Personal Data about you (including your attempted transactions) so that they can assess the fraud or loss risk associated with the transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, we may use your Personal Data, including Transaction Data, to assess your eligibility for, and offer you, other End User Services or promote existing End User Services, including through co-marketing with partners such as Stripe Business Users.
Learn more
. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we use and share End User Personal Data with third party partners to allow us to advertise our End User Services to you, including through interest-based advertising, and to track the efficacy of such ads. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third-party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about ways we may use and share End Users' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.2 End Customers
Stripe provides various Business Services to our Business Users, which include processing in-person or online payments or payouts for those Business Users. When acting as a service provider—also referred to as a Data Processor—for a Business User, we process End Customer Personal Data in accordance with our agreement with the Business User and the Business User's lawful instructions. This happens, for example, when we process a payment for a Business User because you purchased a product from them, or when the Business User asks us to send you funds.
Business Users are responsible for ensuring that the privacy rights of their End Customers are respected, including obtaining appropriate consents and making disclosures about their own data collection and use associated with their products and services. If you're an End Customer, please refer to the privacy policy of the Business User you're doing business with for its privacy practices, choices, and controls.
We provide more comprehensive information about our collection, use, and sharing of End Customer Personal Data in our
Privacy Center
, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing your Personal Data.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Customers
Transaction Data
. If you're an End Customer making payments to, receiving refunds or payments from, initiating a purchase or donation, or otherwise transacting with our Business User, whether in-person or online, we receive your Transaction Data. We may also receive your transaction history with the Business User.
Learn More
. Additionally, we may collect information entered into a checkout form even if you opt not to complete the form or transaction with the Business User.
Learn More
. A Business User who uses Stripe’s Terminal Service to provide its goods or services to End Customers may use the Terminal Service to collect End Customer Personal Data (like your name, email, phone number, address, signature, or age) in accordance with its own privacy policy.
Identity/Verification Information
. Stripe provides a verification and fraud prevention Service that our Business Users can use to verify Personal Data about you, such as your authorization to use a particular payment method. During the process, you’d be asked to share with us certain Personal Data (like your government ID and selfie for biometric verification, Personal Data you input, or Personal Data that is apparent from the physical payment method like a credit card image). To protect against fraud and determine if somebody is trying to impersonate you, we may cross-verify this data with information about you that we've collected from Business Users, Financial Partners, business affiliates, identity verification services, publicly available sources, and other third party service providers and sources.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Customers, including about your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Customers
To provide our Business Services to our Business Users, we use and share End Customers' Personal Data with them. Where allowed, we also use End Customers' Personal Data for Stripe’s own purposes such as enhancing security, improving and offering our Business Services, and preventing fraud, loss, and other damages, as described further below.
Payment processing and accounting
. We use your Transaction Data to deliver Payment-related Business Services to Business Users — including online payment transactions processing, sales tax calculation, and invoice, bill, and dispute handling — and to help them determine their revenue, settle their bills, and execute accounting tasks.
Learn More
. We may also use your Personal Data to provide and improve our Business Services.
During payment transactions, your Personal Data is shared with various entities in connection with your transaction. As a service provider or data processor, we share Personal Data to enable transactions as directed by Business Users. For instance, when you choose a payment method for your transaction, we may share your Transaction Data with your bank or other payment method provider, including as necessary to authenticate you, Learn More, process your transaction, prevent fraud, and handle disputes. The Business User you choose to do business with also receives Transaction Data and might share the data with others. Please review your merchant’s, bank’s, and payment method provider’s privacy policies for more information about how they use and share your Personal Data.
Financial services
. Certain Business Users leverage our Services to offer financial services to you via Stripe or our Financial Partners. For example, a Business User may issue a card product with which you can purchase goods and services. Such cards could carry the brand of Stripe, the bank partner, and/or the Business User. In addition to any Transaction Data we may generate or receive when these cards are used for purchases, we also collect and use your Personal Data to provide and manage these products, including assisting our Business Users in preventing misuse of the cards. Please review the privacy policies of the Business User and, if applicable, our bank partners associated with the financial service (the brands of which may be shown on the card) for more information.
Identity/Verification services
. We use Personal Data about your identity to perform verification services for Stripe or for the Business Users that you are transacting with, to prevent fraud, and to enhance security. For these purposes we may use Personal Data you provide directly or Personal Data we obtain from our service providers, including for phone verification.
Learn More
. If you provide a selfie along with an image of your identity document, we may employ biometric technology to compare and calculate whether they match and verify your identity.
Learn More
.
Fraud detection and loss prevention.
We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect and prevent losses for you, us, our Business Users, and Financial Partners. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those using our fraud prevention-related Business Services, with your Personal Data (including your attempted transactions) to help them assess the fraud or loss risk associated with a transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Our Business Users (and their authorized third parties).
We share End Customers' Personal Data with their respective Business Users and parties directly authorized by those Business Users to receive such data. Here are common examples of such sharing:
When a Business User instructs Stripe to provide another Business User with access to its Stripe account, including data related to its End Customers, via Stripe Connect.
Sharing information that you have provided to us with a Business User so that we can send payments to you on behalf of that Business User.
Sharing information, documents, or images provided by an End Customer with a Business User when the latter uses Stripe Identity, our identity verification Service, to verify the identity of the End Customer.
The Business Users you choose to do business with may further share your Personal Data with third parties (like additional third party service providers other than Stripe). Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information.
Advertising by Business Users
. If you initiate a purchasing process with a Business User, the Business User receives your Personal Data from us in connection with our provision of Services even if you don't finish your purchase. The Business User may use your Personal Data to market and advertise their products or services, subject to the terms of their privacy policy. Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information, including your rights to stop their use of your Personal Data for marketing purposes.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share End Customers' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.3 Representatives
We collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives of Business Users (for example, business owners) to provide our Business Services. For more information about how we collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives, as well as the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Representatives
Registration and contact information
. When you register for a Stripe account for a Business User (including incorporation of a Business), we collect your name and login credentials. If you register for or attend an event organized by Stripe or sign up to receive Stripe communications, we collect your registration and profile data. As a Representative, we may collect your Personal Data from third parties, including data providers, to advertise, market, and communicate with you as detailed further in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below. We may also link a location with you to tailor the Services or information effectively to your needs.
Learn More
.
Identification Information
. As a current or potential Business User, an owner of a Business User, or a shareholder, officer, or director of a Business User, we need your contact details, such as name, postal address, telephone number, and email address, to fulfill our Financial Partner and regulatory requirements, verify your identity, and prevent fraudulent activities and harm to the Stripe platform. We collect your Personal Data, such as ownership interest in the Business User, date of birth, government-issued identity documents, and associated identifiers, as well as any history of fraud or misuse, directly from you and/or from publicly available sources, third parties such as credit bureaus and via the Services we provide.
Learn More
. You may also choose to provide us with bank account information.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about Representatives, including your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Representatives
We typically use the Personal Data of Representatives to provide the Business Services to the corresponding Business Users. The ways we use and share this data are further described below.
Business Services
. We use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with Business Users to provide the Services requested by you or the Business User you represent.
In some instances, we may have to submit your Personal Data to a government entity to provide our Business Services, for purposes such as the incorporation of a business, or calculating and paying applicable sales tax. For our tax-related Business Services, we may use your Personal Data to prepare tax documents and file taxes on behalf of the Business User you represent. For our Atlas business incorporation Services, we may use your Personal Data to submit forms to the IRS on your behalf and file documents with other government authorities, such as articles of incorporation in your state of incorporation.
We share Representatives’ Personal Data with parties authorized by the corresponding Business User, such as Financial Partners servicing a financial product, or third party apps or services the Business User chooses to use alongside our Business Services. Here are common examples of such sharing:
Payment method providers, like Visa or WeChat Pay, require information about Business Users and their Representatives who accept their payment methods. This information is typically required during the onboarding process or for processing transactions and handling disputes for these Business Users.
Learn More
.
A Business User may authorize Stripe to share your Personal Data with other Business Users to facilitate the provision of Services through Stripe Connect.
The use of Personal Data by a third party authorized by a Business User is subject to the third party’s privacy policy.
If you are a Business User who has chosen a name that includes Personal Data (for example, a sole proprietorship or family name in a company name), we will use and share such information for the provision of our Services in the same way we do with any company name. This may include, for example, displaying it on receipts and other transaction-identifying descriptions.
Fraud detection and loss prevention
. We use Representatives’ Personal Data to identify and manage risks that our Business Services might be used for fraudulent activities causing losses to Stripe, End Users, End Customers, Business Users, Financial Partners, and others. We also use information about you obtained from publicly available sources, third parties like credit bureaus and from our Services to address such risks, including to identify patterns of misuse and monitor for terms of service violations. Stripe may share Representatives' Personal Data with Business Users, our Financial Partners, and third party service providers, including phone verification providers,
Learn More
, to verify the information provided by you and identify risk indicators.
Learn More
. We also use and share Representatives' Personal Data to conduct due diligence, including conducting anti-money laundering and sanctions screening in accordance with applicable law.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
. We may also use your Personal Data, including your Stripe account activity, to evaluate your eligibility for and offer you Business Services or promote existing Business Services.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share Representatives’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.4 Visitors
We collect, use, and share the Personal Data of Visitors. More details about how we collect, use, and share Visitors’ Personal Data, along with the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Visitors
When you browse our Sites, we receive your Personal Data, either provided directly by you or collected through our use of cookies and similar technologies. See our
Cookie Policy
for more information. If you opt to complete a form on the Site or third party websites where our advertisements are displayed (like LinkedIn or Facebook), we collect the information you included in the form. This may include your contact information and other information pertaining to your questions about our Services. We may also associate a location with your visit.
Learn More
.
More
. Further details about other types of Personal Data that we may collect from Visitors, including your online activity, can be found in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Visitors
Personalization
. We use the data we collect about you using cookies and similar technologies to measure engagement with the content on the Sites, improve relevancy and navigation, customize your experience (such as language preference and region-specific content), and curate content about Stripe and our Services that's tailored to you. For instance, as not all of our Services are available globally, we may customize our responses based on your region.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Visitors’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
.
Engagement
. As you interact with our Sites, we use the information we collect about and through your devices to provide opportunities for further interactions, such as discussions about Services or interactions with chatbots, to address your questions.
More
. For more information about additional ways we may use and share Visitors’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
2. More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
In addition to the ways described above, we also process your Personal Data as follows:
a. Collection of Personal Data
Online Activity
. Depending on the Service used and how our Business Services are implemented by the Business Users, we may collect information related to:
The devices and browsers you use across our Sites and third party websites, apps, and other online services (“Third Party Sites”).
Usage data associated with those devices and browsers and your engagement with our Services, including data elements like IP address, plug-ins, language preference, time spent on Sites and Third Party Sites, pages visited, links clicked, payment methods used, and the pages that led you to our Sites and Third Party Sites. We also collect activity indicators, such as mouse activity indicators, to help us detect fraud.
Learn More
. See also our
Cookie Policy
.
Communication and Engagement Information
. We also collect information you choose to share with us through various channels, such as support tickets, emails, or social media. If you respond to emails or surveys from Stripe, we collect your email address, name, and any other data you opt to include in your email or responses. If you engage with us over the phone, we collect your phone number and any other information you might provide during the call. Calls with Stripe or Stripe representatives may be recorded.
Learn More
. Additionally, we collect your engagement data, like your registration for, attendance at, or viewing of Stripe events and any other interactions with Stripe personnel.
Forums and Discussion Groups
. If our Sites allow posting of content, we collect Personal Data that you provide in connection with the post.
b. Use of Personal Data.
Besides the use of Personal Data described above, we use Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Analyzing, Improving, and Developing our Services
. We collect and process Personal Data throughout our various Services, whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, to improve our Services, develop new Services, and support our efforts to make our Services more efficient, relevant, and useful to you.
Learn More
.  We may use Personal Data to generate aggregate and statistical information to understand and explain how our Services are used.  Examples of how we use Personal Data to analyze, improve, and develop our products and services include:
Using analytics on our Sites, including as described in our Cookie Policy, to help us understand your use of our Sites and Services and diagnose technical issues.
Training machine learning models to power our Services and protect against fraud and other harm.
Learn more
.
Analyzing and drawing inferences from Transaction Data to reduce costs, fraud, and disputes and increase authentication and authorization rates for Stripe and our Business Users.
Communications
. We use the contact information we have about you to deliver our Services,
Learn More
, which may involve sending codes via SMS for your authentication.
Learn More
. If you are an End User, Representative, or Visitor, we may communicate with you using the contact information we have about you to provide information about our Services and our affiliates’ services, invite you to participate in our events, surveys, or user research, or otherwise communicate with you for marketing purposes, in compliance with applicable law, including any consent or opt-out requirements. For example, when you provide your contact information to us or when we collect your business contact details through participation at trade shows or other events, we may use this data to follow up with you regarding an event, provide information requested about our Services, and include you in our marketing information campaigns. Where permitted under applicable law, we may record our calls with you to provide our Services, comply with our legal obligations, perform research and quality assurance, and for training purposes.
Social Media and Promotions
. If you opt to submit Personal Data to engage in an offer, program, or promotion, we use the Personal Data you provide to manage the offer, program, or promotion. We also use the Personal Data you provide, along with the Personal Data you make available on social media platforms, for marketing purposes, unless we are not permitted to do so.
Fraud Prevention and Security
. We collect and use Personal Data to help us identify and manage activities that could be fraudulent or harmful across our Services, enable our fraud detection Business Services, and secure our Services and transactions against unauthorized access, use, alteration or misappropriation of Personal Data, information, and funds. As part of the fraud prevention, detection, security monitoring, and compliance efforts for Stripe and its Business Users, we collect information from publicly available sources, third parties (such as credit bureaus), and via the Services we offer. In some instances, we may also collect information about you directly from you, or from our Business Users, Financial Partners, and other third parties for the same purposes. Furthermore, to protect our Services, we may receive details such as IP addresses and other identifying data about potential security threats from third parties.
Learn More
. Such information helps us verify identities, conduct credit checks where lawfully permitted, and prevent fraud. Additionally, we might use technology to evaluate the potential risk of fraud associated with individuals seeking to procure our Business Services or arising from attempted transactions by an End Customer or End User with our Business Users or Financial Partners.
Compliance with Legal Obligations
. We use Personal Data to meet our contractual and legal obligations related to anti-money laundering, Know-Your-Customer ("KYC") laws, anti-terrorism activities, safeguarding vulnerable customers, export control, and prohibition of doing business with restricted persons or in certain business fields, among other legal obligations. For example, we may monitor transaction patterns and other online signals and use those insights to identify fraud, money laundering, and other harmful activity that could affect Stripe, our Financial Partners, End Users, Business Users and others.
Learn More
. Safety, security, and compliance for our Services are key priorities for us, and collecting and using Personal Data is crucial to this effort.
Minors
. Our Services are not directed to children under the age of 13, and we request that they do not provide Personal Data to seek Services directly from Stripe. In certain jurisdictions, we may impose higher age limits as required by applicable law.
c. Sharing of Personal Data.
Besides the sharing of Personal Data described above, we share Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Stripe Affiliates
. We share Personal Data with other Stripe-affiliated entities for purposes identified in this Policy.
Service Providers or Processors
. In order to provide, communicate, market, analyze, and advertise our Services, we depend on service providers. These providers offer critical services such as providing cloud infrastructure, conducting analytics for the assessment of the speed, accuracy, and/or security of our Services, verifying identities, identifying potentially harmful activity, and providing customer service and audit functions. We authorize these service providers to use or disclose the Personal Data we make available to them to perform services on our behalf and to comply with relevant legal obligations. We require these service providers to contractually commit to security and confidentiality obligations for the Personal Data they process on our behalf. The majority of our service providers are based in the European Union, the United States of America, and India.
Learn More
.
Financial Partners
. We share Personal Data with certain Financial Partners to provide Services to Business Users and offer certain Services in conjunction with these Financial Partners. For instance, we may share certain Personal Data, such as payment processing volume, loan repayment data, and Representative contact information, with institutional investors and lenders who purchase loan receivables or provide financing related to Stripe Capital.
Learn More
.
Others with Consent
. In some situations, we may not offer a service, but instead refer you to others (like professional service firms that we partner with to deliver the Atlas Service). In these instances, we will disclose the identity of the third party and the information to be shared with them, and seek your consent to share the information.
Corporate Transactions
. If we enter or intend to enter a transaction that modifies the structure of our business, such as a reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer, change of control, or other disposition of all or part of our business, assets, or stock, we may share Personal Data with third parties in connection with such transaction. Any other entity that buys us or part of our business will have the right to continue to use your Personal Data, subject to the terms of this Policy.
Compliance and Harm Prevention
. We share Personal Data when we believe it is necessary to comply with applicable law; to abide by rules imposed by Financial Partners in connection with the use of their payment method; to enforce our contractual rights; to secure and protect the Services, rights, privacy, safety, and property of Stripe, you, and others, including against malicious or fraudulent activity; and to respond to valid legal requests from courts, law enforcement agencies, regulatory agencies, and other public and government authorities, which may include authorities outside your country of residence.
3. Legal bases for processing Personal Data
For purposes of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) and other applicable data protection laws, we rely on a number of legal bases to process your Personal Data.
Learn More
. For some jurisdictions, there may be additional legal bases, which are outlined in the
Jurisdiction-Specific Provisions
section below.
a. Contractual and Pre-Contractual Business Relationships
. We process Personal Data to enter into business relationships with prospective Business Users and End Users and fulfill our respective contractual obligations with them. These processing activities include:
Creation and management of Stripe accounts and Stripe account credentials, including the assessment of applications to initiate or expand the use of our Services;
Creation and management of Stripe Checkout accounts;
Accounting, auditing, and billing activities; and
Processing of payments and related activities, which include fraud detection, loss prevention, transaction optimization, communications about such payments, and related customer service activities.
b. Legal Compliance
. We process Personal Data to verify the identities of individuals and entities to comply with obligations related to fraud monitoring, prevention, and detection, laws associated with identifying and reporting illicit and illegal activities, such as those under the Anti-Money Laundering ("AML") and Know-Your-Customer (“KYC") regulations, and financial reporting obligations. For example, we may be required to record and verify a Business User’s identity to comply with regulations designed to prevent money laundering, fraud, and financial crimes. These legal obligations may require us to report our compliance to third parties and subject ourselves to third party verification audits.
c. Legitimate Interests
. Where permitted under applicable law, we rely on our legitimate business interests to process your Personal Data. The following list provides an example of the business purposes for which we have a legitimate interest in processing your data:
Detection, monitoring, and prevention of fraud and unauthorized payment transactions;
Mitigation of financial loss, claims, liabilities or other harm to End Customers, End Users, Business Users, Financial Partners, and Stripe;
Determination of eligibility for and offering new Stripe Services (
Learn More
);
Response to inquiries, delivery of Service notices, and provision of customer support;
Promotion, analysis, modification, and improvement of our Services, systems, and tools, as well as the development of new products and services, including enhancing the reliability of the Services;
Management, operation, and improvement of the performance of our Sites and Services, through understanding their effectiveness and optimizing our digital assets;
Analysis and advertisement of our Services, and related improvements;
Aggregate analysis and development of business intelligence that enable us to operate, protect, make informed decisions about, and report on the performance of our business;
Sharing of Personal Data with third party service providers that offer services on our behalf and business partners that help us in operating and improving our business (
Learn More)
;
Enabling network and information security throughout Stripe and our Services; and
Sharing of Personal Data among our affiliates.
d. Consent
. We may rely on consent or explicit consent to collect and process Personal Data regarding our interactions with you and the provision of our Services such as Link, Financial Connections, Atlas, and Identity. When we process your Personal Data based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time, and such a withdrawal will not impact the legality of processing performed based on the consent prior to its withdrawal.
e. Substantial Public Interest
. We may process special categories of Personal Data, as defined by the GDPR, when such processing is necessary for reasons of substantial public interest and consistent with applicable law, such as when we conduct politically-exposed person checks. We may also process Personal Data related to criminal convictions and offenses when such processing is authorized by applicable law, such as when we conduct sanctions screening to comply with AML and KYC obligations.
f. Other valid legal bases
. We may process Personal Data further to other valid legal bases as recognized under applicable law in specific jurisdictions. See the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section below for more information.
4. Your rights and choices
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have choices regarding our collection, use, and disclosure of your Personal Data:
a. Opting out of receiving electronic communications from us
If you wish to stop receiving marketing-related emails from us, you can opt-out by clicking the unsubscribe link included in such emails or as described
here
. We'll try to process your request(s) as quickly as reasonably practicable. However, it's important to note that even if you opt out of receiving marketing-related emails from us, we retain the right to communicate with you about the Services you receive (like support and important legal notices) and our Business Users might still send you messages or instruct us to send you messages on their behalf.
b. Your data protection rights
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have the following rights regarding the Personal Data we process about you as a data controller:
The right to request confirmation of whether Stripe is processing Personal Data associated with you, the categories of personal data it has processed, and the third parties or categories of third parties with which your Personal Data is shared;
The right to request access to the Personal Data Stripe processes about you (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe rectify or update your Personal Data if it's inaccurate, incomplete, or outdated;
The right to request that Stripe erase your Personal Data in certain circumstances as provided by law (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe restrict the use of your Personal Data in certain circumstances, such as while Stripe is considering another request you've submitted (for instance, a request that Stripe update your Personal Data);
The right to request that we export the Personal Data we hold about you to another company, provided it's technically feasible;
The right to withdraw your consent if your Personal Data is being processed based on your previous consent;
The right to object to the processing of your Personal Data if we are processing your data based on our legitimate interests; unless there are compelling legitimate grounds or the processing is necessary for legal reasons, we will cease processing your Personal Data upon receiving your objection (
Learn More
);
The right not to be discriminated against for exercising these rights; and
The right to appeal any decision by Stripe relating to your rights by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
, and/or relevant regulatory agencies.
You may have additional rights, depending on applicable law, over your Personal Data. For example, see the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section under United States below.
c. Process for exercising your data protection rights
To exercise your data protection rights related to Personal Data we process as a data controller, visit our
Privacy Center
or contact us as outlined below.  For Personal Data we process as a data processor, please reach out to the relevant data controller (Business User) to exercise your rights. If you contact us regarding your Personal Data we process as a data processor, we will refer you to the relevant data controller to the extent we are able to identify them.
5. Security and Retention
We make reasonable efforts to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk associated with the processing of your Personal Data. We maintain organizational, technical, and administrative measures designed to protect the Personal Data covered by this Policy from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse.
Learn More
. Unfortunately, no data transmission or storage system can be guaranteed to be 100% secure.
We encourage you to assist us in protecting your Personal Data. If you hold a Stripe account, you can do so by using a strong password, safeguarding your password against unauthorized use, and avoiding using identical login credentials you use for other services or accounts for your Stripe account. If you suspect that your interaction with us is no longer secure (for instance, you believe that your Stripe account's security has been compromised), please
contact us
immediately.
We retain your Personal Data for as long as we continue to provide the Services to you or our Business Users, or for a period in which we reasonably foresee continuing to provide the Services. Even after we stop providing Services directly to you or to a Business User that you're doing business with, and even after you close your Stripe account or complete a transaction with a Business User, we may continue to retain your Personal Data to:
Comply with our legal and regulatory obligations;
Enable fraud monitoring, detection, and prevention activities; and
Comply with our tax, accounting, and financial reporting obligations, including when such retention is required by our contractual agreements with our Financial Partners (and where data retention is mandated by the payment methods you've used).
In cases where we keep your Personal Data, we do so in accordance with any limitation periods and record retention obligations imposed by applicable law.
Learn More
.
6. International Data Transfers
As a global business, it's sometimes necessary for us to transfer your Personal Data to countries other than your own, including the United States. These countries might have data protection regulations that are different from those in your country. When transferring data across borders, we take measures to comply with applicable data protection laws related to such transfer. In certain situations, we may be required to disclose Personal Data in response to lawful requests from officials, such as law enforcement or security authorities.
Learn More
.
If you are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”), the United Kingdom ("UK"), or Switzerland, please refer to our
Privacy Center
for additional details. When a data transfer mechanism is mandated by applicable law, we employ one or more of the following:
Transfers to certain countries or recipients that are recognized as having an adequate level of protection for Personal Data under applicable law.
EU Standard Contractual Clauses approved by the European Commission and the UK International Data Transfer Addendum issued by the Information Commissioner’s Office. You can obtain a copy of the relevant Standard Contractual Clauses.
Learn More
.
Other lawful methods available to us under applicable law.
Stripe, Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce and as applicable.
Learn More
.
Stripe’s privacy practices, as described in this Privacy Policy, comply with the Cross Border Privacy Rules System (“CBPR”) and Privacy Rules for Processor (“PRP”) systems. These systems provide a framework for organizations to ensure protection of personal data transferred among participating economies. Where CBPR and/or PRP are recognized as a valid transfer mechanism under applicable law, Stripe will transfer Personal Data in accordance with the CBPR and PRP certifications Stripe has obtained. More information about the framework can be found
here
and
here
. If you have unresolved privacy or data use concerns that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S. based third-party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
. To view the status of our certifications, please click
here
(CBPR) and
here
(PRP).
7. Updates and notifications
We may change this Policy from time to time to reflect new services, changes in our privacy practices or relevant laws. The “Last updated” legend at the top of this Policy indicates when this Policy was last materially revised. Any changes are effective the latter of when we post the revised Policy on the Services or otherwise provide notice of the update as required by law.
We may provide you with disclosures and alerts regarding the Policy or Personal Data collected by posting them on our website and, if you are an End User or Representative, by contacting you through your Stripe Dashboard, email address and/or the physical address listed in your Stripe account.
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
Australia
. “Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under applicable privacy laws in Australia, including the Privacy Act 1988 (Cth) as amended from time to time.
If we use personal information to make automated decisions that could reasonably be expected to significantly affect your rights or interests, we will provide the legally required information and transparency via our
Privacy Center
, and/or on a case by case basis.
If you are an Australian resident and dissatisfied with our handling of any complaint you raise under this Policy, you may consider contacting the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner.
Brazil
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO Adi Gilad at dpo@stripe.com. Brazilian residents, for whom the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (“LGPD”) applies, have rights set forth in Article 18 of the LGPD.
Canada
. As used in this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Federal Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (“PIPEDA”), the Personal Information Protection Act, SBC 2003 c 63, in British Columbia, the Personal Information Protection Act, SA 2003 c P-6.5, in Alberta, and the Act Respecting the Protection of Personal Information in the Private Sector, CQLR c P-39-1 (“Quebec Private Sector Act”), in Quebec.
Learn more.
“Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under those laws.
Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer is the person in charge of personal information, including under the Quebec Private Sector Act.  You may contact them via email at privacy@stripe.com.  When Stripe collects Personal Data belonging to Canadian (including Quebec) residents, it transfers that data to data centers in the United States.  When Stripe relies on service providers to process Personal Data as described herein, those service providers may also be located outside of Canada or Quebec.
You have the right to request access or rectification of the Personal Data Stripe holds related to you or to withdraw any consent given to the processing of such personal data.  You may exercise those rights by contacting Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer at privacy@stripe.com.  If you are an End Customer, you should contact the Business User with which you transacted to exercise your rights.
EEA and UK
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If you are a resident of the EEA or the Stripe entity accountable for your Personal data is otherwise subject to the GDPR, and you believe our processing of your information contradicts the GDPR, you may direct your questions or complaints to the Irish Data Protection Commission. If you are a resident of the UK, direct your questions or concerns to the UK Information Commissioner’s Office. You also have additional rights under the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.
Learn More
.
India
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Digital Personal Data Protection Act (“DPDPA”) once the DPDPA enters into effect. Further, the term “data controller” includes “data fiduciaries,” and the term “data subject” includes “data principal,” both as defined in the DPDPA.
In some cases, and as permitted under the DPDPA, we may rely on “legitimate use” as a legal basis. For example, we might do so when you voluntarily provide your Personal Data to us. Where we are required to obtain your explicit and informed consent, we will do so on a case by case basis. “Consent Managers” as defined under the DPDPA may submit a request to revoke or provide consent using the methods described in the Contact Us section below, or as set out in the following paragraph, or via other means made available by Stripe in the future. We may ask for proof of authorization and identity before processing such a request.
You have the right to contact Stripe to nominate another individual, who may, in the event of your death or incapacity, exercise your rights under this Privacy Policy and under the DPDPA and implementing regulations.
In certain cases, you may be asked to consent to the collection and processing of your Aadhaar number by Stripe India Private Limited and/or its third party verification partner(s). The purpose of this collection is to facilitate the identification verification process as required under applicable laws. Your provision of Aadhaar details is purely voluntary, and you may provide other identification documents as may be accepted by us from time to time. You will not be denied service merely for not submitting Aadhaar details.
If you have any questions or complaints regarding the processing of your Personal Data in India, or if you want to receive this Policy or communicate with us about privacy in one of India’s official languages, please
contact our Nodal and Grievance Officer
.
Learn More
. Alternatively, you may contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If we are unable to address your complaint or grievance, you have the right to escalate the matter to the Data Protection Board of India.
Indonesia
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes Law No. 11 of 2008 as amended by Law No. 19 of 2016 on Electronic Information and Transactions, Government Regulation No. 71 of 2019 on the Implementation of Electronic Systems and Transactions, and Minister of Communication and Informatics Regulation No. 20 of 2016 on Personal Data Protection in Electronic Systems, and from September 2024, Law No. 27 of 2022 concerning Personal Data Protection (“PDP Law”). If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Japan
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Act on the Protection of Personal Information (“APPI”). When we transfer Personal Data of data subjects in Japan to jurisdictions not recognized as ‘adequate’ by the Personal Information Protection Commission, we enter into written agreements with any third parties located outside of Japan. These written agreements provide rights and obligations equivalent to those provided under the Japanese Act on the Protection of Personal Information. For more information on how we ensure that third parties protect your data and where your data is located, please see above or contact us as described below. For a description of foreign systems and frameworks that may affect the implementation of equivalent measures by the third party, see
here
. In some cases, and as permitted under the APPI, we may rely on “public interest” as a legal basis, such as fraud detection and loss prevention.
Malaysia
. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Singapore
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2012 (“PDPA”) (No. 26 of 2012) as amended from time to time. In some cases, and as permitted under the PDPA, we may rely on “deemed consent” as a legal basis. For example, we do so when you voluntarily provide your personal data to us. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Switzerland
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection (“FADP”), as revised. To exercise your rights under the FADP, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. You may also have additional rights under the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework.
Learn More
.
Thailand
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2019 (“PDPA”). If we rely on certain legal bases (such as “legal obligation” or “contractual necessity” and you do not provide us with your Personal Data, we may not be able to lawfully provide you services. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at
dpo@stripe.com
. Where required, we have put in place appropriate safeguards for the cross-border transfer of Personal Data from Thailand, including the EU Standard Contractual Clauses as adapted for Thailand data transfers in accordance with the Notification of the Personal Data Protection Committee on Criteria for the Protection of Personal Data Sent or Transferred to a Foreign Country Pursuant to Section 29 of the Personal Data Protection Act, B.E. 2562 B.E. 2566 (2023).
United States
. If you are a consumer located in the United States (“US”), we process your personal information in accordance with US federal and state privacy laws. For additional  details, please review the information below and see our additional U.S. Privacy Disclosures
here
. Stripe uses cookies, including advertising cookies, as described in our
Cookie Policy
.
Your Rights and Choices
. As a US consumer and subject to certain limitations under US privacy laws, you may have choices regarding our use and disclosure of your Personal Data.  In addition to the
above rights
, you may also have the rights listed in this section. Please see our Privacy Center to
learn more
about data subject rights metrics and
learn more
about the laws under which these rights may apply.
Exercising the right to know: You have a right to request additional information about the categories of personal information collected, sold, disclosed, or shared; purposes for which this personal information was collected, sold, or shared; categories of sources of personal information; and categories of third parties with whom we disclosed or shared this personal information.
Exercising the right to opt-out from a sale or sharing: We do not transfer your personal data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, as noted above, we may provide the data to third party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our products and Services to you. Because these third parties may use the data Stripe provides for their own purposes, Stripe's provision of data to these parties may be considered a data “sale” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising) as those terms are defined under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. You can opt out of targeted advertising and any related data “sales” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising)
here
.
Exercising the right to limit the use or sharing of Sensitive Personal Information: We do not sell or share (for behavioral advertising) Sensitive Personal Information as defined by US privacy laws and have not done so in the past 12 months. Learn more about our collection and use of Sensitive Personal Information over the last 12 months
here
.
Profiling with legal or similarly significant effects
: In the event that we engage in profiling or automated decision making for which applicable law entitles you to an opt out we will provide you with notice of how to exercise that opt-out right.
Appeal
: If you wish to appeal any of our decisions regarding a rights request under US privacy laws, you may do so by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
.
To submit a request to exercise any of the rights described above, please contact us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. Please note that rights under some U.S. state laws do not apply to Personal Data we collect, process, and disclose when you act as a consumer to obtain financial products or services from Stripe for personal, family, or household purposes. The federal Gramm-Leach Bliley Act may govern how Stripe shares and protects that data instead. See our
US Consumer Privacy Notice
below for more information.
We will verify your request by asking you to send it from the email address associated with your account or requiring you to provide information necessary to verify your identity, including name, address, transaction history, photo identification, and other information associated with your account.
You may designate, in writing or through a power of attorney, an authorized agent to make requests on your behalf to exercise your rights under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. Your agent may submit a request on your behalf by contacting us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. We may still require you to directly verify your identity and confirm that you gave the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
Global Privacy Control signals
. Stripe honors the Global Privacy Control (GPC) opt-out preference signals.
Learn More
.
9. Contact us
If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please
contact us
. If you are an End Customer (i.e., an individual doing business or transacting with a Business User), please refer to the privacy policy or notice of the Business User for information regarding the Business User’s privacy practices, choices and controls, or contact the Business User directly.
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
The following Consumer Privacy Notice applies to you if you are an individual who resides in the United States and obtains financial services from Stripe primarily for your own personal, family, or household purposes.
Last updated: January 16, 2025
FACTS
WHAT DOES STRIPE DO WITH YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
Why?
Financial companies choose how they share your personal information.  Federal law gives consumers the right to limit some but not all sharing.  Federal law also requires us to tell you how we collect, share, and protect your personal information.  Please read this notice carefully to understand what we do.
What?
The types of personal information we collect and share depend on the product or service you have with us. This information can include:
• Social Security Number
• Contact details
• Account balances and transaction history
• Payment, transaction, and purchase information and history
When you are
no longer
our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
How?
All financial companies need to share customers' personal information to run their everyday business. In the section below, we list the reasons financial companies can share their customers' personal information; the reasons Stripe chooses to share; and whether you can limit this sharing.
Reasons we can share your personal information
Does Stripe Share?
Can you limit this sharing
For our everyday business purposes – such as to process your transactions, maintain your account(s), respond to court orders and legal investigations, or report to credit bureaus
Yes
No
For our marketing purposes - to offer our products and Services to you
Yes
No
For joint marketing with other financial companies
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your transactions and experiences
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your creditworthiness
No
We don’t share
For our affiliates to market to you
No
We don’t share
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data not collected through Financial Connections)
Yes
Yes
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data collected through Financial Connections)
No
We don’t share
To limit our sharing
Login to your Link account at
app.link.com/settings
and toggle off data sharing from the Messaging menu.
Please note: If you are a new customer, we can begin sharing your information 30 days from the date we sent this notice. When you are no longer our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
However, you can contact us at any time to limit our sharing.
Questions?
Contact us at privacy@stripe.com or visit us at https://support.link.com
Who we are
Who is providing this notice?
Stripe, Inc., Stripe Payments Company, and their affiliates that provide consumers services in the U.S.
What we do
How does Stripe protect my personal information?
To protect your personal information from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse we use security measures to comply with federal law.  These measures include computer safeguards and secured files and buildings.  We impose access controls along with ongoing monitoring to prevent data misuse, and we require our service providers to take similar steps to protect your information.
How does Stripe collect my personal information?
We collect your personal information, for example, when you
• open a Link account;
• ask Stripe to process a payment for goods or services;
• provide bank account information to Stripe using Financial Connections
We also collect your personal information from others, such as affiliates or other companies.
Why can’t I limit all sharing?
Federal law gives you the right to limit only
• sharing for affiliates’ everyday business purposes — information about your creditworthiness
• affiliates from using your information to market to you
• sharing for nonaffiliates to market to you.
State laws and individual companies may give you additional rights to limit sharing. See the Other Important Information section below for more information on your rights under state law.
What happens when I limit sharing for an account I hold jointly with someone else?
Your choices will apply to everyone on your account.
Definitions
Affiliates
Companies related by common ownership or control. They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Our affiliates include companies operating under the Stripe name, such as Stripe Technology Europe, Ltd. and Stripe Payments UK, Ltd.
Nonaffiliates
Companies not related by common ownership or control.  They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Nonaffiliates with which we share personal information include service providers that perform services or functions on our behalf, Business Users with which you choose to transact, partners with which we share data to provide you with services, and advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Joint Marketing
A formal agreement between non-affiliated financial companies that together market financial products or services to you.
• Our joint marketing partners include financial companies we partner with to provide you with financial services.
Other important information
Vermont: If your account with us is associated with a Vermont billing address, we will not disclose information about your creditworthiness to our affiliates and will not disclose your personal information, financial information, credit report, or health information to nonaffiliated third parties to market to you, other than as permitted by Vermont law, unless you authorize us to make those disclosures.  For joint marketing, we will only disclose your name, contact information, and information about your transactions.  Additional information concerning our privacy policies can be found in our
Privacy Policy
and
Privacy Center
.
California: If your account with us is associated with a California billing address, we will not disclose Personal Data we collect about you except to the extent permitted under California law.  For instance, we may disclose your Personal Data as necessary to process transactions or provide products and services you request, at your instruction, as required for institution risk control, and to safeguard against fraud, identity theft, and unauthorized transactions.
For additional information about our privacy practices, please visit the
Stripe Privacy Center
.
Sub-policy 3
https://branch.io/policies/#privacy:
Error
All Contracts
Acceptable Use Policy
Branch Advocacy Program Terms and Conditions
Branch SaaS DPA
Branch SaaS Terms & Conditions
California Privacy Addendum
CCPA Resources
Data Subject Rights - CCPA & Other U.S. States
Data Subject Rights - EU
Data Subject Rights - LGPD
Information Security & Privacy Standards
Modern Slavery and Human Trafficking Statement
Onboarding Services SOW
Privacy Opt-Out
Privacy Policy
Professional Services Hours SOW
Professional Services Terms & Conditions
Reseller Customer Terms & Conditions
Service Level Addendum
Supplier Code of Conduct
Technical Audit Services SOW
Third Party List
Website Terms of Service
Effective December 31st 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Deep Linking And Attribution Analytics Services Acceptable Use Policy
Last updated December 30, 2024
This Acceptable Use Policy (“AUP”) sets forth certain restrictions on Your access and use of Branch Metrics, Inc.’s and its affiliates’ (collectively, “Branch” or “Us”) deep linking and attribution analytics services (collectively, the “Services”). This AUP is incorporated by reference into Branch’s Terms and Conditions, or instead, where there is a service agreement in place between You (“You”, “Your”, or “Customer”) and Branch Metrics, Inc. (“Agreement”). The restrictions set forth in this AUP are not exhaustive.
Applicability
. This Branch AUP applies to all Branch Customers, as well as all Authorized Users You provide access to the Services to on Your behalf.
Definitions
. The capitalized terms that are not defined in this AUP will have the meanings assigned to them in the Agreement.
Prohibited Actions
. You will not use, or facilitate or allow others to use, Branch’s Services to do any of the following:
collect, transmit or store any information or content that is offensive, illegal, fraudulent, harmful, threatening, abusive, harassing, tortious, defamatory, vulgar, obscene, libelous, invasive of another's privacy, hateful, or racially, ethnically based or otherwise poses a threat to the public;
collect, transmit or store any unsolicited or unauthorized advertising, promotional materials, “junk mail,” “spam,” “chain letters,” “pyramid schemes,” or any other forms of unauthorized solicitation;
for any content or activity that promotes or appears to promote human trafficking, or child sexual exploitation or abuse, or any other similar activity;
to interfere with or violate the rights of others (such as privacy rights and intellectual property rights);
collect, transmit, or store any sensitive information such as end user account passwords, financial information (e.g. bank account numbers, credit/debit card information, or any information regulated under the Gramm–Leach–Bliley Act), personal health information (including information regulated under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act), government identifiers (e.g. driver’s license, passport, national ID, social security, TIN or EIN numbers), or other information considered sensitive under applicable law such as biometric or genetic data, information about one’s religious beliefs, race, sex life or orientation;
create lists or segments of children under the age of 13, (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 18), advertise mobile applications or websites that are directed to children under 13, (and in certain jurisdictions under 18), and/or knowingly market products or services to children under the age of 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 18), without employing appropriate SDK Privacy Controls settings documented at https://help.branch.io/developers-hub/docs/sdkprivacy-controls within the Services to limit data collection for children under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 18), in order to comply with any applicable laws protecting children (including, but not limited to, GDPR and COPPA); or
use in any way, that in Branch’s judgment, threatens the security, integrity or availability of the Services.
Intellectual Property Restrictions
. You shall not attempt to reverse engineer, disassemble, copy or decompile the Services in any way. You shall also refrain from infringing any patent, trademark, trade secret, copyright, or other right of any party (including, but not limited to the Digital Millennium Copyright Act of 1998 ("DMCA") in Your use of the Services. Branch reserves the right to take any and all actions it deems necessary to mitigate and discontinue any suspected or actual infringement of the foregoing.
Service Integrity Restrictions.
You shall not attempt to perform any penetration testing, security vulnerability testing or other scans or tests to exploit the Services or attempt to bypass the Service’s security mechanisms or filtering capabilities. Additionally, You shall not attempt to perform any denial of service (DoS) attack on the Services or any other conduct that attempts to disrupt, disable, or overload the Services.
Investigation and Enforcement.
We may investigate accounts associated with any suspected violation of this AUP and remove or disable access to any content or resource that violates this AUP, including the suspension of the Services and/or termination of any agreements between you and Branch. You agree to cooperate with us to remedy any violation.
When determining whether there has been a violation of this AUP, we may consider your ability and willingness to comply with this AUP, including the policies and processes you have in place to prevent or identify and remove any prohibited content or activity. A violation of this AUP will be considered a material breach of the Agreement governing your use of the Services.
Reporting of Violations.
Potential violations of this AUP may be reported to
security@branch.io
.
Changes to this Policy.
We may modify this AUP at our sole discretion which will be effective upon posting of such modified version to Branch’s website at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-aup
.
Effective November 1st 2024
to
December 31st 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Deep Linking And Attribution Analytics Services Acceptable Use Policy
Last updated November 1, 2024
This Acceptable Use Policy (“AUP”) sets forth certain restrictions on Your access and use of Branch Metrics, Inc.’s and its affiliates’ (collectively, “Branch” or “Us”) deep linking and attribution analytics services (collectively, the “Services”). This AUP is incorporated by reference into Branch’s Terms and Conditions, or instead, where there is a service agreement in place between You (“You”, “Your”, or “Customer”) and Branch Metrics, Inc. (“Agreement”). The restrictions set forth in this AUP are not exhaustive.
Applicability
. This Branch AUP applies to all Branch Customers, as well as all Authorized Users You provide access to the Services to on Your behalf.
Definitions
. The capitalized terms that are not defined in this AUP will have the meanings assigned to them in the Agreement.
Prohibited Actions.
You will not use, or facilitate or allow others to use, Branch’s Services to do any of the following:
collect, transmit or store any information or content that is offensive, illegal, fraudulent, harmful, threatening, abusive, harassing, tortious, defamatory, vulgar, obscene, libelous, invasive of another's privacy, hateful, or racially, ethnically based or otherwise poses a threat to the public;
collect, transmit or store any unsolicited or unauthorized advertising, promotional materials, “junk mail,” “spam,” “chain letters,” “pyramid schemes,” or any other forms of unauthorized solicitation;
for any content or activity that promotes or appears to promote human trafficking, or child sexual exploitation or abuse, or any other similar activity;
to interfere with or violate the rights of others (such as privacy rights and intellectual property rights).
collect, transmit, or store any sensitive information such as end user account passwords, financial information (e.g. bank account numbers, credit/debit card information, or any information regulated under the Gramm–Leach–Bliley Act), personal health information (including information regulated under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act), government identifiers (e.g. driver’s license, passport, national ID, social security, TIN or EIN numbers), or other information considered sensitive under applicable law such as biometric or genetic data, information about one’s religious beliefs, race, sex life or orientation; or
create lists or segments of children under the age of 13, (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), advertise mobile applications or websites that are directed to children under 13, (and in certain jurisdictions under 16), and/or knowingly market products or services to children under the age of 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), without employing appropriate SDK Privacy Controls settings documented at https://help.branch.io/developers-hub/docs/sdkprivacy-controls within the Services to limit data collection for children under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16), in order to comply with any applicable laws protecting children (including, but not limited to, GDPR and COPPA)
use in any way, that in Branch’s judgment, threatens the security, integrity or availability of the Services.
Intellectual Property Restrictions
. You shall not attempt to reverse engineer, disassemble, copy or decompile the Services in any way. You shall also refrain from infringing any patent, trademark, trade secret, copyright, or other right of any party (including, but not limited to the Digital Millennium Copyright Act of 1998 ("DMCA") in Your use of the Services. Branch reserves the right to take any and all actions it deems necessary to mitigate and discontinue any suspected or actual infringement of the foregoing.
Service Integrity Restrictions
. You shall not attempt to perform any penetration testing, security vulnerability testing or other scans or tests to exploit the Services or attempt to bypass the Service’s security mechanisms or filtering capabilities. Additionally, You shall not attempt to perform any denial of service (DoS) attack on the Services or any other conduct that attempts to disrupt, disable, or overload the Services.
Investigation and Enforcement.
We may investigate accounts associated with any suspected violation of this AUP and remove or disable access to any content or resource that violates this AUP, including the suspension of the Services and/or termination of any agreements between you and Branch. You agree to cooperate with us to remedy any violation.
When determining whether there has been a violation of this AUP, we may consider your ability and willingness to comply with this AUP, including the policies and processes you have in place to prevent or identify and remove any prohibited content or activity. A violation of this AUP will be considered a material breach of the Agreement governing your use of the Services.
Reporting of Violations.
Potential violations of this AUP may be reported to
security@branch.io
.
Changes to this Policy.
We may modify this AUP at our sole discretion which will be effective upon posting of such modified version to Branch’s website at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-aup
.
Effective November 1st 2024
to
November 1st 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Deep Linking And Attribution Analytics Services Acceptable Use Policy
Last updated November 2, 2024
This Acceptable Use Policy (“AUP”) sets forth certain restrictions on Your access and use of Branch Metrics, Inc.’s and its affiliates’ (collectively, “Branch” or “Us”) deep linking and attribution analytics services (collectively, the “Services”). This AUP is incorporated by reference into Branch’s Terms and Conditions, or instead, where there is a service agreement in place between You (“You”, “Your”, or “Customer”) and Branch Metrics, Inc. (“Agreement”). The restrictions set forth in this AUP are not exhaustive.
Applicability
. This Branch AUP applies to all Branch Customers, as well as all Authorized Users You provide access to the Services to on Your behalf.
Definitions
. The capitalized terms that are not defined in this AUP will have the meanings assigned to them in the Agreement.
Prohibited Actions.
You will not use, or facilitate or allow others to use, Branch’s Services to do any of the following:
collect, transmit or store any information or content that is offensive, illegal, fraudulent, harmful, threatening, abusive, harassing, tortious, defamatory, vulgar, obscene, libelous, invasive of another's privacy, hateful, or racially, ethnically based or otherwise poses a threat to the public;
collect, transmit or store any unsolicited or unauthorized advertising, promotional materials, “junk mail,” “spam,” “chain letters,” “pyramid schemes,” or any other forms of unauthorized solicitation;
for any content or activity that promotes or appears to promote human trafficking, or child sexual exploitation or abuse, or any other similar activity;
to interfere with or violate the rights of others (such as privacy rights and intellectual property rights).
collect, transmit, or store any sensitive information such as end user account passwords, financial information (e.g. bank account numbers, credit/debit card information, or any information regulated under the Gramm–Leach–Bliley Act), personal health information (including information regulated under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act), government identifiers (e.g. driver’s license, passport, national ID, social security, TIN or EIN numbers), or other information considered sensitive under applicable law such as biometric or genetic data, information about one’s religious beliefs, race, sex life or orientation; or
create lists or segments of children under the age of 13, (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), advertise mobile applications or websites that are directed to children under 13, (and in certain jurisdictions under 16), and/or knowingly market products or services to children under the age of 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), without employing appropriate SDK Privacy Controls settings documented at https://help.branch.io/developers-hub/docs/sdkprivacy-controls within the Services to limit data collection for children under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16), in order to comply with any applicable laws protecting children (including, but not limited to, GDPR and COPPA)
use in any way, that in Branch’s judgment, threatens the security, integrity or availability of the Services.
Intellectual Property Restrictions
. You shall not attempt to reverse engineer, disassemble, copy or decompile the Services in any way. You shall also refrain from infringing any patent, trademark, trade secret, copyright, or other right of any party (including, but not limited to the Digital Millennium Copyright Act of 1998 ("DMCA") in Your use of the Services. Branch reserves the right to take any and all actions it deems necessary to mitigate and discontinue any suspected or actual infringement of the foregoing.
Service Integrity Restrictions
. You shall not attempt to perform any penetration testing, security vulnerability testing or other scans or tests to exploit the Services or attempt to bypass the Service’s security mechanisms or filtering capabilities. Additionally, You shall not attempt to perform any denial of service (DoS) attack on the Services or any other conduct that attempts to disrupt, disable, or overload the Services.
Investigation and Enforcement.
We may investigate accounts associated with any suspected violation of this AUP and remove or disable access to any content or resource that violates this AUP, including the suspension of the Services and/or termination of any agreements between you and Branch. You agree to cooperate with us to remedy any violation.
When determining whether there has been a violation of this AUP, we may consider your ability and willingness to comply with this AUP, including the policies and processes you have in place to prevent or identify and remove any prohibited content or activity. A violation of this AUP will be considered a material breach of the Agreement governing your use of the Services.
Reporting of Violations.
Potential violations of this AUP may be reported to
security@branch.io
.
Changes to this Policy.
We may modify this AUP at our sole discretion which will be effective upon posting of such modified version to Branch’s website at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-aup
.
Effective January 1st 2023
to
November 1st 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Deep Linking And Attribution Analytics Services
Acceptable Use Policy
Last updated June 10, 2022
This Acceptable Use Policy (“AUP”) sets forth certain restrictions on Your access and use of Branch Metrics, Inc.’s and its affiliates’ (collectively, “Branch” or “Us”) deep linking and attribution analytics services (collectively, the “Services”). This AUP is incorporated by reference into Branch’s Terms and Conditions, or instead, where there is a service agreement in place between You (“You”, “Your”, or “Customer”) and Branch Metrics, Inc. (“Agreement”). The restrictions set forth in this AUP are not exhaustive.
Applicability.
This Branch AUP applies to all Branch Customers, as well as all Authorized Users You provide access to the Services to on Your behalf. A breach of this AUP by You or any Authorized Users is considered a breach of the Agreement between You and Branch.
Definitions.
The capitalized terms that are not defined in this AUP will have the meanings assigned to them in the Agreement.
Prohibited Actions.
You will not use Branch’s Services to do any of the following:
collect, transmit or store any information or content that that is illegal, harmful, threatening, abusive, harassing, tortious, defamatory, vulgar, obscene, libelous, invasive of another's privacy, hateful, or racially, ethnically based or otherwise poses a threat to the public;
collect, transmit or store any unsolicited or unauthorized advertising, promotional materials, “junk mail,” “spam,” “chain letters,” “pyramid schemes,” or any other forms of unauthorized solicitation;
collect, transmit, or store any sensitive information such as end user account passwords, financial information (e.g. bank account numbers, credit/debit card information, or any information regulated under the Gramm–Leach–Bliley Act), personal health information (including information regulated under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act), government identifiers (e.g. driver’s license, passport, national ID, social security, TIN or EIN numbers), or other information considered sensitive under applicable law such as biometric or genetic data, information about one’s religious beliefs, race, sex life or orientation; or
create lists or segments of children under the age of 13, (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), advertise mobile applications or websites that are directed to children under 13, (and in certain jurisdictions under 16), and/or knowingly market products or services to children under the age of 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), without employing appropriate SDK Privacy Controls settings documented at
https://help.branch.io/developers-hub/docs/sdk-privacy-controls
within the Services to limit data collection for children under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16), in order to comply with any applicable laws protecting children (including, but not limited to, GDPR and COPPA)
Intellectual Property Restrictions.
You shall not attempt to reverse engineer, disassemble, copy or decompile the Services in any way. You shall also refrain from infringing any patent, trademark, trade secret, copyright, or other right of any party (including, but not limited to the Digital Millennium Copyright Act of 1998 ("DMCA") in Your use of the Services. Branch reserves the right to take any and all actions it deems necessary to mitigate and discontinue any suspected or actual infringement of the foregoing.
Service Integrity Restrictions.
You shall not attempt to perform any penetration testing, security vulnerability testing or other scans or tests to exploit the Services or attempt to bypass the Service’s security mechanisms or filtering capabilities. Additionally, You shall not attempt to perform any denial of service (DoS) attack on the Services or any other conduct that attempts to disrupt, disable, or overload the Services.
Effective October 11th 2022
to
January 1st 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Deep Linking And Attribution Analytics Services
Acceptable Use Policy
Last updated June 10, 2022
This Acceptable Use Policy (“AUP”) sets forth certain restrictions on Your access and use of Branch Metrics, Inc.’s and its affiliates’ (collectively, “Branch” or “Us”) deep linking and attribution analytics services (collectively, the “Services”). This AUP is incorporated by reference into Branch’s Terms and Conditions, or instead, where there is a service agreement in place between You (“You”, “Your”, or “Customer”) and Branch Metrics, Inc. (“Agreement”). The restrictions set forth in this AUP are not exhaustive.
Applicability.
This Branch AUP applies to all Branch Customers, as well as all Authorized Users You provide access to the Services to on Your behalf. A breach of this AUP by You or any Authorized Users is considered a breach of the Agreement between You and Branch.
Definitions.
The capitalized terms that are not defined in this AUP will have the meanings assigned to them in the Agreement.
Prohibited Actions.
You will not use Branch’s Services to do any of the following:
collect, transmit or store any information or content that that is illegal, harmful, threatening, abusive, harassing, tortious, defamatory, vulgar, obscene, libelous, invasive of another's privacy, hateful, or racially, ethnically based or otherwise poses a threat to the public;
collect, transmit or store any unsolicited or unauthorized advertising, promotional materials, “junk mail,” “spam,” “chain letters,” “pyramid schemes,” or any other forms of unauthorized solicitation;
collect, transmit, or store any sensitive information such as end user account passwords, financial information (e.g. bank account numbers, credit/debit card information, or any information regulated under the Gramm–Leach–Bliley Act), personal health information (including information regulated under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act), government identifiers (e.g. driver’s license, passport, national ID, social security, TIN or EIN numbers), or other information considered sensitive under applicable law such as biometric or genetic data, information about one’s religious beliefs, race, sex life or orientation; or
create lists or segments of children under the age of 13, (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), advertise mobile applications or websites that are directed to children under 13, (and in certain jurisdictions under 16), and/or knowingly market products or services to children under the age of 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), without employing appropriate SDK Privacy Controls settings documented at
https://help.branch.io/developers-hub/docs/sdk-privacy-controls
within the Services to limit data collection for children under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16), in order to comply with any applicable laws protecting children (including, but not limited to, GDPR and COPPA)
Intellectual Property Restrictions.
You shall not attempt to reverse engineer, disassemble, copy or decompile the Services in any way. You shall also refrain from infringing any patent, trademark, trade secret, copyright, or other right of any party (including, but not limited to the Digital Millennium Copyright Act of 1998 ("DMCA") in Your use of the Services. Branch reserves the right to take any and all actions it deems necessary to mitigate and discontinue any suspected or actual infringement of the foregoing.
Service Integrity Restrictions.
You shall not attempt to perform any penetration testing, security vulnerability testing or other scans or tests to exploit the Services or attempt to bypass the Service’s security mechanisms or filtering capabilities. Additionally, You shall not attempt to perform any denial of service (DoS) attack on the Services or any other conduct that attempts to disrupt, disable, or overload the Services.
Effective July 1st 2022
to
October 11th 2022
Download
Table of Contents
Deep Linking And Attribution Analytics Services
Acceptable Use Policy
Last updated June 10, 2022
This Acceptable Use Policy (“AUP”) sets forth certain restrictions on Your access and use of Branch Metrics, Inc.’s and its affiliates’ (collectively, “Branch” or “Us”) deep linking and attribution analytics services (collectively, the “Services”). This AUP is incorporated by reference into Branch’s Terms and Conditions, or instead, where there is a service agreement in place between You (“You”, “Your”, or “Customer”) and Branch Metrics, Inc. (“Agreement”). The restrictions set forth in this AUP are not exhaustive.
Applicability.
This Branch AUP applies to all Branch Customers, as well as all Authorized Users You provide access to the Services to on Your behalf. A breach of this AUP by You or any Authorized Users is considered a breach of the Agreement between You and Branch.
Definitions.
The capitalized terms that are not defined in this AUP will have the meanings assigned to them in the Agreement.
Prohibited Actions.
You will not use Branch’s Services to do any of the following:
collect, transmit or store any information or content that that is illegal, harmful, threatening, abusive, harassing, tortious, defamatory, vulgar, obscene, libelous, invasive of another's privacy, hateful, or racially, ethnically based or otherwise poses a threat to the public;
collect, transmit or store any unsolicited or unauthorized advertising, promotional materials, “junk mail,” “spam,” “chain letters,” “pyramid schemes,” or any other forms of unauthorized solicitation;
collect, transmit, or store any sensitive information such as end user account passwords, financial information (e.g. bank account numbers, credit/debit card information, or any information regulated under the Gramm–Leach–Bliley Act), personal health information (including information regulated under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act), government identifiers (e.g. driver’s license, passport, national ID, social security, TIN or EIN numbers), or other information considered sensitive under applicable law such as biometric or genetic data, information about one’s religious beliefs, race, sex life or orientation; or
create lists or segments of children under the age of 13, (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), advertise mobile applications or websites that are directed to children under 13, (and in certain jurisdictions under 16), and/or knowingly market products or services to children under the age of 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), without employing appropriate SDK Privacy Controls settings documented at
https://help.branch.io/developers-hub/docs/sdk-privacy-controls
within the Services to limit data collection for children under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16), in order to comply with any applicable laws protecting children (including, but not limited to, GDPR and COPPA)
Intellectual Property Restrictions.
You shall not attempt to reverse engineer, disassemble, copy or decompile the Services in any way. You shall also refrain from infringing any patent, trademark, trade secret, copyright, or other right of any party (including, but not limited to the Digital Millennium Copyright Act of 1998 ("DMCA") in Your use of the Services. Branch reserves the right to take any and all actions it deems necessary to mitigate and discontinue any suspected or actual infringement of the foregoing.
Service Integrity Restrictions.
You shall not attempt to perform any penetration testing, security vulnerability testing or other scans or tests to exploit the Services or attempt to bypass the Service’s security mechanisms or filtering capabilities. Additionally, You shall not attempt to perform any denial of service (DoS) attack on the Services or any other conduct that attempts to disrupt, disable, or overload the Services.
Effective June 1st 2022
to
July 1st 2022
Download
Table of Contents
Deep Linking And Attribution Analytics Services
Acceptable Use Policy
L
ast updated March 26th, 2020
This Acceptable Use Policy (“AUP”) sets forth certain restrictions on Your access and use of Branch Metrics, Inc.’s and its affiliates’ (collectively, “Branch” or “Us”) deep linking and attribution analytics services (collectively, the “Services”). This AUP is incorporated by reference into Branch’s Terms and C
onditions, or in
stead, where there is a service agreement in place between You (“You”, “Your”, or “Customer”) and Branch Metrics, Inc. (“Agreement”). The restrictions set forth in this AUP are not exhaustive.
Definitions.
The capitalized terms that are not defined in this AUP will have the meanings assigned to them in the Agreement.
Prohibited Actions.
You will not use Branch’s Services to do any of the following:
upload, post, email, or otherwise transmit any information that contains anything unlawful, harmful, threatening, abusive, harassing, tortious, defamatory, vulgar, obscene, libelous, invasive of another's privacy, hateful, or racially, ethnically or otherwise objectionable;
harm Us or third parties in any way;
impersonate any person or entity, or otherwise misrepresent Customer’s affiliation with a person or entity;
upload, post, email, or otherwise transmit any information that Customer does not have a right to transmit under any law or under contractual or fiduciary relationships (such as inside information, proprietary and confidential information learned or disclosed as part of employment relationships or under nondisclosure agreements);
upload, post, email or otherwise transmit any information that infringes any patent, trademark, trade secret, copyright, or other right of any party;
upload, post, email, or otherwise transmit any unsolicited or unauthorized advertising, promotional materials, “junk mail,” “spam,” “chain letters,” “pyramid schemes,” or any other forms of unauthorized solicitation;
upload, post, email, or otherwise transmit any material that contains software viruses or any other computer code, files, or programs designed to interrupt, destroy, or limit the functionality of any computer software or hardware or telecommunications equipment;
upload, post, email, enable the Services to collect, or otherwise transmit any sensitive information such as end user account passwords, financial information (e.g. bank account numbers, credit/debit card information, or any information regulated under the Gramm–Leach–Bliley Act), personal health information (including information regulated under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act), government identifiers (e.g. driver’s license, passport, national ID, social security, TIN or EIN numbers), or other information considered sensitive under applicable law such as biometric or genetic data, information about one’s religious beliefs, race, sex life or orientation;
create lists or segments of children under the age of 13, (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), advertise mobile applications or websites that are directed to children under 13, (and in certain jurisdictions under 16), and/or knowingly market products or services to children under the age of 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), without employing appropriate SDK Privacy Controls settings documented at
https://help.branch.io/developers-hub/docs/sdk-privacy-controls
within the Services to limit data collection for children under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16), in order to comply with any applicable laws protecting children (including, but not limited to, GDPR and COPPA);
interfere with or disrupt the Services or servers or networks connected to the Services, or disobey any requirements, procedures, policies or regulations of networks connected to the Services;
intentionally or unintentionally violate any applicable local, state, national or international law or regulation;
reverse engineer or otherwise attempt to discover the underlying code of the Services;
“stalk” or otherwise harass another; or
permit any third party which pools or aggregates data across its customers to use the data provided to Customer through the Services for its own benefit or use.
Effective June 7th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Branch Advocacy Program Terms and Conditions
Introduction
. These Terms & Conditions ("Terms") constitute a legal agreement between Branch Metrics, Inc., a Delaware corporation doing business as Branch Metrics ("Branch," "we," or "us") and the entity or individual participating in the Branch Advocacy Program ("Advocate," "you," or "your"). These Terms govern your participation in the Advocacy Program, which is designed to foster collaboration between Branch and its customers and provide opportunities for Advocates to share their experiences.
Definitions
. "Advocates" are defined as current customers of Branch who engage in at least one Advocacy Activity per year. “Advocacy Activities” may include testimonials, case studies, referrals, participation in beta testing, or speaking engagements at events.
ROI Workshops
. Advocates who engage in three or more distinct Advocacy Activities are eligible for an in-depth hour and a half ROI workshop conducted by Branch's in-house mobile growth experts. Each activity must be unique and different to qualify (e.g. a testimonial and a case study, not two testimonials).
Technical Advisory Hours
. The first four Advocates to collaborate with Branch on four or more unique activities will receive 20 hours of complimentary Branch Professional Service advisory hours. Only available to North America based accounts at this time. These hours may be used at the Advocate's discretion and are subject to the applicable Terms and Conditions at:
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-ts-cs
.
Eligibility
. The Branch Advocacy Program is open to all active customers of Branch. Self-serve customers are excluded.
Rewards and Incentives
. Advocates may receive rewards, incentives, or recognition for their Advocacy Activities. The nature and value of these rewards are determined by Branch and may vary based on the type and extent of advocacy.
Compliance
. To be eligible for the Advocacy Program, participants must adhere to all applicable laws, regulations, and contractual obligations to Branch, and Branch's policies and guidelines.
Non-Exclusivity
. Advocates may participate in similar activities with other organizations, provided they are not direct competitors of Branch.
Rights to Content
. By participating in advocacy activities, Advocates grant Branch a non-exclusive license to use Advocate’s content (e.g., testimonials, case studies), which may include Advocate's company name and logo for promotional purposes while Advocates remain customers of Branch, and for up to two (2) years after Branch terminates the Advocate’s products and services.
Term and Termination
. Branch reserves the right to modify, suspend, or terminate the Advocacy Program at any time without prior notice.
Discretion
. Branch has the final authority on decisions regarding eligibility, rewards, incentives, and all other aspects of the Advocacy Program.
Communication
. Participants may receive communications related to the Advocacy Program, including updates, announcements, and requests for participation.
Disclaimer of Warranty
. Branch provides the Advocacy Program, including office hours, Professional Service advisory hours, "as is" and without any warranty of any kind, express or implied. Branch specifically disclaims any implied warranties of merchantability, fitness for a particular purpose, and non-infringement.
Limitation of Liability
. Branch shall not be liable for any indirect, consequential, exemplary, special, or punitive damages, including lost profits, arising out of or in connection with these Terms or participation in the Advocacy Program. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, Branch's total liability to you for any claim arising out of or relating to these Terms or the Advocacy Program, whether in contract, tort, or otherwise, is limited to $6,000.00.
Merger and Integration
. These Terms constitute the entire agreement between you and Branch regarding your participation in the Advocacy Program and supersede all prior or contemporaneous communications, proposals, and agreements, whether electronic, oral, or written, between you and Branch.
Choice of Law and Jurisdiction
. These Terms shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of California, without giving effect to any principles of conflicts of law. Any legal action or proceeding arising under these Terms will be brought exclusively in the federal or state courts located in the Northern District of California, and the parties hereby consent to the personal jurisdiction and venue therein.
By participating in the Advocacy Program, you acknowledge that you have read, understood, and agree to be bound by these Terms & Conditions.
Effective May 20th 2024
to
June 7th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Branch Advocacy Program Terms and Conditions
Introduction
. These Terms & Conditions ("Terms") constitute a legal agreement between Branch Metrics, Inc., a Delaware corporation doing business as Branch Metrics ("Branch," "we," or "us") and the entity or individual participating in the Branch Advocacy Program ("Advocate," "you," or "your"). These Terms govern your participation in the Advocacy Program, which is designed to foster collaboration between Branch and its customers and provide opportunities for Advocates to share their experiences.
Definitions
. "Advocates" are defined as current customers of Branch who engage in at least one Advocacy Activity per year. “Advocacy Activities” may include testimonials, case studies, referrals, participation in beta testing, or speaking engagements at events.
ROI Workshops
. Advocates who engage in three or more distinct Advocacy Activities are eligible for an in-depth hour and a half ROI workshop conducted by Branch's in-house mobile growth experts. Each activity must be unique and different to qualify (e.g. a testimonial and a case study, not two testimonials).
Technical Advisory Hours
. The first four Advocates to collaborate with Branch on four or more unique activities will receive 20 hours of complimentary Branch Professional Service advisory hours. These hours may be used at the Advocate's discretion and are subject to the applicable Terms and Conditions at:
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-ts-cs
.
Eligibility
. The Branch Advocacy Program is open to all active customers of Branch. Self-serve customers are excluded.
Rewards and Incentives
. Advocates may receive rewards, incentives, or recognition for their Advocacy Activities. The nature and value of these rewards are determined by Branch and may vary based on the type and extent of advocacy.
Compliance
. To be eligible for the Advocacy Program, participants must adhere to all applicable laws, regulations, and contractual obligations to Branch, and Branch's policies and guidelines.
Non-Exclusivity
. Advocates may participate in similar activities with other organizations, provided they are not direct competitors of Branch.
Rights to Content
. By participating in advocacy activities, Advocates grant Branch a non-exclusive license to use Advocate’s content (e.g., testimonials, case studies), which may include Advocate's company name and logo for promotional purposes while Advocates remain customers of Branch, and for up to two (2) years after Branch terminates the Advocate’s products and services.
Term and Termination
. Branch reserves the right to modify, suspend, or terminate the Advocacy Program at any time without prior notice.
Discretion
. Branch has the final authority on decisions regarding eligibility, rewards, incentives, and all other aspects of the Advocacy Program.
Communication
. Participants may receive communications related to the Advocacy Program, including updates, announcements, and requests for participation.
Disclaimer of Warranty
. Branch provides the Advocacy Program, including office hours, Professional Service advisory hours, "as is" and without any warranty of any kind, express or implied. Branch specifically disclaims any implied warranties of merchantability, fitness for a particular purpose, and non-infringement.
Limitation of Liability
. Branch shall not be liable for any indirect, consequential, exemplary, special, or punitive damages, including lost profits, arising out of or in connection with these Terms or participation in the Advocacy Program. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, Branch's total liability to you for any claim arising out of or relating to these Terms or the Advocacy Program, whether in contract, tort, or otherwise, is limited to $6,000.00.
Merger and Integration
. These Terms constitute the entire agreement between you and Branch regarding your participation in the Advocacy Program and supersede all prior or contemporaneous communications, proposals, and agreements, whether electronic, oral, or written, between you and Branch.
Choice of Law and Jurisdiction
. These Terms shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of California, without giving effect to any principles of conflicts of law. Any legal action or proceeding arising under these Terms will be brought exclusively in the federal or state courts located in the Northern District of California, and the parties hereby consent to the personal jurisdiction and venue therein.
By participating in the Advocacy Program, you acknowledge that you have read, understood, and agree to be bound by these Terms & Conditions.
Effective March 18th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Page:
/
Please download the PDF to view this document.
Download
Effective February 14th 2025
to
March 18th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Page:
/
Please download the PDF to view this document.
Download
Effective December 11th 2024
to
February 14th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Page:
/
Please download the PDF to view this document.
Download
Effective July 8th 2024
to
December 11th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Page:
/
Please download the PDF to view this document.
Download
Effective June 16th 2023
to
July 8th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Page:
/
Please download the PDF to view this document.
Download
Effective December 16th 2022
to
June 16th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Page:
/
Please download the PDF to view this document.
Download
Effective December 13th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Branch SaaS Terms & Conditions
1. INTRODUCTION
1.1
These Terms & Conditions ("
Terms
") are entered into by and between of Branch Metrics, Inc., a Delaware corporation d/b/a Branch Metrics ("
Branch
," "
Branch Metrics
," "
we
," or "
us
") and the entity or person accessing this website ("
Website
") or placing an order for or accessing any Services made available by Branch Metrics (“
Customer
” or “
you
” or “
your
”). “
Services
" means the products and services that are made available online by Branch under these Terms, the “
Beta Services
”, as defined in these Terms, other services or products that Branch may make available from time to time, including associated Branch offline or mobile components. Services exclude (i) Web-based, mobile, offline or other software application functionality that interoperates with a Service, that is provided by Customer or a third party, (ii) Third-Party Content, as defined in these Terms, and (iii) Professional Services which shall be governed by the PS Terms and the applicable SOW.
1.2
By accepting this Agreement, either by accessing or using the Services, or authorizing or permitting any Agent or end user of your Digital Properties (as defined below) to access or use the Services, you agree to be legally bound by, and use Branch’s Services in compliance with, all terms, conditions, and notices in this Agreement as of the date of such access or use of the Services. If you are entering into this Agreement on behalf of a company, organization or another legal entity (an “Entity”), you are agreeing to this Agreement for that Entity and representing to Branch that you have the authority to bind such Entity and its Affiliates (as defined below) to this Agreement, in which case the terms “Customer,” “you,” or “your” herein refers to such Entity and its Affiliates. If you do not have such authority, or if you do not agree with this Agreement, you must not use or authorize any use of the Services. Customer and Branch shall each be referred to as a “Party” and collectively referred to as the “Parties” for purposes of this Agreement. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO THESE TERMS & CONDITIONS, DO NOT USE ANY SERVICES.
2. DEFINITIONS
"
Affiliate
" means any entity that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the subject entity. “Control,” for purposes of this definition, means direct or indirect ownership or control of more than 50% of the voting interests of the subject entity.
"
Agreement
" means these Terms together with any applicable Order Forms, and any exhibits, appendices, schedules, professional service terms, SOWs, or attachments identified or referenced in these Terms, and any amendments mutually agreed to by the Parties (all of which are incorporated herein by reference).
"
Beta Services
" means Branch’s services or functionality that are not generally available to customers and that may be made available to you to try at your option which are designated as beta, pilot, limited release, developer preview, non-production, evaluation, or other services or functionality with a similar description.
“
Collection Technologies
” means any tags, SDKs, APIs, JavaScript, pixels, attribution or redirect links, cookies or other technology used or made available by Branch to Customer to support the provision of the Services by Branch, including any updates thereto.
“
Digital Properties
” means your mobile applications, websites and program code created by or for you that use the Services or for use by you with the Services.
"
Documentation
" means the applicable Service’s documentation and usage guidelines at
https://docs.branch.io/
, or its successor URL.
“
Free Services
” means any Branch service or functionality that Branch makes available to Customer, to try at Customer’s option, free of charge.
"
Order Form
" means an ordering document or online order specifying the Services to be provided hereunder that is entered into between Customer and Branch or any Affiliates of the Parties, including any addenda and supplements thereto. By entering into an Order Form hereunder, an Affiliate agrees to be bound by the terms of the Agreement as if it were an original party hereto.
“
Services
" means the products and services that are made available online by Branch under these Terms, the Beta Services, and other services or products that Branch may make available from time to time, including associated Branch offline or mobile components. Services exclude (i) Web-based, mobile, offline or other software application functionality that interoperates with a Service, that is provided by Customer or a third party, and (ii) Third-Party Content, as defined in these Terms.
3. SERVICE ACCESS AND AVAILABILITY
Branch will make the Services available to Customer solely for Customer’s internal business needs pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and the applicable Documentation. Customer acknowledges and agrees that it is solely responsible for its integration and launch of the Services. Branch shall: (a) use commercially reasonable efforts to make the online Services available 24 hours a day, 7 days a week, except for: (i) planned maintenance, (ii) emergency maintenance that is reasonably unforeseeable and necessary for purposes of maintaining the security, integrity or operation of the Services, (iii) maintenance, updates, restrictions or changes due to security vulnerability concerns, and (iv) any unavailability caused by a Force Majeure Event, and (b) provide the Services in accordance with the laws and regulations applicable to Branch’s provision of its Services to its customers generally (i.e., without regard for Customer’s particular use of the Services), and subject to Customer’s use of the Services in accordance with the Agreement and the Documentation. Your right to access and use the Services is limited by all the terms set forth in the Agreement.
4. USE RESTRICTIONS; UPDATES & SUPPORT
4.1 Use Restrictions.
You must comply with all applicable laws when implementing, configuring, and using the Services and, except as expressly permitted under these Terms, you will not directly or indirectly: (a) make the functionality of the Services available to any third party through any means, including, without limitation, any hosting, application services provider, service bureau, or other type of service; (b) use any automated tool (e.g., robots, spiders) to access or use the Services; (c) extend, sell, distribute rent, lease, sublicense, or otherwise provide access to the Services to another person; (d) circumvent or disable any digital rights management, usage rules, permissions, or other security features of the Services or attempt to gain unauthorized access to the Services or Branch’s related systems or networks; (e) use the Services in a manner that overburdens, or that threatens the integrity, performance, or availability of, the Services; (f) frame or mirror any part of the Services, other than on Customer’s own internal and non-public intranets for its own internal business purposes, unless otherwise permitted in the Documentation; (g) remove, alter, or obscure any proprietary notices (including copyright and trademark notices) on any portion of the Services; (h) send material containing software viruses, worms, trojan horses, or other harmful computer code, files, scripts, agents, or programs; (i) use Branch’s Services in violation of Branch’s Acceptable Use Policy available at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-aup
, or its successor URL; or (j) use the Services in connection with any Apps or websites that are directed to children under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 18), without employing appropriate settings within the Collection Technologies to limit data collection from such children in accordance with applicable law. More information on these settings is available
here
. If you have questions about how to use these settings or have any reason to believe that these resources may not address your particular use case, please reach out to the Branch Support team via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
, or its successor URL. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Agreement, use of the Services in violation of the foregoing restrictions by Customer that, in Branch’s judgment, threatens the integrity, performance, availability, or security of the Services may result in Branch’s immediate suspension of, or limitation in Customer’s access to, the Services.
4.2 Updates and Support.
Branch will maintain, support, update, and provide error corrections for the Services to the same extent it does so for its customers generally. If Branch provides you with an update or maintenance release for the offline components of the Branch Services, unless you receive a separate license from Branch for that update or release that expressly supersedes these Terms, such update or release will be subject to these Terms. Branch shall have no liability for any damages that may result from Customer’s failure to implement upgrades or updates to the Services provided that Customer is notified in writing by Branch of such upgrade or update. All support requests must be sent to the Branch Support team via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
, or its successor URL.
5. BETA SERVICES
From time to time, Branch may invite you to try Beta Services. You may accept or decline any such trial at your sole discretion. Beta Services are for evaluation purposes only and not for production use, are not subject to any service level agreements (SLAs) agreed to between you and Branch and may be subject to additional terms. Branch is under no obligation to maintain, support, update, or provide error corrections for the Beta Services. Branch may discontinue Beta Services at any time in Branch’s sole discretion and reserves the right to never make them generally available. BRANCH WILL HAVE NO LIABILITY FOR ANY HARM OR DAMAGE ARISING OUT OF, OR IN CONNECTION WITH, CUSTOMER’S USE OF A BETA SERVICE. THE BETA SERVICES ARE PROVIDED “AS IS” AND AS AVAILABLE AND ARE EXCLUSIVE OF ANY WARRANTY WHATSOEVER. WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, WITH RESPECT TO THE BETA SERVICES, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE. In the event of a conflict or inconsistency between this section and any other provision of the Agreement, the terms of this section “BETA SERVICES” shall control and prevail with respect to Beta Services.
5.1 Free Services.
Branch may make Free Services available to Customer and use of Free Services is subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement. In the event of a conflict between this section and any other provision of this Agreement, this section shall control with respect to Free Services. Free Services are provided to Customer without charge up to certain limits as described in the Documentation. Usage over these limits requires Customer’s purchase of additional resources or services. Customer agrees that Branch, in its sole discretion and for any or no reason, may terminate Customer’s access to the Free Services or any part thereof. Customer agrees that any termination of Customer’s access to the Free Services may be without prior notice, and Customer agrees that Branch will not be liable to Customer or any third party for such termination. BRANCH WILL HAVE NO LIABILITY FOR ANY HARM OR DAMAGE ARISING OUT OF, OR IN CONNECTION WITH, CUSTOMER’S USE OF A FREE SERVICE. THE FREE SERVICES ARE PROVIDED “AS IS” AND AS AVAILABLE AND ARE EXCLUSIVE OF ANY WARRANTY WHATSOEVER. WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, WITH RESPECT TO THE FREE SERVICES, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE. CUSTOMER SHALL NOT USE THE FREE SERVICES IN A MANNER THAT VIOLATES APPLICABLE LAWS AND WILL BE FULLY LIABLE FOR ANY DAMAGES CAUSED BY ITS USE OF A FREE SERVICES. ANY DATA AND CONFIGURATIONS ENTERED INTO CUSTOMER’S FREE SERVICES ACCOUNT MAY BE PERMANENTLY LOST UPON TERMINATION OF THE FREE SERVICES.
6. PAYMENT TERMS
6.1 Fees.
You will pay Branch all fees specified in an Order Form or, if there is no Order Form executed by the Parties, then you will pay the fees set forth at the applicable rates available at
https://branch.io/pricing/
, or its successor URL (“Fees”). You are responsible for all undisputed Fees, including Fees that remain due and payable after expiration or termination of the Agreement, or any portion thereof. Except as otherwise expressly set forth herein or where expressly set forth in an applicable Order Form, (i) payment obligations are non-cancelable, Fees are non-refundable, and failure to use the Services provisioned does not constitute a basis for refusing to pay Fees, and (ii) Services purchased cannot be decreased during the service period for which they were purchased.
6.2 Payments & Invoicing.
To the extent you procure the Services with an applicable Order Form, invoices for the applicable Fees shall be sent to you via email to the email address(es) you designate in your account when signing up for Services, and you shall pay the Fees due upon receipt of such invoice. To the extent you procure the Services under an applicable Order Form, any relevant paid service-specific terms including, for example, contract duration, monthly fees, billing frequency, payment forms, and payment term will be addressed within an associated Order Form. All Fees set forth in an applicable Order Form shall be invoiced in advance in accordance with the billing frequency stated therein. Fees are payable in United States dollars. You shall be responsible for the payment of any fees associated with an electronic funds transfer (i.e., ACH, wire transfer) when issuing payment to Branch, which includes fees from your financial institution and intermediary banks. You are responsible for providing complete and accurate billing and contact information to Branch and notifying Branch of any changes to such information. In certain instances where your payment method is via credit card, the issuer of the credit card may charge a transaction fee or related charges, which you will be responsible to pay.
6.3 Payment by Credit Card.
In certain instances where your payment method is via credit card, the issuer of the credit card may charge a transaction fee or related charges, which you will be responsible to pay. Fees will be billed to the credit card nominated by you and you authorize the card issuer to pay all such amounts and authorize Branch (or its billing agent) to charge the credit card account until you or Branch cancels or terminates the Services as set forth herein; provided that if payment is not received from the credit card issuer, the transaction is returned after the payment has been settled, otherwise known as chargeback, or if there are insufficient funds in the case of check or debit card payments, you agree to pay all amounts plus any applicable transaction fees (e.g., NSF fees, chargeback fees) due upon demand.
6.4 Payment Disputes.
If you have concerns about any charges on your invoice, you agree to the following dispute resolution process: (i) all billing disputes must be submitted in writing to billing@branch.io, (ii) billing disputes must be submitted within 90 days of the date the invoice was generated, and (iii) undisputed amounts will be subject to the Agreement and total payment for undisputed invoices or amounts must be submitted when due.
6.5 Suspension or Cancellation of Service; Payment Acceleration.
Without derogating from any other remedies available to Branch under the Agreement or by applicable law, if you owe any undisputed Fees thirty (30) days or more past due in connection with any Services provided by Branch under any applicable Order Form, then, without affecting any of your payment obligations under the Agreement (including, any payment obligations under an Order Form), Branch is entitled to take further action including but not limited to accelerating your unpaid fee obligations under such agreement so that all such obligations become immediately due and payable, and suspending and/or canceling your access to the Services until such amounts are paid in full. Branch reserves the right to send your account to a collections agency for nonpayment (which may, in turn, report the uncollected debt to credit bureaus) and to use your contact information for debt collection purposes if the Agreement is terminated for non-payment as set forth herein following a 10-day cure period.
6.6 Taxes
. Branch’s Fees do not include any local, state, or federal sales, use, excise, personal property, VAT, or other similar taxes, duties, levies, tariffs, and other governmental charges (including, without limitation, any withholding tax, and any such taxes, to the extent legally applicable, which shall be borne and paid by Customer) (collectively, "Taxes"). If Branch has the legal obligation to pay or collect Taxes for which you are responsible under this section, Branch will invoice you and you will pay that amount unless you provide Branch with a valid tax exemption certificate authorized by the appropriate taxing authority. For clarity, you are responsible for payment of all Taxes resulting from any Fees payable hereunder, other than any taxes based on Branch’s net income, property, and employees.
6.7 Withholding Taxes.
In the event Fees payable by you to Branch under the Agreement are subject to any applicable withholding tax, goods and services tax, or similar taxes required by any tax authority and you are required by applicable law to remit such withholding tax, you: (a) may withhold and deduct from any payments to Branch under the Agreement an amount equivalent to any applicable withholding tax to the extent required by applicable law ("
Withholding Tax
"), (b) will pay to the relevant taxation authority the amount of such applicable withholdings in accordance with applicable law; and (c) will pay to Branch the applicable amounts under this Agreement net of such Withholding Tax. You shall be discharged from the obligation to pay Withholding Tax amounts to Branch provided that (1) you have remitted such amount to the relevant taxation authority and (2) you furnish Branch with (i) your tax registration certificate(s) as proof of registration with the applicable taxation authority, and (ii) any and all relevant tax forms and/or statements with proof of Withholding Tax remittance amount to the taxation authority, the applicable rate, and other information which may reasonably be requested for the purpose of assisting Branch to seek any allowable credits or deductions for the Withholding Tax so withheld in each jurisdiction where you are subject to tax.
6.8 Overdue Charges.
If any invoiced amount is not received by Branch by the due date set forth in the applicable invoice, then without limiting Branch’s rights or remedies, (a) those charges may accrue late interest at the rate of 2.5% of the outstanding balance per month, and (b) Branch may condition future Order Form renewals on payment terms shorter than those specified in the applicable Order Form. You are prohibited from creating new accounts until the Fees due are paid in full.
6.9 Term for Paid Services.
Except as expressly set forth herein, the terms set forth in these Terms shall be in force for as long as an Order Form referencing the Agreement is in effect. Except as otherwise agreed to by you and Branch in a superseding Order Form, at the end of an applicable term, your access to the Services will automatically renew under the same Order Form terms (contract duration, billing frequency, payment period, etc.), unless and until your access to the Services is terminated in accordance with this section or either Party to these Terms provides the other with notice of non-renewal (email sufficient; if to Branch, please email billing@branch.io) at least thirty (30) days prior to the commencement of any renewal period.
7. TERMINATION
7.1 Termination by Branch.
Branch may terminate immediately and without penalty this Agreement (including all Order Form(s) and Services that are in effect) in the event Customer commits a material breach of this Agreement For the avoidance of doubt, a breach of the
Branch Acceptable Use Policy
will be considered a material breach of this Agreement. If Branch terminates this Agreement for material breach, then all of Customer’s outstanding balances and any other unpaid payment obligations will become immediately due and payable by Customer in full. Except as otherwise expressly agreed to by you and Branch in a superseding Order Form, Branch reserves the right to suspend or discontinue, temporarily or permanently, all or any portion of the Services without cause upon at least thirty (30) days’ written notice (email sufficient), Should such termination without cause occur, Branch shall provide a pro-rated refund of all pre-paid and unearned amounts based on the period of suspension or the date of discontinuance, as applicable.Branch shall have no further obligations or liability to you or any third-party as a result of such suspension, termination or discontinuance.
7.2 Termination by Customer.
Except where you have agreed to be bound for a defined service period in any applicable Order Form, you may terminate your access to and use of the Services by providing written notice to Branch via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
, or its successor URL). Such termination will be effective as of the last day of the calendar month in which your termination notice is received by Branch. In the event of termination by you in accordance with this Section 7.2, all outstanding balances and any other unpaid payment obligations will become immediately due and payable by Customer in full.
8. SURVIVAL
Upon termination of the Agreement, those sections of these Terms that by their nature would reasonably be expected to survive will survive termination or expiration of these Terms, including but not limited to the sections on Termination, Privacy Policy & Data Rights, Confidential Information, Proprietary Rights, Limitation of Liability, and Legal Notices.
9. PRIVACY POLICY & DATA RIGHTS
9.1 Privacy Policy.
(a) You acknowledge and agree that you will provide a privacy policy to your end users, which shall be in compliance with applicable laws and regulations and shall include, at minimum, the following: (i) clear, meaningful, and conspicuous notice of your privacy practices consistent with applicable laws, (ii) disclosures regarding your use of cookies (including third-party cookies placed on your Digital Properties) and/or targeting and online behavioral advertising; and (iii) your data collection, use and disclosure practices; Branch’s Privacy Policy does not cover your Digital Properties, or the use of your Digital Properties, by your end users. It is your obligation to provide your own privacy policy to your end users. You acknowledge that Branch has no direct relationship or interface with your end users and that Branch’s ability to comply with certain applicable data protection and privacy laws is dependent on your compliance with the terms of this section of the Terms; (b) If you use Branch’s Engagement Builder feature, you agree to respect opt-out flags passed by Branch to you if you use Engagement Builder data for targeted advertisements. You acknowledge and agree that your use of the Services is subject to Branch’s Privacy Policy, located at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-privacypolicy
, or its successor URL.
9.2 Data Analytics.
You acknowledge and agree that Branch may collect and process data from your Digital Properties as set forth in
Branch’s Privacy Policy
with respect to your use of the Services. You grant to Branch a limited, non-exclusive, non-sublicensable, non-transferable license to use the data collected through the Services to provide, maintain, optimize, and improve the Services.
9.3 Data Security.
Branch shall use commercially reasonable technical, administrative, and physical safeguards designed to protect information on its servers, including customer data, against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction. However, you acknowledge and agree that no method of transmission over the Internet or method of electronic storage is completely secure, and that Branch cannot guarantee the absolute security of such information.
9.4 Compliance with Applicable Law.
You will comply with all laws, rules, and regulations applicable to your business and operations and to your use of the Services, including those governing the privacy, security, and trans-border transfers of personal data (such as, but not limited to, compliance with the General Data Protection Regulation (EU 2016/679) ("
GDPR
") and the California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CCPA
”)). Where required by applicable law, you shall be responsible for (a) obtaining consent from end users of your Digital Properties to (i) to place Collection Technologies (including by Branch) on the browsers or devices of end users of your Digital Properties, and (ii) collect and use the data you provide to Branch through the Services and the data that you enable Branch to collect from end users of your Digital Properties and process on your behalf, and (iii) t0 direct Branch to share data it processes on your behalf with any third party; (b) ensuring that you otherwise have any and all rights required in order to provide such data to Branch or to direct Branch to share it with any third party; (c) obtaining data properly and in accordance with applicable law, including, without limitation, the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (“
COPPA
”), and the Video Privacy Protection Act (18 U.S.C. § 2710) (“
VPPA
”); and (d) ensuring you do not provide Branch with any sensitive information or personally identifiable information through the Services that is afforded legal protection under applicable regulation or laws (“
PII
”). To the extent that any of your users request that you not share their data with Branch, or to the extent that you believe that any data you may have provided to Branch was inappropriately obtained, you shall inform Branch immediately. Branch shall have no responsibility or liability to the extent resulting from, or arising out of, your use of the Services not in compliance with the Agreement, the Documentation or applicable law.
9.5 CCPA.
If any data collected through your use of the Services is deemed personal information subject to the CCPA, then the terms set forth in the Branch California Privacy Addendum (“
California Privacy Addendum
“) available at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-ca-privacy-addendum
, or its successor URL, shall apply to the use and processing of such personal information and the Parties agree to incorporate such California Privacy Addendum by reference into the Agreement as an integral part thereof.
10. RESTRICTED AREAS OF THE SERVICES
10.1 Registration Information.
In order to access and use the Services, you must register an account. Any information provided during your registration must be current, complete, and accurate (“
Registration Information
”). It is your sole responsibility to ensure Registration Information is current, complete, and accurate at all times.
10.2 Access Credentials.
The Services, including account management features, may be password-restricted to registered users or other authorized persons. You may select individuals (your employees, Affiliates, or your independent contractors) to access and use the Services in furtherance of your internal business purposes as expressly permitted by this Agreement, unless otherwise expressly agreed to in writing by Branch. You will obtain separate credentials, e.g., user IDs and passwords, from Branch for such individuals (each, an "
Authorized User
").
10.3 Responsibility.
You are responsible for all actions taken under an Authorized User’s account, regardless of whether such action was taken by an Authorized User or by another party, and regardless of whether such Authorized User authorized or had knowledge of such action. You are responsible for the security of each Authorized User’s credentials and shall take all necessary steps to protect each Authorized User’s credentials from disclosure. You will not share (and will instruct each Authorized User not to share) such credentials with any other person or entity and will notify Branch promptly of unauthorized access or use of the Services.
11. LINKS AND THIRD-PARTY CONTENT
11.1
Subject to these Terms, you may enable the Services to display, or contain links to, third party products, services, and websites. You acknowledge that it is your responsibility to evaluate the information, opinion, advice, or other content linked to or made available through Branch’s Services. Any opinions, advice, statements, services, offers, or other information that constitute part of the content expressed, authored, or made available by other users or other third parties on the Services, or which is accessible through or may be located using the Services (collectively, "
Third-Party Content
") are those of the respective authors or producers and not of Branch or its shareholders, directors, officers, employees, agents, or representatives. Branch does not control Third-Party Content and makes no representations, warranties, endorsements, or guarantees regarding the accuracy, integrity or quality of such Third-Party Content. Branch expressly disclaims all responsibility and liability for any Third-Party Content, including but not limited to, any information or materials advertised in any Third-Party Content. Branch is not responsible or liable, directly or indirectly, for any damage or loss caused to you by your or a third party’s use of or reliance on any goods, services, or information available on or through any third-party service or Third-Party Content.
11.2
If you are purchasing Branch’s Advanced Compliance product, you agree to the following product-specific terms: In activating a Third-Party integration within your Advanced Compliance product, you consent to Branch transmitting data, which may include sensitive data subject to data protection laws such as HIPAA, from your Advanced Compliance instance to the Third-Party service. You acknowledge that Third-Party services, including their websites and mobile applications, are not governed by Branch and may have distinct terms of use and privacy policies. It is your responsibility to review and comply with the Third-Party’s terms and policies. You are solely responsible for ensuring that any Third-Party complies with applicable laws and regulations.
12. TRADEMARKS
"Branch Metrics", the Branch Metrics logo, and any other trademarks or service marks used by Branch or slogan displayed on the Services ("
Branch Marks
") are trademarks of Branch and its suppliers or licensors, and may not be copied, imitated or used, in whole or in part, without the prior written permission of Branch or the applicable trademark holder. You may not use any metatags or any other "hidden text" utilizing "Branch Metrics" or any other Branch Marks without Branch’s prior written permission. In addition, the look and feel of the Services, including all page headers, custom graphics, button icons and scripts, is the trade dress of Branch and may not be copied, imitated or used, in whole or in part, without Branch’s prior written permission. All other trademarks, registered trademarks, product names and company names or logos mentioned in the Services are the property of their respective owners. Reference to any products, services, processes or other information, by trade name, trademark, manufacturer, supplier, or otherwise does not constitute or imply endorsement, sponsorship, or recommendation thereof by Branch.
13. AGENCIES & PARTNERS
13.1 Agency Client.
If you are an agency or a party representing, or providing services for the benefit of, a third party (“
Agency Client
“), you represent and warrant that you are authorized to act on behalf of, and bind to the Agreement, that Agency Client (and upon Branch’s request shall provide evidence thereof). You further represent and warrant that, to the extent that you are accessing the Services on the Agency Client’s behalf, such Agency Client has provided you with explicit permission to collect on its behalf and view Agency Client’s data and that you shall use such data strictly in accordance with the permissions provided to you by such Agency Client and the terms of the Agreement. You shall ensure that each Agency Client agrees to the terms of the Agreement and any applicable Order Form(s) and agrees to abide by its terms, including without limitation, Section 9 (Privacy Policy & Data Rights) of these Terms. You acknowledge and agree that: (i) Branch makes no representations or warranties for the direct or indirect benefit of any Agency Client; and (ii) you shall not make any representations or warranties to such Agency Client on behalf of Branch.
13.2 Partners.
The Services enable you to integrate, measure, and analyze your Branch account (including data contained therein) with certain partners that you work with, such as advertising networks, publishers and analytics providers (“
Partners
“). For such purpose, you may, through your configuration of the Services (“
Partner Features
”), direct Branch to provide data to, and receive data from Partners relating to end users (“
Shared Data
”). To the extent that you use the Partner Features for Partners you select (“
Permitted Partners
”), then you hereby grant Branch the right to provide Shared Data with Partners pursuant to your configuration of the Services and to obtain and process Shared Data from Permitted Partners pursuant to your configuration of the Services. You acknowledge and agree that: (i) the sharing of such Shared Data between Branch and Permitted Partners will be available only to the extent enabled by the Permitted Partner and Branch; (ii) any use of Shared Data by a Permitted Partner shall be subject to your own agreements with such Permitted Partner; (iii) Branch shall have no liability or responsibility in connection with any acts or omissions by Permitted Partners; and (iv) any use or processing of Shared Data may be subject to certain limitations and restrictions imposed by Permitted Partners and Branch is not responsible for fulfilling any such limitations and restrictions unless expressly agreed to in writing between you and Branch.
14. CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION
14.1 Definition.
Each Party to these Terms (a “
Receiving Party
”) may have access to, or become acquainted with, certain non-public confidential information of the other Party (a “
Disclosing Party
”) including without limitation all information clearly identified as confidential at the time of disclosure (“
Confidential Information
”). You and Branch further agree that, subject to the rights and licenses granted herein, each Party's Confidential Information shall include all non-public information regarding the Disclosing Party, including without limitation any customer, customer prospect, the terms, conditions and pricing set forth in the Agreement and its Order Form(s), marketing, technical, business and/or strategic plans or information provided by the Disclosing Party to the Receiving Party in the performance of the Services under the Agreement.
14.2 Use and Disclosure.
Each Party agrees as follows: (a) to use the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party only for the purposes permitted by the Agreement, or as otherwise permitted by the Agreement (the "
Purpose
"); (b) to take all reasonable steps to ensure that the Disclosing Party’s Confidential Information is not disclosed or distributed by the Receiving Party’s employees or agents to another party in violation of the Agreement, but in no event will the Receiving party use less effort to protect the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party than it uses to protect its own Confidential Information of like importance; (c) to restrict access to the Confidential Information disclosed by the Disclosing Party to such of the Receiving Party’s employees, agents and third parties, if any, who have a legitimate need to have access for the Purpose and who have agreed in writing or are otherwise bound to treat such information in accordance with the Agreement; and (d) to return or destroy all Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party’s written request, after termination of the Agreement. The Receiving Party will not be obligated under this confidentiality section with respect to information that: (1) is or has become readily publicly available through no act or omission of the Receiving Party or its employees or agents; (2) is received from a third party lawfully in possession of such information and the Receiving Party has no knowledge of any disclosure restrictions on such third party to disclose such information; (3) is disclosed to a third party by the Disclosing Party without restriction on disclosure; (4) was rightfully in the possession of the Receiving Party without restriction prior to its disclosure by the Disclosing Party; or (5) was independently developed by employees or consultants of the Receiving Party without reliance on, or reference to, such Confidential Information.
14.3 Permitted Disclosures.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, Confidential Information may be disclosed as required by any court order or governmental agency, provided that before disclosing such Confidential Information the Receiving Party must provide the Disclosing Party with sufficient advance notice of the court or agency’s request for the information to enable the Receiving Party to exercise any rights it may have to challenge or limit the court or agency’s authority to receive such Confidential Information, to the extent permitted by applicable law.
15. PROPRIETARY RIGHTS
15.1 Proprietary Rights.
As between you and Branch, you shall retain all right, title, and interest in your Digital Properties. If you choose to use your Digital Properties with a Service, you grant Branch permission to allow the Services to interoperate with your Digital Properties as required for the interoperation of your Digital Properties with the Service. Subject to the limited licenses granted herein, Branch acquires no right, title or interest from you or your licensors under the Agreement in or to your Digital Properties. Subject to the limited rights expressly granted hereunder, Branch, its Affiliates, and its licensors reserve all of their right, title and interest in and to the Services (including the Branch application programming interfaces and the Branch software development kits), the Documentation, all technology utilized by Branch to provide the Services, and all of their related intellectual property rights related to, embodied by, or incorporated in any of the foregoing and including any updates, upgrades, enhancements, modifications and improvements made to, or derivatives of, the foregoing. No copyright is granted by Branch to Customer hereunder. No rights are granted to Customer hereunder other than as expressly set forth herein.
15.2 Feedback.
Branch may provide you with a mechanism to provide feedback, suggestions, and ideas, if you choose, about the Services ("
Feedback
"). You agree that Branch may, in its sole discretion, use the Feedback you provide to Branch in any way, including in future enhancements and modifications to the Services. You hereby grant to Branch and its assigns a perpetual, worldwide, fully transferable, sub-licensable, fully paid-up, irrevocable, royalty-free license to use, reproduce, modify, create derivative works from, distribute, and display the Feedback in any manner for any purpose, in any media, software, or technology of any kind now existing or developed in the future, without any obligation to provide attribution or compensation to you or any third party.
16. WARRANTY & DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTIES
16.1 Warranty.
You represent and warrant to Branch that: (a) you are duly organized under applicable law and have sufficient authority to enter into the Agreement; (b) the person entering into the Agreement is authorized to agree to and execute the Agreement on behalf of such Party; and (c) the execution and performance of the Agreement does not conflict with any contractual obligations you have to any third party.
16.2 DISCLAIMER.
EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY PROVIDED IN THE AGREEMENT, THE SERVICES, AND THE DOCUMENTATION ARE PROVIDED “AS IS,” WITHOUT REPRESENTATION OR WARRANTY OF ANY KIND. WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE. BRANCH DOES NOT WARRANT THE ACCURACY, COMPLETENESS, OR USEFULNESS OF THE SERVICES, AND THE DOCUMENTATION, NOR DOES BRANCH WARRANT THAT THE SERVICES WILL BE FREE FROM ERRORS, OR THAT THE OPERATIONS OF THE SERVICES WILL BE UNINTERRUPTED. YOU RELY ON THE SERVICES AND THE DOCUMENTATION AT YOUR OWN RISK. SOME JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW THE EXCLUSION OF CERTAIN WARRANTIES IN CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES. ACCORDINGLY, THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH ABOVE APPLY TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW.
17. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
17.1
BRANCH AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND LICENSORS WILL NOT BE LIABLE FOR ANY INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, PUNITIVE, CONSEQUENTIAL, OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO, DAMAGES FOR LOSS OF PROFITS, LOSS OF REVENUE, GOODWILL, USE, DATA THAT IS INCOMPLETE, MISSING, OR INCORRECT, OR OTHER INTANGIBLE LOSSES (EVEN IF BRANCH HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES), RESULTING FROM THIS AGREEMENT.
17.2
UNDER NO CIRCUMSTANCES WILL THE TOTAL AGGREGATE LIABILITY OF BRANCH AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND LICENSORS RESULTING FROM THIS AGREEMENT (INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO WARRANTY CLAIMS), REGARDLESS OF THE FORUM AND REGARDLESS OF WHETHER ANY ACTION OR CLAIM IS BASED IN CONTRACT, WARRANTY, NEGLIGENCE, STRICT LIABILITY, OR OTHER TORT, BREACH OF ANY STATUTORY DUTY, INDEMNITY OR CONTRIBUTION, OR OTHERWISE, EXCEED THE AMOUNTS, IF ANY, THAT YOU HAVE PAID, OR AGREED TO PAY, TO BRANCH FOR USE OF THE SERVICES IN THE TWELVE (12) MONTH PERIOD PRIOR TO THE EVENT GIVING RISE TO THE CLAIM. SOME OF THE LIMITATIONS PROVIDED HEREIN MAY NOT BE ALLOWED UNDER THE LAWS OF CERTAIN JURISDICTIONS. IF ANY SUCH LAW IS DEEMED TO APPLY TO THE AGREEMENT, THEN THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH HEREIN SHALL APPLY TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED UNDER SUCH LAWS.
18. INDEMNITY
18.1 Indemnity.
You will defend Branch, its Affiliates and their officers, agents, employees, representatives, and assigns (“
Branch Indemnified Parties
”) against any claim, demand, suit, or action against Branch brought by a third party to the extent arising out of or relating to: (a) Third-Party Content or your use of the Services in violation of the Agreement, the Documentation, or applicable law, (b) allegations that your Digital Properties, or the combination of your Digital Properties with the Services, infringes or misappropriates a third party’s intellectual property rights, (c) your instructions to share Shared Data with a Partner, or (d) a regulatory investigation (each a “
Claim Against Branch
”). You will indemnify Branch Indemnified Parties from any costs, damages, and expenses finally awarded against Branch Indemnified Parties as a result of, or for any amounts paid by Branch Indemnified Parties under a settlement approved by you in writing of, a Claim Against Branch. The above defense and indemnification obligations will be limited to the extent a Claim Against Branch arises from Branch’s fraud, or reckless or willful misconduct.
18.2 Agency Indemnity.
If you are an agency or a party representing, or providing services for the benefit of an Agency Client, in addition to the obligations set forth in the section “Agencies & Partners” of these Terms, you further agree to indemnify, hold harmless and defend Branch Indemnified Parties from and against any claim, demand, suit, or action and any related liability against a Branch Indemnified Party brought by a third party, arising out of or relating to: (a) any representations and warranties made by you concerning any aspect of the Services to an Agency Client; (b) any claims made by or on behalf of any Agency Client arising out or relating to your use of the Services; and (c) any claims arising out of or relating to acts or omissions of an Agency Client in connection with the Services.
18.3 Indemnification Procedure.
Your indemnification obligations under this Agreement will be contingent upon (a) Branch promptly giving you written notice of any claim for which indemnification is sought (provided that the Branch’s failure to notify you will not diminish your obligations under this section, except to the extent that you are materially prejudiced as a result of such failure), (b) you having sole control of the defense and settlement of any and all claims for which indemnification is sought (provided that no settlement may be entered into without either (i) Branch’s consent where a settlement requires any action on the part of Branch or (ii) the securing of an unconditional release of Branch for all liability), and (c) Branch giving you reasonably requested assistance at your expense. Branch may, at its own expense, and without limiting the obligations of the indemnifying party, maintain its own counsel and participate in the defense with counsel of its own choosing at any time.
19. MISCELLANEOUS
19.1 Governing Law.
The Agreement and all matters arising out of or relating to the Agreement shall be governed by and construed under the laws of the State of California, without regard to its conflict of law provisions. The parties expressly disclaim and exclude the application of the United Nations Convention on Contracts for the International Sale of Goods.
19.2 Dispute Resolution.
In the event of any dispute, claim, or controversy in connection with this Agreement (other than for disputes, claims, or controversies related to the intellectual property of a party) (collectively, "
Disputes
"), each Party's senior representatives will, in good faith, attempt to resolve a Dispute. If the Parties are unable to resolve a Dispute within thirty (30) days or within such other time period as the Parties may agree in writing, then the Parties may commence binding arbitration under JAMS' Comprehensive Arbitration Rules and Procedures. The Parties will share equally the fees and expenses of the JAMS arbitrator. The arbitration will be conducted by a sole arbitrator mutually agreed to between the Parties or, failing that, by JAMS under its then prevailing rules. Judgment on the award rendered by the arbitrator may be entered in any court of competent jurisdiction. The arbitrator will have the authority to grant specific performance or any other equitable or legal remedy, including provisional remedies. Each Party will be responsible for its own incurred expenses arising out of any dispute resolution procedure. Any arbitration proceedings will take place in the English language in (a) San Francisco, California, if you are domiciled in any country outside of the (i) European Economic Area or its regions or territories, the United Kingdom, Switzerland, Andorra, Vatican City, and Monaco and (ii) Asia-Pacific region; (b) London, England, if you are domiciled in any country within the European Economic Area or its regions or territories, the United Kingdom, Switzerland, Andorra, Vatican City, or Monaco; or (c) Singapore, if you are domiciled in any country within the Asia-Pacific region.
19.3 No Waiver; Severability.
Branch’s failure to enforce any right or provision in the Agreement will not constitute a waiver of such right or provision unless acknowledged and agreed to by Branch in writing. If any provision of the Agreement is found to be unenforceable or invalid, that provision will be limited or eliminated to the minimum extent necessary so that the Agreement will otherwise remain in full force and effect and enforceable.
19.4 Assignment.
The Agreement is not assignable, transferable or sublicensable by you except with Branch’s prior written consent. Branch may transfer and assign any of its rights and obligations under the Agreement freely and without consent.
19.5 Entire Agreement.
Both you and Branch agree that the Agreement is the complete and exclusive statement of the mutual understanding of the Parties and supersedes all previous written and oral agreements, communications and other understandings relating to your use of the Services, and that all waivers and modifications must be in a signed writing by both Parties, except as otherwise provided herein. Preprinted terms in your purchase orders or other customer-generated ordering documents, or terms referenced or linked within them, will have no effect on the Agreement and are hereby rejected, regardless of whether they are signed, clicked through, or otherwise agreed to by Branch and/or purport to take precedence over the Agreement. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency among the following documents, the order of precedence shall be: (1) the body of these Terms (2), (2) any exhibit, schedule, rider, or addendum to the Agreement,including the PS Terms or a statement of work (SOW), (3)  the Documentation (4) and then the Order Form, unless explicitly provided otherwise as a Special Term within the Order Form itself.
19.6 Relationship between the Parties.
The Parties are independent contractors. No agency, partnership, joint venture, fiduciary or employment relationship is created as a result of the Agreement, and you do not have any authority of any kind to bind Branch in any respect whatsoever.
19.7 International Trade and Anti-Corruption and Laws.
Each party (a) warrants that it will comply with all applicable anti-corruption, anti-money laundering, economic and trade sanctions, export controls, and other international trade laws, regulations, and governmental orders (collectively, “
Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws
”) in the jurisdictions that apply directly or indirectly to the Services, including, without limitation, the United States, and (b) represents that it has not made, offered, promised to make, or authorized any payment or anything of value in violation of Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws. You will promptly notify Branch in writing of any actual or potential violation of Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws in connection with the use of the Services and take all appropriate steps to remedy or resolve such violations, including any steps requested by Branch. If applicable, you represent that you have obtained, and warrant that you will continue to obtain, all licenses or other authorizations required to export, re-export, or transfer the Services.
19.8 Sanctions Lists.
The Services and any derivatives thereof, may be subject to export control and economic sanctions laws and regulations of the United States and other jurisdictions. Both you and Branch each represent that (and in your case, also your end users of your Digital Properties) it is not named on any government prohibited, denied, or unverified-party, sanctions, debarment, or exclusion list or export-controlled related restricted party list (collectively, “
Sanctions Lists
”). Customer shall not permit any entity or individual to access or use any of the Services who is listed on the Consolidated Screening List or located in a U.S. government-embargoed country, or known to be engaged in proliferation of nuclear, chemical or biological weapons or missiles, or otherwise in violation of any U.S. export law or regulation. You will immediately (i) discontinue your use of the Services if you become placed on any Sanctions List and (ii) remove your End Users’ access to the Services if your end users become placed on any Sanctions List. You represent that you have not, and warrant that you will not, export, re-export, or transfer the Services to an entity on any Sanctions List without prior authorization from the applicable governmental authority. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, either Party may terminate this Agreement immediately upon written notice to the other party if the other party is in breach of its obligations hereunder with respect to Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws or Sanction Lists. If your account is blocked because it is operating in a country or region prohibited by Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws, you will receive notice of your account being inoperable when you attempt to log into your account in such a prohibited country or region.
19.9 Third Party Beneficiary.
No provision of the Agreement is intended, nor shall it be interpreted, to provide or create any third-party beneficiary rights or any other rights of any kind in any customer, affiliate, stockholder, partner, member, director, officer, or employee of any Party hereto or any other person or entity.
19.10 Marketing Support.
You agree to comply with reasonable requests of Branch to support public relations efforts pertaining to the Services, which efforts may include: (a) a press release highlighting your company’s use of the Services, (b) participation in targeted press and analyst interviews highlighting benefits of implementing the Services, and (c) participation in customer case studies developed by Branch and used on Branch’s website(s) and other collateral. You grant to Branch a non-exclusive, non-transferable, limited right to use your name, trademarks, and logos (collectively, the "
Customer Marks
") (i) for the purpose of referencing You as a customer of Branch on the Branch website(s) and (ii) in the production of marketing materials, provided that such use is in accordance with any trademark and logo use guidelines that you provide to Branch. All goodwill developed from such use shall be solely for your benefit.
19.11 Force Majeure.
Neither Party will be responsible for any delay or failure in performance of any part of this Agreement to the extent that such delay or failure is caused by an event or circumstance beyond the reasonable control of the Party whose performance is affected and could not have been prevented or corrected through the exercise of reasonable diligence, including, for example, an act of God, act of government, flood, fire, earthquake, civil unrest, act of terror, strike or other labor problem (other than one involving Branch employees), Internet service provider failure or delay, integrated third party applications, or denial of service attack (each such event, a “
Force Majeure Event
”). The Party alleging a Force Majeure Event (the “
Affected Party
”) will promptly notify the other Party in writing of the Force Majeure Event, providing reasonable detail of the circumstances giving rise to the Force Majeure Event, and the steps it is taking to remedy the delay or failure. Notwithstanding the foregoing, financial incapability will not be considered as a Force Majeure Event.
19.12 Notices.
Except as otherwise specified in the Agreement, all notices of termination or an indemnifiable claim related to the Agreement (“
Legal Notices
”) will be provided via email and will be effective upon receipt by email as set forth below. If to Branch, all notices shall be provided to legal@branch.io ("
Branch Notices
"). Billing-related notices to Customer will be provided via email and addressed to the relevant billing contact designated by Customer on the applicable Order Form or the relevant Services account administrator designated by Customer. All Legal Notices and other notices to Customer will be provided via email and addressed to the relevant Services account administrator designated by Customer.
19.13 Modifications.
We may make changes to these Terms from time to time. When we do, we will revise the "Last updated" date given above. It is your responsibility to review these Terms frequently and to remain informed of any changes to them. The then-current version of these Terms will supersede all earlier versions. You agree that your continued use of Branch’s Services after such changes have been published to Branch’s Services will constitute your acceptance of such revised Terms.
20. CONTACTING US
If you have any questions or concerns about Branch’s Services or these Terms, you may contact us by email at
info@branch.io
.
Effective September 24th 2024
to
December 13th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Branch SaaS Terms & Conditions
1. INTRODUCTION
1.1
These Terms & Conditions ("
Terms
") are entered into by and between of Branch Metrics, Inc., a Delaware corporation d/b/a Branch Metrics ("
Branch
," "
Branch Metrics
," "
we
," or "
us
") and the entity or person accessing this website ("
Website
") or placing an order for or accessing any Services made available by Branch Metrics (“
Customer
” or “
you
” or “
your
”). “
Services
" means the products and services that are made available online by Branch under these Terms, the “
Beta Services
”, as defined in these Terms, other services or products that Branch may make available from time to time, including associated Branch offline or mobile components. Services exclude (i) Web-based, mobile, offline or other software application functionality that interoperates with a Service, that is provided by Customer or a third party, (ii) Third-Party Content, as defined in these Terms, and (iii) Professional Services which shall be governed by the PS Terms and the applicable SOW.
1.2
By accepting this Agreement, either by accessing or using the Services, or authorizing or permitting any Agent or end user of your Digital Properties (as defined below) to access or use the Services, you agree to be legally bound by, and use Branch’s Services in compliance with, all terms, conditions, and notices in this Agreement as of the date of such access or use of the Services. If you are entering into this Agreement on behalf of a company, organization or another legal entity (an “Entity”), you are agreeing to this Agreement for that Entity and representing to Branch that you have the authority to bind such Entity and its Affiliates (as defined below) to this Agreement, in which case the terms “Customer,” “you,” or “your” herein refers to such Entity and its Affiliates. If you do not have such authority, or if you do not agree with this Agreement, you must not use or authorize any use of the Services. Customer and Branch shall each be referred to as a “Party” and collectively referred to as the “Parties” for purposes of this Agreement. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO THESE TERMS & CONDITIONS, DO NOT USE ANY SERVICES.
2. DEFINITIONS
"
Affiliate
" means any entity that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the subject entity. “Control,” for purposes of this definition, means direct or indirect ownership or control of more than 50% of the voting interests of the subject entity.
"
Agreement
" means these Terms together with any applicable Order Forms, and any exhibits, appendices, schedules, professional service terms, SOWs, or attachments identified or referenced in these Terms, and any amendments mutually agreed to by the Parties (all of which are incorporated herein by reference).
"
Beta Services
" means Branch’s services or functionality that are not generally available to customers and that may be made available to you to try at your option which are designated as beta, pilot, limited release, developer preview, non-production, evaluation, or other services or functionality with a similar description.
“
Collection Technologies
” means any tags, SDKs, APIs, JavaScript, pixels, attribution or redirect links, cookies or other technology used or made available by Branch to Customer to support the provision of the Services by Branch, including any updates thereto.
“
Digital Properties
” means your mobile applications, websites and program code created by or for you that use the Services or for use by you with the Services.
"
Documentation
" means the applicable Service’s documentation and usage guidelines at
https://docs.branch.io/
, or its successor URL.
“
Free Services
” means any Branch service or functionality that Branch makes available to Customer, to try at Customer’s option, free of charge.
"
Order Form
" means an ordering document or online order specifying the Services to be provided hereunder that is entered into between Customer and Branch or any Affiliates of the Parties, including any addenda and supplements thereto. By entering into an Order Form hereunder, an Affiliate agrees to be bound by the terms of the Agreement as if it were an original party hereto.
“
Services
" means the products and services that are made available online by Branch under these Terms, the Beta Services, and other services or products that Branch may make available from time to time, including associated Branch offline or mobile components. Services exclude (i) Web-based, mobile, offline or other software application functionality that interoperates with a Service, that is provided by Customer or a third party, and (ii) Third-Party Content, as defined in these Terms.
3. SERVICE ACCESS AND AVAILABILITY
Branch will make the Services available to Customer solely for Customer’s internal business needs pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and the applicable Documentation. Customer acknowledges and agrees that it is solely responsible for its integration and launch of the Services. Branch shall: (a) use commercially reasonable efforts to make the online Services available 24 hours a day, 7 days a week, except for: (i) planned maintenance, (ii) emergency maintenance that is reasonably unforeseeable and necessary for purposes of maintaining the security, integrity or operation of the Services, (iii) maintenance, updates, restrictions or changes due to security vulnerability concerns, and (iv) any unavailability caused by a Force Majeure Event, and (b) provide the Services in accordance with the laws and regulations applicable to Branch’s provision of its Services to its customers generally (i.e., without regard for Customer’s particular use of the Services), and subject to Customer’s use of the Services in accordance with the Agreement and the Documentation. Your right to access and use the Services is limited by all the terms set forth in the Agreement.
4. USE RESTRICTIONS; UPDATES & SUPPORT
4.1 Use Restrictions.
You must comply with all applicable laws when implementing, configuring, and using the Services and, except as expressly permitted under these Terms, you will not directly or indirectly: (a) make the functionality of the Services available to any third party through any means, including, without limitation, any hosting, application services provider, service bureau, or other type of service; (b) use any automated tool (e.g., robots, spiders) to access or use the Services; (c) extend, sell, distribute rent, lease, sublicense, or otherwise provide access to the Services to another person; (d) circumvent or disable any digital rights management, usage rules, permissions, or other security features of the Services or attempt to gain unauthorized access to the Services or Branch’s related systems or networks; (e) use the Services in a manner that overburdens, or that threatens the integrity, performance, or availability of, the Services; (f) frame or mirror any part of the Services, other than on Customer’s own internal and non-public intranets for its own internal business purposes, unless otherwise permitted in the Documentation; (g) remove, alter, or obscure any proprietary notices (including copyright and trademark notices) on any portion of the Services; (h) send material containing software viruses, worms, trojan horses, or other harmful computer code, files, scripts, agents, or programs; (i) use Branch’s Services in violation of Branch’s Acceptable Use Policy available at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-aup
, or its successor URL; or (j) use the Services in connection with any Apps or websites that are directed to children under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), without employing appropriate settings within the Collection Technologies to limit data collection from such children in accordance with applicable law. More information on these settings is available
here
. If you have questions about how to use these settings or have any reason to believe that these resources may not address your particular use case, please reach out to the Branch Support team via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
, or its successor URL. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Agreement, use of the Services in violation of the foregoing restrictions by Customer that, in Branch’s judgment, threatens the integrity, performance, availability, or security of the Services may result in Branch’s immediate suspension of, or limitation in Customer’s access to, the Services.
4.2 Updates and Support.
Branch will maintain, support, update, and provide error corrections for the Services to the same extent it does so for its customers generally. If Branch provides you with an update or maintenance release for the offline components of the Branch Services, unless you receive a separate license from Branch for that update or release that expressly supersedes these Terms, such update or release will be subject to these Terms. Branch shall have no liability for any damages that may result from Customer’s failure to implement upgrades or updates to the Services provided that Customer is notified in writing by Branch of such upgrade or update. All support requests must be sent to the Branch Support team via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
, or its successor URL.
5. BETA SERVICES
From time to time, Branch may invite you to try Beta Services. You may accept or decline any such trial at your sole discretion. Beta Services are for evaluation purposes only and not for production use, are not subject to any service level agreements (SLAs) agreed to between you and Branch and may be subject to additional terms. Branch is under no obligation to maintain, support, update, or provide error corrections for the Beta Services. Branch may discontinue Beta Services at any time in Branch’s sole discretion and reserves the right to never make them generally available. BRANCH WILL HAVE NO LIABILITY FOR ANY HARM OR DAMAGE ARISING OUT OF, OR IN CONNECTION WITH, CUSTOMER’S USE OF A BETA SERVICE. THE BETA SERVICES ARE PROVIDED “AS IS” AND AS AVAILABLE AND ARE EXCLUSIVE OF ANY WARRANTY WHATSOEVER. WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, WITH RESPECT TO THE BETA SERVICES, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE. In the event of a conflict or inconsistency between this section and any other provision of the Agreement, the terms of this section “BETA SERVICES” shall control and prevail with respect to Beta Services.
5.1 Free Services.
Branch may make Free Services available to Customer and use of Free Services is subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement. In the event of a conflict between this section and any other provision of this Agreement, this section shall control with respect to Free Services. Free Services are provided to Customer without charge up to certain limits as described in the Documentation. Usage over these limits requires Customer’s purchase of additional resources or services. Customer agrees that Branch, in its sole discretion and for any or no reason, may terminate Customer’s access to the Free Services or any part thereof. Customer agrees that any termination of Customer’s access to the Free Services may be without prior notice, and Customer agrees that Branch will not be liable to Customer or any third party for such termination. BRANCH WILL HAVE NO LIABILITY FOR ANY HARM OR DAMAGE ARISING OUT OF, OR IN CONNECTION WITH, CUSTOMER’S USE OF A FREE SERVICE. THE FREE SERVICES ARE PROVIDED “AS IS” AND AS AVAILABLE AND ARE EXCLUSIVE OF ANY WARRANTY WHATSOEVER. WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, WITH RESPECT TO THE FREE SERVICES, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE. CUSTOMER SHALL NOT USE THE FREE SERVICES IN A MANNER THAT VIOLATES APPLICABLE LAWS AND WILL BE FULLY LIABLE FOR ANY DAMAGES CAUSED BY ITS USE OF A FREE SERVICES. ANY DATA AND CONFIGURATIONS ENTERED INTO CUSTOMER’S FREE SERVICES ACCOUNT MAY BE PERMANENTLY LOST UPON TERMINATION OF THE FREE SERVICES.
6. PAYMENT TERMS
6.1 Fees.
You will pay Branch all fees specified in an Order Form or, if there is no Order Form executed by the Parties, then you will pay the fees set forth at the applicable rates available at
https://branch.io/pricing/
, or its successor URL (“Fees”). You are responsible for all undisputed Fees, including Fees that remain due and payable after expiration or termination of the Agreement, or any portion thereof. Except as otherwise expressly set forth herein or where expressly set forth in an applicable Order Form, (i) payment obligations are non-cancelable, Fees are non-refundable, and failure to use the Services provisioned does not constitute a basis for refusing to pay Fees, and (ii) Services purchased cannot be decreased during the service period for which they were purchased.
6.2 Payments & Invoicing.
To the extent you procure the Services with an applicable Order Form, invoices for the applicable Fees shall be sent to you via email to the email address(es) you designate in your account when signing up for Services, and you shall pay the Fees due upon receipt of such invoice. To the extent you procure the Services under an applicable Order Form, any relevant paid service-specific terms including, for example, contract duration, monthly fees, billing frequency, payment forms, and payment term will be addressed within an associated Order Form. All Fees set forth in an applicable Order Form shall be invoiced in advance in accordance with the billing frequency stated therein. Fees are payable in United States dollars. You shall be responsible for the payment of any fees associated with an electronic funds transfer (i.e., ACH, wire transfer) when issuing payment to Branch, which includes fees from your financial institution and intermediary banks. You are responsible for providing complete and accurate billing and contact information to Branch and notifying Branch of any changes to such information. In certain instances where your payment method is via credit card, the issuer of the credit card may charge a transaction fee or related charges, which you will be responsible to pay.
6.3 Payment by Credit Card.
In certain instances where your payment method is via credit card, the issuer of the credit card may charge a transaction fee or related charges, which you will be responsible to pay. Fees will be billed to the credit card nominated by you and you authorize the card issuer to pay all such amounts and authorize Branch (or its billing agent) to charge the credit card account until you or Branch cancels or terminates the Services as set forth herein; provided that if payment is not received from the credit card issuer, the transaction is returned after the payment has been settled, otherwise known as chargeback, or if there are insufficient funds in the case of check or debit card payments, you agree to pay all amounts plus any applicable transaction fees (e.g., NSF fees, chargeback fees) due upon demand.
6.4 Payment Disputes.
If you have concerns about any charges on your invoice, you agree to the following dispute resolution process: (i) all billing disputes must be submitted in writing to billing@branch.io, (ii) billing disputes must be submitted within 90 days of the date the invoice was generated, and (iii) undisputed amounts will be subject to the Agreement and total payment for undisputed invoices or amounts must be submitted when due.
6.5 Suspension or Cancellation of Service; Payment Acceleration.
Without derogating from any other remedies available to Branch under the Agreement or by applicable law, if you owe any undisputed Fees thirty (30) days or more past due in connection with any Services provided by Branch under any applicable Order Form, then, without affecting any of your payment obligations under the Agreement (including, any payment obligations under an Order Form), Branch is entitled to take further action including but not limited to accelerating your unpaid fee obligations under such agreement so that all such obligations become immediately due and payable, and suspending and/or canceling your access to the Services until such amounts are paid in full. Branch reserves the right to send your account to a collections agency for nonpayment (which may, in turn, report the uncollected debt to credit bureaus) and to use your contact information for debt collection purposes if the Agreement is terminated for non-payment as set forth herein following a 10-day cure period.
6.6 Taxes
. Branch’s Fees do not include any local, state, or federal sales, use, excise, personal property, VAT, or other similar taxes, duties, levies, tariffs, and other governmental charges (including, without limitation, any withholding tax, and any such taxes, to the extent legally applicable, which shall be borne and paid by Customer) (collectively, "Taxes"). If Branch has the legal obligation to pay or collect Taxes for which you are responsible under this section, Branch will invoice you and you will pay that amount unless you provide Branch with a valid tax exemption certificate authorized by the appropriate taxing authority. For clarity, you are responsible for payment of all Taxes resulting from any Fees payable hereunder, other than any taxes based on Branch’s net income, property, and employees.
6.7 Withholding Taxes.
In the event Fees payable by you to Branch under the Agreement are subject to any applicable withholding tax, goods and services tax, or similar taxes required by any tax authority and you are required by applicable law to remit such withholding tax, you: (a) may withhold and deduct from any payments to Branch under the Agreement an amount equivalent to any applicable withholding tax to the extent required by applicable law ("
Withholding Tax
"), (b) will pay to the relevant taxation authority the amount of such applicable withholdings in accordance with applicable law; and (c) will pay to Branch the applicable amounts under this Agreement net of such Withholding Tax. You shall be discharged from the obligation to pay Withholding Tax amounts to Branch provided that (1) you have remitted such amount to the relevant taxation authority and (2) you furnish Branch with (i) your tax registration certificate(s) as proof of registration with the applicable taxation authority, and (ii) any and all relevant tax forms and/or statements with proof of Withholding Tax remittance amount to the taxation authority, the applicable rate, and other information which may reasonably be requested for the purpose of assisting Branch to seek any allowable credits or deductions for the Withholding Tax so withheld in each jurisdiction where you are subject to tax.
6.8 Overdue Charges.
If any invoiced amount is not received by Branch by the due date set forth in the applicable invoice, then without limiting Branch’s rights or remedies, (a) those charges may accrue late interest at the rate of 2.5% of the outstanding balance per month, and (b) Branch may condition future Order Form renewals on payment terms shorter than those specified in the applicable Order Form. You are prohibited from creating new accounts until the Fees due are paid in full.
6.9 Term for Paid Services.
Except as expressly set forth herein, the terms set forth in these Terms shall be in force for as long as an Order Form referencing the Agreement is in effect. Except as otherwise agreed to by you and Branch in a superseding Order Form, at the end of an applicable term, your access to the Services will automatically renew under the same Order Form terms (contract duration, billing frequency, payment period, etc.), unless and until your access to the Services is terminated in accordance with this section or either Party to these Terms provides the other with notice of non-renewal (email sufficient; if to Branch, please email billing@branch.io) at least thirty (30) days prior to the commencement of any renewal period.
7. TERMINATION
7.1 Termination by Branch.
Branch may terminate immediately and without penalty this Agreement (including all Order Form(s) and Services that are in effect) in the event Customer commits a material breach of this Agreement For the avoidance of doubt, a breach of the
Branch Acceptable Use Policy
will be considered a material breach of this Agreement. If Branch terminates this Agreement for material breach, then all of Customer’s outstanding balances and any other unpaid payment obligations will become immediately due and payable by Customer in full. Except as otherwise expressly agreed to by you and Branch in a superseding Order Form, Branch reserves the right to suspend or discontinue, temporarily or permanently, all or any portion of the Services without cause upon at least thirty (30) days’ written notice (email sufficient), Should such termination without cause occur, Branch shall provide a pro-rated refund of all pre-paid and unearned amounts based on the period of suspension or the date of discontinuance, as applicable.Branch shall have no further obligations or liability to you or any third-party as a result of such suspension, termination or discontinuance.
7.2 Termination by Customer.
Except where you have agreed to be bound for a defined service period in any applicable Order Form, you may terminate your access to and use of the Services by providing written notice to Branch via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
, or its successor URL). Such termination will be effective as of the last day of the calendar month in which your termination notice is received by Branch. In the event of termination by you in accordance with this Section 7.2, all outstanding balances and any other unpaid payment obligations will become immediately due and payable by Customer in full.
8. SURVIVAL
Upon termination of the Agreement, those sections of these Terms that by their nature would reasonably be expected to survive will survive termination or expiration of these Terms, including but not limited to the sections on Termination, Privacy Policy & Data Rights, Confidential Information, Proprietary Rights, Limitation of Liability, and Legal Notices.
9. PRIVACY POLICY & DATA RIGHTS
9.1 Privacy Policy.
(a) You acknowledge and agree that you will provide a privacy policy to your end users, which shall be in compliance with applicable laws and regulations and shall include, at minimum, the following: (i) clear, meaningful, and conspicuous notice of your privacy practices consistent with applicable laws, (ii) disclosures regarding your use of cookies (including third-party cookies placed on your Digital Properties) and/or targeting and online behavioral advertising; and (iii) your data collection, use and disclosure practices; Branch’s Privacy Policy does not cover your Digital Properties, or the use of your Digital Properties, by your end users. It is your obligation to provide your own privacy policy to your end users. You acknowledge that Branch has no direct relationship or interface with your end users and that Branch’s ability to comply with certain applicable data protection and privacy laws is dependent on your compliance with the terms of this section of the Terms; (b) If you use Branch’s Engagement Builder feature, you agree to respect opt-out flags passed by Branch to you if you use Engagement Builder data for targeted advertisements. You acknowledge and agree that your use of the Services is subject to Branch’s Privacy Policy, located at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-privacypolicy
, or its successor URL.
9.2 Data Analytics.
You acknowledge and agree that Branch may collect and process data from your Digital Properties as set forth in
Branch’s Privacy Policy
with respect to your use of the Services. You grant to Branch a limited, non-exclusive, non-sublicensable, non-transferable license to use the data collected through the Services to provide, maintain, optimize, and improve the Services.
9.3 Data Security.
Branch shall use commercially reasonable technical, administrative, and physical safeguards designed to protect information on its servers, including customer data, against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction. However, you acknowledge and agree that no method of transmission over the Internet or method of electronic storage is completely secure, and that Branch cannot guarantee the absolute security of such information.
9.4 Compliance with Applicable Law.
You will comply with all laws, rules, and regulations applicable to your business and operations and to your use of the Services, including those governing the privacy, security, and trans-border transfers of personal data (such as, but not limited to, compliance with the General Data Protection Regulation (EU 2016/679) ("
GDPR
") and the California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CCPA
”)). Where required by applicable law, you shall be responsible for (a) obtaining consent from end users of your Digital Properties to (i) to place Collection Technologies (including by Branch) on the browsers or devices of end users of your Digital Properties, and (ii) collect and use the data you provide to Branch through the Services and the data that you enable Branch to collect from end users of your Digital Properties and process on your behalf, and (iii) t0 direct Branch to share data it processes on your behalf with any third party; (b) ensuring that you otherwise have any and all rights required in order to provide such data to Branch or to direct Branch to share it with any third party; (c) obtaining data properly and in accordance with applicable law, including, without limitation, the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (“
COPPA
”), and the Video Privacy Protection Act (18 U.S.C. § 2710) (“
VPPA
”); and (d) ensuring you do not provide Branch with any sensitive information or personally identifiable information through the Services that is afforded legal protection under applicable regulation or laws (“
PII
”). To the extent that any of your users request that you not share their data with Branch, or to the extent that you believe that any data you may have provided to Branch was inappropriately obtained, you shall inform Branch immediately. Branch shall have no responsibility or liability to the extent resulting from, or arising out of, your use of the Services not in compliance with the Agreement, the Documentation or applicable law.
9.5 CCPA.
If any data collected through your use of the Services is deemed personal information subject to the CCPA, then the terms set forth in the Branch California Privacy Addendum (“
California Privacy Addendum
“) available at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-ca-privacy-addendum
, or its successor URL, shall apply to the use and processing of such personal information and the Parties agree to incorporate such California Privacy Addendum by reference into the Agreement as an integral part thereof.
10. RESTRICTED AREAS OF THE SERVICES
10.1 Registration Information.
In order to access and use the Services, you must register an account. Any information provided during your registration must be current, complete, and accurate (“
Registration Information
”). It is your sole responsibility to ensure Registration Information is current, complete, and accurate at all times.
10.2 Access Credentials.
The Services, including account management features, may be password-restricted to registered users or other authorized persons. You may select individuals (your employees, Affiliates, or your independent contractors) to access and use the Services in furtherance of your internal business purposes as expressly permitted by this Agreement, unless otherwise expressly agreed to in writing by Branch. You will obtain separate credentials, e.g., user IDs and passwords, from Branch for such individuals (each, an "
Authorized User
").
10.3 Responsibility.
You are responsible for all actions taken under an Authorized User’s account, regardless of whether such action was taken by an Authorized User or by another party, and regardless of whether such Authorized User authorized or had knowledge of such action. You are responsible for the security of each Authorized User’s credentials and shall take all necessary steps to protect each Authorized User’s credentials from disclosure. You will not share (and will instruct each Authorized User not to share) such credentials with any other person or entity and will notify Branch promptly of unauthorized access or use of the Services.
11. LINKS AND THIRD-PARTY CONTENT
11.1
Subject to these Terms, you may enable the Services to display, or contain links to, third party products, services, and websites. You acknowledge that it is your responsibility to evaluate the information, opinion, advice, or other content linked to or made available through Branch’s Services. Any opinions, advice, statements, services, offers, or other information that constitute part of the content expressed, authored, or made available by other users or other third parties on the Services, or which is accessible through or may be located using the Services (collectively, "
Third-Party Content
") are those of the respective authors or producers and not of Branch or its shareholders, directors, officers, employees, agents, or representatives. Branch does not control Third-Party Content and makes no representations, warranties, endorsements, or guarantees regarding the accuracy, integrity or quality of such Third-Party Content. Branch expressly disclaims all responsibility and liability for any Third-Party Content, including but not limited to, any information or materials advertised in any Third-Party Content. Branch is not responsible or liable, directly or indirectly, for any damage or loss caused to you by your or a third party’s use of or reliance on any goods, services, or information available on or through any third-party service or Third-Party Content.
11.2
If you are purchasing Branch’s Advanced Compliance product, you agree to the following product-specific terms: In activating a Third-Party integration within your Advanced Compliance product, you consent to Branch transmitting data, which may include sensitive data subject to data protection laws such as HIPAA, from your Advanced Compliance instance to the Third-Party service. You acknowledge that Third-Party services, including their websites and mobile applications, are not governed by Branch and may have distinct terms of use and privacy policies. It is your responsibility to review and comply with the Third-Party’s terms and policies. You are solely responsible for ensuring that any Third-Party complies with applicable laws and regulations.
12. TRADEMARKS
"Branch Metrics", the Branch Metrics logo, and any other trademarks or service marks used by Branch or slogan displayed on the Services ("
Branch Marks
") are trademarks of Branch and its suppliers or licensors, and may not be copied, imitated or used, in whole or in part, without the prior written permission of Branch or the applicable trademark holder. You may not use any metatags or any other "hidden text" utilizing "Branch Metrics" or any other Branch Marks without Branch’s prior written permission. In addition, the look and feel of the Services, including all page headers, custom graphics, button icons and scripts, is the trade dress of Branch and may not be copied, imitated or used, in whole or in part, without Branch’s prior written permission. All other trademarks, registered trademarks, product names and company names or logos mentioned in the Services are the property of their respective owners. Reference to any products, services, processes or other information, by trade name, trademark, manufacturer, supplier, or otherwise does not constitute or imply endorsement, sponsorship, or recommendation thereof by Branch.
13. AGENCIES & PARTNERS
13.1 Agency Client.
If you are an agency or a party representing, or providing services for the benefit of, a third party (“
Agency Client
“), you represent and warrant that you are authorized to act on behalf of, and bind to the Agreement, that Agency Client (and upon Branch’s request shall provide evidence thereof). You further represent and warrant that, to the extent that you are accessing the Services on the Agency Client’s behalf, such Agency Client has provided you with explicit permission to collect on its behalf and view Agency Client’s data and that you shall use such data strictly in accordance with the permissions provided to you by such Agency Client and the terms of the Agreement. You shall ensure that each Agency Client agrees to the terms of the Agreement and any applicable Order Form(s) and agrees to abide by its terms, including without limitation, Section 9 (Privacy Policy & Data Rights) of these Terms. You acknowledge and agree that: (i) Branch makes no representations or warranties for the direct or indirect benefit of any Agency Client; and (ii) you shall not make any representations or warranties to such Agency Client on behalf of Branch.
13.2 Partners.
The Services enable you to integrate, measure, and analyze your Branch account (including data contained therein) with certain partners that you work with, such as advertising networks, publishers and analytics providers (“
Partners
“). For such purpose, you may, through your configuration of the Services (“
Partner Features
”), direct Branch to provide data to, and receive data from Partners relating to end users (“
Shared Data
”). To the extent that you use the Partner Features for Partners you select (“
Permitted Partners
”), then you hereby grant Branch the right to provide Shared Data with Partners pursuant to your configuration of the Services and to obtain and process Shared Data from Permitted Partners pursuant to your configuration of the Services. You acknowledge and agree that: (i) the sharing of such Shared Data between Branch and Permitted Partners will be available only to the extent enabled by the Permitted Partner and Branch; (ii) any use of Shared Data by a Permitted Partner shall be subject to your own agreements with such Permitted Partner; (iii) Branch shall have no liability or responsibility in connection with any acts or omissions by Permitted Partners; and (iv) any use or processing of Shared Data may be subject to certain limitations and restrictions imposed by Permitted Partners and Branch is not responsible for fulfilling any such limitations and restrictions unless expressly agreed to in writing between you and Branch.
14. CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION
14.1 Definition.
Each Party to these Terms (a “
Receiving Party
”) may have access to, or become acquainted with, certain non-public confidential information of the other Party (a “
Disclosing Party
”) including without limitation all information clearly identified as confidential at the time of disclosure (“
Confidential Information
”). You and Branch further agree that, subject to the rights and licenses granted herein, each Party's Confidential Information shall include all non-public information regarding the Disclosing Party, including without limitation any customer, customer prospect, the terms, conditions and pricing set forth in the Agreement and its Order Form(s), marketing, technical, business and/or strategic plans or information provided by the Disclosing Party to the Receiving Party in the performance of the Services under the Agreement.
14.2 Use and Disclosure.
Each Party agrees as follows: (a) to use the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party only for the purposes permitted by the Agreement, or as otherwise permitted by the Agreement (the "
Purpose
"); (b) to take all reasonable steps to ensure that the Disclosing Party’s Confidential Information is not disclosed or distributed by the Receiving Party’s employees or agents to another party in violation of the Agreement, but in no event will the Receiving party use less effort to protect the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party than it uses to protect its own Confidential Information of like importance; (c) to restrict access to the Confidential Information disclosed by the Disclosing Party to such of the Receiving Party’s employees, agents and third parties, if any, who have a legitimate need to have access for the Purpose and who have agreed in writing or are otherwise bound to treat such information in accordance with the Agreement; and (d) to return or destroy all Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party’s written request, after termination of the Agreement. The Receiving Party will not be obligated under this confidentiality section with respect to information that: (1) is or has become readily publicly available through no act or omission of the Receiving Party or its employees or agents; (2) is received from a third party lawfully in possession of such information and the Receiving Party has no knowledge of any disclosure restrictions on such third party to disclose such information; (3) is disclosed to a third party by the Disclosing Party without restriction on disclosure; (4) was rightfully in the possession of the Receiving Party without restriction prior to its disclosure by the Disclosing Party; or (5) was independently developed by employees or consultants of the Receiving Party without reliance on, or reference to, such Confidential Information.
14.3 Permitted Disclosures.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, Confidential Information may be disclosed as required by any court order or governmental agency, provided that before disclosing such Confidential Information the Receiving Party must provide the Disclosing Party with sufficient advance notice of the court or agency’s request for the information to enable the Receiving Party to exercise any rights it may have to challenge or limit the court or agency’s authority to receive such Confidential Information, to the extent permitted by applicable law.
15. PROPRIETARY RIGHTS
15.1 Proprietary Rights.
As between you and Branch, you shall retain all right, title, and interest in your Digital Properties. If you choose to use your Digital Properties with a Service, you grant Branch permission to allow the Services to interoperate with your Digital Properties as required for the interoperation of your Digital Properties with the Service. Subject to the limited licenses granted herein, Branch acquires no right, title or interest from you or your licensors under the Agreement in or to your Digital Properties. Subject to the limited rights expressly granted hereunder, Branch, its Affiliates, and its licensors reserve all of their right, title and interest in and to the Services (including the Branch application programming interfaces and the Branch software development kits), the Documentation, all technology utilized by Branch to provide the Services, and all of their related intellectual property rights related to, embodied by, or incorporated in any of the foregoing and including any updates, upgrades, enhancements, modifications and improvements made to, or derivatives of, the foregoing. No copyright is granted by Branch to Customer hereunder. No rights are granted to Customer hereunder other than as expressly set forth herein.
15.2 Feedback.
Branch may provide you with a mechanism to provide feedback, suggestions, and ideas, if you choose, about the Services ("
Feedback
"). You agree that Branch may, in its sole discretion, use the Feedback you provide to Branch in any way, including in future enhancements and modifications to the Services. You hereby grant to Branch and its assigns a perpetual, worldwide, fully transferable, sub-licensable, fully paid-up, irrevocable, royalty-free license to use, reproduce, modify, create derivative works from, distribute, and display the Feedback in any manner for any purpose, in any media, software, or technology of any kind now existing or developed in the future, without any obligation to provide attribution or compensation to you or any third party.
16. WARRANTY & DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTIES
16.1 Warranty.
You represent and warrant to Branch that: (a) you are duly organized under applicable law and have sufficient authority to enter into the Agreement; (b) the person entering into the Agreement is authorized to agree to and execute the Agreement on behalf of such Party; and (c) the execution and performance of the Agreement does not conflict with any contractual obligations you have to any third party.
16.2 DISCLAIMER.
EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY PROVIDED IN THE AGREEMENT, THE SERVICES, AND THE DOCUMENTATION ARE PROVIDED “AS IS,” WITHOUT REPRESENTATION OR WARRANTY OF ANY KIND. WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE. BRANCH DOES NOT WARRANT THE ACCURACY, COMPLETENESS, OR USEFULNESS OF THE SERVICES, AND THE DOCUMENTATION, NOR DOES BRANCH WARRANT THAT THE SERVICES WILL BE FREE FROM ERRORS, OR THAT THE OPERATIONS OF THE SERVICES WILL BE UNINTERRUPTED. YOU RELY ON THE SERVICES AND THE DOCUMENTATION AT YOUR OWN RISK. SOME JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW THE EXCLUSION OF CERTAIN WARRANTIES IN CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES. ACCORDINGLY, THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH ABOVE APPLY TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW.
17. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
17.1
BRANCH AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND LICENSORS WILL NOT BE LIABLE FOR ANY INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, PUNITIVE, CONSEQUENTIAL, OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO, DAMAGES FOR LOSS OF PROFITS, LOSS OF REVENUE, GOODWILL, USE, DATA THAT IS INCOMPLETE, MISSING, OR INCORRECT, OR OTHER INTANGIBLE LOSSES (EVEN IF BRANCH HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES), RESULTING FROM THIS AGREEMENT.
17.2
UNDER NO CIRCUMSTANCES WILL THE TOTAL AGGREGATE LIABILITY OF BRANCH AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND LICENSORS RESULTING FROM THIS AGREEMENT (INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO WARRANTY CLAIMS), REGARDLESS OF THE FORUM AND REGARDLESS OF WHETHER ANY ACTION OR CLAIM IS BASED IN CONTRACT, WARRANTY, NEGLIGENCE, STRICT LIABILITY, OR OTHER TORT, BREACH OF ANY STATUTORY DUTY, INDEMNITY OR CONTRIBUTION, OR OTHERWISE, EXCEED THE AMOUNTS, IF ANY, THAT YOU HAVE PAID, OR AGREED TO PAY, TO BRANCH FOR USE OF THE SERVICES IN THE TWELVE (12) MONTH PERIOD PRIOR TO THE EVENT GIVING RISE TO THE CLAIM. SOME OF THE LIMITATIONS PROVIDED HEREIN MAY NOT BE ALLOWED UNDER THE LAWS OF CERTAIN JURISDICTIONS. IF ANY SUCH LAW IS DEEMED TO APPLY TO THE AGREEMENT, THEN THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH HEREIN SHALL APPLY TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED UNDER SUCH LAWS.
18. INDEMNITY
18.1 Indemnity.
You will defend Branch, its Affiliates and their officers, agents, employees, representatives, and assigns (“
Branch Indemnified Parties
”) against any claim, demand, suit, or action against Branch brought by a third party to the extent arising out of or relating to: (a) Third-Party Content or your use of the Services in violation of the Agreement, the Documentation, or applicable law, (b) allegations that your Digital Properties, or the combination of your Digital Properties with the Services, infringes or misappropriates a third party’s intellectual property rights, (c) your instructions to share Shared Data with a Partner, or (d) a regulatory investigation (each a “
Claim Against Branch
”). You will indemnify Branch Indemnified Parties from any costs, damages, and expenses finally awarded against Branch Indemnified Parties as a result of, or for any amounts paid by Branch Indemnified Parties under a settlement approved by you in writing of, a Claim Against Branch. The above defense and indemnification obligations will be limited to the extent a Claim Against Branch arises from Branch’s fraud, or reckless or willful misconduct.
18.2 Agency Indemnity.
If you are an agency or a party representing, or providing services for the benefit of an Agency Client, in addition to the obligations set forth in the section “Agencies & Partners” of these Terms, you further agree to indemnify, hold harmless and defend Branch Indemnified Parties from and against any claim, demand, suit, or action and any related liability against a Branch Indemnified Party brought by a third party, arising out of or relating to: (a) any representations and warranties made by you concerning any aspect of the Services to an Agency Client; (b) any claims made by or on behalf of any Agency Client arising out or relating to your use of the Services; and (c) any claims arising out of or relating to acts or omissions of an Agency Client in connection with the Services.
18.3 Indemnification Procedure.
Your indemnification obligations under this Agreement will be contingent upon (a) Branch promptly giving you written notice of any claim for which indemnification is sought (provided that the Branch’s failure to notify you will not diminish your obligations under this section, except to the extent that you are materially prejudiced as a result of such failure), (b) you having sole control of the defense and settlement of any and all claims for which indemnification is sought (provided that no settlement may be entered into without either (i) Branch’s consent where a settlement requires any action on the part of Branch or (ii) the securing of an unconditional release of Branch for all liability), and (c) Branch giving you reasonably requested assistance at your expense. Branch may, at its own expense, and without limiting the obligations of the indemnifying party, maintain its own counsel and participate in the defense with counsel of its own choosing at any time.
19. MISCELLANEOUS
19.1 Governing Law.
The Agreement and all matters arising out of or relating to the Agreement shall be governed by and construed under the laws of the State of California, without regard to its conflict of law provisions. The parties expressly disclaim and exclude the application of the United Nations Convention on Contracts for the International Sale of Goods.
19.2 Dispute Resolution.
In the event of any dispute, claim, or controversy in connection with this Agreement (other than for disputes, claims, or controversies related to the intellectual property of a party) (collectively, "
Disputes
"), each Party's senior representatives will, in good faith, attempt to resolve a Dispute. If the Parties are unable to resolve a Dispute within thirty (30) days or within such other time period as the Parties may agree in writing, then the Parties may commence binding arbitration under JAMS' Comprehensive Arbitration Rules and Procedures. The Parties will share equally the fees and expenses of the JAMS arbitrator. The arbitration will be conducted by a sole arbitrator mutually agreed to between the Parties or, failing that, by JAMS under its then prevailing rules. Judgment on the award rendered by the arbitrator may be entered in any court of competent jurisdiction. The arbitrator will have the authority to grant specific performance or any other equitable or legal remedy, including provisional remedies. Each Party will be responsible for its own incurred expenses arising out of any dispute resolution procedure. Any arbitration proceedings will take place in the English language in (a) San Francisco, California, if you are domiciled in any country outside of the (i) European Economic Area or its regions or territories, the United Kingdom, Switzerland, Andorra, Vatican City, and Monaco and (ii) Asia-Pacific region; (b) London, England, if you are domiciled in any country within the European Economic Area or its regions or territories, the United Kingdom, Switzerland, Andorra, Vatican City, or Monaco; or (c) Singapore, if you are domiciled in any country within the Asia-Pacific region.
19.3 No Waiver; Severability.
Branch’s failure to enforce any right or provision in the Agreement will not constitute a waiver of such right or provision unless acknowledged and agreed to by Branch in writing. If any provision of the Agreement is found to be unenforceable or invalid, that provision will be limited or eliminated to the minimum extent necessary so that the Agreement will otherwise remain in full force and effect and enforceable.
19.4 Assignment.
The Agreement is not assignable, transferable or sublicensable by you except with Branch’s prior written consent. Branch may transfer and assign any of its rights and obligations under the Agreement freely and without consent.
19.5 Entire Agreement.
Both you and Branch agree that the Agreement is the complete and exclusive statement of the mutual understanding of the Parties and supersedes all previous written and oral agreements, communications and other understandings relating to your use of the Services, and that all waivers and modifications must be in a signed writing by both Parties, except as otherwise provided herein. Preprinted terms in your purchase orders or other customer-generated ordering documents, or terms referenced or linked within them, will have no effect on the Agreement and are hereby rejected, regardless of whether they are signed, clicked through, or otherwise agreed to by Branch and/or purport to take precedence over the Agreement. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency among the following documents, the order of precedence shall be: (1) the body of these Terms (2), (2) any exhibit, schedule, rider, or addendum to the Agreement,including the PS Terms or a statement of work (SOW), (3)  the Documentation (4) and then the Order Form, unless explicitly provided otherwise as a Special Term within the Order Form itself.
19.6 Relationship between the Parties.
The Parties are independent contractors. No agency, partnership, joint venture, fiduciary or employment relationship is created as a result of the Agreement, and you do not have any authority of any kind to bind Branch in any respect whatsoever.
19.7 International Trade and Anti-Corruption and Laws.
Each party (a) warrants that it will comply with all applicable anti-corruption, anti-money laundering, economic and trade sanctions, export controls, and other international trade laws, regulations, and governmental orders (collectively, “
Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws
”) in the jurisdictions that apply directly or indirectly to the Services, including, without limitation, the United States, and (b) represents that it has not made, offered, promised to make, or authorized any payment or anything of value in violation of Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws. You will promptly notify Branch in writing of any actual or potential violation of Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws in connection with the use of the Services and take all appropriate steps to remedy or resolve such violations, including any steps requested by Branch. If applicable, you represent that you have obtained, and warrant that you will continue to obtain, all licenses or other authorizations required to export, re-export, or transfer the Services.
19.8 Sanctions Lists.
The Services and any derivatives thereof, may be subject to export control and economic sanctions laws and regulations of the United States and other jurisdictions. Both you and Branch each represent that (and in your case, also your end users of your Digital Properties) it is not named on any government prohibited, denied, or unverified-party, sanctions, debarment, or exclusion list or export-controlled related restricted party list (collectively, “
Sanctions Lists
”). Customer shall not permit any entity or individual to access or use any of the Services who is listed on the Consolidated Screening List or located in a U.S. government-embargoed country (currently Russia, Belarus, Cuba, Iran, North Korea, Syria and Crimea), or known to be engaged in proliferation of nuclear, chemical or biological weapons or missiles, or otherwise in violation of any U.S. export law or regulation. You will immediately (i) discontinue your use of the Services if you become placed on any Sanctions List and (ii) remove your End Users’ access to the Services if your end users become placed on any Sanctions List. You represent that you have not, and warrant that you will not, export, re-export, or transfer the Services to an entity on any Sanctions List without prior authorization from the applicable governmental authority. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, either Party may terminate this Agreement immediately upon written notice to the other party if the other party is in breach of its obligations hereunder with respect to Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws or Sanction Lists. If your account is blocked because it is operating in a country or region prohibited by Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws, you will receive notice of your account being inoperable when you attempt to log into your account in such a prohibited country or region.
19.9 Third Party Beneficiary.
No provision of the Agreement is intended, nor shall it be interpreted, to provide or create any third-party beneficiary rights or any other rights of any kind in any customer, affiliate, stockholder, partner, member, director, officer, or employee of any Party hereto or any other person or entity.
19.10 Marketing Support.
You agree to comply with reasonable requests of Branch to support public relations efforts pertaining to the Services, which efforts may include: (a) a press release highlighting your company’s use of the Services, (b) participation in targeted press and analyst interviews highlighting benefits of implementing the Services, and (c) participation in customer case studies developed by Branch and used on Branch’s website(s) and other collateral. You grant to Branch a non-exclusive, non-transferable, limited right to use your name, trademarks, and logos (collectively, the "
Customer Marks
") (i) for the purpose of referencing You as a customer of Branch on the Branch website(s) and (ii) in the production of marketing materials, provided that such use is in accordance with any trademark and logo use guidelines that you provide to Branch. All goodwill developed from such use shall be solely for your benefit.
19.11 Force Majeure.
Neither Party will be responsible for any delay or failure in performance of any part of this Agreement to the extent that such delay or failure is caused by an event or circumstance beyond the reasonable control of the Party whose performance is affected and could not have been prevented or corrected through the exercise of reasonable diligence, including, for example, an act of God, act of government, flood, fire, earthquake, civil unrest, act of terror, strike or other labor problem (other than one involving Branch employees), Internet service provider failure or delay, integrated third party applications, or denial of service attack (each such event, a “
Force Majeure Event
”). The Party alleging a Force Majeure Event (the “
Affected Party
”) will promptly notify the other Party in writing of the Force Majeure Event, providing reasonable detail of the circumstances giving rise to the Force Majeure Event, and the steps it is taking to remedy the delay or failure. Notwithstanding the foregoing, financial incapability will not be considered as a Force Majeure Event.
19.12 Notices.
Except as otherwise specified in the Agreement, all notices of termination or an indemnifiable claim related to the Agreement (“
Legal Notices
”) will be provided via email and will be effective upon receipt by email as set forth below. If to Branch, all notices shall be provided to legal@branch.io ("
Branch Notices
"). Billing-related notices to Customer will be provided via email and addressed to the relevant billing contact designated by Customer on the applicable Order Form or the relevant Services account administrator designated by Customer. All Legal Notices and other notices to Customer will be provided via email and addressed to the relevant Services account administrator designated by Customer.
19.13 Modifications.
We may make changes to these Terms from time to time. When we do, we will revise the "Last updated" date given above. It is your responsibility to review these Terms frequently and to remain informed of any changes to them. The then-current version of these Terms will supersede all earlier versions. You agree that your continued use of Branch’s Services after such changes have been published to Branch’s Services will constitute your acceptance of such revised Terms.
20. CONTACTING US
If you have any questions or concerns about Branch’s Services or these Terms, you may contact us by email at
info@branch.io
.
Effective September 23rd 2024
to
September 24th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Branch SaaS Terms & Conditions
1. INTRODUCTION
1.1
These Terms & Conditions ("
Terms
") are entered into by and between of Branch Metrics, Inc., a Delaware corporation d/b/a Branch Metrics ("
Branch
," "
Branch Metrics
," "
we
," or "
us
") and the entity or person accessing this website ("
Website
") or placing an order for or accessing any Services made available by Branch Metrics (“
Customer
” or “
you
” or “
your
”). “
Services
" means the products and services that are made available online by Branch under these Terms, the “
Beta Services
”, as defined in these Terms, other services or products that Branch may make available from time to time, including associated Branch offline or mobile components. Services exclude (i) Web-based, mobile, offline or other software application functionality that interoperates with a Service, that is provided by Customer or a third party, (ii) Third-Party Content, as defined in these Terms, and (iii) Professional Services which shall be governed by the PS Terms and the applicable SOW.
1.2
By accepting this Agreement, either by accessing or using the Services, or authorizing or permitting any Agent or end user of your Digital Properties (as defined below) to access or use the Services, you agree to be legally bound by, and use Branch’s Services in compliance with, all terms, conditions, and notices in this Agreement as of the date of such access or use of the Services. If you are entering into this Agreement on behalf of a company, organization or another legal entity (an “Entity”), you are agreeing to this Agreement for that Entity and representing to Branch that you have the authority to bind such Entity and its Affiliates (as defined below) to this Agreement, in which case the terms “Customer,” “you,” or “your” herein refers to such Entity and its Affiliates. If you do not have such authority, or if you do not agree with this Agreement, you must not use or authorize any use of the Services. Customer and Branch shall each be referred to as a “Party” and collectively referred to as the “Parties” for purposes of this Agreement. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO THESE TERMS & CONDITIONS, DO NOT USE ANY SERVICES.
2. DEFINITIONS
"
Affiliate
" means any entity that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the subject entity. “Control,” for purposes of this definition, means direct or indirect ownership or control of more than 50% of the voting interests of the subject entity.
"
Agreement
" means these Terms together with any applicable Order Forms, and any exhibits, appendices, schedules, professional service terms, SOWs, or attachments identified or referenced in these Terms, and any amendments mutually agreed to by the Parties (all of which are incorporated herein by reference).
"
Beta Services
" means Branch’s services or functionality that are not generally available to customers and that may be made available to you to try at your option which are designated as beta, pilot, limited release, developer preview, non-production, evaluation, or other services or functionality with a similar description.
“
Collection Technologies
” means any tags, SDKs, APIs, JavaScript, pixels, attribution or redirect links, cookies or other technology used or made available by Branch to Customer to support the provision of the Services by Branch, including any updates thereto.
“
Digital Properties
” means your mobile applications, websites and program code created by or for you that use the Services or for use by you with the Services.
"
Documentation
" means the applicable Service’s documentation and usage guidelines at
https://docs.branch.io/
, or its successor URL.
“
Free Services
” means any Branch service or functionality that Branch makes available to Customer, to try at Customer’s option, free of charge.
"
Order Form
" means an ordering document or online order specifying the Services to be provided hereunder that is entered into between Customer and Branch or any Affiliates of the Parties, including any addenda and supplements thereto. By entering into an Order Form hereunder, an Affiliate agrees to be bound by the terms of the Agreement as if it were an original party hereto.
“
Services
" means the products and services that are made available online by Branch under these Terms, the Beta Services, and other services or products that Branch may make available from time to time, including associated Branch offline or mobile components. Services exclude (i) Web-based, mobile, offline or other software application functionality that interoperates with a Service, that is provided by Customer or a third party, and (ii) Third-Party Content, as defined in these Terms.
3. SERVICE ACCESS AND AVAILABILITY
Branch will make the Services available to Customer solely for Customer’s internal business needs pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and the applicable Documentation. Customer acknowledges and agrees that it is solely responsible for its integration and launch of the Services. Branch shall: (a) use commercially reasonable efforts to make the online Services available 24 hours a day, 7 days a week, except for: (i) planned maintenance, (ii) emergency maintenance that is reasonably unforeseeable and necessary for purposes of maintaining the security, integrity or operation of the Services, (iii) maintenance, updates, restrictions or changes due to security vulnerability concerns, and (iv) any unavailability caused by a Force Majeure Event, and (b) provide the Services in accordance with the laws and regulations applicable to Branch’s provision of its Services to its customers generally (i.e., without regard for Customer’s particular use of the Services), and subject to Customer’s use of the Services in accordance with the Agreement and the Documentation. Your right to access and use the Services is limited by all the terms set forth in the Agreement.
4. USE RESTRICTIONS; UPDATES & SUPPORT
4.1 Use Restrictions.
You must comply with all applicable laws when implementing, configuring, and using the Services and, except as expressly permitted under these Terms, you will not directly or indirectly: (a) make the functionality of the Services available to any third party through any means, including, without limitation, any hosting, application services provider, service bureau, or other type of service; (b) use any automated tool (e.g., robots, spiders) to access or use the Services; (c) extend, sell, distribute rent, lease, sublicense, or otherwise provide access to the Services to another person; (d) circumvent or disable any digital rights management, usage rules, permissions, or other security features of the Services or attempt to gain unauthorized access to the Services or Branch’s related systems or networks; (e) use the Services in a manner that overburdens, or that threatens the integrity, performance, or availability of, the Services; (f) frame or mirror any part of the Services, other than on Customer’s own internal and non-public intranets for its own internal business purposes, unless otherwise permitted in the Documentation; (g) remove, alter, or obscure any proprietary notices (including copyright and trademark notices) on any portion of the Services; (h) send material containing software viruses, worms, trojan horses, or other harmful computer code, files, scripts, agents, or programs; (i) use Branch’s Services in violation of Branch’s Acceptable Use Policy available at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-aup
, or its successor URL; or (j) use the Services in connection with any Apps or websites that are directed to children under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), without employing appropriate settings within the Collection Technologies to limit data collection from such children in accordance with applicable law. More information on these settings is available
here
. If you have questions about how to use these settings or have any reason to believe that these resources may not address your particular use case, please reach out to the Branch Support team via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
, or its successor URL. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Agreement, use of the Services in violation of the foregoing restrictions by Customer that, in Branch’s judgment, threatens the integrity, performance, availability, or security of the Services may result in Branch’s immediate suspension of, or limitation in Customer’s access to, the Services.
4.2 Updates and Support.
Branch will maintain, support, update, and provide error corrections for the Services to the same extent it does so for its customers generally. If Branch provides you with an update or maintenance release for the offline components of the Branch Services, unless you receive a separate license from Branch for that update or release that expressly supersedes these Terms, such update or release will be subject to these Terms. Branch shall have no liability for any damages that may result from Customer’s failure to implement upgrades or updates to the Services provided that Customer is notified in writing by Branch of such upgrade or update. All support requests must be sent to the Branch Support team via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
, or its successor URL.
5. BETA SERVICES
From time to time, Branch may invite you to try Beta Services. You may accept or decline any such trial at your sole discretion. Beta Services are for evaluation purposes only and not for production use, are not subject to any service level agreements (SLAs) agreed to between you and Branch and may be subject to additional terms. Branch is under no obligation to maintain, support, update, or provide error corrections for the Beta Services. Branch may discontinue Beta Services at any time in Branch’s sole discretion and reserves the right to never make them generally available. BRANCH WILL HAVE NO LIABILITY FOR ANY HARM OR DAMAGE ARISING OUT OF, OR IN CONNECTION WITH, CUSTOMER’S USE OF A BETA SERVICE. THE BETA SERVICES ARE PROVIDED “AS IS” AND AS AVAILABLE AND ARE EXCLUSIVE OF ANY WARRANTY WHATSOEVER. WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, WITH RESPECT TO THE BETA SERVICES, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE. In the event of a conflict or inconsistency between this section and any other provision of the Agreement, the terms of this section “BETA SERVICES” shall control and prevail with respect to Beta Services.
5.1 Free Services.
Branch may make Free Services available to Customer and use of Free Services is subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement. In the event of a conflict between this section and any other provision of this Agreement, this section shall control with respect to Free Services. Free Services are provided to Customer without charge up to certain limits as described in the Documentation. Usage over these limits requires Customer’s purchase of additional resources or services. Customer agrees that Branch, in its sole discretion and for any or no reason, may terminate Customer’s access to the Free Services or any part thereof. Customer agrees that any termination of Customer’s access to the Free Services may be without prior notice, and Customer agrees that Branch will not be liable to Customer or any third party for such termination. BRANCH WILL HAVE NO LIABILITY FOR ANY HARM OR DAMAGE ARISING OUT OF, OR IN CONNECTION WITH, CUSTOMER’S USE OF A FREE SERVICE. THE FREE SERVICES ARE PROVIDED “AS IS” AND AS AVAILABLE AND ARE EXCLUSIVE OF ANY WARRANTY WHATSOEVER. WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, WITH RESPECT TO THE FREE SERVICES, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE. CUSTOMER SHALL NOT USE THE FREE SERVICES IN A MANNER THAT VIOLATES APPLICABLE LAWS AND WILL BE FULLY LIABLE FOR ANY DAMAGES CAUSED BY ITS USE OF A FREE SERVICES. ANY DATA AND CONFIGURATIONS ENTERED INTO CUSTOMER’S FREE SERVICES ACCOUNT MAY BE PERMANENTLY LOST UPON TERMINATION OF THE FREE SERVICES.
6. PAYMENT TERMS
6.1 Fees.
You will pay Branch all fees specified in an Order Form or, if there is no Order Form executed by the Parties, then you will pay the fees set forth at the applicable rates available at
https://branch.io/pricing/
, or its successor URL (“Fees”). You are responsible for all undisputed Fees, including Fees that remain due and payable after expiration or termination of the Agreement, or any portion thereof. Except as otherwise expressly set forth herein or where expressly set forth in an applicable Order Form, (i) payment obligations are non-cancelable, Fees are non-refundable, and failure to use the Services provisioned does not constitute a basis for refusing to pay Fees, and (ii) Services purchased cannot be decreased during the service period for which they were purchased.
6.2 Payments & Invoicing.
To the extent you procure the Services with an applicable Order Form, invoices for the applicable Fees shall be sent to you via email to the email address(es) you designate in your account when signing up for Services, and you shall pay the Fees due upon receipt of such invoice. To the extent you procure the Services under an applicable Order Form, any relevant paid service-specific terms including, for example, contract duration, monthly fees, billing frequency, payment forms, and payment term will be addressed within an associated Order Form. All Fees set forth in an applicable Order Form shall be invoiced in advance in accordance with the billing frequency stated therein. Fees are payable in United States dollars. You shall be responsible for the payment of any fees associated with an electronic funds transfer (i.e., ACH, wire transfer) when issuing payment to Branch, which includes fees from your financial institution and intermediary banks. You are responsible for providing complete and accurate billing and contact information to Branch and notifying Branch of any changes to such information. In certain instances where your payment method is via credit card, the issuer of the credit card may charge a transaction fee or related charges, which you will be responsible to pay.
6.3 Payment by Credit Card.
In certain instances where your payment method is via credit card, the issuer of the credit card may charge a transaction fee or related charges, which you will be responsible to pay. Fees will be billed to the credit card nominated by you and you authorize the card issuer to pay all such amounts and authorize Branch (or its billing agent) to charge the credit card account until you or Branch cancels or terminates the Services as set forth herein; provided that if payment is not received from the credit card issuer, the transaction is returned after the payment has been settled, otherwise known as chargeback, or if there are insufficient funds in the case of check or debit card payments, you agree to pay all amounts plus any applicable transaction fees (e.g., NSF fees, chargeback fees) due upon demand.
6.4 Payment Disputes.
If you have concerns about any charges on your invoice, you agree to the following dispute resolution process: (i) all billing disputes must be submitted in writing to billing@branch.io, (ii) billing disputes must be submitted within 90 days of the date the invoice was generated, and (iii) undisputed amounts will be subject to the Agreement and total payment for undisputed invoices or amounts must be submitted when due.
6.5 Suspension or Cancellation of Service; Payment Acceleration.
Without derogating from any other remedies available to Branch under the Agreement or by applicable law, if you owe any undisputed Fees thirty (30) days or more past due in connection with any Services provided by Branch under any applicable Order Form, then, without affecting any of your payment obligations under the Agreement (including, any payment obligations under an Order Form), Branch is entitled to take further action including but not limited to accelerating your unpaid fee obligations under such agreement so that all such obligations become immediately due and payable, and suspending and/or canceling your access to the Services until such amounts are paid in full. Branch reserves the right to send your account to a collections agency for nonpayment (which may, in turn, report the uncollected debt to credit bureaus) and to use your contact information for debt collection purposes if the Agreement is terminated for non-payment as set forth herein following a 10-day cure period.
6.6 Taxes
. Branch’s Fees do not include any local, state, or federal sales, use, excise, personal property, VAT, or other similar taxes, duties, levies, tariffs, and other governmental charges (including, without limitation, any withholding tax, and any such taxes, to the extent legally applicable, which shall be borne and paid by Customer) (collectively, "Taxes"). If Branch has the legal obligation to pay or collect Taxes for which you are responsible under this section, Branch will invoice you and you will pay that amount unless you provide Branch with a valid tax exemption certificate authorized by the appropriate taxing authority. For clarity, you are responsible for payment of all Taxes resulting from any Fees payable hereunder, other than any taxes based on Branch’s net income, property, and employees.
6.7 Withholding Taxes.
In the event Fees payable by you to Branch under the Agreement are subject to any applicable withholding tax, goods and services tax, or similar taxes required by any tax authority and you are required by applicable law to remit such withholding tax, you: (a) may withhold and deduct from any payments to Branch under the Agreement an amount equivalent to any applicable withholding tax to the extent required by applicable law ("
Withholding Tax
"), (b) will pay to the relevant taxation authority the amount of such applicable withholdings in accordance with applicable law; and (c) will pay to Branch the applicable amounts under this Agreement net of such Withholding Tax. You shall be discharged from the obligation to pay Withholding Tax amounts to Branch provided that (1) you have remitted such amount to the relevant taxation authority and (2) you furnish Branch with (i) your tax registration certificate(s) as proof of registration with the applicable taxation authority, and (ii) any and all relevant tax forms and/or statements with proof of Withholding Tax remittance amount to the taxation authority, the applicable rate, and other information which may reasonably be requested for the purpose of assisting Branch to seek any allowable credits or deductions for the Withholding Tax so withheld in each jurisdiction where you are subject to tax.
6.8 Overdue Charges.
If any invoiced amount is not received by Branch by the due date set forth in the applicable invoice, then without limiting Branch’s rights or remedies, (a) those charges may accrue late interest at the rate of 2.5% of the outstanding balance per month, and (b) Branch may condition future Order Form renewals on payment terms shorter than those specified in the applicable Order Form. You are prohibited from creating new accounts until the Fees due are paid in full.
6.9 Term for Paid Services.
Except as expressly set forth herein, the terms set forth in these Terms shall be in force for as long as an Order Form referencing the Agreement is in effect. Except as otherwise agreed to by you and Branch in a superseding Order Form, at the end of an applicable term, your access to the Services will automatically renew under the same Order Form terms (contract duration, billing frequency, payment period, etc.), unless and until your access to the Services is terminated in accordance with this section or either Party to these Terms provides the other with notice of non-renewal (email sufficient; if to Branch, please email billing@branch.io) at least thirty (30) days prior to the commencement of any renewal period.
7. TERMINATION
7.1 Termination by Branch.
Branch may terminate immediately and without penalty this Agreement (including all Order Form(s) and Services that are in effect) in the event Customer commits a material breach of this Agreement For the avoidance of doubt, a breach of the
Branch Acceptable Use Policy
will be considered a material breach of this Agreement. If Branch terminates this Agreement for material breach, then all of Customer’s outstanding balances and any other unpaid payment obligations will become immediately due and payable by Customer in full. Except as otherwise expressly agreed to by you and Branch in a superseding Order Form, Branch reserves the right to suspend or discontinue, temporarily or permanently, all or any portion of the Services without cause upon at least thirty (30) days’ written notice (email sufficient), Should such termination without cause occur, Branch shall provide a pro-rated refund of all pre-paid and unearned amounts based on the period of suspension or the date of discontinuance, as applicable.Branch shall have no further obligations or liability to you or any third-party as a result of such suspension, termination or discontinuance.
7.2 Termination by Customer.
Except where you have agreed to be bound for a defined service period in any applicable Order Form, you may terminate your access to and use of the Services by providing written notice to Branch via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
, or its successor URL). Such termination will be effective as of the last day of the calendar month in which your termination notice is received by Branch. In the event of termination by you in accordance with this Section 7.2, all outstanding balances and any other unpaid payment obligations will become immediately due and payable by Customer in full.
8. SURVIVAL
Upon termination of the Agreement, those sections of these Terms that by their nature would reasonably be expected to survive will survive termination or expiration of these Terms, including but not limited to the sections on Termination, Privacy Policy & Data Rights, Confidential Information, Proprietary Rights, Limitation of Liability, and Legal Notices.
9. PRIVACY POLICY & DATA RIGHTS
9.1 Privacy Policy.
(a) You acknowledge and agree that you will provide a privacy policy to your end users, which shall be in compliance with applicable laws and regulations and shall include, at minimum, the following: (i) clear, meaningful, and conspicuous notice of your privacy practices consistent with applicable laws, (ii) disclosures regarding your use of cookies (including third-party cookies placed on your Digital Properties) and/or targeting and online behavioral advertising; and (iii) your data collection, use and disclosure practices; Branch’s Privacy Policy does not cover your Digital Properties, or the use of your Digital Properties, by your end users. It is your obligation to provide your own privacy policy to your end users. You acknowledge that Branch has no direct relationship or interface with your end users and that Branch’s ability to comply with certain applicable data protection and privacy laws is dependent on your compliance with the terms of this section of the Terms; (b) If you use Branch’s Engagement Builder feature, you agree to respect opt-out flags passed by Branch to you if you use Engagement Builder data for targeted advertisements. You acknowledge and agree that your use of the Services is subject to Branch’s Privacy Policy, located at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-privacypolicy
, or its successor URL.
9.2 Data Analytics.
You acknowledge and agree that Branch may collect and process data from your Digital Properties as set forth in
Branch’s Privacy Policy
with respect to your use of the Services. You grant to Branch a limited, non-exclusive, non-sublicensable, non-transferable license to use the data collected through the Services to provide, maintain, optimize, and improve the Services.
9.3 Data Security.
Branch shall use commercially reasonable technical, administrative, and physical safeguards designed to protect information on its servers, including customer data, against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction. However, you acknowledge and agree that no method of transmission over the Internet or method of electronic storage is completely secure, and that Branch cannot guarantee the absolute security of such information.
9.4 Compliance with Applicable Law.
You will comply with all laws, rules, and regulations applicable to your business and operations and to your use of the Services, including those governing the privacy, security, and trans-border transfers of personal data (such as, but not limited to, compliance with the General Data Protection Regulation (EU 2016/679) ("
GDPR
") and the California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CCPA
”)). Where required by applicable law, you shall be responsible for (a) obtaining consent from end users of your Digital Properties to (i) to place Collection Technologies (including by Branch) on the browsers or devices of end users of your Digital Properties, and (ii) collect and use the data you provide to Branch through the Services and the data that you enable Branch to collect from end users of your Digital Properties and process on your behalf, and (iii) t0 direct Branch to share data it processes on your behalf with any third party; (b) ensuring that you otherwise have any and all rights required in order to provide such data to Branch or to direct Branch to share it with any third party; (c) obtaining data properly and in accordance with applicable law, including, without limitation, the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (“
COPPA
”), and the Video Privacy Protection Act (18 U.S.C. § 2710) (“
VPPA
”); and (d) ensuring you do not provide Branch with any sensitive information or personally identifiable information through the Services that is afforded legal protection under applicable regulation or laws (“
PII
”). To the extent that any of your users request that you not share their data with Branch, or to the extent that you believe that any data you may have provided to Branch was inappropriately obtained, you shall inform Branch immediately. Branch shall have no responsibility or liability to the extent resulting from, or arising out of, your use of the Services not in compliance with the Agreement, the Documentation or applicable law.
9.5 CCPA.
If any data collected through your use of the Services is deemed personal information subject to the CCPA, then the terms set forth in the Branch California Privacy Addendum (“
California Privacy Addendum
“) available at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-ca-privacy-addendum
, or its successor URL, shall apply to the use and processing of such personal information and the Parties agree to incorporate such California Privacy Addendum by reference into the Agreement as an integral part thereof.
10. RESTRICTED AREAS OF THE SERVICES
10.1 Registration Information.
In order to access and use the Services, you must register an account. Any information provided during your registration must be current, complete, and accurate (“
Registration Information
”). It is your sole responsibility to ensure Registration Information is current, complete, and accurate at all times.
10.2 Access Credentials.
The Services, including account management features, may be password-restricted to registered users or other authorized persons. You may select individuals (your employees, Affiliates, or your independent contractors) to access and use the Services in furtherance of your internal business purposes as expressly permitted by this Agreement, unless otherwise expressly agreed to in writing by Branch. You will obtain separate credentials, e.g., user IDs and passwords, from Branch for such individuals (each, an "
Authorized User
").
10.3 Responsibility.
You are responsible for all actions taken under an Authorized User’s account, regardless of whether such action was taken by an Authorized User or by another party, and regardless of whether such Authorized User authorized or had knowledge of such action. You are responsible for the security of each Authorized User’s credentials and shall take all necessary steps to protect each Authorized User’s credentials from disclosure. You will not share (and will instruct each Authorized User not to share) such credentials with any other person or entity and will notify Branch promptly of unauthorized access or use of the Services.
11. LINKS AND THIRD-PARTY CONTENT
11.1
Subject to these Terms, you may enable the Services to display, or contain links to, third party products, services, and websites. You acknowledge that it is your responsibility to evaluate the information, opinion, advice, or other content linked to or made available through Branch’s Services. Any opinions, advice, statements, services, offers, or other information that constitute part of the content expressed, authored, or made available by other users or other third parties on the Services, or which is accessible through or may be located using the Services (collectively, "
Third-Party Content
") are those of the respective authors or producers and not of Branch or its shareholders, directors, officers, employees, agents, or representatives. Branch does not control Third-Party Content and makes no representations, warranties, endorsements, or guarantees regarding the accuracy, integrity or quality of such Third-Party Content. Branch expressly disclaims all responsibility and liability for any Third-Party Content, including but not limited to, any information or materials advertised in any Third-Party Content. Branch is not responsible or liable, directly or indirectly, for any damage or loss caused to you by your or a third party’s use of or reliance on any goods, services, or information available on or through any third-party service or Third-Party Content.
11.2
If you are purchasing Branch’s Advance Compliance product, you agree to the following product-specific terms: In activating a Third-Party integration within your Advance Compliance product, you consent to Branch transmitting data, which may include sensitive data subject to data protection laws such as HIPAA, from your Advance Compliance instance to the Third-Party service. You acknowledge that Third-Party services, including their websites and mobile applications, are not governed by Branch and may have distinct terms of use and privacy policies. It is your responsibility to review and comply with the Third-Party’s terms and policies. You are solely responsible for ensuring that any Third-Party complies with applicable laws and regulations.
12. TRADEMARKS
"Branch Metrics", the Branch Metrics logo, and any other trademarks or service marks used by Branch or slogan displayed on the Services ("
Branch Marks
") are trademarks of Branch and its suppliers or licensors, and may not be copied, imitated or used, in whole or in part, without the prior written permission of Branch or the applicable trademark holder. You may not use any metatags or any other "hidden text" utilizing "Branch Metrics" or any other Branch Marks without Branch’s prior written permission. In addition, the look and feel of the Services, including all page headers, custom graphics, button icons and scripts, is the trade dress of Branch and may not be copied, imitated or used, in whole or in part, without Branch’s prior written permission. All other trademarks, registered trademarks, product names and company names or logos mentioned in the Services are the property of their respective owners. Reference to any products, services, processes or other information, by trade name, trademark, manufacturer, supplier, or otherwise does not constitute or imply endorsement, sponsorship, or recommendation thereof by Branch.
13. AGENCIES & PARTNERS
13.1 Agency Client.
If you are an agency or a party representing, or providing services for the benefit of, a third party (“
Agency Client
“), you represent and warrant that you are authorized to act on behalf of, and bind to the Agreement, that Agency Client (and upon Branch’s request shall provide evidence thereof). You further represent and warrant that, to the extent that you are accessing the Services on the Agency Client’s behalf, such Agency Client has provided you with explicit permission to collect on its behalf and view Agency Client’s data and that you shall use such data strictly in accordance with the permissions provided to you by such Agency Client and the terms of the Agreement. You shall ensure that each Agency Client agrees to the terms of the Agreement and any applicable Order Form(s) and agrees to abide by its terms, including without limitation, Section 9 (Privacy Policy & Data Rights) of these Terms. You acknowledge and agree that: (i) Branch makes no representations or warranties for the direct or indirect benefit of any Agency Client; and (ii) you shall not make any representations or warranties to such Agency Client on behalf of Branch.
13.2 Partners.
The Services enable you to integrate, measure, and analyze your Branch account (including data contained therein) with certain partners that you work with, such as advertising networks, publishers and analytics providers (“
Partners
“). For such purpose, you may, through your configuration of the Services (“
Partner Features
”), direct Branch to provide data to, and receive data from Partners relating to end users (“
Shared Data
”). To the extent that you use the Partner Features for Partners you select (“
Permitted Partners
”), then you hereby grant Branch the right to provide Shared Data with Partners pursuant to your configuration of the Services and to obtain and process Shared Data from Permitted Partners pursuant to your configuration of the Services. You acknowledge and agree that: (i) the sharing of such Shared Data between Branch and Permitted Partners will be available only to the extent enabled by the Permitted Partner and Branch; (ii) any use of Shared Data by a Permitted Partner shall be subject to your own agreements with such Permitted Partner; (iii) Branch shall have no liability or responsibility in connection with any acts or omissions by Permitted Partners; and (iv) any use or processing of Shared Data may be subject to certain limitations and restrictions imposed by Permitted Partners and Branch is not responsible for fulfilling any such limitations and restrictions unless expressly agreed to in writing between you and Branch.
14. CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION
14.1 Definition.
Each Party to these Terms (a “
Receiving Party
”) may have access to, or become acquainted with, certain non-public confidential information of the other Party (a “
Disclosing Party
”) including without limitation all information clearly identified as confidential at the time of disclosure (“
Confidential Information
”). You and Branch further agree that, subject to the rights and licenses granted herein, each Party's Confidential Information shall include all non-public information regarding the Disclosing Party, including without limitation any customer, customer prospect, the terms, conditions and pricing set forth in the Agreement and its Order Form(s), marketing, technical, business and/or strategic plans or information provided by the Disclosing Party to the Receiving Party in the performance of the Services under the Agreement.
14.2 Use and Disclosure.
Each Party agrees as follows: (a) to use the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party only for the purposes permitted by the Agreement, or as otherwise permitted by the Agreement (the "
Purpose
"); (b) to take all reasonable steps to ensure that the Disclosing Party’s Confidential Information is not disclosed or distributed by the Receiving Party’s employees or agents to another party in violation of the Agreement, but in no event will the Receiving party use less effort to protect the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party than it uses to protect its own Confidential Information of like importance; (c) to restrict access to the Confidential Information disclosed by the Disclosing Party to such of the Receiving Party’s employees, agents and third parties, if any, who have a legitimate need to have access for the Purpose and who have agreed in writing or are otherwise bound to treat such information in accordance with the Agreement; and (d) to return or destroy all Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party’s written request, after termination of the Agreement. The Receiving Party will not be obligated under this confidentiality section with respect to information that: (1) is or has become readily publicly available through no act or omission of the Receiving Party or its employees or agents; (2) is received from a third party lawfully in possession of such information and the Receiving Party has no knowledge of any disclosure restrictions on such third party to disclose such information; (3) is disclosed to a third party by the Disclosing Party without restriction on disclosure; (4) was rightfully in the possession of the Receiving Party without restriction prior to its disclosure by the Disclosing Party; or (5) was independently developed by employees or consultants of the Receiving Party without reliance on, or reference to, such Confidential Information.
14.3 Permitted Disclosures.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, Confidential Information may be disclosed as required by any court order or governmental agency, provided that before disclosing such Confidential Information the Receiving Party must provide the Disclosing Party with sufficient advance notice of the court or agency’s request for the information to enable the Receiving Party to exercise any rights it may have to challenge or limit the court or agency’s authority to receive such Confidential Information, to the extent permitted by applicable law.
15. PROPRIETARY RIGHTS
15.1 Proprietary Rights.
As between you and Branch, you shall retain all right, title, and interest in your Digital Properties. If you choose to use your Digital Properties with a Service, you grant Branch permission to allow the Services to interoperate with your Digital Properties as required for the interoperation of your Digital Properties with the Service. Subject to the limited licenses granted herein, Branch acquires no right, title or interest from you or your licensors under the Agreement in or to your Digital Properties. Subject to the limited rights expressly granted hereunder, Branch, its Affiliates, and its licensors reserve all of their right, title and interest in and to the Services (including the Branch application programming interfaces and the Branch software development kits), the Documentation, all technology utilized by Branch to provide the Services, and all of their related intellectual property rights related to, embodied by, or incorporated in any of the foregoing and including any updates, upgrades, enhancements, modifications and improvements made to, or derivatives of, the foregoing. No copyright is granted by Branch to Customer hereunder. No rights are granted to Customer hereunder other than as expressly set forth herein.
15.2 Feedback.
Branch may provide you with a mechanism to provide feedback, suggestions, and ideas, if you choose, about the Services ("
Feedback
"). You agree that Branch may, in its sole discretion, use the Feedback you provide to Branch in any way, including in future enhancements and modifications to the Services. You hereby grant to Branch and its assigns a perpetual, worldwide, fully transferable, sub-licensable, fully paid-up, irrevocable, royalty-free license to use, reproduce, modify, create derivative works from, distribute, and display the Feedback in any manner for any purpose, in any media, software, or technology of any kind now existing or developed in the future, without any obligation to provide attribution or compensation to you or any third party.
16. WARRANTY & DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTIES
16.1 Warranty.
You represent and warrant to Branch that: (a) you are duly organized under applicable law and have sufficient authority to enter into the Agreement; (b) the person entering into the Agreement is authorized to agree to and execute the Agreement on behalf of such Party; and (c) the execution and performance of the Agreement does not conflict with any contractual obligations you have to any third party.
16.2 DISCLAIMER.
EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY PROVIDED IN THE AGREEMENT, THE SERVICES, AND THE DOCUMENTATION ARE PROVIDED “AS IS,” WITHOUT REPRESENTATION OR WARRANTY OF ANY KIND. WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE. BRANCH DOES NOT WARRANT THE ACCURACY, COMPLETENESS, OR USEFULNESS OF THE SERVICES, AND THE DOCUMENTATION, NOR DOES BRANCH WARRANT THAT THE SERVICES WILL BE FREE FROM ERRORS, OR THAT THE OPERATIONS OF THE SERVICES WILL BE UNINTERRUPTED. YOU RELY ON THE SERVICES AND THE DOCUMENTATION AT YOUR OWN RISK. SOME JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW THE EXCLUSION OF CERTAIN WARRANTIES IN CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES. ACCORDINGLY, THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH ABOVE APPLY TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW.
17. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
17.1
BRANCH AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND LICENSORS WILL NOT BE LIABLE FOR ANY INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, PUNITIVE, CONSEQUENTIAL, OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO, DAMAGES FOR LOSS OF PROFITS, LOSS OF REVENUE, GOODWILL, USE, DATA THAT IS INCOMPLETE, MISSING, OR INCORRECT, OR OTHER INTANGIBLE LOSSES (EVEN IF BRANCH HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES), RESULTING FROM THIS AGREEMENT.
17.2
UNDER NO CIRCUMSTANCES WILL THE TOTAL AGGREGATE LIABILITY OF BRANCH AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND LICENSORS RESULTING FROM THIS AGREEMENT (INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO WARRANTY CLAIMS), REGARDLESS OF THE FORUM AND REGARDLESS OF WHETHER ANY ACTION OR CLAIM IS BASED IN CONTRACT, WARRANTY, NEGLIGENCE, STRICT LIABILITY, OR OTHER TORT, BREACH OF ANY STATUTORY DUTY, INDEMNITY OR CONTRIBUTION, OR OTHERWISE, EXCEED THE AMOUNTS, IF ANY, THAT YOU HAVE PAID, OR AGREED TO PAY, TO BRANCH FOR USE OF THE SERVICES IN THE TWELVE (12) MONTH PERIOD PRIOR TO THE EVENT GIVING RISE TO THE CLAIM. SOME OF THE LIMITATIONS PROVIDED HEREIN MAY NOT BE ALLOWED UNDER THE LAWS OF CERTAIN JURISDICTIONS. IF ANY SUCH LAW IS DEEMED TO APPLY TO THE AGREEMENT, THEN THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH HEREIN SHALL APPLY TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED UNDER SUCH LAWS.
18. INDEMNITY
18.1 Indemnity.
You will defend Branch, its Affiliates and their officers, agents, employees, representatives, and assigns (“
Branch Indemnified Parties
”) against any claim, demand, suit, or action against Branch brought by a third party to the extent arising out of or relating to: (a) Third-Party Content or your use of the Services in violation of the Agreement, the Documentation, or applicable law, (b) allegations that your Digital Properties, or the combination of your Digital Properties with the Services, infringes or misappropriates a third party’s intellectual property rights, (c) your instructions to share Shared Data with a Partner, or (d) a regulatory investigation (each a “
Claim Against Branch
”). You will indemnify Branch Indemnified Parties from any costs, damages, and expenses finally awarded against Branch Indemnified Parties as a result of, or for any amounts paid by Branch Indemnified Parties under a settlement approved by you in writing of, a Claim Against Branch. The above defense and indemnification obligations will be limited to the extent a Claim Against Branch arises from Branch’s fraud, or reckless or willful misconduct.
18.2 Agency Indemnity.
If you are an agency or a party representing, or providing services for the benefit of an Agency Client, in addition to the obligations set forth in the section “Agencies & Partners” of these Terms, you further agree to indemnify, hold harmless and defend Branch Indemnified Parties from and against any claim, demand, suit, or action and any related liability against a Branch Indemnified Party brought by a third party, arising out of or relating to: (a) any representations and warranties made by you concerning any aspect of the Services to an Agency Client; (b) any claims made by or on behalf of any Agency Client arising out or relating to your use of the Services; and (c) any claims arising out of or relating to acts or omissions of an Agency Client in connection with the Services.
18.3 Indemnification Procedure.
Your indemnification obligations under this Agreement will be contingent upon (a) Branch promptly giving you written notice of any claim for which indemnification is sought (provided that the Branch’s failure to notify you will not diminish your obligations under this section, except to the extent that you are materially prejudiced as a result of such failure), (b) you having sole control of the defense and settlement of any and all claims for which indemnification is sought (provided that no settlement may be entered into without either (i) Branch’s consent where a settlement requires any action on the part of Branch or (ii) the securing of an unconditional release of Branch for all liability), and (c) Branch giving you reasonably requested assistance at your expense. Branch may, at its own expense, and without limiting the obligations of the indemnifying party, maintain its own counsel and participate in the defense with counsel of its own choosing at any time.
19. MISCELLANEOUS
19.1 Governing Law.
The Agreement and all matters arising out of or relating to the Agreement shall be governed by and construed under the laws of the State of California, without regard to its conflict of law provisions. The parties expressly disclaim and exclude the application of the United Nations Convention on Contracts for the International Sale of Goods.
19.2 Dispute Resolution.
In the event of any dispute, claim, or controversy in connection with this Agreement (other than for disputes, claims, or controversies related to the intellectual property of a party) (collectively, "
Disputes
"), each Party's senior representatives will, in good faith, attempt to resolve a Dispute. If the Parties are unable to resolve a Dispute within thirty (30) days or within such other time period as the Parties may agree in writing, then the Parties may commence binding arbitration under JAMS' Comprehensive Arbitration Rules and Procedures. The Parties will share equally the fees and expenses of the JAMS arbitrator. The arbitration will be conducted by a sole arbitrator mutually agreed to between the Parties or, failing that, by JAMS under its then prevailing rules. Judgment on the award rendered by the arbitrator may be entered in any court of competent jurisdiction. The arbitrator will have the authority to grant specific performance or any other equitable or legal remedy, including provisional remedies. Each Party will be responsible for its own incurred expenses arising out of any dispute resolution procedure. Any arbitration proceedings will take place in the English language in (a) San Francisco, California, if you are domiciled in any country outside of the (i) European Economic Area or its regions or territories, the United Kingdom, Switzerland, Andorra, Vatican City, and Monaco and (ii) Asia-Pacific region; (b) London, England, if you are domiciled in any country within the European Economic Area or its regions or territories, the United Kingdom, Switzerland, Andorra, Vatican City, or Monaco; or (c) Singapore, if you are domiciled in any country within the Asia-Pacific region.
19.3 No Waiver; Severability.
Branch’s failure to enforce any right or provision in the Agreement will not constitute a waiver of such right or provision unless acknowledged and agreed to by Branch in writing. If any provision of the Agreement is found to be unenforceable or invalid, that provision will be limited or eliminated to the minimum extent necessary so that the Agreement will otherwise remain in full force and effect and enforceable.
19.4 Assignment.
The Agreement is not assignable, transferable or sublicensable by you except with Branch’s prior written consent. Branch may transfer and assign any of its rights and obligations under the Agreement freely and without consent.
19.5 Entire Agreement.
Both you and Branch agree that the Agreement is the complete and exclusive statement of the mutual understanding of the Parties and supersedes all previous written and oral agreements, communications and other understandings relating to your use of the Services, and that all waivers and modifications must be in a signed writing by both Parties, except as otherwise provided herein. Preprinted terms in your purchase orders or other customer-generated ordering documents, or terms referenced or linked within them, will have no effect on the Agreement and are hereby rejected, regardless of whether they are signed, clicked through, or otherwise agreed to by Branch and/or purport to take precedence over the Agreement. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency among the following documents, the order of precedence shall be: (1) the body of these Terms (2), (2) any exhibit, schedule, rider, or addendum to the Agreement,including the PS Terms or a statement of work (SOW), (3)  the Documentation (4) and then the Order Form, unless explicitly provided otherwise as a Special Term within the Order Form itself.
19.6 Relationship between the Parties.
The Parties are independent contractors. No agency, partnership, joint venture, fiduciary or employment relationship is created as a result of the Agreement, and you do not have any authority of any kind to bind Branch in any respect whatsoever.
19.7 International Trade and Anti-Corruption and Laws.
Each party (a) warrants that it will comply with all applicable anti-corruption, anti-money laundering, economic and trade sanctions, export controls, and other international trade laws, regulations, and governmental orders (collectively, “
Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws
”) in the jurisdictions that apply directly or indirectly to the Services, including, without limitation, the United States, and (b) represents that it has not made, offered, promised to make, or authorized any payment or anything of value in violation of Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws. You will promptly notify Branch in writing of any actual or potential violation of Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws in connection with the use of the Services and take all appropriate steps to remedy or resolve such violations, including any steps requested by Branch. If applicable, you represent that you have obtained, and warrant that you will continue to obtain, all licenses or other authorizations required to export, re-export, or transfer the Services.
19.8 Sanctions Lists.
The Services and any derivatives thereof, may be subject to export control and economic sanctions laws and regulations of the United States and other jurisdictions. Both you and Branch each represent that (and in your case, also your end users of your Digital Properties) it is not named on any government prohibited, denied, or unverified-party, sanctions, debarment, or exclusion list or export-controlled related restricted party list (collectively, “
Sanctions Lists
”). Customer shall not permit any entity or individual to access or use any of the Services who is listed on the Consolidated Screening List or located in a U.S. government-embargoed country (currently Russia, Belarus, Cuba, Iran, North Korea, Syria and Crimea), or known to be engaged in proliferation of nuclear, chemical or biological weapons or missiles, or otherwise in violation of any U.S. export law or regulation. You will immediately (i) discontinue your use of the Services if you become placed on any Sanctions List and (ii) remove your End Users’ access to the Services if your end users become placed on any Sanctions List. You represent that you have not, and warrant that you will not, export, re-export, or transfer the Services to an entity on any Sanctions List without prior authorization from the applicable governmental authority. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, either Party may terminate this Agreement immediately upon written notice to the other party if the other party is in breach of its obligations hereunder with respect to Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws or Sanction Lists. If your account is blocked because it is operating in a country or region prohibited by Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws, you will receive notice of your account being inoperable when you attempt to log into your account in such a prohibited country or region.
19.9 Third Party Beneficiary.
No provision of the Agreement is intended, nor shall it be interpreted, to provide or create any third-party beneficiary rights or any other rights of any kind in any customer, affiliate, stockholder, partner, member, director, officer, or employee of any Party hereto or any other person or entity.
19.10 Marketing Support.
You agree to comply with reasonable requests of Branch to support public relations efforts pertaining to the Services, which efforts may include: (a) a press release highlighting your company’s use of the Services, (b) participation in targeted press and analyst interviews highlighting benefits of implementing the Services, and (c) participation in customer case studies developed by Branch and used on Branch’s website(s) and other collateral. You grant to Branch a non-exclusive, non-transferable, limited right to use your name, trademarks, and logos (collectively, the "
Customer Marks
") (i) for the purpose of referencing You as a customer of Branch on the Branch website(s) and (ii) in the production of marketing materials, provided that such use is in accordance with any trademark and logo use guidelines that you provide to Branch. All goodwill developed from such use shall be solely for your benefit.
19.11 Force Majeure.
Neither Party will be responsible for any delay or failure in performance of any part of this Agreement to the extent that such delay or failure is caused by an event or circumstance beyond the reasonable control of the Party whose performance is affected and could not have been prevented or corrected through the exercise of reasonable diligence, including, for example, an act of God, act of government, flood, fire, earthquake, civil unrest, act of terror, strike or other labor problem (other than one involving Branch employees), Internet service provider failure or delay, integrated third party applications, or denial of service attack (each such event, a “
Force Majeure Event
”). The Party alleging a Force Majeure Event (the “
Affected Party
”) will promptly notify the other Party in writing of the Force Majeure Event, providing reasonable detail of the circumstances giving rise to the Force Majeure Event, and the steps it is taking to remedy the delay or failure. Notwithstanding the foregoing, financial incapability will not be considered as a Force Majeure Event.
19.12 Notices.
Except as otherwise specified in the Agreement, all notices of termination or an indemnifiable claim related to the Agreement (“
Legal Notices
”) will be provided via email and will be effective upon receipt by email as set forth below. If to Branch, all notices shall be provided to legal@branch.io ("
Branch Notices
"). Billing-related notices to Customer will be provided via email and addressed to the relevant billing contact designated by Customer on the applicable Order Form or the relevant Services account administrator designated by Customer. All Legal Notices and other notices to Customer will be provided via email and addressed to the relevant Services account administrator designated by Customer.
19.13 Modifications.
We may make changes to these Terms from time to time. When we do, we will revise the "Last updated" date given above. It is your responsibility to review these Terms frequently and to remain informed of any changes to them. The then-current version of these Terms will supersede all earlier versions. You agree that your continued use of Branch’s Services after such changes have been published to Branch’s Services will constitute your acceptance of such revised Terms.
20. CONTACTING US
If you have any questions or concerns about Branch’s Services or these Terms, you may contact us by email at
info@branch.io
.
Effective June 22nd 2023
to
September 23rd 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Branch SaaS Terms & Conditions
1. Introduction
1.1
These Terms & Conditions ("
Terms
") are entered into by and between of Branch Metrics, Inc., a Delaware corporation d/b/a Branch Metrics ("
Branch
," "
Branch Metrics
," "
we
," or "
us
") and the entity or person accessing this website ("
Website
") or placing an order for or accessing any Services made available by Branch Metrics (“
Customer
” or “
you
” or “
your
”). “
Services
" means the products and services that are made available online by Branch under these Terms, the “
Beta Services
”, as defined in these Terms, other services or products that Branch may make available from time to time, including associated Branch offline or mobile components. Services exclude (i) Web-based, mobile, offline or other software application functionality that interoperates with a Service, that is provided by Customer or a third party, and (ii) Third-Party Content, as defined in these Terms.
1.2
By accepting this Agreement, either by accessing or using the Services, or authorizing or permitting any Agent or end user of your Digital Properties (as defined below) to access or use the Services, you agree to be legally bound by, and use Branch’s Services in compliance with, all terms, conditions, and notices in this Agreement as of the date of such access or use of the Services. If you are entering into this Agreement on behalf of a company, organization or another legal entity (an “
Entity
”), you are agreeing to this Agreement for that Entity and representing to Branch that you have the authority to bind such Entity and its Affiliates (as defined below) to this Agreement, in which case the terms “Customer,” “you,” or “your” herein refers to such Entity and its Affiliates. If you do not have such authority, or if you do not agree with this Agreement, you must not use or authorize any use of the Services. Customer and Branch shall each be referred to as a “
Party
” and collectively referred to as the “
Parties
” for purposes of this Agreement.  IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO THESE TERMS & CONDITIONS, DO NOT USE ANY SERVICES.
2. Definitions
"
Affiliate
" means any entity that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the subject entity. “Control,” for purposes of this definition, means direct or indirect ownership or control of more than 50% of the voting interests of the subject entity.
"
Agreement
" means these Terms together with any applicable Order Forms, and any exhibits, appendices, schedules, or attachments identified or referenced in these Terms, and any amendments mutually agreed to by the Parties (all of which are incorporated herein by reference).
"
Beta Services
" means Branch’s services or functionality that are not generally available to customers and that may be made available to you to try at your option which are designated as beta, pilot, limited release, developer preview, non-production, evaluation, or other services or functionality with a similar description.
“
Collection Technologies
” means any tags, SDKs, APIs, JavaScript, pixels, attribution or redirect links, cookies or other technology used or made available by Branch to Customer to support the provision of the Services by Branch, including any updates thereto.
“
Digital Properties
” means your mobile applications, websites and program code created by or for you that use the Services or for use by you with the Services.
"
Documentation
" means the applicable Service’s documentation and usage guidelines at
https://docs.branch.io/
, or its successor URL.
"
Order Form
" means an ordering document or online order specifying the Services to be provided hereunder that is entered into between Customer and Branch or any Affiliates of the Parties, including any addenda and supplements thereto. By entering into an Order Form hereunder, an Affiliate agrees to be bound by the terms of the Agreement as if it were an original party hereto.
“
Services
" means the products and services that are made available online by Branch under these Terms, the Beta Services, and other services or products that Branch may make available from time to time, including associated Branch offline or mobile components. Services exclude (i) Web-based, mobile, offline or other software application functionality that interoperates with a Service, that is provided by Customer or a third party, and (ii) Third-Party Content, as defined in these Terms.
3. SERVICE ACCESS AND AVAILABILITY
Branch will make the Services available to Customer solely for Customer’s internal business needs pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and the applicable Documentation. Customer acknowledges and agrees that it is solely responsible for its integration and launch of the Services. Branch shall: (a) use commercially reasonable efforts to make the online Services available 24 hours a day, 7 days a week, except for: (i) planned maintenance, (ii) emergency maintenance that is reasonably unforeseeable and necessary for purposes of maintaining the integrity or operation of the Services, and (iii) any unavailability caused by a Force Majeure Event, and (b) provide the Services in accordance with the laws and regulations applicable to Branch’s provision of its Services to its customers generally (i.e., without regard for Customer’s particular use of the Services), and subject to Customer’s use of the Services in accordance with the Agreement and the Documentation. Your right to access and use the Services is limited by all the terms set forth in the Agreement.
4. USE RESTRICTIONS; UPDATES & SUPPORT
4.1 Use Restrictions.
You must comply with all applicable laws when implementing, configuring, and using the Services and, except as expressly permitted under these Terms, you will not directly or indirectly: (a) make the functionality of the Services available to any third party through any means, including, without limitation, any hosting, application services provider, service bureau, or other type of service; (b) use any automated tool (e.g., robots, spiders) to access or use the Services; (c) extend, sell, distribute rent, lease, sublicense, or otherwise provide access to the Services to another person; (d) circumvent or disable any digital rights management, usage rules, permissions, or other security features of the Services or attempt to gain unauthorized access to the Services or Branch’s related systems or networks; (e) use the Services in a manner that overburdens, or that threatens the integrity, performance, or availability of, the Services; (f) frame or mirror any part of the Services, other than on Customer’s own internal and non-public intranets for its own internal business purposes, unless otherwise permitted in the Documentation; (g) remove, alter, or obscure any proprietary notices (including copyright and trademark notices) on any portion of the Services; (h) send material containing software viruses, worms, trojan horses, or other harmful computer code, files, scripts, agents, or programs; (i) use Branch’s Services in violation of Branch’s Acceptable Use Policy available at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-aup
, or its successor URL; or (j) use the Services in connection with any Apps or websites that are directed to children under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), without employing appropriate settings within the Collection Technologies to limit data collection from such children in accordance with applicable law. More information on these settings is available
here
. If you have questions about how to use these settings or have any reason to believe that these resources may not address your particular use case, please reach out to the Branch Support team via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
, or its successor URL. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Agreement, use of the Services in violation of the foregoing restrictions by Customer that, in Branch’s judgment, threatens the integrity, performance, availability, or security of the Services may result in Branch’s immediate suspension of, or limitation in Customer’s access to, the Services.
4.2 Updates and Support.
Branch will maintain, support, update, and provide error corrections for the Services to the same extent it does so for its customers generally. If Branch provides you with an update or maintenance release for the offline components of the Branch Services, unless you receive a separate license from Branch for that update or release that expressly supersedes these Terms, such update or release will be subject to these Terms. Branch shall have no liability for any damages that may result from Customer’s failure to implement upgrades or updates to the Services provided that Customer is notified in writing by Branch of such upgrade or update. All support requests must be sent to the Branch Support team via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
, or its successor URL.
5. BETA SERVICES
From time to time, Branch may invite you to try Beta Services. You may accept or decline any such trial in your sole discretion. Beta Services are for evaluation purposes only and not for production use, are not subject to any service level agreements (SLAs) agreed to between you and Branch and may be subject to additional terms. Branch is under no obligation to maintain, support, update, or provide error corrections for the Beta Services. Branch may discontinue Beta Services at any time in Branch’s sole discretion and reserves the right to never make them generally available. BRANCH WILL HAVE NO LIABILITY FOR ANY HARM OR DAMAGE ARISING OUT OF, OR IN CONNECTION WITH, CUSTOMER’S USE OF A BETA SERVICE. THE BETA SERVICES ARE PROVIDED “AS IS” AND AS AVAILABLE AND ARE EXCLUSIVE OF ANY WARRANTY WHATSOEVER. WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, WITH RESPECT TO THE BETA SERVICES, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE. In the event of a conflict or inconsistency between this section and any other provision of the Agreement, the terms of this section “BETA SERVICES” shall control and prevail with respect to Beta Services.
6. PAYMENT TERMS
6.1 Fees.
You will pay Branch all fees specified in an Order Form or, if there is no Order Form executed by the Parties, then you will pay the fees set forth at the applicable rates available at
https://branch.io/pricing/
, or its successor URL (“Fees”). You are responsible for all undisputed Fees, including Fees that remain due and payable after expiration or termination of the Agreement, or any portion thereof. Except as otherwise expressly set forth herein or where expressly set forth in an applicable Order Form, (i) payment obligations are non-cancelable, Fees are non-refundable, and failure to use the Services provisioned does not constitute a basis for refusing to pay Fees, and (ii) Services purchased cannot be decreased during the service period for which they were purchased.
6.2 Payments & Invoicing.
To the extent you procure the Services with an applicable Order Form, invoices for the applicable Fees shall be sent to you via email to the email address(es) you designate in your account when signing up for Services, and you shall pay the Fees due upon receipt of such invoice. To the extent you procure the Services under an applicable Order Form, any relevant paid service-specific terms including, for example, contract duration, monthly fees, billing frequency, payment forms, and payment term will be addressed within an associated Order Form. All Fees set forth in an applicable Order Form shall be invoiced in advance in accordance with the billing frequency stated therein. Fees are payable in United States dollars. You shall be responsible for the payment of any fees associated with an electronic funds transfer (i.e., ACH, wire transfer) when issuing payment to Branch, which includes fees from your financial institution and intermediary banks. You are responsible for providing complete and accurate billing and contact information to Branch and notifying Branch of any changes to such information. In certain instances where your payment method is via credit card, the issuer of the credit card may charge a transaction fee or related charges, which you will be responsible to pay.
6.3 Payment by Credit Card.
In certain instances where your payment method is via credit card, the issuer of the credit card may charge a transaction fee or related charges, which you will be responsible to pay. Fees will be billed to the credit card nominated by you and you authorize the card issuer to pay all such amounts and authorize Branch (or its billing agent) to charge the credit card account until you or Branch cancels or terminates the Services as set forth herein; provided that if payment is not received from the credit card issuer, the transaction is returned after the payment has been settled, otherwise known as chargeback, or if there are insufficient funds in the case of check or debit card payments, you agree to pay all amounts plus any applicable transaction fees (e.g., NSF fees, chargeback fees) due upon demand.
6.4 Payment Disputes.
If you have concerns about any charges on your invoice, you agree to the following dispute resolution process: (i) all billing disputes must be submitted in writing to billing@branch.io, (ii) billing disputes must be submitted within 90 days of the date the invoice was generated, and (iii) undisputed amounts will be subject to the Agreement and total payment for undisputed invoices or amounts must be submitted when due.
6.5 Suspension or Cancellation of Service; Payment Acceleration.
Without derogating from any other remedies available to Branch under the Agreement or by applicable law, if you owe any undisputed Fees thirty (30) days or more past due in connection with any Services provided by Branch under any applicable Order Form, then, without affecting any of your payment obligations under the Agreement (including, any payment obligations under an Order Form), Branch is entitled to take further action including but not limited to accelerating your unpaid fee obligations under such agreement so that all such obligations become immediately due and payable, and suspending and/or canceling your access to the Services until such amounts are paid in full. Branch reserves the right to send your account to a collections agency for nonpayment (which may, in turn, report the uncollected debt to credit bureaus) and to use your contact information for debt collection purposes if the Agreement is terminated for non-payment as set forth herein following a 10-day cure period.
6.6 Taxes.
Branch’s Fees do not include any local, state, or federal sales, use, excise, personal property, VAT, or other similar taxes, duties, levies, tariffs, and other governmental charges (including, without limitation, any withholding tax, and any such taxes, to the extent legally applicable, which shall be borne and paid by Customer) (collectively, "Taxes"). If Branch has the legal obligation to pay or collect Taxes for which you are responsible under this section, Branch will invoice you and you will pay that amount unless you provide Branch with a valid tax exemption certificate authorized by the appropriate taxing authority. For clarity, you are responsible for payment of all Taxes resulting from any Fees payable hereunder, other than any taxes based on Branch’s net income, property, and employees.
6.7 Withholding Taxes.
In the event Fees payable by you to Branch under the Agreement are subject to any applicable withholding tax, goods and services tax, or similar taxes required by any tax authority and you are required by applicable law to remit such withholding tax, you: (a) may withhold and deduct from any payments to Branch under the Agreement an amount equivalent to any applicable withholding tax to the extent required by applicable law ("
Withholding Tax
"), (b) will pay to the relevant taxation authority the amount of such applicable withholdings in accordance with applicable law; and (c) will pay to Branch the applicable amounts under this Agreement net of such Withholding Tax. You shall be discharged from the obligation to pay Withholding Tax amounts to Branch provided that (1) you have remitted such amount to the relevant taxation authority and (2) you furnish Branch with (i) your tax registration certificate(s) as proof of registration with the applicable taxation authority, and (ii) any and all relevant tax forms and/or statements with proof of Withholding Tax remittance amount to the taxation authority, the applicable rate, and other information which may reasonably be requested for the purpose of assisting Branch to seek any allowable credits or deductions for the Withholding Tax so withheld in each jurisdiction where you are subject to tax.
6.8 Overdue Charges.
If any invoiced amount is not received by Branch by the due date set forth in the applicable invoice, then without limiting Branch’s rights or remedies, (a) those charges may accrue late interest at the rate of 2.5% of the outstanding balance per month, and (b) Branch may condition future Order Form renewals on payment terms shorter than those specified in the applicable Order Form. You are prohibited from creating new accounts until the Fees due are paid in full.
6.9 Term for Paid Services.
Except as expressly set forth herein, the terms set forth in these Terms shall be in force for as long as an Order Form referencing the Agreement is in effect. Except as otherwise agreed to by you and Branch in a superseding Order Form, at the end of an applicable term, your access to the Services will automatically renew under the same Order Form terms (contract duration, billing frequency, payment period, etc.), unless and until your access to the Services is terminated in accordance with this section or either Party to these Terms provides the other with notice of non-renewal (email sufficient; if to Branch, please email billing@branch.io) at least thirty (30) days prior to the commencement of any renewal period.
7. TERMINATION
7.1 Termination by Branch.
Branch may terminate this Agreement (including all Order Form(s) and Services that are in effect) in the event Customer commits a material breach of this Agreement and fails to remedy such breach within thirty (30) days of the date of written notice of such breach. For the avoidance of doubt, a breach of the
Branch Acceptable Use Policy
will be considered a material breach of this Agreement. Termination by Branch for material breach of these Terms will be effective as of the last day of the 30-day cure period provided herein or immediately to the extent such violation reasonably cannot be cured. If Branch terminates this Agreement for material breach, then all of Customer’s outstanding balances and any other unpaid payment obligations will become immediately due and payable by Customer in full. Except as otherwise expressly agreed to by you and Branch in a superseding Order Form, Branch reserves the right to suspend or discontinue, temporarily or permanently, all or any portion of the Services upon at least thirty (30) days’ written notice (email sufficient), provided that Branch will promptly provide a pro-rated refund of all pre-paid and unearned amounts based on the period of suspension or the date of discontinuance, as applicable, and Branch will have no further obligations or liability to you or any third-party as a result of such suspension or discontinuance. Except where there are any Order Form(s) in effect, Branch may terminate your use of the Services without prior notice for any reason at any time by providing you with written notice.
7.2 Termination by Customer.
Except where you have agreed to be bound for a defined service period in any applicable Order Form, you may terminate your access to and use of the Services at any time by providing written notice to Branch via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
, or its successor URL). Such termination will be effective as of the last day of the calendar month in which your termination notice is received by Branch. In the event of termination by you in accordance with this Section 7.2, all outstanding balances and any other unpaid payment obligations will become immediately due and payable by Customer in full.
8. SURVIVAL
Upon termination of the Agreement, those sections of these Terms that by their nature would reasonably be expected to survive will survive termination or expiration of these Terms, including but not limited to the sections on Termination, Privacy Policy & Data Rights, Confidential Information, Proprietary Rights, Limitation of Liability, and Legal Notices.
9. PRIVACY POLICY & DATA RIGHTS
9.1 Privacy Policy.
(a) You acknowledge and agree that you will provide a privacy policy to your end users, which shall be in compliance with applicable laws and regulations and shall include, at minimum, the following: (i) clear, meaningful, and conspicuous notice of your privacy practices consistent with applicable laws, (ii) disclosures regarding your use of cookies (including third-party cookies placed on your Digital Properties) and/or targeting and online behavioral advertising; (iii) your data collection, use and disclosure practices; and (iv) information regarding how end users may opt out from receiving targeted advertisements by visiting the NAI website opt-out page here:
http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices/
, the DAA opt-out page here:
h
ttp://www.aboutads.info/
, and/or the EDAA opt-out page here:
http://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
. Branch’s Privacy Policy does not cover your Digital Properties, or the use of your Digital Properties, by your end users. It is your obligation to provide your own privacy policy to your end users. You acknowledge that Branch has no direct relationship or interface with your end users and that Branch’s ability to comply with certain applicable data protection and privacy laws is dependent on your compliance with the terms of this section of the Terms. (b) If you use Branch’s Engagement Builder feature, you agree to respect opt-out flags passed by Branch to you if you use Engagement Builder data for targeted advertisements. You acknowledge and agree that your use of the Services is subject to Branch’s Privacy Policy, located at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-privacypolicy
, or its successor URL. (c) Where applicable in your use of the Services, you also agree to incorporate and adhere to the best practices and guidelines of the Self-Regulatory Principles of the Digital Advertising Alliance ("
DAA
") (
http://www.aboutads.info/principles
), and the Principles of the European Interactive Digital Alliance ("
EDAA
") (
http://www.edaa.eu/european-principles/
), as may be updated and amended from time to time.
9.2 Data Analytics.
You acknowledge and agree that Branch may collect and process data from your Digital Properties as set forth in
Branch’s Privacy Policy
with respect to your use of the Services. You grant to Branch a limited, non-exclusive, non-sublicensable, non-transferable license to use the data collected through the Services to provide, maintain, optimize, and improve the Services.
9.3 Data Security.
Branch will maintain appropriate technical, administrative, and physical safeguards designed to protect information on its servers, including customer data, against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction. However, you acknowledge and agree that no method of transmission over the Internet or method of electronic storage is completely secure, and that Branch cannot guarantee the absolute security of such information.
9.4 Compliance with Applicable Law.
You will comply with all laws, rules, and regulations applicable to your business and operations and to your use of the Services, including those governing the privacy, security, and trans-border transfers of personal data (such as, but not limited to, compliance with the General Data Protection Regulation (EU 2016/679) ("
GDPR
") and the California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CCPA
”)). Where required by applicable law, you shall be responsible for (a) obtaining consent from end users of your Digital Properties to (i) to place Collection Technologies (including by Branch) on the browsers or devices of end users of your Digital Properties, and (ii) collect and use the data you provide to Branch through the Services and the data that you enable Branch to collect from end users of your Digital Properties and process on your behalf, and (iii) t0 direct Branch to share data it processes on your behalf with any third party; (b) ensuring that you otherwise have any and all rights required in order to provide such data to Branch or to direct Branch to share it with any third party; (c) obtaining data properly and in accordance with applicable law, including, without limitation, the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (“
COPPA
”), and the Video Privacy Protection Act (18 U.S.C. § 2710) (“
VPPA
”); and (d) ensuring you do not provide Branch with any sensitive information or personally identifiable information through the Services that is afforded legal protection under applicable regulation or laws (“
PII
”). To the extent that any of your users request that you not share their data with Branch, or to the extent that you believe that any data you may have provided to Branch was inappropriately obtained, you shall inform Branch immediately. Branch shall have no responsibility or liability to the extent resulting from, or arising out of, your use of the Services not in compliance with the Agreement, the Documentation or applicable law.
9.5 CCPA.
If any data collected through your use of the Services is deemed personal information subject to the CCPA, then the terms set forth in the Branch California Privacy Addendum (“
California Privacy Addendum
“) available at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-ca-privacy-addendum
, or its successor URL, shall apply to the use and processing of such personal information and the Parties agree to incorporate such California Privacy Addendum by reference into the Agreement as an integral part thereof.
10. RESTRICTED AREAS OF THE SERVICES
10.1 Registration Information.
In order to access and use the Services, you must register an account. Any information provided during your registration must be current, complete, and accurate (“
Registration Information
”). It is your sole responsibility to ensure Registration Information is current, complete, and accurate at all times.
10.2 Access Credentials.
The Services, including account management features, may be password-restricted to registered users or other authorized persons. You may select individuals (your employees, Affiliates, or your independent contractors) to access and use the Services in furtherance of your internal business purposes as expressly permitted by this Agreement, unless otherwise expressly agreed to in writing by Branch. You will obtain separate credentials, e.g., user IDs and passwords, from Branch for such individuals (each, an "
Authorized User
").
10.3 Responsibility.
You are responsible for all actions taken under an Authorized User’s account, regardless of whether such action was taken by an Authorized User or by another party, and regardless of whether such Authorized User authorized or had knowledge of such action. You are responsible for the security of each Authorized User’s credentials and shall take all necessary steps to protect each Authorized User’s credentials from disclosure. You will not share (and will instruct each Authorized User not to share) such credentials with any other person or entity and will notify Branch promptly of unauthorized access or use of the Services.
11. LINKS AND THIRD-PARTY CONTENT
You may enable the Services to display, or contain links to, third party products, services, and websites. You acknowledge that it is your responsibility to evaluate the information, opinion, advice, or other content linked to or made available through Branch’s Services. Any opinions, advice, statements, services, offers, or other information that constitute part of the content expressed, authored, or made available by other users or other third parties on the Services, or which is accessible through or may be located using the Services (collectively, "
Third-Party Content
") are those of the respective authors or producers and not of Branch or its shareholders, directors, officers, employees, agents, or representatives. Branch does not control Third-Party Content and makes no representations, warranties, endorsements, or guarantees regarding the accuracy, integrity or quality of such Third-Party Content. Branch expressly disclaims all responsibility and liability for any Third-Party Content, including but not limited to, any information or materials advertised in any Third-Party Content.  Branch is not responsible or liable, directly or indirectly, for any damage or loss caused to you by your or a third party’s use of or reliance on any goods, services, or information available on or through any third-party service or Third-Party Content.
12. TRADEMARKS
"Branch Metrics", the Branch Metrics logo, and any other trademarks or service marks used by Branch or slogan displayed on the Services ("
Branch Marks
") are trademarks of Branch and its suppliers or licensors, and may not be copied, imitated or used, in whole or in part, without the prior written permission of Branch or the applicable trademark holder. You may not use any metatags or any other "hidden text" utilizing "Branch Metrics" or any other Branch Marks without Branch’s prior written permission. In addition, the look and feel of the Services, including all page headers, custom graphics, button icons and scripts, is the trade dress of Branch and may not be copied, imitated or used, in whole or in part, without Branch’s prior written permission. All other trademarks, registered trademarks, product names and company names or logos mentioned in the Services are the property of their respective owners. Reference to any products, services, processes or other information, by trade name, trademark, manufacturer, supplier, or otherwise does not constitute or imply endorsement, sponsorship, or recommendation thereof by Branch.
13. AGENCIES & PARTNERS
13.1 Agency Client.
If you are an agency or a party representing, or providing services for the benefit of, a third party (“
Agency Client
“), you represent and warrant that you are authorized to act on behalf of, and bind to the Agreement, that Agency Client (and upon Branch’s request shall provide evidence thereof). You further represent and warrant that, to the extent that you are accessing the Services on the Agency Client’s behalf, such Agency Client has provided you with explicit permission to collect on its behalf and view Agency Client’s data and that you shall use such data strictly in accordance with the permissions provided to you by such Agency Client and the terms of the Agreement. You shall ensure that each Agency Client agrees to the terms of the Agreement and any applicable Order Form(s) and agrees to abide by its terms, including without limitation, Section 9 (Privacy Policy & Data Rights) of these Terms. You acknowledge and agree that: (i) Branch makes no representations or warranties for the direct or indirect benefit of any Agency Client; and (ii) you shall not make any representations or warranties to such Agency Client on behalf of Branch.
13.2 Partners.
The Services enable you to integrate, measure, and analyze your Branch account (including data contained therein) with certain partners that you work with, such as advertising networks, publishers and analytics providers (“
Partners
“). For such purpose, you may, through your configuration of the Services (“
Partner Features
”), direct Branch to provide data to, and receive data from Partners relating to end users (“
Shared Data
”). To the extent that you use the Partner Features for Partners you select (“
Permitted Partners
”), then you hereby grant Branch the right to provide Shared Data with Partners pursuant to your configuration of the Services and to obtain and process Shared Data from Permitted Partners pursuant to your configuration of the Services. You acknowledge and agree that: (i) the sharing of such Shared Data between Branch and Permitted Partners will be available only to the extent enabled by the Permitted Partner and Branch; (ii) any use of Shared Data by a Permitted Partner shall be subject to your own agreements with such Permitted Partner; (iii) Branch shall have no liability or responsibility in connection with any acts or omissions by Permitted Partners; and (iv) any use or processing of Shared Data may be subject to certain limitations and restrictions imposed by Permitted Partners and Branch is not responsible for fulfilling any such limitations and restrictions unless expressly agreed to in writing between you and Branch.
14. CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION
14.1 Definition.
Each Party to these Terms (a “
Receiving Party
”) may have access to, or become acquainted with, certain non-public confidential information of the other Party (a “
Disclosing Party
”) including without limitation all information clearly identified as confidential at the time of disclosure (“
Confidential Information
”). You and Branch further agree that, subject to the rights and licenses granted herein, each Party's Confidential Information shall include all non-public information regarding the Disclosing Party, including without limitation any customer, customer prospect, the terms, conditions and pricing set forth in the Agreement and its Order Form(s), marketing, technical, business and/or strategic plans or information provided by the Disclosing Party to the Receiving Party in the performance of the Services under the Agreement.
14.2 Use and Disclosure.
Each Party agrees as follows: (a) to use the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party only for the purposes permitted by the Agreement, or as otherwise permitted by the Agreement (the "
Purpose
"); (b) to take all reasonable steps to ensure that the Disclosing Party’s Confidential Information is not disclosed or distributed by the Receiving Party’s employees or agents to another party in violation of the Agreement, but in no event will the Receiving party use less effort to protect the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party than it uses to protect its own Confidential Information of like importance; (c) to restrict access to the Confidential Information disclosed by the Disclosing Party to such of the Receiving Party’s employees, agents and third parties, if any, who have a legitimate need to have access for the Purpose and who have agreed in writing or are otherwise bound to treat such information in accordance with the Agreement; and (d) to return or destroy all Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party’s written request, after termination of the Agreement. The Receiving Party will not be obligated under this confidentiality section with respect to information that: (1) is or has become readily publicly available through no act or omission of the Receiving Party or its employees or agents; (2) is received from a third party lawfully in possession of such information and the Receiving Party has no knowledge of any disclosure restrictions on such third party to disclose such information; (3) is disclosed to a third party by the Disclosing Party without restriction on disclosure; (4) was rightfully in the possession of the Receiving Party without restriction prior to its disclosure by the Disclosing Party; or (5) was independently developed by employees or consultants of the Receiving Party without reliance on, or reference to, such Confidential Information.
14.3 Permitted Disclosures.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, Confidential Information may be disclosed as required by any court order or governmental agency, provided that before disclosing such Confidential Information the Receiving Party must provide the Disclosing Party with sufficient advance notice of the court or agency’s request for the information to enable the Receiving Party to exercise any rights it may have to challenge or limit the court or agency’s authority to receive such Confidential Information, to the extent permitted by applicable law.
15. PROPRIETARY RIGHTS
15.1 Proprietary Rights.
As between you and Branch, you shall retain all right, title, and interest in your Digital Properties. If you choose to use your Digital Properties with a Service, you grant Branch permission to allow the Services to interoperate with your Digital Properties as required for the interoperation of your Digital Properties with the Service. Subject to the limited licenses granted herein, Branch acquires no right, title or interest from you or your licensors under the Agreement in or to your Digital Properties. Subject to the limited rights expressly granted hereunder, Branch, its Affiliates, and its licensors reserve all of their right, title and interest in and to the Services (including the Branch application programming interfaces and the Branch software development kits), the Documentation, all technology utilized by Branch to provide the Services, and all of their related intellectual property rights related to, embodied by, or incorporated in any of the foregoing and including any updates, upgrades, enhancements, modifications and improvements made to, or derivatives of, the foregoing. No copyright is granted by Branch to Customer hereunder. No rights are granted to Customer hereunder other than as expressly set forth herein.
15.2 Feedback.
Branch may provide you with a mechanism to provide feedback, suggestions, and ideas, if you choose, about the Services ("
Feedback
"). You agree that Branch may, in its sole discretion, use the Feedback you provide to Branch in any way, including in future enhancements and modifications to the Services. You hereby grant to Branch and its assigns a perpetual, worldwide, fully transferable, sub-licensable, fully paid-up, irrevocable, royalty-free license to use, reproduce, modify, create derivative works from, distribute, and display the Feedback in any manner for any purpose, in any media, software, or technology of any kind now existing or developed in the future, without any obligation to provide attribution or compensation to you or any third party.
16. WARRANTY & DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTIES
16.1 Warranty.
You represent and warrant to Branch that: (a) you are duly organized under applicable law and have sufficient authority to enter into the Agreement; (b) the person entering into the Agreement is authorized to agree to and execute the Agreement on behalf of such Party; and (c) the execution and performance of the Agreement does not conflict with any contractual obligations you have to any third party.
16.2 DISCLAIMER.
EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY PROVIDED IN THE AGREEMENT, THE SERVICES, AND THE DOCUMENTATION ARE PROVIDED “AS IS,” WITHOUT REPRESENTATION OR WARRANTY OF ANY KIND. WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE. BRANCH DOES NOT WARRANT THE ACCURACY, COMPLETENESS, OR USEFULNESS OF THE SERVICES, AND THE DOCUMENTATION, NOR DOES BRANCH WARRANT THAT THE SERVICES WILL BE FREE FROM ERRORS, OR THAT THE OPERATIONS OF THE SERVICES WILL BE UNINTERRUPTED. YOU RELY ON THE SERVICES AND THE DOCUMENTATION AT YOUR OWN RISK. SOME JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW THE EXCLUSION OF CERTAIN WARRANTIES IN CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES. ACCORDINGLY, THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH ABOVE APPLY TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW.
17. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
17.1
BRANCH AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND LICENSORS WILL NOT BE LIABLE FOR ANY INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, PUNITIVE, CONSEQUENTIAL, OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO, DAMAGES FOR LOSS OF PROFITS, LOSS OF REVENUE, GOODWILL, USE, DATA THAT IS INCOMPLETE, MISSING, OR INCORRECT, OR OTHER INTANGIBLE LOSSES (EVEN IF BRANCH HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES), RESULTING FROM THIS AGREEMENT.
17.2
UNDER NO CIRCUMSTANCES WILL THE TOTAL AGGREGATE LIABILITY OF BRANCH AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND LICENSORS RESULTING FROM THIS AGREEMENT (INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO WARRANTY CLAIMS), REGARDLESS OF THE FORUM AND REGARDLESS OF WHETHER ANY ACTION OR CLAIM IS BASED IN CONTRACT, WARRANTY, NEGLIGENCE, STRICT LIABILITY, OR OTHER TORT, BREACH OF ANY STATUTORY DUTY, INDEMNITY OR CONTRIBUTION, OR OTHERWISE, EXCEED THE AMOUNTS, IF ANY, THAT YOU HAVE PAID, OR AGREED TO PAY, TO BRANCH FOR USE OF THE SERVICES IN THE TWELVE (12) MONTH PERIOD PRIOR TO THE EVENT GIVING RISE TO THE CLAIM. SOME OF THE LIMITATIONS PROVIDED HEREIN MAY NOT BE ALLOWED UNDER THE LAWS OF CERTAIN JURISDICTIONS. IF ANY SUCH LAW IS DEEMED TO APPLY TO THE AGREEMENT, THEN THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH HEREIN SHALL APPLY TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED UNDER SUCH LAWS.
18. INDEMNITY
18.1 Indemnity.
You will defend Branch, its Affiliates and their officers, agents, employees, representatives, and assigns (“
Branch Indemnified Parties
”) against any claim, demand, suit, or action against Branch brought by a third party to the extent arising out of or relating to: (a) Third-Party Content or your use of the Services in violation of the Agreement, the Documentation, or applicable law, (b) allegations that your Digital Properties, or the combination of your Digital Properties with the Services, infringes or misappropriates a third party’s intellectual property rights, (c) your instructions to share Shared Data with a Partner, or (d) a regulatory investigation (each a “
Claim Against Branch
”). You will indemnify Branch Indemnified Parties from any costs, damages, and expenses finally awarded against Branch Indemnified Parties as a result of, or for any amounts paid by Branch Indemnified Parties under a settlement approved by you in writing of, a Claim Against Branch. The above defense and indemnification obligations will be limited to the extent a Claim Against Branch arises from Branch’s fraud, or reckless or willful misconduct.
18.2 Agency Indemnity.
If you are an agency or a party representing, or providing services for the benefit of an Agency Client, in addition to the obligations set forth in the section “Agencies & Partners” of these Terms, you further agree to indemnify, hold harmless and defend Branch Indemnified Parties from and against any claim, demand, suit, or action and any related liability against a Branch Indemnified Party brought by a third party, arising out of or relating to: (a) any representations and warranties made by you concerning any aspect of the Services to an Agency Client; (b) any claims made by or on behalf of any Agency Client arising out or relating to your use of the Services; and (c) any claims arising out of or relating to acts or omissions of an Agency Client in connection with the Services.
18.3 Indemnification Procedure.
Your indemnification obligations under this Agreement will be contingent upon (a) Branch promptly giving you written notice of any claim for which indemnification is sought (provided that the Branch’s failure to notify you will not diminish your obligations under this section, except to the extent that you are materially prejudiced as a result of such failure), (b) you having sole control of the defense and settlement of any and all claims for which indemnification is sought (provided that no settlement may be entered into without either (i) Branch’s consent where a settlement requires any action on the part of Branch or (ii) the securing of an unconditional release of Branch for all liability), and (c) Branch giving you reasonably requested assistance at your expense. Branch may, at its own expense, and without limiting the obligations of the indemnifying party, maintain its own counsel and participate in the defense with counsel of its own choosing at any time.
19. MISCELLANEOUS
19.1 Governing Law.
The Agreement and all matters arising out of or relating to the Agreement shall be governed by and construed under the laws of the State of California, without regard to its conflict of law provisions. The parties expressly disclaim and exclude the application of the United Nations Convention on Contracts for the International Sale of Goods.
19.2 Dispute Resolution.
In the event of any dispute, claim, or controversy in connection with this Agreement (other than for disputes, claims, or controversies related to the intellectual property of a party) (collectively, "
Disputes
"), each Party's senior representatives will, in good faith, attempt to resolve a Dispute. If the Parties are unable to resolve a Dispute within thirty (30) days or within such other time period as the Parties may agree in writing, then the Parties may commence binding arbitration under JAMS' Comprehensive Arbitration Rules and Procedures. The Parties will share equally the fees and expenses of the JAMS arbitrator. The arbitration will be conducted by a sole arbitrator mutually agreed to between the Parties or, failing that, by JAMS under its then prevailing rules. Judgment on the award rendered by the arbitrator may be entered in any court of competent jurisdiction. The arbitrator will have the authority to grant specific performance or any other equitable or legal remedy, including provisional remedies. Each Party will be responsible for its own incurred expenses arising out of any dispute resolution procedure. Any arbitration proceedings will take place in the English language in (a) San Francisco, California, if you are domiciled in any country outside of the (i) European Economic Area or its regions or territories, the United Kingdom, Switzerland, Andorra, Vatican City, and Monaco and (ii) Asia-Pacific region; (b) London, England, if you are domiciled in any country within the European Economic Area or its regions or territories, the United Kingdom, Switzerland, Andorra, Vatican City, or Monaco; or (c) Singapore, if you are domiciled in any country within the Asia-Pacific region.
19.3 No Waiver; Severability.
Branch’s failure to enforce any right or provision in the Agreement will not constitute a waiver of such right or provision unless acknowledged and agreed to by Branch in writing. If any provision of the Agreement is found to be unenforceable or invalid, that provision will be limited or eliminated to the minimum extent necessary so that the Agreement will otherwise remain in full force and effect and enforceable.
19.4 Assignment.
The Agreement is not assignable, transferable or sublicensable by you except with Branch’s prior written consent. Branch may transfer and assign any of its rights and obligations under the Agreement freely and without consent.
19.5 Entire Agreement.
Both you and Branch agree that the Agreement is the complete and exclusive statement of the mutual understanding of the Parties and supersedes all previous written and oral agreements, communications and other understandings relating to your use of the Services, and that all waivers and modifications must be in a signed writing by both Parties, except as otherwise provided herein. Preprinted terms in your purchase orders or other customer-generated ordering documents, or terms referenced or linked within them, will have no effect on the Agreement and are hereby rejected, regardless of whether they are signed, clicked through, or otherwise agreed to by Branch and/or purport to take precedence over the Agreement. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency among the following documents, the order of precedence shall be: (1) the applicable Order Form, (2) any exhibit, schedule or addendum to the Agreement, (3) the body of these Terms, and (4) the Documentation.
19.6 Relationship between the Parties.
The Parties are independent contractors. No agency, partnership, joint venture, fiduciary or employment relationship is created as a result of the Agreement, and you do not have any authority of any kind to bind Branch in any respect whatsoever.
19.7 International Trade and Anti-Corruption and Laws.
Each party (a) warrants that it will comply with all applicable anti-corruption, anti-money laundering, economic and trade sanctions, export controls, and other international trade laws, regulations, and governmental orders (collectively, “
Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws
”) in the jurisdictions that apply directly or indirectly to the Services, including, without limitation, the United States, and (b) represents that it has not made, offered, promised to make, or authorized any payment or anything of value in violation of Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws. You will promptly notify Branch in writing of any actual or potential violation of Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws in connection with the use of the Services and take all appropriate steps to remedy or resolve such violations, including any steps requested by Branch. If applicable, you represent that you have obtained, and warrant that you will continue to obtain, all licenses or other authorizations required to export, re-export, or transfer the Services.
19.8 Sanctions Lists.
The Services and any derivatives thereof, may be subject to export control and economic sanctions laws and regulations of the United States and other jurisdictions. Both you and Branch each represent that (and in your case, also your end users of your Digital Properties) it is not named on any government prohibited, denied, or unverified-party, sanctions, debarment, or exclusion list or export-controlled related restricted party list (collectively, “
Sanctions Lists
”). Customer shall not permit any entity or individual to access or use any of the Services who is listed on the Consolidated Screening List or located in a U.S. government-embargoed country (currently Cuba, Iran, North Korea, Syria and Crimea), or known to be engaged in proliferation of nuclear, chemical or biological weapons or missiles, or otherwise in violation of any U.S. export law or regulation. You will immediately (i) discontinue your use of the Services if you become placed on any Sanctions List and (ii) remove your End Users’ access to the Services if your end users become placed on any Sanctions List. You represent that you have not, and warrant that you will not, export, re-export, or transfer the Services to an entity on any Sanctions List without prior authorization from the applicable governmental authority. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, either Party may terminate this Agreement immediately upon written notice to the other party if the other party is in breach of its obligations hereunder with respect to Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws or Sanction Lists. If your account is blocked because it is operating in a country or region prohibited by Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws, you will receive notice of your account being inoperable when you attempt to log into your account in such prohibited country or region.
19.9 Third Party Beneficiary.
No provision of the Agreement is intended, nor shall it be interpreted, to provide or create any third-party beneficiary rights or any other rights of any kind in any customer, affiliate, stockholder, partner, member, director, officer, or employee of any Party hereto or any other person or entity.
19.10 Marketing Support.
You agree to comply with reasonable requests of Branch to support public relations efforts pertaining to the Services, which efforts may include: (a) a press release highlighting your company’s use of the Services, (b) participation in targeted press and analyst interviews highlighting benefits of implementing the Services, and (c) participation in customer case studies developed by Branch and used on Branch’s website(s) and other collateral. You grant to Branch a non-exclusive, non-transferable, limited right to use your name, trademarks, and logos (collectively, the "
Customer Marks
") (i) for the purpose of referencing You as a customer of Branch on the Branch website(s) and (ii) in the production of marketing materials, provided that such use is in accordance with any trademark and logo use guidelines that you provide to Branch. All goodwill developed from such use shall be solely for your benefit.
19.11 Force Majeure.
Neither Party will be responsible for any delay or failure in performance of any part of this Agreement to the extent that such delay or failure is caused by an event or circumstance beyond the reasonable control of the Party whose performance is affected and could not have been prevented or corrected through the exercise of reasonable diligence, including, for example, an act of God, act of government, flood, fire, earthquake, civil unrest, act of terror, strike or other labor problem (other than one involving Branch employees), Internet service provider failure or delay, integrated third party applications, or denial of service attack (each such event, a “
Force Majeure Event
”). The Party alleging a Force Majeure Event (the “
Affected Party
”) will promptly notify the other Party in writing of the Force Majeure Event, providing reasonable detail of the circumstances giving rise to the Force Majeure Event, and the steps it is taking to remedy the delay or failure. Notwithstanding the foregoing, financial incapability will not be considered as a Force Majeure Event.
19.12 Notices.
Except as otherwise specified in the Agreement, all notices of termination or an indemnifiable claim related to the Agreement (“
Legal Notices
”) will be provided via email and will be effective upon receipt by e-mail as set forth below. If to Branch, all notices shall be provided to legal@branch.io ("
Branch Notices
"). Billing-related notices to Customer will be provided via email and addressed to the relevant billing contact designated by Customer on the applicable Order Form or the relevant Services account administrator designated by Customer. All Legal Notices and other notices to Customer will be provided via email and addressed to the relevant Services account administrator designated by Customer.
19.13 Modifications.
We may make changes to these Terms from time to time. When we do, we will revise the "Last updated" date given above. It is your responsibility to review these Terms frequently and to remain informed of any changes to them. The then-current version of these Terms will supersede all earlier versions. You agree that your continued use of Branch’s Services after such changes have been published to Branch’s Services will constitute your acceptance of such revised Terms.
20. CONTACTING US
If you have any questions or concerns about Branch’s Services or these Terms, you may contact us by email at
info@branch.io
.
Effective January 1st 2023
to
June 22nd 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Terms & Conditions
1. Introduction
These Terms & Conditions ("
Terms
") are entered into by and between of Branch Metrics, Inc., a Delaware corporation d/b/a Branch Metrics ("
Branch
," "
Branch Metrics
," "
we
," or "
us
") and the entity or person accessing this website ("
Website
") or placing an order for or accessing any Services made available by Branch Metrics (“
Customer
” or “
you
” or “
your
”). “
Services
" means the products and services that are made available online by Branch under these Terms, the “
Beta Services
”, as defined in these Terms, other services or products that Branch may make available from time to time, including associated Branch offline or mobile components. Services exclude (i) Web-based, mobile, offline or other software application functionality that interoperates with a Service, that is provided by Customer or a third party, and (ii) Third-Party Content, as defined in these Terms. By indicating your acceptance of these Terms or using any of our Services, you agree to be legally bound by, and use our Services in compliance with, all terms, conditions, and notices in the Agreement. By agreeing to these Terms, you warrant that you are authorized to agree to these Terms on behalf of you and/or your company. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO THESE TERMS & CONDITIONS, DO NOT USE OUR WEBSITE OR ANY SERVICES.
2. Definitions
"
Agreement
" means these Terms together with any applicable Order Forms, and any exhibits, appendices, schedules, or attachments identified or referenced in these Terms, and any amendments attached hereto or hereafter attached by mutual written agreement of the parties (all of which are incorporated herein by reference).
"
Order Form
" means an ordering document or online order specifying the Services to be provided hereunder that is entered into between Customer and Branch or any of their Affiliates, including any addenda and supplements thereto. By entering into an Order Form hereunder, an Affiliate agrees to be bound by the terms of the Agreement as if it were an original party hereto.
"
Documentation
" means the applicable Service’s documentation and usage guidelines at
https://docs.branch.io/
, or its successor URL.
"
Affiliate
" means any entity that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the subject entity. “Control,” for purposes of this definition, means direct or indirect ownership or control of more than 50% of the voting interests of the subject entity.
Modifications
. We may make changes to these Terms from time to time. When we do, we will revise the "Last updated" date given above. It is your responsibility to review these Terms frequently and to remain informed of any changes to them. The then-current version of these Terms will supersede all earlier versions. You agree that your continued use of our Services after such changes have been published to our Services will constitute your acceptance of such revised Terms.
3. SERVICE ACCESS AND AVAILABILITY
Branch will make the Services available to you pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and solely for Customer’s internal business needs. Branch shall: (a) use commercially reasonable efforts to make the online Services available 24 hours a day, 7 days a week, except for: (i) planned downtime (of which Branch shall give advance electronic notice), (ii) emergency maintenance that is reasonably unforeseeable and necessary for purposes of maintaining the integrity or operation of the Services, regardless of the notice provided by Branch and (iii) any unavailability caused by circumstances beyond Branch’s reasonable control, including, for example, an act of God, act of government, flood, fire, earthquake, civil unrest, act of terror, strike or other labor problem (other than one involving Branch employees), Internet service provider failure or delay, integrated third party applications , or denial of service attack, and (b) provide the Services in accordance with laws and government regulations applicable to Branch’s provision of its Services to its customers generally (i.e., without regard for Customer’s particular use of the Services), and subject to Customer’s use of the Services in accordance with the Agreement, the Documentation and the applicable Order Form. Your rights to access and use the Services are limited by all terms set forth in the Agreement.
4. USE RESTRICTIONS; UPDATES & SUPPORT
4.1 Use Restrictions
. You must comply with all applicable laws when implementing, configuring, and using the Services. Except as expressly permitted under these Terms, you will not, and will not permit anyone else to: (a) make the functionality of the Services to any third party through any means, including, without limitation, any hosting, application services provider, service bureau, or other type of service; (b) use any automated tool (e.g., robots, spiders) to access or use the Services; (c) rent, lease, or sublicense your access to the Services to another person; (d) circumvent or disable any digital rights management, usage rules, or other security features of the Services or attempt to gain unauthorized access to the Services or its related systems or networks; (e) use the Services in a manner that overburdens, or that threatens the integrity, performance, or availability of, the Services; (f) remove, alter, or obscure any proprietary notices (including copyright and trademark notices) on any portion of the Services; (g) send material containing software viruses, worms, trojan horses, or other harmful computer code, files, scripts, agents, or programs; (h) use Branch’s Services in violation of Branch’s Acceptable Use Policy available at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-aup
, or its successor URL; or (i) use the Services in connection with any Apps or websites that are directed to children under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), without employing appropriate settings within the Branch SDKs to limit data collection from such children in accordance with applicable law. More information on these settings is available
here
. If you have questions about how to use these settings or have any reason to believe that these resources may not address your particular use case, please reach out to the Branch Support team via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
, or its successor URL. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Agreement, use of the Services in violation of the foregoing restrictions by Customer that, in Branch’s judgment, threatens the integrity, performance, availability, or security of the Services may result in Branch’s immediate suspension of, or limitation in Customer’s access to, the Services.
4.2 Updates and Support
. Branch will maintain, support, update, and provide error corrections for the Services to the same extent it does so for its customers generally. Ultimately, you are responsible for timely integration and launch of the Services. If Branch provides you with an update or maintenance release for the offline components of the Branch Services, unless you receive a separate license from Branch for that update or release that expressly supersedes these Terms, such update or release will be subject to the terms and conditions of these Terms. Branch shall have no liability for any damages that may result from Customer’s failure to implement upgrades or updates to the Services provided that Customer is notified in writing by Branch of an upgrade or update. All support requests must be sent to the Branch Support team via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
, or its successor URL.
5. BETA SERVICES
From time to time, Branch may invite You to try Beta Services. "
Beta Services
" means Our services or functionality that are not generally available to customers at no additional charge and that may be made available to You to try at Your option which are designated as beta, pilot, limited release, developer preview, non-production, evaluation, or by a similar description. You may accept or decline any such trial in Your sole discretion. Beta Services are for evaluation purposes only and not for production use, are not subject to any service level agreements (SLAs) agreed to between you and Branch, and may be subject to additional terms. Branch is under no obligation to, maintain, support, update, or provide error corrections for the Beta Services. Branch may discontinue Beta Services at any time in Branch’s sole discretion and reserves the right to never make them generally available. BRANCH WILL HAVE NO LIABILITY FOR ANY HARM OR DAMAGE ARISING OUT OF, OR IN CONNECTION WITH, CUSTOMER’S USE OF A BETA SERVICE. THE BETA SERVICES ARE PROVIDED “AS IS” AND AS AVAILABLE, AND ARE EXCLUSIVE OF ANY WARRANTY WHATSOEVER.
WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, WITH RESPECT TO THE BETA SERVICES, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE.
In the event of a conflict or inconsistency between this section and any other provision of the Agreement, the terms of this section “BETA SERVICES” shall control and prevail with respect to Beta Services.
6. PAID SERVICE TERMS
6.1 Fees
. You shall pay to Branch all fees specified in an Order Form or, if there is no Order Form executed by the Parties, you shall pay the fees set forth at the applicable rates available at
https://branch.io/pricing/
, or its successor URL (“Fees”). You are responsible for all undisputed Fees, even if such Fees are due and payable after termination of the Services, or any portion thereof. Fees are non-cancellable and failure to use the Services does not constitute a basis for refusing to pay any Fees. Except as expressly provided in an applicable Order Form, you will not receive any refund or prorated refund for amounts previously paid or amounts owed for the term of the Order Form.
6.2 Payments & Invoicing
. To the extent you procure the Services with an applicable Order Form(s), invoices for the applicable Fees shall be sent to you via email to the email address(es) you designate in your account when signing up for Services, and you shall pay the Fees due upon receipt of such invoice. To the extent you procure the Services under an applicable Order Form, any relevant paid service-specific terms including, for example, contract duration, monthly fees, billing frequency, payment forms, and payment term will be addressed within an associated Order Form. All Fees set forth in an applicable Order Form shall be invoiced in advance in accordance with the billing frequency stated therein. Fees are payable in United States dollars. You shall be responsible for the payment of any fees associated with an electronic funds transfer (i.e., ACH, wire transfer) when issuing payment to Branch, which includes fees from Your financial institution and intermediary banks. You are responsible for providing complete and accurate billing and contact information to Branch and notifying Branch of any changes to such information. In certain instances where your payment method is via credit card, the issuer of the credit card may charge a transaction fee or related charges, which you will be responsible to pay.
6.3 Payment by Credit Card
. In certain instances where your payment method is via credit card, the issuer of the credit card may charge a transaction fee or related charges, which you will be responsible to pay. Fees will be billed to the credit card nominated by you and you authorize the card issuer to pay all such amounts and authorize Branch (or its billing agent) to charge the credit card account until you or Branch cancels or terminates the Services as set forth herein; provided that if payment is not received from the credit card issuer, the transaction is returned after the payment has been settled, otherwise known as chargeback, or if there are insufficient funds in the case of check or debit card payments, you agree to pay all amounts plus any applicable transaction fees (e.g., NSF fees, chargeback fees) due upon demand.
6.4 Payment Disputes
. If you have concerns about any charges on your invoice, you agree to the following dispute resolution process: (i) all billing disputes must be submitted in writing to billing@branch.io, (ii) billing disputes must be submitted within 90 days of the date the invoice was generated, and (iii) undisputed amounts will be subject to the Agreement and total payment for undisputed invoices or amounts must be submitted when due.
6.5 Suspension or Cancellation of Service; Payment Acceleration
. Without derogating from any other remedies available to Branch under the Agreement or by applicable law, if you owe any undisputed Fees 30 days or more past due in connection with any Services provided by Branch under any applicable Order Form, then, without affecting any of your payment obligations under the Agreement (including, any payment obligations under an Order Form), Branch is entitled to take further action including but not limited to accelerating your unpaid fee obligations under such agreement so that all such obligations become immediately due and payable, and suspending and/or canceling your access to the Services until such amounts are paid in full. Branch reserves the right to send your account to a collections agency for nonpayment (which may, in turn, report the uncollected debt to credit bureaus) and to use your contact information for debt collection purposes if the Agreement is terminated for non-payment as set forth herein following a 10-day cure period.
6.6 Taxes
. Branch’s Fees do not include any local, state, or federal sales, use, excise, personal property, VAT, or other similar taxes, duties, levies, tariffs, and other governmental charges (including, without limitation, any withholding tax, and any such taxes, to the extent legally applicable, which shall be borne and paid by Customer) (collectively, "Taxes"). If Branch has the legal obligation to pay or collect Taxes for which you are responsible under this section, Branch will invoice you and you will pay that amount unless you provide Branch with a valid tax exemption certificate authorized by the appropriate taxing authority. For clarity, you are responsible for payment of all Taxes resulting from any Fees payable hereunder, other than any taxes based on Branch’s net income, property, and employees.
6.7 Withholding Taxes
. In the event Fees payable by you to Branch under the Agreement are subject to any applicable withholding tax, goods and services tax, or similar taxes required by any tax authority and you are required by applicable law to remit such withholding tax, you: (a) may withhold and deduct from any payments to Branch under the Agreement an amount equivalent to any applicable withholding tax to the extent required by applicable law ("Withholding Tax"), (b) will pay to the relevant taxation authority the amount of such applicable withholdings in accordance with applicable law; and (c) will pay to Branch the applicable amounts under this Agreement net of such Withholding Tax. You shall be discharged from the obligation to pay Withholding Tax amounts to Branch provided that (1) you have remitted such amount to the relevant taxation authority and (2) you furnish Branch with (i) your tax registration certificate(s) as proof of registration with the applicable taxation authority, and (ii) any and all relevant tax forms and/or statements with proof of Withholding Tax remittance amount to the taxation authority, the applicable rate, and other information which may reasonably be requested for the purpose of assisting Branch to seek any allowable credits or deductions for the Withholding Tax so withheld in each jurisdiction where you are subject to tax.
6.8 Overdue Charges
. If any invoiced amount is not received by Branch by the due date set forth in the applicable invoice, then without limiting Branch’s rights or remedies, (a) those charges may accrue late interest at the rate of 2.5% of the outstanding balance per month, and (b) Branch may condition future Order Form renewals on payment terms shorter than those specified in the applicable Order Form. You are prohibited from creating new accounts until the Fees due are paid in full.
6.9 Term for Paid Services
. Except as expressly set forth herein, the terms set forth in these Terms shall be in force for as long as an Order Form referencing the Agreement is in effect. Except as otherwise agreed to by you and Branch in a superseding Order Form, at the end of an applicable term, your access to the Services will automatically renew under the same Order Form terms (contract duration, billing frequency, payment period, etc.), unless and until your access to the Services is terminated in accordance with this section or either party to these Terms provides the other with notice of non-renewal (email sufficient; if to Branch, please email billing@branch.io) at least thirty (30) days prior to the commencement of any renewal period.
6.10 Termination by Branch
. Except as expressly agreed to by you and Branch in a superseding Order Form, Branch reserves the right to modify or discontinue, temporarily or permanently, all or any portion of the Services immediately upon at least thirty (30) days’ written notice (email sufficient), provided that Branch will promptly provide a pro-rated refund of all pre-paid and unearned amounts based on the period of suspension or the date of discontinuance, as applicable. Branch may also, in its sole discretion, terminate your access to the Services or any portion thereof if you violate any terms of the Agreement, unless you cure such breach within thirty (30) days of the date Branch provides written notice to you of such violation. Termination by Branch for your violation of these Terms will be effective as of the last day of the 30-day cure period provided herein or immediately to the extent such violation reasonably cannot be cured. Upon termination of the Agreement, any outstanding balance through the effective date of termination and other unpaid payment obligations will be immediately due and payable in full.
7. TERMINATION
Except with respect to paid services, as to which the terms and conditions governing termination are set forth above in the section "PAID SERVICE TERMS" of these Terms above, You acknowledge and agree that Branch, in its sole discretion, may terminate your use of the Services without prior notice for any reason at any time. You agree that Branch shall not be liable to you or any third party for termination by Branch. Except when subject to a binding contract duration (see any applicable Order Form), you may terminate your access to and use of the Services at any time by providing written notice to Branch via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
, or its successor URL). Such termination will be effective as of the last day of the calendar month during which such termination notice is received.
8. SURVIVAL
Upon termination of the Agreement, those sections of these Terms that by their nature would reasonably be expected to survive will survive termination or expiration of these Terms, including but not limited to the sections on Termination, Privacy Policy & Data Rights, Confidential Information, Proprietary Rights, Limitation of Liability, and Legal Notices.
9. PRIVACY POLICY & DATA RIGHTS
9.1 Privacy Policy.
(a) You acknowledge and agree that you will provide a privacy policy to your end users, which shall be in compliance with applicable laws and self-regulatory guidelines, including, without limitation each of the Self-Regulatory Principles of the Digital Advertising Alliance ("
DAA
"), currently available at
http://www.aboutads.info/principles
, and the Principles of the European Interactive Digital Alliance ("
EDAA
"), currently available at
http://www.edaa.eu/european-principles/
, as each set of principles may be amended from time to time.
(b) Your privacy policy will further include clear, meaningful, and conspicuous notice consistent with applicable laws, regulations, and self-regulatory guidelines that includes, at minimum, the following: (a) disclosure regarding your practices with regard to cookies and/or targeting and online behavioral advertising; the types of data you collect for this purpose; and your data collection, use and disclosure practices (including that by visiting your Digital Properties, third parties may place cookies on end user browsers, or use non-cookie technology, to collect data that you may use for this purpose); and (b) information regarding how end users may opt out from receiving targeted advertisements by visiting the NAI website opt-out page here:
http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices/
, the DAA opt-out page here:
http://www.aboutads.info/
, and/or the EDAA opt-out page here:
http://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
. Your “
Digital Properties
” means your mobile applications, websites and program code created by or for you using a Service or for use by you with the Services.
(c) You further agree to obtain consent to your practices from your end users with regard to cookies and/or targeting and online behavioral advertising to the extent required by applicable laws, regulations, and self-regulatory guidelines. If you use Branch’s Engagement Builder feature, you agree to respect opt-out flags passed by Branch to you if you use Engagement Builder data for targeted advertisements. You acknowledge and agree that your use of the Services is subject to Branch’s Privacy Policy, located at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-privacypolicy
, or its successor URL. Branch’s Privacy Policy does not cover your Digital Properties, or the use of your Digital Properties, by your end users. It is your obligation to provide your own privacy policy to your end users. You acknowledge that Branch has no direct relationship or interface with your end users and that Branch’s ability to comply with certain applicable data protection and privacy laws is dependent on your compliance with the terms of this section of the Terms.
9.2 Data Analytics
. You acknowledge and agree that Branch may collect and process data from your Digital Properties as set forth in
Branch’s Privacy Policy
with respect to your use of the Services. You grant to Branch a limited, non-exclusive, non-sublicensable, non-transferable license to use the data collected through the Services to provide, maintain, optimize and improve the Services.
9.3 Data Security
. Branch will maintain appropriate technical, administrative, and physical safeguards designed to protect information on its servers, including customer data, against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. However, you acknowledge and agree that no method of transmission over the Internet or method of electronic storage is completely secure, and that Branch cannot guarantee the absolute security of such information
9.4 Compliance with Applicable Law
. You will comply with all laws, regulations, and self-regulatory guidelines applicable to your business and operations and to your use of the Services, including those governing the privacy, security and trans-border transfers of personal data (including, but not limited to, compliance with the General Data Protection Regulation (EU 2016/679) ("
GDPR
") and the California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CCPA
”)). Where required, you shall be responsible for (a) obtaining verifiable consent, in the form required by applicable laws, regulations, and self-regulatory guidelines, related to any personal data collected, used, maintained, and shared with Branch, or that you direct Branch to share with any third party; (b) ensuring that you otherwise have any and all rights required in order to provide such data to Branch or to direct Branch to share it with any third party; and (c) obtaining data properly and in accordance with applicable law, including, without limitation, the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (“
COPPA
”), and the Video Privacy Protection Act (18 U.S.C. § 2710) (“
VPPA
”); and ; and (d) ensuring it does not provide to Branch any other sensitive information, including without limitation personally identifiable information that is afforded legal protection under applicable regulation or laws (“
PII
”). To the extent that any of your users request that you not share their data with Branch, or to the extent that you believe that any data you may have provided to Branch was inappropriately obtained, you shall inform Branch immediately. Branch shall have no responsibility or liability to the extent resulting from, or arising out of your use of the Services not in compliance with the Agreement, the Documentation or applicable law.
9.5 CCPA
. If any data collected through your use of the Services is deemed personal information and is subject to the CCPA, then the terms set forth in the Branch California Privacy Addendum (“
California Privacy Addendum
“) available at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-ca-privacy-addendum
, or its successor URL, shall apply to the use and processing of such personal information and shall be incorporated by reference into, and made an integral part of, the Agreement.
10. RESTRICTED AREAS OF THE SERVICES
10.1 Registration Information
. In order to access and use the Services, you will register an account. Any information provided during such registration must be current, complete and accurate (“
Registration Information
”). It is your sole responsibility to ensure Registration Information is up to date at all times.
10.2 Access Credentials
. Certain parts of the Services, including account management features, may be password-restricted to registered users or other authorized persons. You may select individuals (your employees or your independent contractors) to access and use such parts and you will obtain separate credentials, e.g., user IDs and passwords, from Branch for such individuals (each, an "
Authorized User
").
10.3 Responsibility
. You are responsible for all actions taken under an Authorized User’s account, whether or not such action was taken by an Authorized User or by another party, and whether or not such action was authorized by an Authorized User. You are responsible for the security of each Authorized User’s credentials and shall take all necessary steps to protect each Authorized User’s credentials from disclosure. You will not share (and will instruct each Authorized User not to share) such credentials with any other person or entity or otherwise permit any other person or entity to access or use the Services.
11. LINKS AND THIRD-PARTY CONTENT
You may enable the Services to display, or contain links to, third party products, services, and websites. Any opinions, advice, statements, services, offers, or other information that constitute part of the content expressed, authored, or made available by other users or other third parties on the Services, or which is accessible through or may be located using the Services (collectively, "
Third-Party Content
") are those of the respective authors or producers and not of Branch or its shareholders, directors, officers, employees, agents, or representatives. Branch does not control Third-Party Content and does not guarantee the accuracy, integrity or quality of such Third-Party Content. Branch is not responsible for the performance of, does not endorse, and is not responsible or liable for, any Third-Party Content or any information or materials advertised in any Third-Party Content. By using Branch’s Services, you and/or your end users may be exposed to content that is offensive, indecent, or objectionable. We are not responsible or liable, directly or indirectly, for any damage or loss caused to you by your or a third party’s use of or reliance on any goods, services, or information available on or through any third-party service or Third-Party Content. It is your responsibility to evaluate the information, opinion, advice, or other content available on and through our Services.
12. TRADEMARKS
"Branch Metrics", the Branch Metrics logo, and any other trademarks or service marks used by Branch or slogan displayed on the Services ("
Branch Marks
") are trademarks of Branch and its suppliers or licensors, and may not be copied, imitated or used, in whole or in part, without the prior written permission of Branch or the applicable trademark holder. You may not use any metatags or any other "hidden text" utilizing "Branch Metrics" or any other Branch Marks without Branch’s prior written permission. In addition, the look and feel of the Services, including all page headers, custom graphics, button icons and scripts, is the trade dress of Branch and may not be copied, imitated or used, in whole or in part, without Branch’s prior written permission. All other trademarks, registered trademarks, product names and company names or logos mentioned in the Services are the property of their respective owners. Reference to any products, services, processes or other information, by trade name, trademark, manufacturer, supplier, or otherwise does not constitute or imply endorsement, sponsorship, or recommendation thereof by Branch.
13. AGENCIES & PARTNERS
13.1 Agency Client
. If you are an agency or a party representing, or providing services for the benefit of, a third party (“
Agency Client
“), you represent and warrant that you are authorized to act on behalf of, and bind to the Agreement, that Agency Client (and upon Branch’s request shall provide evidence thereof). You further represent and warrant that such Agency Client has provided you with explicit permission to collect on its behalf and view Agency Client’s data and that you shall use such data strictly in accordance with the permissions provided to you by such Agency Client and the terms of the Agreement. You shall ensure that each Agency Client agrees to the terms of the Agreement and any applicable Order Form(s) and agrees to abide by its terms, including without limitation, Section 9 (Privacy Policy & Data Rights) of these Terms. You acknowledge and agree that: (i) Branch makes no representations or warranties for the direct or indirect benefit of any Agency Client; and (ii) you shall not make any representations or warranties to such Agency Client on behalf of Branch.
13.2 Partners
. The Services enable you to measure and analyze its marketing campaigns with certain partners that you work with, such as advertising networks, publishers and analytics providers (“
Partners
“). For such purpose, you may, through your configuration of the Services (“
Partner Features
”), direct Branch to provide data to, and receive data from Partners relating to end users (“Shared Data”). Pursuant to the foregoing, insofar as you make use of the Partner Features, you hereby grant Branch the right to provide Shared Data with Partners as to which you make use of the Partner Features (the “
Permitted Partners
”) and to obtain and process Shared Data from Permitted Partners. You acknowledge and agree that: (i) the sharing of such Shared Data between Branch and Permitted Partners will be available only to the extent enabled by the Permitted Partner and Branch; (ii) any use of Shared Data by a Permitted Partner shall be subject to your own agreements with Permitted Partner; (iii) Branch shall have no liability or responsibility in connection with any acts or omissions by Permitted Partners; (iv) any use or processing of Shared Data may be subject to certain limitations and restrictions imposed by Permitted Partners, and that Branch is not responsible for fulfilling such limitations and restrictions unless expressly agreed to in writing between you and Branch.
14. CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION
14.1 Definition
. Each party to these Terms (a “
Receiving Party
”) may have access to, or become acquainted with, certain non-public confidential information of the other party (a “
Disclosing Party
”) including without limitation all information clearly identified as confidential at the time of disclosure (“
ConfidentialInformation
”). You and Branch further agree that, subject to the rights and licenses granted herein, each party's Confidential Information shall include all non-public information regarding the Disclosing party, including without limitation any customer, customer prospect, the terms, conditions and pricing set forth in the Agreement and its Order Form(s), marketing, technical, business and/or strategic plans or information provided by the Disclosing Party to the Receiving party in the performance of the Services under the Agreement.
14.2 Use and Disclosure
. Each party agrees as follows: (a) to use the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party only for the purposes permitted by the Agreement, or as otherwise permitted by the Agreement (the "
Purpose
"); (b) to take all reasonable steps to ensure that the Disclosing Party’s Confidential Information is not disclosed or distributed by the Receiving Party’s employees or agents to another party in violation of the Agreement, but in no event will the Receiving party use less effort to protect the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party than it uses to protect its own Confidential Information of like importance; (c) to restrict access to the Confidential Information disclosed by the Disclosing Party to such of the Receiving Party’s employees, agents and third parties, if any, who have a legitimate need to have access for the Purpose and who have agreed in writing or are otherwise bound to treat such information in accordance with the Agreement; and (d) to return or destroy all Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party’s written request, after termination of the Agreement. The Receiving Party will not be obligated under this confidentiality section with respect to information that: (a) is or has become readily publicly available through no act or omission of the Receiving Party or its employees or agents; (b) is received from a third party lawfully in possession of such information and the Receiving Party has no knowledge of any disclosure restrictions on such third party to disclose such information; (c) is disclosed to a third party by the Disclosing Party without restriction on disclosure; (d) was rightfully in the possession of the Receiving Party without restriction prior to its disclosure by the Disclosing Party; or (e) was independently developed by employees or consultants of the Receiving Party without reliance on, or reference to, such Confidential Information.
14.3 Permitted Disclosures
. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Confidential Information may be disclosed as required by any court or governmental agency, provided that before disclosing such information the Receiving Party must provide the Disclosing Party with sufficient advance notice of the court or agency’s request for the information to enable the Receiving Party to exercise any rights it may have to challenge or limit the court or agency’s authority to receive such Confidential Information, to the extent permitted by applicable law.
15. PROPRIETARY RIGHTS
15.1 Proprietary Rights
. As between you and Branch, you shall retain all right, title and interest in your Digital Properties. If you choose to use Customer’s Digital Properties with a Service, you grant Branch permission to allow the Services to interoperate with your Digital Properties as required for the interoperation of your Digital Properties with the Service. Subject to the limited licenses granted herein, Branch acquires no right, title or interest from you or your licensors under the Agreement in or to your Digital Properties. Subject to the limited rights expressly granted hereunder, Branch, its Affiliates, and its licensors reserve all of their right, title and interest in and to the Services (including the Branch application programming interfaces and the Branch software development kits), all technology utilized by Branch to provide the Services, and all of their related intellectual property rights related to, embodied by, or incorporated in any of the foregoing and including any updates, upgrades, enhancements, modifications and improvements made to, or derivatives of, the foregoing. No copyright is granted by Branch to Customer hereunder. No rights are granted to Customer hereunder other than as expressly set forth herein.
15.2 Feedback
. Branch may provide you with a mechanism to provide feedback, suggestions, and ideas, if you choose, about the Services ("
Feedback
"). You agree that Branch may, in its sole discretion, use the Feedback you provide to Branch in any way, including in future enhancements and modifications to the Services. You hereby grant to Branch and its assigns a perpetual, worldwide, fully transferable, sub-licensable, fully paid-up, irrevocable, royalty-free license to use, reproduce, modify, create derivative works from, distribute, and display the Feedback in any manner for any purpose, in any media, software, or technology of any kind now existing or developed in the future, without any obligation to provide attribution or compensation to you or any third party.
16. WARRANTY & DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTIES
16.1 Warranty
. You represent and warrant to Branch that: (a) you are duly organized under applicable law and have sufficient authority to enter into the Agreement; (b) the person entering into the Agreement is authorized to agree to and execute the Agreement on behalf of such party; and (c) the execution and performance of the Agreement does not conflict with any contractual obligations you have to any third party.
16.2 DISCLAIMER
. EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY PROVIDED IN THE AGREEMENT, THE SERVICES, AND THE DOCUMENTATION ARE PROVIDED “AS IS,” WITHOUT REPRESENTATION OR WARRANTY OF ANY KIND. WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE. Branch does not warrant the accuracy, completeness, or usefulness of the Services, and the Documentation, nor does Branch warrant that the Services will be free from errors, or that the operations of the Services will be uninterrupted. You rely on the Services and the Documentation at your own risk. SOME JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW THE EXCLUSION OF CERTAIN WARRANTIES IN CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES. ACCORDINGLY THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH ABOVE APPLY TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW.
17. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
17.1 INDIRECT LIABILITY.
BRANCH AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND LICENSORS WILL NOT BE LIABLE FOR ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, PUNITIVE, CONSEQUENTIAL, OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO, DAMAGES FOR LOSS OF PROFITS, LOSS OF REVENUE, GOODWILL, USE, DATA THAT IS INCOMPLETE, MISSING, OR INCORRECT, OR OTHER INTANGIBLE LOSSES (EVEN IF BRANCH HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES), RESULTING FROM THIS AGREEMENT.
17.2 DIRECT LIABILITY.
UNDER NO CIRCUMSTANCES WILL THE TOTAL LIABILITY OF BRANCH AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND LICENSORS RESULTING FROM THIS AGREEMENT (INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO WARRANTY CLAIMS), REGARDLESS OF THE FORUM AND REGARDLESS OF WHETHER ANY ACTION OR CLAIM IS BASED IN CONTRACT, WARRANTY, NEGLIGENCE, STRICT LIABILITY, OR OTHER TORT, BREACH OF ANY STATUTORY DUTY, INDEMNITY OR CONTRIBUTION, OR OTHERWISE, EXCEED THE AMOUNTS, IF ANY, THAT YOU HAVE PAID TO BRANCH FOR USE OF THE SERVICES FOR THE TWELVE (12) MONTH PERIOD PRIOR TO THE CLAIM IN THE AGGREGATE. SOME OF THE LIMITATIONS PROVIDED HEREIN MAY NOT BE ALLOWED UNDER THE LAWS OF CERTAIN JURISDICTIONS.
IF ANY SUCH LAW IS DEEMED TO APPLY TO THE AGREEMENT THEN THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH HEREIN SHALL APPLY TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED UNDER SUCH LAWS.
18. INDEMNITY
18.1 Indemnity
. You will defend Branch, its Affiliates and their officers, agents, employees, representatives, and assigns (“
Branch Indemnified Parties
”) against any claim, demand suit or action against Branch brought by a third party (a) arising from your use of the Services in a unlawful manner or in violation of the Agreement or applicable Order Form, or usage of the Services in violation of the Documentation or (b) alleging that any of your Digital Properties developed or provided by you, or the combination of your Digital Properties used with the Services, infringes or misappropriates such third party’s intellectual property rights (c) based on your instructions to share Shared Data with a Partner or (d) related to a regulatory investigation (each a “
Claim Against Branch
”). You will indemnify Branch Indemnified Parties from any costs, damages, and expenses finally awarded against Branch Indemnified Parties as a result of, or for any amounts paid by Branch Indemnified Parties under a settlement approved by you in writing of, a Claim Against Branch. The above defense and indemnification obligations do not apply if a Claim Against Branch arises from Branch’s breach of the Agreement, or applicable Order Forms.
18.2 Agency Indemnity
. If you are an agency or a party representing, or providing services for the benefit of an Agency Client, in addition to the obligations set forth in the section “AGENCIES & PARTNERS” of these Terms, you further agree to indemnify, hold harmless and defend Branch Indemnified Parties from and against any claim, demand, suit, or action and any related liability against a Branch Indemnified Party brought by a third party, arising out of or relating to: (a) any representations and warranties made by you concerning any aspect of the Services to an Agency Client; (b) any claims made by or on behalf of any Agency Client arising out or relating to your use of the Services; and (c) any claims arising out of or relating to acts or omissions of an Agency Client in connection with the Services.
18.3 Indemnification Procedure
. Your obligations to provide indemnification under this Agreement will be contingent upon (a) Branch promptly giving you written notice of any claim for which indemnification is sought (provided that the Branch’s failure to notify you will not diminish your obligations under this Section, except to the extent that you are materially prejudiced as a result of such failure); (b) you having sole control of the defense and settlement of any and all claims for which indemnification is sought (provided that no settlement may be entered into without either (i) the consent of Branch if such settlement would require any action on the part of Branch or (ii) unconditionally releasing Branch of all liability); and (c) Branch giving You all reasonably requested assistance at Your expense. Subject to the foregoing, Branch will at all times have the option to participate in any matter or litigation through counsel of its own selection solely at its own expense.
19. MISCELLANEOUS
19.1 Governing Law
. The Agreement and all matters arising out of or relating to the Agreement shall be governed by and construed under the laws of the State of California, without regard to its conflict of law provisions. The parties expressly disclaim and exclude the application of the United Nations Convention on Contracts for the International Sale of Goods.
19.2 Venue
. Any legal action or proceeding arising out of or relating to the Agreement shall be brought exclusively in the state or federal courts located in the Northern District of California. You and Branch hereby agree to submit to the jurisdiction of, and agree that venue is proper in, those courts in any such legal action or proceeding.
19.3 No Waiver; Severability
. Our failure to enforce any right or provision in the Agreement will not constitute a waiver of such right or provision unless acknowledged and agreed to by us in writing. If any provision of the Agreement is found to be unenforceable or invalid, that provision will be limited or eliminated to the minimum extent necessary so that the Agreement will otherwise remain in full force and effect and enforceable.
19.4 Assignment
. The Agreement is not assignable, transferable or sublicensable by you except with Branch’s prior written consent. Branch may transfer and assign any of its rights and obligations under the Agreement freely and without consent.
19.5 Entire Agreement
. Both you and Branch agree that the Agreement is the complete and exclusive statement of the mutual understanding of the Parties and supersedes all previous written and oral agreements, communications and other understandings relating to your use of the Services, and that all waivers and modifications must be in a signed writing by both Parties, except as otherwise provided herein. Preprinted terms in your purchase orders or other customer-generated ordering documents, or terms referenced or linked within them, will have no effect on the Agreement and are hereby rejected, regardless of whether they are signed, clicked through, or otherwise agreed to by Branch and/or purport to take precedence over the Agreement. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency among the following documents, the order of precedence shall be: (1) the applicable Order Form, (2) any exhibit, schedule or addendum to the Agreement, (3) the body of these Terms, and (4) the Documentation.
19.6 Relationship between the Parties
. The Parties are independent contractors. No agency, partnership, joint venture, fiduciary or employment relationship is created as a result of the Agreement, and you do not have any authority of any kind to bind Branch in any respect whatsoever.
19.7 Export / Trade Compliance
. The Services and any derivatives thereof, may be subject to export control and economic sanctions laws and regulations of the United States and other jurisdictions. Both Customer and Branch each represent that it is not named on any U.S. Government Consolidated Screening denied-party list which may be searched at:
https://www.export.gov/article?id=Consolidated-Screening-List
. Customer shall not permit any entity or individual to access or use any of the Services who is listed on the Consolidated Screening List or located in a U.S. government-embargoed country (currently Cuba, Iran, North Korea, Syria and Crimea), or known to be engaged in proliferation of nuclear, chemical or biological weapons or missiles, or otherwise in violation of any U.S. export law or regulation.
19.8 Third Party Beneficiary
. No provision of the Agreement is intended, nor shall it be interpreted, to provide or create any third-party beneficiary rights or any other rights of any kind in any customer, affiliate, stockholder, partner, member, director, officer or employee of any party hereto or any other person or entity.
19.9 Marketing Support
. You agree to comply with reasonable requests of Branch to support public relations efforts pertaining to the Services, which efforts may include: (a) a press release highlighting your company’s use of the Services; (b) participation in targeted press and analyst interviews highlighting benefits of implementing the Services; and (c) participation in customer case studies developed by Branch and used on Branch’s website(s) and other collateral. You grant to Branch a non-exclusive, non-transferable, limited right to use your name, trademarks, and logos (collectively, the "
Customer Marks
") (i) for the purpose of referencing You as a customer of Branch on the Branch website(s) and (ii) in the production of marketing materials, provided that such use is in accordance with any trademark and logo use guidelines that you provide to Branch. All goodwill developed from such use shall be solely for your benefit.
19.10 Notices
. Except as otherwise specified in the Agreement, all notices of termination or an indemnifiable claim related to the Agreement (“
Legal Notices
”) will be provided via email and will be effective upon receipt by e-mail as set forth below. If to Branch, all notices shall be provided to legal@branch.io ("
Branch Notices
"). Billing-related notices to Customer will be provided via email and addressed to the relevant billing contact designated by Customer on the applicable Order Form. All Legal Notices and other notices to Customer will be provided via email and addressed to the relevant Services account administrator designated by Customer.
20. CONTACTING US
If you have any questions or concerns about our Services or these Terms, you may contact us by email at
info@branch.io
Effective December 29th 2022
to
January 1st 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Terms & Conditions
1. Introduction
These Terms & Conditions (“
Terms
”) are entered into by and between of Branch Metrics, Inc., a Delaware corporation d/b/a Branch Metrics ("
Branch
," "
Branch Metrics
," "
we
," or "
us
") and the entity or person accessing this website (“
Website
”) or placing an order for or accessing any Services made available by Branch Metrics (“
Customer
” or “
you
” or “
your
”). “
Services
" means the products and services that are made available online by Branch under these Terms, the “
Beta Services
”, as defined in these Terms, other services or products that Branch may make available from time to time, including associated Branch offline or mobile components. Services exclude (i) Web-based, mobile, offline or other software application functionality that interoperates with a Service, that is provided by Customer or a third party, and (ii) Third-Party Content, as defined in these Terms. By indicating your acceptance of these Terms or using any of our Services, you agree to be legally bound by, and use our Services in compliance with, all terms, conditions, and notices in the Agreement. By agreeing to these Terms, you warrant that you are authorized to agree to these Terms on behalf of you and/or your company. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO THESE TERMS & CONDITIONS, DO NOT USE OUR WEBSITE OR ANY SERVICES.
2. Definitions
“
Agreement
” means these Terms together with any applicable Order Forms, and any exhibits, appendices, schedules, or attachments identified or referenced in these Terms, and any amendments attached hereto or hereafter attached by mutual written agreement of the parties (all of which are incorporated herein by reference).
“
Order Form
” means an ordering document or online order specifying the Services to be provided hereunder that is entered into between Customer and Branch or any of their Affiliates, including any addenda and supplements thereto. By entering into an Order Form hereunder, an Affiliate agrees to be bound by the terms of the Agreement as if it were an original party hereto.
“
Documentation
” means the applicable Service’s documentation and usage guidelines at
https://docs.branch.io/
, or its successor URL.
“
Affiliate
” means any entity that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the subject entity. “Control,” for purposes of this definition, means direct or indirect ownership or control of more than 50% of the voting interests of the subject entity.
Modifications
. We may make changes to these Terms from time to time. When we do, we will revise the "Last updated" date given above. It is your responsibility to review these Terms frequently and to remain informed of any changes to them. The then-current version of these Terms will supersede all earlier versions. You agree that your continued use of our Services after such changes have been published to our Services will constitute your acceptance of such revised Terms.
3. SERVICE ACCESS AND AVAILABILITY
Branch will make the Services available to you pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and solely for Customer’s internal business needs. Branch shall: (a) use commercially reasonable efforts to make the online Services available 24 hours a day, 7 days a week, except for: (i) planned downtime (of which Branch shall give advance electronic notice), (ii) emergency maintenance that is reasonably unforeseeable and necessary for purposes of maintaining the integrity or operation of the Services, regardless of the notice provided by Branch and (iii) any unavailability caused by circumstances beyond Branch’s reasonable control, including, for example, an act of God, act of government, flood, fire, earthquake, civil unrest, act of terror, strike or other labor problem (other than one involving Branch employees), Internet service provider failure or delay, integrated third party applications , or denial of service attack, and (b) provide the Services in accordance with laws and government regulations applicable to Branch’s provision of its Services to its customers generally (i.e., without regard for Customer’s particular use of the Services), and subject to Customer’s use of the Services in accordance with the Agreement, the Documentation and the applicable Order Form. Your rights to access and use the Services are limited by all terms set forth in the Agreement.
4. USE RESTRICTIONS; UPDATES & SUPPORT
4.1 Use Restrictions
. You must comply with all applicable laws when implementing, configuring, and using the Services. Except as expressly permitted under these Terms, you will not, and will not permit anyone else to: (a) make the functionality of the Services to any third party through any means, including, without limitation, any hosting, application services provider, service bureau, or other type of service; (b) use any automated tool (e.g., robots, spiders) to access or use the Services; (c) rent, lease, or sublicense your access to the Services to another person; (d) circumvent or disable any digital rights management, usage rules, or other security features of the Services or attempt to gain unauthorized access to the Services or its related systems or networks; (e) use the Services in a manner that overburdens, or that threatens the integrity, performance, or availability of, the Services; (f) remove, alter, or obscure any proprietary notices (including copyright and trademark notices) on any portion of the Services; (g) send material containing software viruses, worms, trojan horses, or other harmful computer code, files, scripts, agents, or programs; (h) use Branch’s Services in violation of Branch’s Acceptable Use Policy available at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-aup
, or its successor URL; or (i) use the Services in connection with any Apps or websites that are directed to children under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), without employing appropriate settings within the Branch SDKs to limit data collection from such children in accordance with applicable law. More information on these settings is available
here
. If you have questions about how to use these settings or have any reason to believe that these resources may not address your particular use case, please reach out to the Branch Support team via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
, or its successor URL. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Agreement, use of the Services in violation of the foregoing restrictions by Customer that, in Branch’s judgment, threatens the integrity, performance, availability, or security of the Services may result in Branch’s immediate suspension of, or limitation in Customer’s access to, the Services.
4.2 Updates and Support
. Branch will maintain, support, update, and provide error corrections for the Services to the same extent it does so for its customers generally. Ultimately, you are responsible for timely integration and launch of the Services. If Branch provides you with an update or maintenance release for the offline components of the Branch Services, unless you receive a separate license from Branch for that update or release that expressly supersedes these Terms, such update or release will be subject to the terms and conditions of these Terms. Branch shall have no liability for any damages that may result from Customer’s failure to implement upgrades or updates to the Services provided that Customer is notified in writing by Branch of an upgrade or update. All support requests must be sent to the Branch Support team via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
, or its successor URL.
5. BETA SERVICES
From time to time, Branch may invite You to try Beta Services. “
Beta Services
” means Our services or functionality that are not generally available to customers at no additional charge and that may be made available to You to try at Your option which are designated as beta, pilot, limited release, developer preview, non-production, evaluation, or by a similar description. You may accept or decline any such trial in Your sole discretion. Beta Services are for evaluation purposes only and not for production use, are not subject to any service level agreements (SLAs) agreed to between you and Branch, and may be subject to additional terms. Branch is under no obligation to, maintain, support, update, or provide error corrections for the Beta Services. Branch may discontinue Beta Services at any time in Branch’s sole discretion and reserves the right to never make them generally available. BRANCH WILL HAVE NO LIABILITY FOR ANY HARM OR DAMAGE ARISING OUT OF, OR IN CONNECTION WITH, CUSTOMER’S USE OF A BETA SERVICE. THE BETA SERVICES ARE PROVIDED “AS IS” AND AS AVAILABLE, AND ARE EXCLUSIVE OF ANY WARRANTY WHATSOEVER.
WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, WITH RESPECT TO THE BETA SERVICES, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE
. In the event of a conflict or inconsistency between this section and any other provision of the Agreement, the terms of this section “BETA SERVICES” shall control and prevail with respect to Beta Services.
6. PAID SERVICE TERMS
6.1 Fees
. You shall pay to Branch all fees specified in an Order Form or, if there is no Order Form executed by the Parties, you shall pay the fees set forth at the applicable rates available at
https://branch.io/pricing/
, or its successor URL (“Fees”). You are responsible for all undisputed Fees, even if such Fees are due and payable after termination of the Services, or any portion thereof. Fees are non-cancellable and failure to use the Services does not constitute a basis for refusing to pay any Fees. Except as expressly provided in an applicable Order Form, you will not receive any refund or prorated refund for amounts previously paid or amounts owed for the term of the Order Form.
6.2 Payments & Invoicing
. To the extent you procure the Services with an applicable Order Form(s), invoices for the applicable Fees shall be sent to you via email to the email address(es) you designate in your account when signing up for Services, and you shall pay the Fees due upon receipt of such invoice. To the extent you procure the Services under an applicable Order Form, any relevant paid service-specific terms including, for example, contract duration, monthly fees, billing frequency, payment forms, and payment term will be addressed within an associated Order Form. All Fees set forth in an applicable Order Form shall be invoiced in advance in accordance with the billing frequency stated therein. Fees are payable in United States dollars. You shall be responsible for the payment of any fees associated with an electronic funds transfer (i.e., ACH, wire transfer) when issuing payment to Branch, which includes fees from Your financial institution and intermediary banks. You are responsible for providing complete and accurate billing and contact information to Branch and notifying Branch of any changes to such information. In certain instances where your payment method is via credit card, the issuer of the credit card may charge a transaction fee or related charges, which you will be responsible to pay.
6.3 Payment by Credit Card
. In certain instances where your payment method is via credit card, the issuer of the credit card may charge a transaction fee or related charges, which you will be responsible to pay. Fees will be billed to the credit card nominated by you and you authorize the card issuer to pay all such amounts and authorize Branch (or its billing agent) to charge the credit card account until you or Branch cancels or terminates the Services as set forth herein; provided that if payment is not received from the credit card issuer, the transaction is returned after the payment has been settled, otherwise known as chargeback, or if there are insufficient funds in the case of check or debit card payments, you agree to pay all amounts plus any applicable transaction fees (e.g., NSF fees, chargeback fees) due upon demand.
6.4 Payment Disputes
. If you have concerns about any charges on your invoice, you agree to the following dispute resolution process: (i) all billing disputes must be submitted in writing to billing@branch.io, (ii) billing disputes must be submitted within 90 days of the date the invoice was generated, and (iii) undisputed amounts will be subject to the Agreement and total payment for undisputed invoices or amounts must be submitted when due.
6.5 Suspension or Cancellation of Service; Payment Acceleration
. Without derogating from any other remedies available to Branch under the Agreement or by applicable law, if you owe any undisputed Fees 30 days or more past due in connection with any Services provided by Branch under any applicable Order Form, then, without affecting any of your payment obligations under the Agreement (including, any payment obligations under an Order Form), Branch is entitled to take further action including but not limited to accelerating your unpaid fee obligations under such agreement so that all such obligations become immediately due and payable, and suspending and/or canceling your access to the Services until such amounts are paid in full. Branch reserves the right to send your account to a collections agency for nonpayment (which may, in turn, report the uncollected debt to credit bureaus) and to use your contact information for debt collection purposes if the Agreement is terminated for non-payment as set forth herein following a 10-day cure period.
6.6 Taxes
. Branch’s Fees do not include any local, state, or federal sales, use, excise, personal property, VAT, or other similar taxes, duties, levies, tariffs, and other governmental charges (including, without limitation, any withholding tax, and any such taxes, to the extent legally applicable, which shall be borne and paid by Customer) (collectively, "
Taxes
"). If Branch has the legal obligation to pay or collect Taxes for which you are responsible under this section, Branch will invoice you and you will pay that amount unless you provide Branch with a valid tax exemption certificate authorized by the appropriate taxing authority. For clarity, you are responsible for payment of all Taxes resulting from any Fees payable hereunder, other than any taxes based on Branch’s net income, property, and employees.
6.7 Withholding Taxes
. In the event Fees payable by you to Branch under the Agreement are subject to any applicable withholding tax, goods and services tax, or similar taxes required by any tax authority and you are required by applicable law to remit such withholding tax, you: (a) may withhold and deduct from any payments to Branch under the Agreement an amount equivalent to any applicable withholding tax to the extent required by applicable law ("
Withholding Tax
"), (b) will pay to the relevant taxation authority the amount of such applicable withholdings in accordance with applicable law; and (c) will pay to Branch the applicable amounts under this Agreement net of such Withholding Tax. You shall be discharged from the obligation to pay Withholding Tax amounts to Branch provided that (1) you have remitted such amount to the relevant taxation authority and (2) you furnish Branch with (i) your tax registration certificate(s) as proof of registration with the applicable taxation authority, and (ii) any and all relevant tax forms and/or statements with proof of Withholding Tax remittance amount to the taxation authority, the applicable rate, and other information which may reasonably be requested for the purpose of assisting Branch to seek any allowable credits or deductions for the Withholding Tax so withheld in each jurisdiction where you are subject to tax.
6.8 Overdue Charges
. If any invoiced amount is not received by Branch by the due date set forth in the applicable invoice, then without limiting Branch’s rights or remedies, (a) those charges may accrue late interest at the rate of 2.5% of the outstanding balance per month, and (b) Branch may condition future Order Form renewals on payment terms shorter than those specified in the applicable Order Form.  You are prohibited from creating new accounts until the Fees due are paid in full.
6.9 Term for Paid Services
. Except as expressly set forth herein, the terms set forth in these Terms shall be in force for as long as an Order Form referencing the Agreement is in effect. Except as otherwise agreed to by you and Branch in a superseding Order Form, at the end of an applicable term, your access to the Services will automatically renew under the same Order Form terms (contract duration, billing frequency, payment period, etc.), unless and until your access to the Services is terminated in accordance with this section or either party to these Terms provides the other with notice of non-renewal (email sufficient; if to Branch, please email billing@branch.io) at least thirty (30) days prior to the commencement of any renewal period.
6.10 Termination by Branch
. Except as expressly agreed to by you and Branch in a superseding Order Form, Branch reserves the right to modify or discontinue, temporarily or permanently, all or any portion of the Services immediately upon at least thirty (30) days’ written notice (email sufficient), provided that Branch will promptly provide a pro-rated refund of all pre-paid and unearned amounts based on the period of suspension or the date of discontinuance, as applicable. Branch may also, in its sole discretion, terminate your access to the Services or any portion thereof if you violate any terms of the Agreement, unless you cure such breach within thirty (30) days of the date Branch provides written notice to you of such violation. Termination by Branch for your violation of these Terms will be effective as of the last day of the 30-day cure period provided herein or immediately to the extent such violation reasonably cannot be cured. Upon termination of the Agreement, any outstanding balance through the effective date of termination and other unpaid payment obligations will be immediately due and payable in full.
7. TERMINATION
Except with respect to paid services, as to which the terms and conditions governing termination are set forth above in the section "PAID SERVICE TERMS" of these Terms above, You acknowledge and agree that Branch, in its sole discretion, may terminate your use of the Services without prior notice for any reason at any time. You agree that Branch shall not be liable to you or any third party for termination by Branch. Except when subject to a binding contract duration (see any applicable Order Form), you may terminate your access to and use of the Services at any time by providing written notice to Branch via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
, or its successor URL). Such termination will be effective as of the last day of the calendar month during which such termination notice is received.
8. SURVIVAL
Upon termination of the Agreement, those sections of these Terms that by their nature would reasonably be expected to survive will survive termination or expiration of these Terms, including but not limited to the sections on Termination, Privacy Policy & Data Rights, Confidential Information, Proprietary Rights, Limitation of Liability, and Legal Notices.
9. PRIVACY POLICY & DATA RIGHTS
9.1 Privacy Policy
.
(a) You acknowledge and agree that you will provide a privacy policy to your end users, which shall be in compliance with applicable laws and self-regulatory guidelines, including, without limitation each of the Self-Regulatory Principles of the Digital Advertising Alliance ("
DAA
"), currently available at
http://www.aboutads.info/principles
, and the Principles of the European Interactive Digital Alliance ("
EDAA
"), currently available at
http://www.edaa.eu/european-principles/
, as each set of principles may be amended from time to time.
(b) Your privacy policy will further include clear, meaningful, and conspicuous notice consistent with applicable laws, regulations, and self-regulatory guidelines that includes, at minimum, the following: (a) disclosure regarding your practices with regard to cookies and/or targeting and online behavioral advertising; the types of data you collect for this purpose; and your data collection, use and disclosure practices (including that by visiting your Digital Properties, third parties may place cookies on end user browsers, or use non-cookie technology, to collect data that you may use for this purpose); and (b) information regarding how end users may opt out from receiving targeted advertisements by visiting the NAI website opt-out page here:
http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices/
, the DAA opt-out page here:
http://www.aboutads.info/
, and/or the EDAA opt-out page here:
http://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
. Your “
Digital Properties
” means your mobile applications, websites and program code created by or for you for use by you with the Services.
(c) You further agree to obtain consent to your practices from your end users with regard to cookies and/or targeting and online behavioral advertising to the extent required by applicable laws, regulations, and self-regulatory guidelines. If you use Branch’s Engagement Builder feature, you agree to respect opt-out flags passed by Branch to you if you use Engagement Builder data for targeted advertisements. You acknowledge and agree that your use of the Services is subject to Branch’s Privacy Policy, located at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-privacypolicy
, or its successor URL. Branch’s Privacy Policy does not cover your Digital Properties, or the use of your Digital Properties, by your end users. It is your obligation to provide your own privacy policy to your end users. You acknowledge that Branch has no direct relationship or interface with your end users and that Branch’s ability to comply with certain applicable data protection and privacy laws is dependent on your compliance with the terms of this section of the Terms.
9.2 Data Analytics
. You acknowledge and agree that Branch may collect and process data from your Digital Properties as set forth in
Branch’s Privacy Policy
with respect to your use of the Services. You grant to Branch a limited, non-exclusive, non-sublicensable, non-transferable license to use the data collected through the Services to provide, maintain, optimize and improve the Services.
9.3 Data Security
. Branch will maintain appropriate technical, administrative, and physical safeguards designed to protect information on its servers, including customer data, against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. However, you acknowledge and agree that no method of transmission over the Internet or method of electronic storage is completely secure, and that Branch cannot guarantee the absolute security of such information.
9.4 Compliance with Applicable Law
. You will comply with all laws, regulations, and self-regulatory guidelines applicable to your business and operations and to your use of the Services, including those governing the privacy, security and trans-border transfers of personal data (including, but not limited to, compliance with the General Data Protection Regulation (EU 2016/679) ("
GDPR
") and the California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CCPA
”)). Where required, you shall be responsible for (a) obtaining verifiable consent, in the form required by applicable laws, regulations, and self-regulatory guidelines, related to any personal data collected, used, maintained, and shared with Branch, or that you direct Branch to share with any third party; (b) ensuring that you otherwise have any and all rights required in order to provide such data to Branch or to direct Branch to share it with any third party; and (c) obtaining data properly and in accordance with applicable law, including, without limitation, the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (“
COPPA
”), and the Video Privacy Protection Act (18 U.S.C. § 2710) (“
VPPA
”); and ; and (d) ensuring it does not provide to Branch any other sensitive information, including without limitation personally identifiable information that is afforded legal protection under applicable regulation or laws (“
PII
”). To the extent that any of your users request that you not share their data with Branch, or to the extent that you believe that any data you may have provided to Branch was inappropriately obtained, you shall inform Branch immediately. Branch shall have no responsibility or liability to the extent resulting from, or arising out of your use of the Services not in compliance with the Agreement, the Documentation or applicable law.
9.5 CCPA
. If any data collected through your use of the Services is deemed personal information and is subject to the CCPA, then the terms set forth in the Branch California Privacy Addendum (“
California Privacy Addendum
“) available at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-ca-privacy-addendum
, or its successor URL, shall apply to the use and processing of such personal information and shall be incorporated by reference into, and made an integral part of, the Agreement.
10. RESTRICTED AREAS OF THE SERVICES
10.1 Registration Information
. In order to access and use the Services, you will register an account. Any information provided during such registration must be current, complete and accurate (“
Registration Information
”). It is your sole responsibility to ensure Registration Information is up to date at all times.
10.2 Access Credentials
. Certain parts of the Services, including account management features, may be password-restricted to registered users or other authorized persons. You may select individuals (your employees or your independent contractors) to access and use such parts and you will obtain separate credentials, e.g., user IDs and passwords, from Branch for such individuals (each, an "
Authorized User
").
10.3 Responsibility
. You are responsible for all actions taken under an Authorized User’s account, whether or not such action was taken by an Authorized User or by another party, and whether or not such action was authorized by an Authorized User. You are responsible for the security of each Authorized User’s credentials and shall take all necessary steps to protect each Authorized User’s credentials from disclosure. You will not share (and will instruct each Authorized User not to share) such credentials with any other person or entity or otherwise permit any other person or entity to access or use the Services.
11. LINKS AND THIRD-PARTY CONTENT
You may enable the Services to display, or contain links to, third party products, services, and websites. Any opinions, advice, statements, services, offers, or other information that constitute part of the content expressed, authored, or made available by other users or other third parties on the Services, or which is accessible through or may be located using the Services (collectively, "
Third-Party Content
") are those of the respective authors or producers and not of Branch or its shareholders, directors, officers, employees, agents, or representatives. Branch does not control Third-Party Content and does not guarantee the accuracy, integrity or quality of such Third-Party Content. Branch is not responsible for the performance of, does not endorse, and is not responsible or liable for, any Third-Party Content or any information or materials advertised in any Third-Party Content. By using Branch’s Services, you and/or your end users may be exposed to content that is offensive, indecent, or objectionable. We are not responsible or liable, directly or indirectly, for any damage or loss caused to you by your or a third party’s use of or reliance on any goods, services, or information available on or through any third-party service or Third-Party Content. It is your responsibility to evaluate the information, opinion, advice, or other content available on and through our Services.
12. TRADEMARKS
"Branch Metrics", the Branch Metrics logo, and any other trademarks or service marks used by Branch or slogan displayed on the Services ("
Branch Marks
") are trademarks of Branch and its suppliers or licensors, and may not be copied, imitated or used, in whole or in part, without the prior written permission of Branch or the applicable trademark holder. You may not use any metatags or any other "hidden text" utilizing "Branch Metrics" or any other Branch Marks without Branch’s prior written permission. In addition, the look and feel of the Services, including all page headers, custom graphics, button icons and scripts, is the trade dress of Branch and may not be copied, imitated or used, in whole or in part, without Branch’s prior written permission. All other trademarks, registered trademarks, product names and company names or logos mentioned in the Services are the property of their respective owners. Reference to any products, services, processes or other information, by trade name, trademark, manufacturer, supplier, or otherwise does not constitute or imply endorsement, sponsorship, or recommendation thereof by Branch.
13. AGENCIES & PARTNERS
13.1 Agency Client
. If you are an agency or a party representing, or providing services for the benefit of, a third party (“
Agency Client
“), you represent and warrant that you are authorized to act on behalf of, and bind to the Agreement, that Agency Client (and upon Branch’s request shall provide evidence thereof). You further represent and warrant that such Agency Client has provided you with explicit permission to collect on its behalf and view Agency Client’s data and that you shall use such data strictly in accordance with the permissions provided to you by such Agency Client and the terms of the Agreement. You shall ensure that each Agency Client agrees to the terms of the Agreement and any applicable Order Form(s) and agrees to abide by its terms, including without limitation, Section 9 (Privacy Policy & Data Rights) of these Terms. You acknowledge and agree that: (i) Branch makes no representations or warranties for the direct or indirect benefit of any Agency Client; and (ii) you shall not make any representations or warranties to such Agency Client on behalf of Branch.
13.2 Partners
. The Services enable you to measure and analyze its marketing campaigns with certain partners that you work with, such as advertising networks, publishers and analytics providers (“
Partners
“). For such purpose, you may, through your configuration of the Services (“
Partner Features
”), direct Branch to provide data to, and receive data from Partners relating to end users (“
Shared Data
”). Pursuant to the foregoing, insofar as you make use of the Partner Features, you hereby grant Branch the right to provide Shared Data with Partners as to which you make use of the Partner Features (the “
Permitted Partners
”) and to obtain and process Shared Data from Permitted Partners. You acknowledge and agree that: (i) the sharing of such Shared Data between Branch and Permitted Partners will be available only to the extent enabled by the Permitted Partner and Branch; (ii) any use of Shared Data by a Permitted Partner shall be subject to your own agreements with Permitted Partner; (iii) Branch shall have no liability or responsibility in connection with any acts or omissions by Permitted Partners; (iv) any use or processing of Shared Data may be subject to certain limitations and restrictions imposed by Permitted Partners, and that Branch is not responsible for fulfilling such limitations and restrictions unless expressly agreed to in writing between you and Branch.
14. CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION
14.1 Definition
. Each party to these Terms (a “
Receiving Party
”) may have access to, or become acquainted with, certain non-public confidential information of the other party (a “
Disclosing Party
”) including without limitation all information clearly identified as confidential at the time of disclosure (“
Confidential Information
”). You and Branch further agree that, subject to the rights and licenses granted herein, each party's Confidential Information shall include all non-public information regarding the Disclosing party, including without limitation any customer, customer prospect, the terms, conditions and pricing set forth in the Agreement and its Order Form(s), marketing, technical, business and/or strategic plans or information provided by the Disclosing Party to the Receiving party in the performance of the Services under the Agreement.
14.2 Use and Disclosure
. Each party agrees as follows: (a) to use the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party only for the purposes permitted by the Agreement, or as otherwise permitted by the Agreement (the “
Purpose
”); (b) to take all reasonable steps to ensure that the Disclosing Party’s Confidential Information is not disclosed or distributed by the Receiving Party’s employees or agents to another party in violation of the Agreement, but in no event will the Receiving party use less effort to protect the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party than it uses to protect its own Confidential Information of like importance; (c) to restrict access to the Confidential Information disclosed by the Disclosing Party to such of the Receiving Party’s employees, agents and third parties, if any, who have a legitimate need to have access for the Purpose and who have agreed in writing or are otherwise bound to treat such information in accordance with the Agreement; and (d) to return or destroy all Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party’s written request, after termination of the Agreement. The Receiving Party will not be obligated under this confidentiality section with respect to information that: (a) is or has become readily publicly available through no act or omission of the Receiving Party or its employees or agents; (b) is received from a third party lawfully in possession of such information and the Receiving Party has no knowledge of any disclosure restrictions on such third party to disclose such information; (c) is disclosed to a third party by the Disclosing Party without restriction on disclosure; (d) was rightfully in the possession of the Receiving Party without restriction prior to its disclosure by the Disclosing Party; or (e) was independently developed by employees or consultants of the Receiving Party without reliance on, or reference to, such Confidential Information.
14.3 Permitted Disclosures
. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Confidential Information may be disclosed as required by any court or governmental agency, provided that before disclosing such information the Receiving Party must provide the Disclosing Party with sufficient advance notice of the court or agency’s request for the information to enable the Receiving Party to exercise any rights it may have to challenge or limit the court or agency’s authority to receive such Confidential Information, to the extent permitted by applicable law.
15. PROPRIETARY RIGHTS
15.1 Proprietary Rights
. As between you and Branch, you shall retain all right, title and interest in your Digital Properties. If you choose to use Customer’s Digital Properties with a Service, you grant Branch permission to allow the Services to interoperate with your Digital Properties as required for the interoperation of your Digital Properties with the Service. Subject to the limited licenses granted herein, Branch acquires no right, title or interest from you or your licensors under the Agreement in or to your Digital Properties. Subject to the limited rights expressly granted hereunder, Branch, its Affiliates, and its licensors reserve all of their right, title and interest in and to the Services (including the Branch application programming interfaces and the Branch software development kits), all technology utilized by Branch to provide the Services, and all of their related intellectual property rights related to, embodied by, or incorporated in any of the foregoing and including any updates, upgrades, enhancements, modifications and improvements made to, or derivatives of, the foregoing. No copyright is granted by Branch to Customer hereunder. No rights are granted to Customer hereunder other than as expressly set forth herein.
15.2 Feedback
. Branch may provide you with a mechanism to provide feedback, suggestions, and ideas, if you choose, about the Services ("
Feedback
"). You agree that Branch may, in its sole discretion, use the Feedback you provide to Branch in any way, including in future enhancements and modifications to the Services. You hereby grant to Branch and its assigns a perpetual, worldwide, fully transferable, sub-licensable, fully paid-up, irrevocable, royalty-free license to use, reproduce, modify, create derivative works from, distribute, and display the Feedback in any manner for any purpose, in any media, software, or technology of any kind now existing or developed in the future, without any obligation to provide attribution or compensation to you or any third party.
16. WARRANTY & DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTIES
16.1 Warranty
. You represent and warrant to Branch that: (a) you are duly organized under applicable law and have sufficient authority to enter into the Agreement; (b) the person entering into the Agreement is authorized to agree to and execute the Agreement on behalf of such party; and (c) the execution and performance of the Agreement does not conflict with any contractual obligations you have to any third party.
16.2 DISCLAIMER
.
EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY PROVIDED IN THE AGREEMENT, THE SERVICES, AND THE DOCUMENTATION ARE PROVIDED “AS IS,” WITHOUT REPRESENTATION OR WARRANTY OF ANY KIND.
WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE.
Branch does not warrant the accuracy, completeness, or usefulness of the Services, and the Documentation, nor does Branch warrant that the Services will be free from errors, or that the operations of the Services will be uninterrupted. You rely on the Services and the Documentation at your own risk.
SOME JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW THE EXCLUSION OF CERTAIN WARRANTIES IN CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES. ACCORDINGLY THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH ABOVE APPLY TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW.
17. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
17.1 INDIRECT LIABILITY
. BRANCH AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND LICENSORS WILL NOT BE LIABLE FOR ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, PUNITIVE, CONSEQUENTIAL, OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO, DAMAGES FOR LOSS OF PROFITS, LOSS OF REVENUE, GOODWILL, USE, DATA THAT IS INCOMPLETE, MISSING, OR INCORRECT, OR OTHER INTANGIBLE LOSSES (EVEN IF BRANCH HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES), RESULTING FROM THIS AGREEMENT.
17.2 DIRECT LIABILITY.
UNDER NO CIRCUMSTANCES WILL THE TOTAL LIABILITY OF BRANCH AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND LICENSORS RESULTING FROM THIS AGREEMENT (INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO WARRANTY CLAIMS), REGARDLESS OF THE FORUM AND REGARDLESS OF WHETHER ANY ACTION OR CLAIM IS BASED IN CONTRACT, WARRANTY, NEGLIGENCE, STRICT LIABILITY, OR OTHER TORT, BREACH OF ANY STATUTORY DUTY, INDEMNITY OR CONTRIBUTION, OR OTHERWISE, EXCEED THE AMOUNTS, IF ANY, THAT YOU HAVE PAID TO BRANCH FOR USE OF THE SERVICES FOR THE TWELVE (12) MONTH PERIOD PRIOR TO THE CLAIM IN THE AGGREGATE. SOME OF THE LIMITATIONS PROVIDED HEREIN MAY NOT BE ALLOWED UNDER THE LAWS OF CERTAIN JURISDICTIONS. IF ANY SUCH LAW IS DEEMED TO APPLY TO THE AGREEMENT THEN THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH HEREIN SHALL APPLY TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED UNDER SUCH LAWS.
18. INDEMNITY
18.1 Indemnity
. You will defend Branch, its Affiliates and their officers, agents, employees, representatives, and assigns (“
Branch Indemnified Parties
”) against any claim, demand suit or action against Branch brought by a third party (a) arising from your use of the Services in a unlawful manner or in violation of the Agreement or applicable Order Form, or usage of the Services in violation of the Documentation or (b) alleging that any of your Digital Properties developed or provided by you, or the combination of your Digital Properties used with the Services, infringes or misappropriates such third party’s intellectual property rights (c) based on your instructions to share Shared Data with a Partner or (d) related to a regulatory investigation (each a “
Claim Against Branch
”). You will indemnify Branch Indemnified Parties from any costs, damages, and expenses finally awarded against Branch Indemnified Parties as a result of, or for any amounts paid by Branch Indemnified Parties under a settlement approved by you in writing of, a Claim Against Branch. The above defense and indemnification obligations do not apply if a Claim Against Branch arises from Branch’s breach of the Agreement, or applicable Order Forms.
18.2 Agency Indemnity
. If you are an agency or a party representing, or providing services for the benefit of an Agency Client, in addition to the obligations set forth in the section “AGENCIES & PARTNERS” of these Terms, you further agree to indemnify, hold harmless and defend Branch Indemnified Parties from and against any claim, demand, suit, or action and any related liability against a Branch Indemnified Party brought by a third party, arising out of or relating to: (a) any representations and warranties made by you concerning any aspect of the Services to an Agency Client; (b) any claims made by or on behalf of any Agency Client arising out or relating to your use of the Services; and (c) any claims arising out of or relating to acts or omissions of an Agency Client in connection with the Services.
18.3 Indemnification Procedure
. Your obligations to provide indemnification under this Agreement will be contingent upon (a) Branch promptly giving you written notice of any claim for which indemnification is sought (provided that the Branch’s failure to notify you will not diminish your obligations under this Section, except to the extent that you are materially prejudiced as a result of such failure); (b) you having sole control of the defense and settlement of any and all claims for which indemnification is sought (provided that no settlement may be entered into without either (i) the consent of Branch if such settlement would require any action on the part of Branch or (ii) unconditionally releasing Branch of all liability); and (c) Branch giving You all reasonably requested assistance at Your expense. Subject to the foregoing, Branch will at all times have the option to participate in any matter or litigation through counsel of its own selection solely at its own expense.
19. MISCELLANEOUS
19.1 Governing Law
. The Agreement and all matters arising out of or relating to the Agreement shall be governed by and construed under the laws of the State of California, without regard to its conflict of law provisions. The Parties expressly disclaim and exclude the application of the United Nations Convention on Contracts for the International Sale of Goods.
19.2 Venue
. Any legal action or proceeding arising out of or relating to the Agreement shall be brought exclusively in the state or federal courts located in the Northern District of California. You and Branch hereby agree to submit to the jurisdiction of, and agree that venue is proper in, those courts in any such legal action or proceeding.
19.3 No Waiver; Severability
. Our failure to enforce any right or provision in the Agreement will not constitute a waiver of such right or provision unless acknowledged and agreed to by us in writing. If any provision of the Agreement is found to be unenforceable or invalid, that provision will be limited or eliminated to the minimum extent necessary so that the Agreement will otherwise remain in full force and effect and enforceable.
19.4 Assignment
. The Agreement is not assignable, transferable or sublicensable by you except with Branch’s prior written consent. Branch may transfer and assign any of its rights and obligations under the Agreement freely and without consent.
19.5 Entire Agreement
. Both you and Branch agree that the Agreement is the complete and exclusive statement of the mutual understanding of the Parties and supersedes all previous written and oral agreements, communications and other understandings relating to your use of the Services, and that all waivers and modifications must be in a signed writing by both Parties, except as otherwise provided herein. Preprinted terms in your purchase orders or other customer-generated ordering documents, or terms referenced or linked within them, will have no effect on the Agreement and are hereby rejected, regardless of whether they are signed, clicked through, or otherwise agreed to by Branch and/or purport to take precedence over the Agreement. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency among the following documents, the order of precedence shall be: (1) the applicable Order Form, (2) any exhibit, schedule or addendum to the Agreement, (3) the body of these Terms, and (4) the Documentation.
19.6 Relationship between the Parties
. The Parties are independent contractors. No agency, partnership, joint venture, fiduciary or employment relationship is created as a result of the Agreement, and you do not have any authority of any kind to bind Branch in any respect whatsoever.
19.7 Export / Trade Compliance
. The Services and any derivatives thereof, may be subject to export control and economic sanctions laws and regulations of the United States and other jurisdictions. Both Customer and Branch each represent that it is not named on any U.S. Government Consolidated Screening denied-party list which may be searched at:
https://www.export.gov/article?id=Consolidated-Screening-List
. Customer shall not permit any entity or individual to access or use any of the Services who is listed on the Consolidated Screening List or located in a U.S. government-embargoed country (currently Cuba, Iran, North Korea, Syria and Crimea), or known to be engaged in proliferation of nuclear, chemical or biological weapons or missiles, or otherwise in violation of any U.S. export law or regulation.
19.8 Third Party Beneficiary
. No provision of the Agreement is intended, nor shall it be interpreted, to provide or create any third-party beneficiary rights or any other rights of any kind in any customer, affiliate, stockholder, partner, member, director, officer or employee of any party hereto or any other person or entity.
19.9 Marketing Support
. You agree to comply with reasonable requests of Branch to support public relations efforts pertaining to the Services, which efforts may include: (a) a press release highlighting your company’s use of the Services; (b) participation in targeted press and analyst interviews highlighting benefits of implementing the Services; and (c) participation in customer case studies developed by Branch and used on Branch’s website(s) and other collateral. You grant to Branch a non-exclusive, non-transferable, limited right to use your name, trademarks, and logos (collectively, the "
Customer Marks
") (i) for the purpose of referencing You as a customer of Branch on the Branch website(s) and (ii) in the production of marketing materials, provided that such use is in accordance with any trademark and logo use guidelines that you provide to Branch. All goodwill developed from such use shall be solely for your benefit.
19.10 Notices
. Except as otherwise specified in the Agreement, all notices of termination or an indemnifiable claim related to the Agreement (“
Legal Notices
”) will be provided via email and will be effective upon receipt by e-mail as set forth below. If to Branch, all notices shall be provided to legal@branch.io (“
Branch Notices
”). Billing-related notices to Customer will be provided via email and addressed to the relevant billing contact designated by Customer on the applicable Order Form. All Legal Notices and other notices to Customer will be provided via email and addressed to the relevant Services account administrator designated by Customer.
20. CONTACTING US
If you have any questions or concerns about our Services or these Terms, you may contact us by email at
info@branch.io
.
Effective October 11th 2022
to
December 29th 2022
Download
Table of Contents
Terms & Conditions
Last updated January 28, 2022
INTRODUCTION
Top
These Terms & Conditions (“
Terms
”) are entered into by and between of Branch Metrics, Inc., a Delaware corporation d/b/a Branch Metrics ("
Branch
," "
Branch Metrics
," "
we
," or "
us
") and the entity or person accessing this website (“
Website
”) or placing an order for or accessing any Services made available by Branch Metrics (“
Customer
” or “
you
” or “
your
”). “
Services
" means the products and services that are made available online by Branch under these Terms, the “
Beta Services
”, as defined in these Terms, other services or products that Branch may make available from time to time, including associated Branch offline or mobile components. Services exclude (i) Web-based, mobile, offline or other software application functionality that interoperates with a Service, that is provided by Customer or a third party, and (ii) Third-Party Content, as defined in these Terms. By indicating your acceptance of these Terms or using any of our Services, you agree to be legally bound by, and use our Services in compliance with, all terms, conditions, and notices in the Agreement. By agreeing to these Terms, you warrant that you are authorized to agree to these Terms on behalf of you and/or your company. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO THESE TERMS & CONDITIONS, DO NOT USE OUR WEBSITE OR ANY SERVICES.
“
Agreement
” means these Terms together with any applicable Order Forms, and any exhibits, appendices, schedules, or attachments identified or referenced in these Terms, and any amendments attached hereto or hereafter attached by mutual written agreement of the parties (all of which are incorporated herein by reference).
“
Order Form
” means an ordering document or online order specifying the Services to be provided hereunder that is entered into between Customer and Branch or any of their Affiliates, including any addenda and supplements thereto. By entering into an Order Form hereunder, an Affiliate agrees to be bound by the terms of the Agreement as if it were an original party hereto.
“
Documentation
” means the applicable Service’s documentation and usage guidelines at
https://docs.branch.io/
.
“
Affiliate
” means any entity that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the subject entity. “Control,” for purposes of this definition, means direct or indirect ownership or control of more than 50% of the voting interests of the subject entity.
Modifications
. We may make changes to these Terms from time to time. When we do, we will revise the "Last updated" date given above. It is your responsibility to review these Terms frequently and to remain informed of any changes to them. The then-current version of these Terms will supersede all earlier versions. You agree that your continued use of our Services after such changes have been published to our Services will constitute your acceptance of such revised Terms.
SERVICE ACCESS AND AVAILABILITY
Top
Service Access & Availability
. Subject to your compliance with these terms and conditions, Branch will make the Services available to you pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and solely for Customer’s internal business needs. Branch shall: (a) use commercially reasonable efforts to make the online Services available 24 hours a day, 7 days a week, except for: (i) planned downtime (of which Branch shall give advance electronic notice), (ii) emergency maintenance that is reasonably unforeseeable and necessary for purposes of maintaining the integrity or operation of the Services, regardless of the notice provided by Branch and (iii) any unavailability caused by circumstances beyond Branch’s reasonable control, including, for example, an act of God, act of government, flood, fire, earthquake, civil unrest, act of terror, strike or other labor problem (other than one involving Branch employees), Internet service provider failure or delay, integrated third party applications , or denial of service attack, and (b) provide the Services in accordance with laws and government regulations applicable to Branch’s provision of its Services to its customers generally (i.e., without regard for Customer’s particular use of the Services), and subject to Customer’s use of the Services in accordance with the Agreement, the Documentation and the applicable Order Form. Your rights to access and use the Services are limited by all terms set forth in the Agreement.
RESTRICTIONS; UPDATES & SUPPORT
Top
Restrictions
. You must comply with all applicable laws when implementing, configuring, and using the Services. Except as expressly permitted under these Terms, you will not, and will not permit anyone else to: (a) make the functionality of the Services to any third party through any means, including, without limitation, any hosting, application services provider, service bureau, or other type of service; (b) use any automated tool (e.g., robots, spiders) to access or use the Services; (c) rent, lease, or sublicense your access to the Services to another person; (d) circumvent or disable any digital rights management, usage rules, or other security features of the Services or attempt to gain unauthorized access to the Services or its related systems or networks; (e) use the Services in a manner that overburdens, or that threatens the integrity, performance, or availability of, the Services; (f) remove, alter, or obscure any proprietary notices (including copyright and trademark notices) on any portion of the Services; (g) send material containing software viruses, worms, trojan horses, or other harmful computer code, files, scripts, agents, or programs; or (h) use the Services in connection with any Apps or websites that are directed to children under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), without employing appropriate settings within the Branch SDKs to limit data collection from such children in accordance with applicable law. More information on these settings is available
here
. If you have questions about how to use these settings or have any reason to believe that these resources may not address your particular use case, please reach out to the Branch Support team via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Agreement, use of the Services in violation of the foregoing restrictions by Customer that, in Branch’s judgment, threatens the integrity, performance, availability, or security of the Services may result in Branch’s immediate suspension of, or limitation in Customer’s access to, the Services.
Updates and Support
. Branch will maintain, support, update, and provide error corrections for the Services to the same extent it does so for its customers generally. Ultimately, you are responsible for timely integration and launch of the Services. If Branch provides you with an update or maintenance release for the offline components of the Branch Services, unless you receive a separate license from Branch for that update or release that expressly supersedes these Terms, such update or release will be subject to the terms and conditions of these Terms. Branch shall have no liability for any damages that may result from Customer’s failure to implement upgrades or updates to the Services provided that Customer is notified in writing by Branch of an upgrade or update. All support requests must be sent to the Branch Support team via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
.
BETA SERVICES
Top
From time to time, Branch may invite You to try Beta Services. “
Beta Services
” means Our services or functionality that are not generally available to customers at no additional charge and that may be made available to You to try at Your option which are designated as beta, pilot, limited release, developer preview, non-production, evaluation, or by a similar description. You may accept or decline any such trial in Your sole discretion. Beta Services are for evaluation purposes only and not for production use, are not subject to any service level agreements (SLAs) agreed to between you and Branch, and may be subject to additional terms. Branch is under no obligation to, maintain, support, update, or provide error corrections for the Beta Services. Branch may discontinue Beta Services at any time in Branch’s sole discretion and reserves the right to never make them generally available. BRANCH WILL HAVE NO LIABILITY FOR ANY HARM OR DAMAGE ARISING OUT OF, OR IN CONNECTION WITH, CUSTOMER’S USE OF A BETA SERVICE. THE BETA SERVICES ARE PROVIDED “AS IS” AND AS AVAILABLE, AND ARE EXCLUSIVE OF ANY WARRANTY WHATSOEVER.
Without limiting the foregoing, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE
. In the event of a conflict or inconsistency between this section and any other provision of the Agreement, the terms of this section “BETA SERVICES” shall control and prevail with respect to Beta Services.
PAID SERVICE TERMS
Top
Fees
. You will pay to Branch all fees specified in an Order Form (“Fees”). You are responsible for all undisputed Fees, even if such Fees are due and payable after termination of the Agreement or any portion thereof. Fees are non-cancellable and failure to use the Services does not constitute a basis for refusing to pay any Fees. Except as expressly provided in the Agreement, you will not receive any refund or prorated refund for amounts previously paid or amounts owed up to the effective date of termination.
Payments & Invoicing
. Any relevant paid service-specific terms including, for example, contract duration, monthly fees, billing frequency, payment forms, and payment term will be addressed within an associated Order Form. All charges shall be invoiced in advance in accordance with the billing frequency stated in the applicable Order Form. You shall be responsible for the payment of any fees associated with an electronic funds transfer (i.e., ACH, wire transfer) when issuing payment to Branch, which includes fees from Your financial institution and intermediary banks. You are responsible for providing complete and accurate billing and contact information to Branch and notifying Branch of any changes to such information. In certain instances where your payment method is via credit card, the issuer of the credit card may charge a transaction fee or related charges, which you will be responsible to pay.
Payment by Credit Card
. In certain instances where your payment method is via credit card, the issuer of the credit card may charge a transaction fee or related charges, which you will be responsible to pay. Fees will be billed to the credit card nominated by you and you authorize the card issuer to pay all such amounts and authorize Branch (or its billing agent) to charge the credit card account until you or Branch cancels or terminates the Services as set forth herein; provided that if payment is not received from the credit card issuer, the transaction is returned after the payment has been settled, otherwise known as chargeback, or if there are insufficient funds in the case of check or debit card payments, you agree to pay all amounts plus any applicable transaction fees (e.g., NSF fees, chargeback fees) due upon demand.
Payment Disputes
. If you have concerns about any charges on your invoice, you agree to the following dispute resolution process: (i) all billing disputes must be submitted in writing to billing@branch.io, (ii) billing disputes must be submitted within 90 days of the date the invoice was generated, and (iii) undisputed amounts will be subject to the Agreement and total payment for undisputed invoices or amounts must be submitted when due.
Suspension or Cancellation of Service; Payment Acceleration
. Without derogating from any other remedies available to Branch under the Agreement or by applicable law, if you owe any undisputed Fees 30 days or more past due in connection with any Services provided by Branch under any applicable Order Form, then, without affecting any of your payment obligations under the Agreement (including, any payment obligations under an Order Form), Branch is entitled to take further action including but not limited to accelerating your unpaid fee obligations under such agreement so that all such obligations become immediately due and payable, and suspending and/or cancelling your access to the Services until such amounts are paid in full. Branch reserves the right to send your account to a collections agency for nonpayment (which may, in turn, report the uncollected debt to credit bureaus) and to use your contact information for debt collection purposes if the Agreement is terminated for non-payment as set forth herein following a 10-day cure period.
Taxes
. Branch’s Fees do not include any local, state, or federal sales, use, excise, personal property, VAT, or other similar taxes, duties, levies, tariffs, and other governmental charges (including, without limitation, any withholding tax, and any such taxes, to the extent legally applicable, which shall be borne and paid by Customer) (collectively, "
Taxes
"). If Branch has the legal obligation to pay or collect Taxes for which you are responsible under this section, Branch will invoice you and you will pay that amount unless you provide Branch with a valid tax exemption certificate authorized by the appropriate taxing authority. For clarity, you are responsible for payment of all Taxes resulting from any Fees payable hereunder, other than any taxes based on Branch’s net income, property, and employees.
Withholding Taxes
. In the event Fees payable by you to Branch under the Agreement are subject to any applicable withholding tax, goods and services tax, or similar taxes required by any tax authority and you are required by applicable law to remit such withholding tax, you: (a) may withhold and deduct from any payments to Branch under the Agreement an amount equivalent to any applicable withholding tax to the extent required by applicable law ("
Withholding Tax
"), (b) will pay to the relevant taxation authority the amount of such applicable withholdings in accordance with applicable law; and (c) will pay to Branch the applicable amounts under this Agreement net of such Withholding Tax. You shall be discharged from the obligation to pay Withholding Tax amounts to Branch provided that (1) you have remitted such amount to the relevant taxation authority and (2) you furnish Branch with (i) your tax registration certificate(s) as proof of registration with the applicable taxation authority, and (ii) any and all relevant tax forms and/or statements with proof of Withholding Tax remittance amount to the taxation authority, the applicable rate, and other information which may reasonably be requested for the purpose of assisting Branch to seek any allowable credits or deductions for the Withholding Tax so withheld in each jurisdiction where you are subject to tax.
Overdue Charges
. If any invoiced amount is not received by Branch by the due date set forth in the applicable invoice, then without limiting Branch’s rights or remedies, (a) those charges may accrue late interest at the rate of 2.5% of the outstanding balance per month, and (b) Branch may condition future Order Form renewals on payment terms shorter than those specified in the applicable Order Form.
Term for Paid Services
. Except as expressly set forth herein, the terms set forth in these Terms shall be in force for as long as an Order Form referencing the Agreement is in effect. Except as otherwise agreed to by you and Branch in a superseding Order Form, at the end of an applicable term, your access to the Services will automatically renew under the same Order Form terms (contract duration, billing frequency, payment period, etc.), unless and until your access to the Services is terminated in accordance with this section or either party to these Terms provides the other with notice of non-renewal (email sufficient; if to Branch, please email billing@branch.io) at least thirty (30) days prior to the commencement of any renewal period.
Termination by Branch
. Except as expressly agreed to by you and Branch in a superseding Order Form, Branch reserves the right to modify or discontinue, temporarily or permanently, all or any portion of the Services immediately upon at least thirty (30) days’ written notice (email sufficient), provided that Branch will promptly provide a pro-rated refund of all pre-paid and unearned amounts based on the period of suspension or the date of discontinuance, as applicable. Branch may also, in its sole discretion, terminate your access to the Services or any portion thereof if you violate any terms of the Agreement, unless you cure such breach within thirty (30) days of the date Branch provides written notice to you of such violation. Termination by Branch for your violation of these Terms will be effective as of the last day of the 30-day cure period provided herein or immediately to the extent such violation reasonably cannot be cured. Upon termination of the Agreement, any outstanding balance through the effective date of termination and other unpaid payment obligations will be immediately due and payable in full.
TERMINATION
Top
Except with respect to paid services, as to which the terms and conditions governing termination are set forth above in the section "PAID SERVICE TERMS" of these Terms above, You acknowledge and agree that Branch, in its sole discretion, may terminate your use of the Services without prior notice for any reason at any time. You agree that Branch shall not be liable to you or any third party for termination by Branch. Except when subject to a binding contract duration (see any applicable Order Form), you may terminate your access to and use of the Services at any time by providing written notice to Branch via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
). Such termination will be effective as of the last day of the calendar month during which such termination notice is received.
SURVIVAL
Top
Upon termination of the Agreement, those sections of these Terms that by their nature would reasonably be expected to survive will survive termination or expiration of these Terms, including but not limited to the sections on Termination, Privacy Policy & Data Rights, Confidential Information, Proprietary Rights, Limitation of Liability, and Legal Notices.
PRIVACY POLICY & DATA RIGHTS
Top
Privacy Policy
. You acknowledge and agree that you will provide a privacy policy to your end users, which shall be in compliance with applicable laws and self-regulatory guidelines, including, without limitation each of the Self-Regulatory Principles of the Digital Advertising Alliance ("
DAA
"), currently available at
http://www.aboutads.info/principles
, and the Principles of the European Interactive Digital Alliance ("
EDAA
"), currently available at
http://www.edaa.eu/european-principles/
, as each set of principles may be amended from time to time.
Your privacy policy will further include clear, meaningful, and conspicuous notice consistent with applicable laws, regulations, and self-regulatory guidelines that includes, at minimum, the following: (a) disclosure regarding your practices with regard to cookies and/or targeting and online behavioral advertising; the types of data you collect for this purpose; and your data collection, use and disclosure practices (including that by visiting your Digital Properties, third parties may place cookies on end user browsers, or use non-cookie technology, to collect data that you may use for this purpose); and (b) information regarding how end users may opt out from receiving targeted advertisements by visiting the NAI website opt-out page
here:
http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices/
, the DAA opt-out page
here:
http://www.aboutads.info/
, and/or the EDAA opt-out page
here:
http://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
. Your “
Digital Properties
” means your mobile applications, websites and program code created by or for you using a Service or for use by you with the Services. You further agree to obtain consent to your practices from your end users with regard to cookies and/or targeting and online behavioral advertising to the extent required by applicable laws, regulations, and self-regulatory guidelines. If you use Branch’s Engagement Builder feature, you agree to respect opt-out flags passed by Branch to you if you use Engagement Builder data for targeted advertisements. You acknowledge and agree that your use of the Services is subject to Branch’s Privacy Policy, located at https://branch.io/policies/#privacy. Branch’s Privacy Policy does not cover your Digital Properties, or the use of your Digital Properties, by your end users. It is your obligation to provide your own privacy policy to your end users. You acknowledge that Branch has no direct relationship or interface with your end users and that Branch’s ability to comply with certain applicable data protection and privacy laws is dependent on your compliance with the terms of this section of the Terms.
Data Analytics
. You acknowledge and agree that Branch may collect and process data from your Digital Properties as set forth in
Branch’s Privacy Policy
with respect to your use of the Services. You grant to Branch a limited, non-exclusive, non-sublicensable, non-transferable license to use the data collected through the Services to provide, maintain, optimize and improve the Services.
Data Security
. Branch will maintain appropriate technical, administrative, and physical safeguards for the protection of information on its servers, including customer data, against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. However, you acknowledge and agree that no method of transmission over the Internet or method of electronic storage is completely secure, and that Branch cannot guarantee the absolute security of such information.
Compliance with Applicable Law
. You will comply with all laws, regulations, and self-regulatory guidelines applicable to your business and operations and to your use of the Services, including those governing the privacy, security and trans-border transfers of personal data (including, but not limited to, compliance with the General Data Protection Regulation (EU 2016/679) ("
GDPR
") and the California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CCPA
”)). Where required, you shall be responsible for (a) obtaining verifiable consent, in the form required by applicable laws, regulations, and self-regulatory guidelines, related to any personal data collected, used, maintained, and shared with Branch, or that you direct Branch to share with any third party; (b) ensuring that you otherwise have any and all rights required in order to provide such data to Branch or to direct Branch to share it with any third party; and (c) obtaining data properly and in accordance with applicable law, including, without limitation, the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (“
COPPA
”), and the Video Privacy Protection Act (18 U.S.C. § 2710) (“
VPPA
”). To the extent that any of your users request that you not share their data with Branch, or to the extent that you believe that any data you may have provided to Branch was inappropriately obtained, you shall inform Branch immediately. Branch shall have no responsibility or liability to the extent resulting from, or arising out of your use of the Services not in compliance with the Agreement, the Documentation or applicable law.
CCPA
. If any data collected through your use of the Services is deemed personal information and is subject to the CCPA, then the terms set forth in the Branch CCPA Addendum (“
CCPA Addendum
“) available at
https://branch.io/branch-california-privacy-addendum/
(or its successor URL) shall apply to the use and processing of such personal information and shall be incorporated by reference into, and made an integral part of, the Agreement.
RESTRICTED AREAS OF THE SERVICES
Top
Registration Information
. In order to access and use the Services, you will register an account. Any information provided during such registration must be current, complete and accurate (“
Registration Information
”). It is your sole responsibility to ensure Registration Information is up to date at all times.
Access Credentials
. Certain parts of the Services, including account management features, may be password-restricted to registered users or other authorized persons. You may select individuals (your employees or your independent contractors) to access and use such parts and you will obtain separate credentials, e.g., user IDs and passwords, from Branch for such individuals (each, an "
Authorized User
").
Responsibility
. You are responsible for all actions taken under an Authorized User’s account, whether or not such action was taken by an Authorized User or by another party, and whether or not such action was authorized by an Authorized User. You are responsible for the security of each Authorized User’s credentials and shall take all necessary steps to protect each Authorized User’s credentials from disclosure. You will not share (and will instruct each Authorized User not to share) such credentials with any other person or entity or otherwise permit any other person or entity to access or use the Services.
LINKS AND THIRD-PARTY CONTENT
Top
Third Party Content
. You may enable the Services to display, or contain links to, third party products, services, and websites. Any opinions, advice, statements, services, offers, or other information that constitute part of the content expressed, authored, or made available by other users or other third parties on the Services, or which is accessible through or may be located using the Services (collectively, "
Third-Party Content
") are those of the respective authors or producers and not of Branch or its shareholders, directors, officers, employees, agents, or representatives. Branch does not control Third-Party Content and does not guarantee the accuracy, integrity or quality of such Third-Party Content. Branch is not responsible for the performance of, does not endorse, and is not responsible or liable for, any Third-Party Content or any information or materials advertised in any Third-Party Content. By using Branch’s Services, you and/or your end users may be exposed to content that is offensive, indecent, or objectionable. We are not responsible or liable, directly or indirectly, for any damage or loss caused to you by your or a third party’s use of or reliance on any goods, services, or information available on or through any third-party service or Third-Party Content. It is your responsibility to evaluate the information, opinion, advice, or other content available on and through our Services.
USE POLICIES
Top
You are solely responsible for any content and other material that you submit, publish, transmit, or display on, through, or with our Services. Customer will not use Branch’s Services in violation of Branch’s Acceptable Use Policy currently available at
https://branch.io/policies/#aup
.
TRADEMARKS
Top
Branch Trademark Rights
. "Branch Metrics", the Branch Metrics logo, and any other trademarks or service marks used by Branch or slogan displayed on the Services ("
Branch Marks
") are trademarks of Branch and its suppliers or licensors, and may not be copied, imitated or used, in whole or in part, without the prior written permission of Branch or the applicable trademark holder. You may not use any metatags or any other "hidden text" utilizing "Branch Metrics" or any other Branch Marks without Branch’s prior written permission. In addition, the look and feel of the Services, including all page headers, custom graphics, button icons and scripts, is the trade dress of Branch and may not be copied, imitated or used, in whole or in part, without Branch’s prior written permission. All other trademarks, registered trademarks, product names and company names or logos mentioned in the Services are the property of their respective owners. Reference to any products, services, processes or other information, by trade name, trademark, manufacturer, supplier, or otherwise does not constitute or imply endorsement, sponsorship, or recommendation thereof by Branch.
AGENCIES & PARTNERS
Top
Agency Client
. If you are an agency or a party representing, or providing services for the benefit of, a third party (“
Agency Client
“), you represent and warrant that you are authorized to act on behalf of, and bind to the Agreement, that Agency Client (and upon Branch’s request shall provide evidence thereof). You further represent and warrant that such Agency Client has provided you with explicit permission to collect on its behalf and view Agency Client’s data and that you shall use such data strictly in accordance with the permissions provided to you by such Agency Client and the terms of the Agreement. You shall ensure that each Agency Client agrees to the terms of the Agreement and any applicable Order Form(s) and agrees to abide by its terms, including without limitation, section 4 (Privacy and Data Rights) of these Terms. You acknowledge and agree that: (i) Branch makes no representations or warranties for the direct or indirect benefit of any Agency Client; and (ii) you shall not make any representations or warranties to such Agency Client on behalf of Branch.
Partners
. The Services enable you to measure and analyze its marketing campaigns with certain third parties that you work with, such as advertising networks, publishers and analytics providers (“
Partners
“). For such purpose, you may, through your configuration of the Services (“
Partner Features
”), direct Branch to provide data to, and receive data from Partners relating to end users (“Shared Data”). Pursuant to the foregoing, insofar as you make use of the Partner Features, you hereby grant Branch the right to provide Shared Data with Partners as to which you make use of the Partner Features (the “
Permitted Partners
”) and to obtain and process Shared Data from Permitted Partners. You acknowledge and agree that: (i) the sharing of such Shared Data between Branch and Permitted Partners will be available only to the extent enabled by the Permitted Partner and Branch; (ii) any use of Shared Data by a Permitted Partner shall be subject to your own agreements with Permitted Partner; (iii) Branch shall have no liability or responsibility in connection with any acts or omissions by Permitted Partners; (iv) any use or processing of Shared Data may be subject to certain limitations and restrictions imposed by Permitted Partners, and that Branch is not responsible for fulfilling such limitations and restrictions unless expressly agreed to in writing between you and Branch.
CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION
Top
Definition
. Each party to these Terms (a “
Receiving Party
”) may have access to, or become acquainted with, certain non-public confidential information of the other party (a “
Disclosing Party
”) including without limitation all information clearly identified as confidential at the time of disclosure (“
Confidential Information
”). You and Branch further agree that, subject to the rights and licenses granted herein, each party's Confidential Information shall include all non-public information regarding the Disclosing party, including without limitation any customer, customer prospect, the terms, conditions and pricing set forth in the Agreement and its Order Form(s), marketing, technical, business and/or strategic plans or information provided by the Disclosing Party to the Receiving party in the performance of the Services under the Agreement.
Use and Disclosure
. Each party agrees as follows: (a) to use the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party only for the purposes permitted by the Agreement, or as otherwise permitted by the Agreement; (b) to take all reasonable steps to ensure that the Disclosing Party’s Confidential Information is not disclosed or distributed by the Receiving Party’s employees or agents in violation of the Agreement, but in no event will the Receiving party use less effort to protect the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party than it uses to protect its own Confidential Information of like importance; (c) to restrict access to the Confidential Information disclosed by the Disclosing Party to such of the Receiving Party’s employees, agents and third parties, if any, who have a need to have access and who have been advised of and have agreed in writing or are otherwise bound to treat such information in accordance with the Agreement; and (d) to return or destroy all Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party’s written request, after termination of the Agreement. The Receiving Party will not be obligated under this confidentiality section with respect to information that: (a) is or has become readily publicly available through no act or omission of the Receiving Party or its employees or agents; (b) is received from a third party lawfully in possession of such information and the Receiving Party has no knowledge of any disclosure restrictions on such third party to disclose such information; (c) is disclosed to a third party by the Disclosing Party without restriction on disclosure; (d) was rightfully in the possession of the Receiving Party without restriction prior to its disclosure by the Disclosing Party; or (e) was independently developed by employees or consultants of the Receiving Party without reliance on, or reference to, such Confidential Information.
Permitted Disclosures
. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Confidential Information may be disclosed as required by any governmental agency, provided that before disclosing such information the Receiving Party must provide the Disclosing Party with sufficient advance notice of the agency’s request for the information to enable the Receiving Party to exercise any rights it may have to challenge or limit the agency’s authority to receive such Confidential Information, to the extent permitted by applicable law.
PROPRIETARY RIGHTS
Top
Proprietary Rights
. As between you and Branch, you shall retain all right, title and interest in your Digital Properties. If you choose to use Customer’s Digital Properties with a Service, you grant Branch permission to allow the Services to interoperate with your Digital Properties as required for the interoperation of your Digital Properties with the Service. Subject to the limited licenses granted herein, Branch acquires no right, title or interest from you or your licensors under the Agreement in or to your Digital Properties. Subject to the limited rights expressly granted hereunder, Branch, its Affiliates, and its licensors reserve all of their right, title and interest in and to the Services (including the Branch application programming interfaces and the Branch software development kits), all technology utilized by Branch to provide the Services, and all of their related intellectual property rights related to, embodied by, or incorporated in any of the foregoing and including any updates, upgrades, enhancements, modifications and improvements made to, or derivatives of, the foregoing. No copyright is granted by Branch to Customer hereunder. No rights are granted to Customer hereunder other than as expressly set forth herein.
Feedback
. Branch may provide you with a mechanism to provide feedback, suggestions, and ideas, if you choose, about the Services ("
Feedback
"). You agree that Branch may, in its sole discretion, use the Feedback you provide to Branch in any way, including in future enhancements and modifications to the Services. You hereby grant to Branch and its assigns a perpetual, worldwide, fully transferable, sub-licensable, fully paid-up, irrevocable, royalty-free license to use, reproduce, modify, create derivative works from, distribute, and display the Feedback in any manner for any purpose, in any media, software, or technology of any kind now existing or developed in the future, without any obligation to provide attribution or compensation to you or any third party.
WARRANTY & DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTIES
Top
Warranty
. You represent and warrant to Branch that: (a) you are duly organized under applicable law and have sufficient authority to enter into the Agreement; (b) the person entering into the Agreement is authorized to agree to and execute the Agreement on behalf of such party; and (c) the execution and performance of the Agreement does not conflict with any contractual obligations you have to any third party.
DISCLAIMER
. EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY PROVIDED IN THE AGREEMENT, THE SERVICES, AND THE DOCUMENTATION ARE PROVIDED “AS IS,” WITHOUT REPRESENTATION OR WARRANTY OF ANY KIND. WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE. Branch does not warrant the accuracy, completeness, or usefulness of the Services, and the Documentation, nor does Branch warrant that the Services will be free from errors, or that the operations of the Services will be uninterrupted. You rely on the Services and the Documentation at your own risk. SOME JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW THE EXCLUSION OF CERTAIN WARRANTIES IN CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES. ACCORDINGLY THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH ABOVE APPLY TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW.
LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
Top
BRANCH AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND LICENSORS WILL NOT BE LIABLE FOR ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, PUNITIVE, CONSEQUENTIAL, OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO, DAMAGES FOR LOSS OF PROFITS, LOSS OF REVENUE, GOODWILL, USE, DATA THAT IS INCOMPLETE, MISSING, OR INCORRECT, OR OTHER INTANGIBLE LOSSES (EVEN IF BRANCH HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES), RESULTING FROM THIS AGREEMENT.
UNDER NO CIRCUMSTANCES WILL THE TOTAL LIABILITY OF BRANCH AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND LICENSORS RESULTING FROM THIS AGREEMENT (INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO WARRANTY CLAIMS), REGARDLESS OF THE FORUM AND REGARDLESS OF WHETHER ANY ACTION OR CLAIM IS BASED IN CONTRACT, WARRANTY, NEGLIGENCE, STRICT LIABILITY, OR OTHER TORT, BREACH OF ANY STATUTORY DUTY, INDEMNITY OR CONTRIBUTION, OR OTHERWISE, EXCEED THE AMOUNTS, IF ANY, THAT YOU HAVE PAID TO BRANCH FOR USE OF THE SERVICES FOR THE TWELVE (12) MONTH PERIOD PRIOR TO THE CLAIM IN THE AGGREGATE. SOME OF THE LIMITATIONS PROVIDED HEREIN MAY NOT BE ALLOWED UNDER THE LAWS OF CERTAIN JURISDICTIONS.
IF ANY SUCH LAW IS DEEMED TO APPLY TO THE AGREEMENT THEN THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH HEREIN SHALL APPLY TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED UNDER SUCH LAWS.
INDEMNITY
Top
Indemnity
. You will defend Branch, its Affiliates and their officers, agents, employees, representatives, and assigns (“
Branch Indemnified Parties
”) against any claim, demand suit or action against Branch brought by a third party (a) arising from your use of the Services in a unlawful manner or in violation of the Agreement or applicable Order Form, or usage of the Services in violation of the Documentation or (b) alleging that any of your Digital Properties developed or provided by you, or the combination of your Digital Properties used with the Services, infringes or misappropriates such third party’s intellectual property rights (c) based on your instructions to share Shared Data with a Partner or (d) related to a regulatory investigation (each a “
Claim Against Branch
”). You will indemnify Branch Indemnified Parties from any costs, damages, and expenses finally awarded against Branch Indemnified Parties as a result of, or for any amounts paid by Branch Indemnified Parties under a settlement approved by you in writing of, a Claim Against Branch. The above defense and indemnification obligations do not apply if a Claim Against Branch arises from Branch’s breach of the Agreement, or applicable Order Forms.
Agency Indemnity
. If you are an agency or a party representing, or providing services for the benefit of an Agency Client, in addition to the obligations set forth in the section “AGENCIES & PARTNERS” of these Terms, you further agree to indemnify, hold harmless and defend Branch Indemnified Parties from and against any claim, demand, suit, or action and any related liability against a Branch Indemnified Party brought by a third party, arising out of or relating to: (a) any representations and warranties made by you concerning any aspect of the Services to an Agency Client; (b) any claims made by or on behalf of any Agency Client arising out or relating to your use of the Services; and (c) any claims arising out of or relating to acts or omissions of an Agency Client in connection with the Services.
Indemnification Procedure
. Your obligations to provide indemnification under this Agreement will be contingent upon (a) Branch promptly giving you written notice of any claim for which indemnification is sought (provided that the Branch’s failure to notify you will not diminish your obligations under this Section, except to the extent that you are materially prejudiced as a result of such failure); (b) you having sole control of the defense and settlement of any and all claims for which indemnification is sought (provided that no settlement may be entered into without either (i) the consent of Branch if such settlement would require any action on the part of Branch or (ii) unconditionally releasing Branch of all liability); and (c) Branch giving You all reasonably requested assistance at Your expense. Subject to the foregoing, Branch will at all times have the option to participate in any matter or litigation through counsel of its own selection solely at its own expense.
MISCELLANEOUS
Top
Governing Law
. The Agreement and all matters arising out of or relating to the Agreement shall be governed by and construed under the laws of the State of California, without regard to its conflict of law provisions. The parties expressly disclaim and exclude the application of the United Nations Convention on Contracts for the International Sale of Goods.
Venue
. Any legal action or proceeding arising out of or relating to the Agreement shall be brought exclusively in the state or federal courts located in the Northern District of California. You and Branch hereby agree to submit to the jurisdiction of, and agree that venue is proper in, those courts in any such legal action or proceeding.
No Waiver; Severability
. Our failure to enforce any right or provision in the Agreement will not constitute a waiver of such right or provision unless acknowledged and agreed to by us in writing. If any provision of the Agreement is found to be unenforceable or invalid, that provision will be limited or eliminated to the minimum extent necessary so that the Agreement will otherwise remain in full force and effect and enforceable.
Assignment
. The Agreement is not assignable, transferable or sublicensable by you except with Branch’s prior written consent. Branch may transfer and assign any of its rights and obligations under the Agreement freely and without consent.
Entire Agreement
. Both you and Branch agree that the Agreement is the complete and exclusive statement of the mutual understanding of the Parties and supersedes all previous written and oral agreements, communications and other understandings relating to your use of the Services, and that all waivers and modifications must be in a signed writing by both Parties, except as otherwise provided herein. Preprinted terms in your purchase orders or other customer-generated ordering documents, or terms referenced or linked within them, will have no effect on the Agreement and are hereby rejected, regardless of whether they are signed, clicked through, or otherwise agreed to by Branch and/or purport to take precedence over the Agreement. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency among the following documents, the order of precedence shall be: (1) the applicable Order Form, (2) any exhibit, schedule or addendum to the Agreement, (3) the body of these Terms, and (4) the Documentation.
Relationship between the Parties
. The Parties are independent contractors. No agency, partnership, joint venture, fiduciary or employment relationship is created as a result of the Agreement, and you do not have any authority of any kind to bind Branch in any respect whatsoever.
Export / Trade Compliance
. The Services and any derivatives thereof, may be subject to export control and economic sanctions laws and regulations of the United States and other jurisdictions. Both Customer and Branch each represent that it is not named on any U.S. Government Consolidated Screening denied-party list which may be searched at:
https://www.export.gov/article?id=Consolidated-Screening-List
. Customer shall not permit any entity or individual to access or use any of the Services who is listed on the Consolidated Screening List or located in a U.S. government-embargoed country (currently Cuba, Iran, North Korea, Syria and Crimea), or known to be engaged in proliferation of nuclear, chemical or biological weapons or missiles, or otherwise in violation of any U.S. export law or regulation.
Third Party Beneficiary
. No provision of the Agreement is intended, nor shall it be interpreted, to provide or create any third-party beneficiary rights or any other rights of any kind in any customer, affiliate, stockholder, partner, member, director, officer or employee of any party hereto or any other person or entity.
Marketing Support
. You agree to comply with reasonable requests of Branch to support public relations efforts pertaining to the Services, which efforts may include: (a) a press release highlighting your company’s use of the Services; (b) participation in targeted press and analyst interviews highlighting benefits of implementing the Services; and (c) participation in customer case studies developed by Branch and used on Branch’s website(s) and other collateral. You grant to Branch a non-exclusive, non-transferable, limited right to use your name, trademarks, and logos (collectively, the "
Customer Marks
") (i) for the purpose of referencing You as a customer of Branch on the Branch website(s) and (ii) in the production of marketing materials, provided that such use is in accordance with any trademark and logo use guidelines that you provide to Branch. All goodwill developed from such use shall be solely for your benefit.
Notices
. Except as otherwise specified in the Agreement, all notices of termination or an indemnifiable claim related to the Agreement (“Legal Notices”) will be in writing and will be effective (a) upon receipt if personally delivered to one of the addresses listed below, (b) upon receipt if sent by certified or registered mail (return receipt requested), postage prepaid, to one of the addresses listed below, or (c) upon receipt if transmitted by e-mail as set forth below. If to Branch, all notices shall be provided to the mailing and e-mail address set forth below (“
Branch Notices
”). Billing-related notices to Customer will be addressed to the relevant billing contact designated by Customer on the applicable Order Form. All Legal Notices and other notices to Customer will be addressed to the relevant Services account administrator designated by Customer.
Branch Notices
: Legal notices should be sent to:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
With a copy provided to: legal@branch.io
CONTACTING US
Top
If you have any questions or concerns about our Services or these Terms, you may contact us at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
info@branch.io
Effective May 9th 2022
to
October 11th 2022
Download
Table of Contents
Terms & Conditions
Last updated January 28, 2022
INTRODUCTION
These Terms & Conditions (“
Terms
”) are entered into by and between of Branch Metrics, Inc., a Delaware corporation d/b/a Branch Metrics ("
Branch
," "
Branch Metrics
," "
we
," or "
us
") and the entity or person accessing this website (“
Website
”) or placing an order for or accessing any Services made available by Branch Metrics (“
Customer
” or “
you
” or “
your
”). “
Services
" means the products and services that are made available online by Branch under these Terms, the “
Beta Services
”, as defined in these Terms, other services or products that Branch may make available from time to time, including associated Branch offline or mobile components. Services exclude (i) Web-based, mobile, offline or other software application functionality that interoperates with a Service, that is provided by Customer or a third party, and (ii) Third-Party Content, as defined in these Terms. By indicating your acceptance of these Terms or using any of our Services, you agree to be legally bound by, and use our Services in compliance with, all terms, conditions, and notices in the Agreement. By agreeing to these Terms, you warrant that you are authorized to agree to these Terms on behalf of you and/or your company. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO THESE TERMS & CONDITIONS, DO NOT USE OUR WEBSITE OR ANY SERVICES.
“
Agreement
” means these Terms together with any applicable Order Forms, and any exhibits, appendices, schedules, or attachments identified or referenced in these Terms, and any amendments attached hereto or hereafter attached by mutual written agreement of the parties (all of which are incorporated herein by reference).
“
Order Form
” means an ordering document or online order specifying the Services to be provided hereunder that is entered into between Customer and Branch or any of their Affiliates, including any addenda and supplements thereto. By entering into an Order Form hereunder, an Affiliate agrees to be bound by the terms of the Agreement as if it were an original party hereto.
“
Documentation
” means the applicable Service’s documentation and usage guidelines at
https://docs.branch.io/
.
“
Affiliate
” means any entity that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the subject entity. “Control,” for purposes of this definition, means direct or indirect ownership or control of more than 50% of the voting interests of the subject entity.
Modifications
. We may make changes to these Terms from time to time. When we do, we will revise the "Last updated" date given above. It is your responsibility to review these Terms frequently and to remain informed of any changes to them. The then-current version of these Terms will supersede all earlier versions. You agree that your continued use of our Services after such changes have been published to our Services will constitute your acceptance of such revised Terms.
SERVICE ACCESS AND AVAILABILITY
Service Access & Availability
. Subject to your compliance with these terms and conditions, Branch will make the Services available to you pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and solely for Customer’s internal business needs. Branch shall: (a) use commercially reasonable efforts to make the online Services available 24 hours a day, 7 days a week, except for: (i) planned downtime (of which Branch shall give advance electronic notice), (ii) emergency maintenance that is reasonably unforeseeable and necessary for purposes of maintaining the integrity or operation of the Services, regardless of the notice provided by Branch and (iii) any unavailability caused by circumstances beyond Branch’s reasonable control, including, for example, an act of God, act of government, flood, fire, earthquake, civil unrest, act of terror, strike or other labor problem (other than one involving Branch employees), Internet service provider failure or delay, integrated third party applications , or denial of service attack, and (b) provide the Services in accordance with laws and government regulations applicable to Branch’s provision of its Services to its customers generally (i.e., without regard for Customer’s particular use of the Services), and subject to Customer’s use of the Services in accordance with the Agreement, the Documentation and the applicable Order Form. Your rights to access and use the Services are limited by all terms set forth in the Agreement.
RESTRICTIONS; UPDATES & SUPPORT
Restrictions
. You must comply with all applicable laws when implementing, configuring, and using the Services. Except as expressly permitted under these Terms, you will not, and will not permit anyone else to: (a) make the functionality of the Services to any third party through any means, including, without limitation, any hosting, application services provider, service bureau, or other type of service; (b) use any automated tool (e.g., robots, spiders) to access or use the Services; (c) rent, lease, or sublicense your access to the Services to another person; (d) circumvent or disable any digital rights management, usage rules, or other security features of the Services or attempt to gain unauthorized access to the Services or its related systems or networks; (e) use the Services in a manner that overburdens, or that threatens the integrity, performance, or availability of, the Services; (f) remove, alter, or obscure any proprietary notices (including copyright and trademark notices) on any portion of the Services; (g) send material containing software viruses, worms, trojan horses, or other harmful computer code, files, scripts, agents, or programs; or (h) use the Services in connection with any Apps or websites that are directed to children under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), without employing appropriate settings within the Branch SDKs to limit data collection from such children in accordance with applicable law. More information on these settings is available
here
. If you have questions about how to use these settings or have any reason to believe that these resources may not address your particular use case, please reach out to the Branch Support team via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Agreement, use of the Services in violation of the foregoing restrictions by Customer that, in Branch’s judgment, threatens the integrity, performance, availability, or security of the Services may result in Branch’s immediate suspension of, or limitation in Customer’s access to, the Services.
Updates and Support
. Branch will maintain, support, update, and provide error corrections for the Services to the same extent it does so for its customers generally. Ultimately, you are responsible for timely integration and launch of the Services. If Branch provides you with an update or maintenance release for the offline components of the Branch Services, unless you receive a separate license from Branch for that update or release that expressly supersedes these Terms, such update or release will be subject to the terms and conditions of these Terms. Branch shall have no liability for any damages that may result from Customer’s failure to implement upgrades or updates to the Services provided that Customer is notified in writing by Branch of an upgrade or update. All support requests must be sent to the Branch Support team via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
.
BETA SERVICES
From time to time, Branch may invite You to try Beta Services. “
Beta Services
” means Our services or functionality that are not generally available to customers at no additional charge and that may be made available to You to try at Your option which are designated as beta, pilot, limited release, developer preview, non-production, evaluation, or by a similar description. You may accept or decline any such trial in Your sole discretion. Beta Services are for evaluation purposes only and not for production use, are not subject to any service level agreements (SLAs) agreed to between you and Branch, and may be subject to additional terms. Branch is under no obligation to, maintain, support, update, or provide error corrections for the Beta Services. Branch may discontinue Beta Services at any time in Branch’s sole discretion and reserves the right to never make them generally available. BRANCH WILL HAVE NO LIABILITY FOR ANY HARM OR DAMAGE ARISING OUT OF, OR IN CONNECTION WITH, CUSTOMER’S USE OF A BETA SERVICE. THE BETA SERVICES ARE PROVIDED “AS IS” AND AS AVAILABLE, AND ARE EXCLUSIVE OF ANY WARRANTY WHATSOEVER.
Without limiting the foregoing, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE
. In the event of a conflict or inconsistency between this section and any other provision of the Agreement, the terms of this section “BETA SERVICES” shall control and prevail with respect to Beta Services.
PAID SERVICE TERMS
Fees
. You will pay to Branch all fees specified in an Order Form (“Fees”). You are responsible for all undisputed Fees, even if such Fees are due and payable after termination of the Agreement or any portion thereof. Fees are non-cancellable and failure to use the Services does not constitute a basis for refusing to pay any Fees. Except as expressly provided in the Agreement, you will not receive any refund or prorated refund for amounts previously paid or amounts owed up to the effective date of termination.
Payments & Invoicing
. Any relevant paid service-specific terms including, for example, contract duration, monthly fees, billing frequency, payment forms, and payment term will be addressed within an associated Order Form. All charges shall be invoiced in advance in accordance with the billing frequency stated in the applicable Order Form. You shall be responsible for the payment of any fees associated with an electronic funds transfer (i.e., ACH, wire transfer) when issuing payment to Branch, which includes fees from Your financial institution and intermediary banks. You are responsible for providing complete and accurate billing and contact information to Branch and notifying Branch of any changes to such information. In certain instances where your payment method is via credit card, the issuer of the credit card may charge a transaction fee or related charges, which you will be responsible to pay.
Payment by Credit Card
. In certain instances where your payment method is via credit card, the issuer of the credit card may charge a transaction fee or related charges, which you will be responsible to pay. Fees will be billed to the credit card nominated by you and you authorize the card issuer to pay all such amounts and authorize Branch (or its billing agent) to charge the credit card account until you or Branch cancels or terminates the Services as set forth herein; provided that if payment is not received from the credit card issuer, the transaction is returned after the payment has been settled, otherwise known as chargeback, or if there are insufficient funds in the case of check or debit card payments, you agree to pay all amounts plus any applicable transaction fees (e.g., NSF fees, chargeback fees) due upon demand.
Payment Disputes
. If you have concerns about any charges on your invoice, you agree to the following dispute resolution process: (i) all billing disputes must be submitted in writing to billing@branch.io, (ii) billing disputes must be submitted within 90 days of the date the invoice was generated, and (iii) undisputed amounts will be subject to the Agreement and total payment for undisputed invoices or amounts must be submitted when due.
Suspension or Cancellation of Service; Payment Acceleration
. Without derogating from any other remedies available to Branch under the Agreement or by applicable law, if you owe any undisputed Fees 30 days or more past due in connection with any Services provided by Branch under any applicable Order Form, then, without affecting any of your payment obligations under the Agreement (including, any payment obligations under an Order Form), Branch is entitled to take further action including but not limited to accelerating your unpaid fee obligations under such agreement so that all such obligations become immediately due and payable, and suspending and/or cancelling your access to the Services until such amounts are paid in full. Branch reserves the right to send your account to a collections agency for nonpayment (which may, in turn, report the uncollected debt to credit bureaus) and to use your contact information for debt collection purposes if the Agreement is terminated for non-payment as set forth herein following a 10-day cure period.
Taxes
. Branch’s Fees do not include any local, state, or federal sales, use, excise, personal property, VAT, or other similar taxes, duties, levies, tariffs, and other governmental charges (including, without limitation, any withholding tax, and any such taxes, to the extent legally applicable, which shall be borne and paid by Customer) (collectively, "
Taxes
"). If Branch has the legal obligation to pay or collect Taxes for which you are responsible under this section, Branch will invoice you and you will pay that amount unless you provide Branch with a valid tax exemption certificate authorized by the appropriate taxing authority. For clarity, you are responsible for payment of all Taxes resulting from any Fees payable hereunder, other than any taxes based on Branch’s net income, property, and employees.
Withholding Taxes
. In the event Fees payable by you to Branch under the Agreement are subject to any applicable withholding tax, goods and services tax, or similar taxes required by any tax authority and you are required by applicable law to remit such withholding tax, you: (a) may withhold and deduct from any payments to Branch under the Agreement an amount equivalent to any applicable withholding tax to the extent required by applicable law ("
Withholding Tax
"), (b) will pay to the relevant taxation authority the amount of such applicable withholdings in accordance with applicable law; and (c) will pay to Branch the applicable amounts under this Agreement net of such Withholding Tax. You shall be discharged from the obligation to pay Withholding Tax amounts to Branch provided that (1) you have remitted such amount to the relevant taxation authority and (2) you furnish Branch with (i) your tax registration certificate(s) as proof of registration with the applicable taxation authority, and (ii) any and all relevant tax forms and/or statements with proof of Withholding Tax remittance amount to the taxation authority, the applicable rate, and other information which may reasonably be requested for the purpose of assisting Branch to seek any allowable credits or deductions for the Withholding Tax so withheld in each jurisdiction where you are subject to tax.
Overdue Charges
. If any invoiced amount is not received by Branch by the due date set forth in the applicable invoice, then without limiting Branch’s rights or remedies, (a) those charges may accrue late interest at the rate of 2.5% of the outstanding balance per month, and (b) Branch may condition future Order Form renewals on payment terms shorter than those specified in the applicable Order Form.
Term for Paid Services
. Except as expressly set forth herein, the terms set forth in these Terms shall be in force for as long as an Order Form referencing the Agreement is in effect. Except as otherwise agreed to by you and Branch in a superseding Order Form, at the end of an applicable term, your access to the Services will automatically renew under the same Order Form terms (contract duration, billing frequency, payment period, etc.), unless and until your access to the Services is terminated in accordance with this section or either party to these Terms provides the other with notice of non-renewal (email sufficient; if to Branch, please email billing@branch.io) at least thirty (30) days prior to the commencement of any renewal period.
Termination by Branch
. Except as expressly agreed to by you and Branch in a superseding Order Form, Branch reserves the right to modify or discontinue, temporarily or permanently, all or any portion of the Services immediately upon at least thirty (30) days’ written notice (email sufficient), provided that Branch will promptly provide a pro-rated refund of all pre-paid and unearned amounts based on the period of suspension or the date of discontinuance, as applicable. Branch may also, in its sole discretion, terminate your access to the Services or any portion thereof if you violate any terms of the Agreement, unless you cure such breach within thirty (30) days of the date Branch provides written notice to you of such violation. Termination by Branch for your violation of these Terms will be effective as of the last day of the 30-day cure period provided herein or immediately to the extent such violation reasonably cannot be cured. Upon termination of the Agreement, any outstanding balance through the effective date of termination and other unpaid payment obligations will be immediately due and payable in full.
TERMINATION
Except with respect to paid services, as to which the terms and conditions governing termination are set forth above in the section "PAID SERVICE TERMS" of these Terms above, You acknowledge and agree that Branch, in its sole discretion, may terminate your use of the Services without prior notice for any reason at any time. You agree that Branch shall not be liable to you or any third party for termination by Branch. Except when subject to a binding contract duration (see any applicable Order Form), you may terminate your access to and use of the Services at any time by providing written notice to Branch via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
). Such termination will be effective as of the last day of the calendar month during which such termination notice is received.
SURVIVAL
Upon termination of the Agreement, those sections of these Terms that by their nature would reasonably be expected to survive will survive termination or expiration of these Terms, including but not limited to the sections on Termination, Privacy Policy & Data Rights, Confidential Information, Proprietary Rights, Limitation of Liability, and Legal Notices.
PRIVACY POLICY & DATA RIGHTS
Privacy Policy
. You acknowledge and agree that you will provide a privacy policy to your end users, which shall be in compliance with applicable laws and self-regulatory guidelines, including, without limitation each of the Self-Regulatory Principles of the Digital Advertising Alliance ("
DAA
"), currently available at
http://www.aboutads.info/principles
, and the Principles of the European Interactive Digital Alliance ("
EDAA
"), currently available at
http://www.edaa.eu/european-principles/
, as each set of principles may be amended from time to time.
Your privacy policy will further include clear, meaningful, and conspicuous notice consistent with applicable laws, regulations, and self-regulatory guidelines that includes, at minimum, the following: (a) disclosure regarding your practices with regard to cookies and/or targeting and online behavioral advertising; the types of data you collect for this purpose; and your data collection, use and disclosure practices (including that by visiting your Digital Properties, third parties may place cookies on end user browsers, or use non-cookie technology, to collect data that you may use for this purpose); and (b) information regarding how end users may opt out from receiving targeted advertisements by visiting the NAI website opt-out page
here:
http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices/
, the DAA opt-out page
here:
http://www.aboutads.info/
, and/or the EDAA opt-out page
here:
http://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
. Your “
Digital Properties
” means your mobile applications, websites and program code created by or for you using a Service or for use by you with the Services. You further agree to obtain consent to your practices from your end users with regard to cookies and/or targeting and online behavioral advertising to the extent required by applicable laws, regulations, and self-regulatory guidelines. If you use Branch’s Engagement Builder feature, you agree to respect opt-out flags passed by Branch to you if you use Engagement Builder data for targeted advertisements. You acknowledge and agree that your use of the Services is subject to Branch’s Privacy Policy, located at https://branch.io/policies/#privacy. Branch’s Privacy Policy does not cover your Digital Properties, or the use of your Digital Properties, by your end users. It is your obligation to provide your own privacy policy to your end users. You acknowledge that Branch has no direct relationship or interface with your end users and that Branch’s ability to comply with certain applicable data protection and privacy laws is dependent on your compliance with the terms of this section of the Terms.
Data Analytics
. You acknowledge and agree that Branch may collect and process data from your Digital Properties as set forth in
Branch’s Privacy Policy
with respect to your use of the Services. You grant to Branch a limited, non-exclusive, non-sublicensable, non-transferable license to use the data collected through the Services to provide, maintain, optimize and improve the Services.
Data Security
. Branch will maintain appropriate technical, administrative, and physical safeguards for the protection of information on its servers, including customer data, against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. However, you acknowledge and agree that no method of transmission over the Internet or method of electronic storage is completely secure, and that Branch cannot guarantee the absolute security of such information.
Compliance with Applicable Law
. You will comply with all laws, regulations, and self-regulatory guidelines applicable to your business and operations and to your use of the Services, including those governing the privacy, security and trans-border transfers of personal data (including, but not limited to, compliance with the General Data Protection Regulation (EU 2016/679) ("
GDPR
") and the California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CCPA
”)). Where required, you shall be responsible for (a) obtaining verifiable consent, in the form required by applicable laws, regulations, and self-regulatory guidelines, related to any personal data collected, used, maintained, and shared with Branch, or that you direct Branch to share with any third party; (b) ensuring that you otherwise have any and all rights required in order to provide such data to Branch or to direct Branch to share it with any third party; and (c) obtaining data properly and in accordance with applicable law, including, without limitation, the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (“
COPPA
”), and the Video Privacy Protection Act (18 U.S.C. § 2710) (“
VPPA
”). To the extent that any of your users request that you not share their data with Branch, or to the extent that you believe that any data you may have provided to Branch was inappropriately obtained, you shall inform Branch immediately. Branch shall have no responsibility or liability to the extent resulting from, or arising out of your use of the Services not in compliance with the Agreement, the Documentation or applicable law.
CCPA
. If any data collected through your use of the Services is deemed personal information and is subject to the CCPA, then the terms set forth in the Branch CCPA Addendum (“
CCPA Addendum
“) available at
https://branch.io/branch-california-privacy-addendum/
(or its successor URL) shall apply to the use and processing of such personal information and shall be incorporated by reference into, and made an integral part of, the Agreement.
RESTRICTED AREAS OF THE SERVICES
Registration Information
. In order to access and use the Services, you will register an account. Any information provided during such registration must be current, complete and accurate (“
Registration Information
”). It is your sole responsibility to ensure Registration Information is up to date at all times.
Access Credentials
. Certain parts of the Services, including account management features, may be password-restricted to registered users or other authorized persons. You may select individuals (your employees or your independent contractors) to access and use such parts and you will obtain separate credentials, e.g., user IDs and passwords, from Branch for such individuals (each, an "
Authorized User
").
Responsibility
. You are responsible for all actions taken under an Authorized User’s account, whether or not such action was taken by an Authorized User or by another party, and whether or not such action was authorized by an Authorized User. You are responsible for the security of each Authorized User’s credentials and shall take all necessary steps to protect each Authorized User’s credentials from disclosure. You will not share (and will instruct each Authorized User not to share) such credentials with any other person or entity or otherwise permit any other person or entity to access or use the Services.
LINKS AND THIRD-PARTY CONTENT
Third Party Content
. You may enable the Services to display, or contain links to, third party products, services, and websites. Any opinions, advice, statements, services, offers, or other information that constitute part of the content expressed, authored, or made available by other users or other third parties on the Services, or which is accessible through or may be located using the Services (collectively, "
Third-Party Content
") are those of the respective authors or producers and not of Branch or its shareholders, directors, officers, employees, agents, or representatives. Branch does not control Third-Party Content and does not guarantee the accuracy, integrity or quality of such Third-Party Content. Branch is not responsible for the performance of, does not endorse, and is not responsible or liable for, any Third-Party Content or any information or materials advertised in any Third-Party Content. By using Branch’s Services, you and/or your end users may be exposed to content that is offensive, indecent, or objectionable. We are not responsible or liable, directly or indirectly, for any damage or loss caused to you by your or a third party’s use of or reliance on any goods, services, or information available on or through any third-party service or Third-Party Content. It is your responsibility to evaluate the information, opinion, advice, or other content available on and through our Services.
USE POLICIES
You are solely responsible for any content and other material that you submit, publish, transmit, or display on, through, or with our Services. Customer will not use Branch’s Services in violation of Branch’s Acceptable Use Policy currently available at https://branch.io/policies/#aup.
TRADEMARKS
Branch Trademark Rights
. "Branch Metrics", the Branch Metrics logo, and any other trademarks or service marks used by Branch or slogan displayed on the Services ("
Branch Marks
") are trademarks of Branch and its suppliers or licensors, and may not be copied, imitated or used, in whole or in part, without the prior written permission of Branch or the applicable trademark holder. You may not use any metatags or any other "hidden text" utilizing "Branch Metrics" or any other Branch Marks without Branch’s prior written permission. In addition, the look and feel of the Services, including all page headers, custom graphics, button icons and scripts, is the trade dress of Branch and may not be copied, imitated or used, in whole or in part, without Branch’s prior written permission. All other trademarks, registered trademarks, product names and company names or logos mentioned in the Services are the property of their respective owners. Reference to any products, services, processes or other information, by trade name, trademark, manufacturer, supplier, or otherwise does not constitute or imply endorsement, sponsorship, or recommendation thereof by Branch.
AGENCIES & PARTNERS
Agency Client
. If you are an agency or a party representing, or providing services for the benefit of, a third party (“
Agency Client
“), you represent and warrant that you are authorized to act on behalf of, and bind to the Agreement, that Agency Client (and upon Branch’s request shall provide evidence thereof). You further represent and warrant that such Agency Client has provided you with explicit permission to collect on its behalf and view Agency Client’s data and that you shall use such data strictly in accordance with the permissions provided to you by such Agency Client and the terms of the Agreement. You shall ensure that each Agency Client agrees to the terms of the Agreement and any applicable Order Form(s) and agrees to abide by its terms, including without limitation, section 4 (Privacy and Data Rights) of these Terms. You acknowledge and agree that: (i) Branch makes no representations or warranties for the direct or indirect benefit of any Agency Client; and (ii) you shall not make any representations or warranties to such Agency Client on behalf of Branch.
Partners
. The Services enable you to measure and analyze its marketing campaigns with certain third parties that you work with, such as advertising networks, publishers and analytics providers (“
Partners
“). For such purpose, you may, through your configuration of the Services (“
Partner Features
”), direct Branch to provide data to, and receive data from Partners relating to end users (“Shared Data”). Pursuant to the foregoing, insofar as you make use of the Partner Features, you hereby grant Branch the right to provide Shared Data with Partners as to which you make use of the Partner Features (the “
Permitted Partners
”) and to obtain and process Shared Data from Permitted Partners. You acknowledge and agree that: (i) the sharing of such Shared Data between Branch and Permitted Partners will be available only to the extent enabled by the Permitted Partner and Branch; (ii) any use of Shared Data by a Permitted Partner shall be subject to your own agreements with Permitted Partner; (iii) Branch shall have no liability or responsibility in connection with any acts or omissions by Permitted Partners; (iv) any use or processing of Shared Data may be subject to certain limitations and restrictions imposed by Permitted Partners, and that Branch is not responsible for fulfilling such limitations and restrictions unless expressly agreed to in writing between you and Branch.
CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION
Definition
. Each party to these Terms (a “
Receiving Party
”) may have access to, or become acquainted with, certain non-public confidential information of the other party (a “
Disclosing Party
”) including without limitation all information clearly identified as confidential at the time of disclosure (“
Confidential Information
”). You and Branch further agree that, subject to the rights and licenses granted herein, each party's Confidential Information shall include all non-public information regarding the Disclosing party, including without limitation any customer, customer prospect, the terms, conditions and pricing set forth in the Agreement and its Order Form(s), marketing, technical, business and/or strategic plans or information provided by the Disclosing Party to the Receiving party in the performance of the Services under the Agreement.
Use and Disclosure
. Each party agrees as follows: (a) to use the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party only for the purposes permitted by the Agreement, or as otherwise permitted by the Agreement; (b) to take all reasonable steps to ensure that the Disclosing Party’s Confidential Information is not disclosed or distributed by the Receiving Party’s employees or agents in violation of the Agreement, but in no event will the Receiving party use less effort to protect the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party than it uses to protect its own Confidential Information of like importance; (c) to restrict access to the Confidential Information disclosed by the Disclosing Party to such of the Receiving Party’s employees, agents and third parties, if any, who have a need to have access and who have been advised of and have agreed in writing or are otherwise bound to treat such information in accordance with the Agreement; and (d) to return or destroy all Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party’s written request, after termination of the Agreement. The Receiving Party will not be obligated under this confidentiality section with respect to information that: (a) is or has become readily publicly available through no act or omission of the Receiving Party or its employees or agents; (b) is received from a third party lawfully in possession of such information and the Receiving Party has no knowledge of any disclosure restrictions on such third party to disclose such information; (c) is disclosed to a third party by the Disclosing Party without restriction on disclosure; (d) was rightfully in the possession of the Receiving Party without restriction prior to its disclosure by the Disclosing Party; or (e) was independently developed by employees or consultants of the Receiving Party without reliance on, or reference to, such Confidential Information.
Permitted Disclosures
. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Confidential Information may be disclosed as required by any governmental agency, provided that before disclosing such information the Receiving Party must provide the Disclosing Party with sufficient advance notice of the agency’s request for the information to enable the Receiving Party to exercise any rights it may have to challenge or limit the agency’s authority to receive such Confidential Information, to the extent permitted by applicable law.
PROPRIETARY RIGHTS
Proprietary Rights
. As between you and Branch, you shall retain all right, title and interest in your Digital Properties. If you choose to use Customer’s Digital Properties with a Service, you grant Branch permission to allow the Services to interoperate with your Digital Properties as required for the interoperation of your Digital Properties with the Service. Subject to the limited licenses granted herein, Branch acquires no right, title or interest from you or your licensors under the Agreement in or to your Digital Properties. Subject to the limited rights expressly granted hereunder, Branch, its Affiliates, and its licensors reserve all of their right, title and interest in and to the Services (including the Branch application programming interfaces and the Branch software development kits), all technology utilized by Branch to provide the Services, and all of their related intellectual property rights related to, embodied by, or incorporated in any of the foregoing and including any updates, upgrades, enhancements, modifications and improvements made to, or derivatives of, the foregoing. No copyright is granted by Branch to Customer hereunder. No rights are granted to Customer hereunder other than as expressly set forth herein.
Feedback
. Branch may provide you with a mechanism to provide feedback, suggestions, and ideas, if you choose, about the Services ("
Feedback
"). You agree that Branch may, in its sole discretion, use the Feedback you provide to Branch in any way, including in future enhancements and modifications to the Services. You hereby grant to Branch and its assigns a perpetual, worldwide, fully transferable, sub-licensable, fully paid-up, irrevocable, royalty-free license to use, reproduce, modify, create derivative works from, distribute, and display the Feedback in any manner for any purpose, in any media, software, or technology of any kind now existing or developed in the future, without any obligation to provide attribution or compensation to you or any third party.
WARRANTY & DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTIES
Warranty
. You represent and warrant to Branch that: (a) you are duly organized under applicable law and have sufficient authority to enter into the Agreement; (b) the person entering into the Agreement is authorized to agree to and execute the Agreement on behalf of such party; and (c) the execution and performance of the Agreement does not conflict with any contractual obligations you have to any third party.
DISCLAIMER
. EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY PROVIDED IN THE AGREEMENT, THE SERVICES, AND THE DOCUMENTATION ARE PROVIDED “AS IS,” WITHOUT REPRESENTATION OR WARRANTY OF ANY KIND. WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE. Branch does not warrant the accuracy, completeness, or usefulness of the Services, and the Documentation, nor does Branch warrant that the Services will be free from errors, or that the operations of the Services will be uninterrupted. You rely on the Services and the Documentation at your own risk. SOME JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW THE EXCLUSION OF CERTAIN WARRANTIES IN CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES. ACCORDINGLY THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH ABOVE APPLY TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW.
LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
BRANCH AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND LICENSORS WILL NOT BE LIABLE FOR ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, PUNITIVE, CONSEQUENTIAL, OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO, DAMAGES FOR LOSS OF PROFITS, LOSS OF REVENUE, GOODWILL, USE, DATA THAT IS INCOMPLETE, MISSING, OR INCORRECT, OR OTHER INTANGIBLE LOSSES (EVEN IF BRANCH HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES), RESULTING FROM THIS AGREEMENT.
UNDER NO CIRCUMSTANCES WILL THE TOTAL LIABILITY OF BRANCH AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND LICENSORS RESULTING FROM THIS AGREEMENT (INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO WARRANTY CLAIMS), REGARDLESS OF THE FORUM AND REGARDLESS OF WHETHER ANY ACTION OR CLAIM IS BASED IN CONTRACT, WARRANTY, NEGLIGENCE, STRICT LIABILITY, OR OTHER TORT, BREACH OF ANY STATUTORY DUTY, INDEMNITY OR CONTRIBUTION, OR OTHERWISE, EXCEED THE AMOUNTS, IF ANY, THAT YOU HAVE PAID TO BRANCH FOR USE OF THE SERVICES FOR THE TWELVE (12) MONTH PERIOD PRIOR TO THE CLAIM IN THE AGGREGATE. SOME OF THE LIMITATIONS PROVIDED HEREIN MAY NOT BE ALLOWED UNDER THE LAWS OF CERTAIN JURISDICTIONS.
IF ANY SUCH LAW IS DEEMED TO APPLY TO THE AGREEMENT THEN THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH HEREIN SHALL APPLY TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED UNDER SUCH LAWS.
INDEMNITY
Indemnity
. You will defend Branch, its Affiliates and their officers, agents, employees, representatives, and assigns (“
Branch Indemnified Parties
”) against any claim, demand suit or action against Branch brought by a third party (a) arising from your use of the Services in a unlawful manner or in violation of the Agreement or applicable Order Form, or usage of the Services in violation of the Documentation or (b) alleging that any of your Digital Properties developed or provided by you, or the combination of your Digital Properties used with the Services, infringes or misappropriates such third party’s intellectual property rights (c) based on your instructions to share Shared Data with a Partner or (d) related to a regulatory investigation (each a “
Claim Against Branch
”). You will indemnify Branch Indemnified Parties from any costs, damages, and expenses finally awarded against Branch Indemnified Parties as a result of, or for any amounts paid by Branch Indemnified Parties under a settlement approved by you in writing of, a Claim Against Branch. The above defense and indemnification obligations do not apply if a Claim Against Branch arises from Branch’s breach of the Agreement, or applicable Order Forms.
Agency Indemnity
. If you are an agency or a party representing, or providing services for the benefit of an Agency Client, in addition to the obligations set forth in the section “AGENCIES & PARTNERS” of these Terms, you further agree to indemnify, hold harmless and defend Branch Indemnified Parties from and against any claim, demand, suit, or action and any related liability against a Branch Indemnified Party brought by a third party, arising out of or relating to: (a) any representations and warranties made by you concerning any aspect of the Services to an Agency Client; (b) any claims made by or on behalf of any Agency Client arising out or relating to your use of the Services; and (c) any claims arising out of or relating to acts or omissions of an Agency Client in connection with the Services.
Indemnification Procedure
. Your obligations to provide indemnification under this Agreement will be contingent upon (a) Branch promptly giving you written notice of any claim for which indemnification is sought (provided that the Branch’s failure to notify you will not diminish your obligations under this Section, except to the extent that you are materially prejudiced as a result of such failure); (b) you having sole control of the defense and settlement of any and all claims for which indemnification is sought (provided that no settlement may be entered into without either (i) the consent of Branch if such settlement would require any action on the part of Branch or (ii) unconditionally releasing Branch of all liability); and (c) Branch giving You all reasonably requested assistance at Your expense. Subject to the foregoing, Branch will at all times have the option to participate in any matter or litigation through counsel of its own selection solely at its own expense.
MISCELLANEOUS
Governing Law
. The Agreement and all matters arising out of or relating to the Agreement shall be governed by and construed under the laws of the State of California, without regard to its conflict of law provisions. The parties expressly disclaim and exclude the application of the United Nations Convention on Contracts for the International Sale of Goods.
Venue
. Any legal action or proceeding arising out of or relating to the Agreement shall be brought exclusively in the state or federal courts located in the Northern District of California. You and Branch hereby agree to submit to the jurisdiction of, and agree that venue is proper in, those courts in any such legal action or proceeding.
No Waiver; Severability
. Our failure to enforce any right or provision in the Agreement will not constitute a waiver of such right or provision unless acknowledged and agreed to by us in writing. If any provision of the Agreement is found to be unenforceable or invalid, that provision will be limited or eliminated to the minimum extent necessary so that the Agreement will otherwise remain in full force and effect and enforceable.
Assignment
. The Agreement is not assignable, transferable or sublicensable by you except with Branch’s prior written consent. Branch may transfer and assign any of its rights and obligations under the Agreement freely and without consent.
Entire Agreement
. Both you and Branch agree that the Agreement is the complete and exclusive statement of the mutual understanding of the Parties and supersedes all previous written and oral agreements, communications and other understandings relating to your use of the Services, and that all waivers and modifications must be in a signed writing by both Parties, except as otherwise provided herein. Preprinted terms in your purchase orders or other customer-generated ordering documents, or terms referenced or linked within them, will have no effect on the Agreement and are hereby rejected, regardless of whether they are signed, clicked through, or otherwise agreed to by Branch and/or purport to take precedence over the Agreement. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency among the following documents, the order of precedence shall be: (1) the applicable Order Form, (2) any exhibit, schedule or addendum to the Agreement, (3) the body of these Terms, and (4) the Documentation.
Relationship between the Parties
. The Parties are independent contractors. No agency, partnership, joint venture, fiduciary or employment relationship is created as a result of the Agreement, and you do not have any authority of any kind to bind Branch in any respect whatsoever.
Export / Trade Compliance
. The Services and any derivatives thereof, may be subject to export control and economic sanctions laws and regulations of the United States and other jurisdictions. Both Customer and Branch each represent that it is not named on any U.S. Government Consolidated Screening denied-party list which may be searched at:
https://www.export.gov/article?id=Consolidated-Screening-List
. Customer shall not permit any entity or individual to access or use any of the Services who is listed on the Consolidated Screening List or located in a U.S. government-embargoed country (currently Cuba, Iran, North Korea, Syria and Crimea), or known to be engaged in proliferation of nuclear, chemical or biological weapons or missiles, or otherwise in violation of any U.S. export law or regulation.
Third Party Beneficiary
. No provision of the Agreement is intended, nor shall it be interpreted, to provide or create any third-party beneficiary rights or any other rights of any kind in any customer, affiliate, stockholder, partner, member, director, officer or employee of any party hereto or any other person or entity.
Marketing Support
. You agree to comply with reasonable requests of Branch to support public relations efforts pertaining to the Services, which efforts may include: (a) a press release highlighting your company’s use of the Services; (b) participation in targeted press and analyst interviews highlighting benefits of implementing the Services; and (c) participation in customer case studies developed by Branch and used on Branch’s website(s) and other collateral. You grant to Branch a non-exclusive, non-transferable, limited right to use your name, trademarks, and logos (collectively, the "
Customer Marks
") (i) for the purpose of referencing You as a customer of Branch on the Branch website(s) and (ii) in the production of marketing materials, provided that such use is in accordance with any trademark and logo use guidelines that you provide to Branch. All goodwill developed from such use shall be solely for your benefit.
Notices
. Except as otherwise specified in the Agreement, all notices of termination or an indemnifiable claim related to the Agreement (“Legal Notices”) will be in writing and will be effective (a) upon receipt if personally delivered to one of the addresses listed below, (b) upon receipt if sent by certified or registered mail (return receipt requested), postage prepaid, to one of the addresses listed below, or (c) upon receipt if transmitted by e-mail as set forth below. If to Branch, all notices shall be provided to the mailing and e-mail address set forth below (“
Branch Notices
”). Billing-related notices to Customer will be addressed to the relevant billing contact designated by Customer on the applicable Order Form. All Legal Notices and other notices to Customer will be addressed to the relevant Services account administrator designated by Customer.
Branch Notices
: Legal notices should be sent to:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
With a copy provided to: legal@branch.io
CONTACTING US
If you have any questions or concerns about our Services or these Terms, you may contact us at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
info@branch.io
Effective May 9th 2022
to
May 9th 2022
Download
Table of Contents
Terms & Conditions
Last updated January 28, 2022
INTRODUCTION
These Terms & Conditions (“
Terms
”) are entered into by and between of Branch Metrics, Inc., a Delaware corporation d/b/a Branch Metrics ("
Branch
," "
Branch Metrics
," "
we
," or "
us
") and the entity or person accessing this website (“
Website
”) or placing an order for or accessing any Services made available by Branch Metrics (“
Customer
” or “
you
” or “
your
”). “
Services
" means the products and services that are made available online by Branch under these Terms, the “
Beta Services
”, as defined in these Terms, other services or products that Branch may make available from time to time, including associated Branch offline or mobile components. Services exclude (i) Web-based, mobile, offline or other software application functionality that interoperates with a Service, that is provided by Customer or a third party, and (ii) Third-Party Content, as defined in these Terms. By indicating your acceptance of these Terms or using any of our Services, you agree to be legally bound by, and use our Services in compliance with, all terms, conditions, and notices in the Agreement. By agreeing to these Terms, you warrant that you are authorized to agree to these Terms on behalf of you and/or your company. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO THESE TERMS & CONDITIONS, DO NOT USE OUR WEBSITE OR ANY SERVICES.
“
Agreement
” means these Terms together with any applicable Order Forms, and any exhibits, appendices, schedules, or attachments identified or referenced in these Terms, and any amendments attached hereto or hereafter attached by mutual written agreement of the parties (all of which are incorporated herein by reference).
“
Order Form
” means an ordering document or online order specifying the Services to be provided hereunder that is entered into between Customer and Branch or any of their Affiliates, including any addenda and supplements thereto. By entering into an Order Form hereunder, an Affiliate agrees to be bound by the terms of the Agreement as if it were an original party hereto.
“
Documentation
” means the applicable Service’s documentation and usage guidelines at
https://docs.branch.io/
.
“
Affiliate
” means any entity that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the subject entity. “Control,” for purposes of this definition, means direct or indirect ownership or control of more than 50% of the voting interests of the subject entity.
Modifications
. We may make changes to these Terms from time to time. When we do, we will revise the "Last updated" date given above. It is your responsibility to review these Terms frequently and to remain informed of any changes to them. The then-current version of these Terms will supersede all earlier versions. You agree that your continued use of our Services after such changes have been published to our Services will constitute your acceptance of such revised Terms.
SERVICE ACCESS AND AVAILABILITY
Service Access & Availability
. Subject to your compliance with these terms and conditions, Branch will make the Services available to you pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and solely for Customer’s internal business needs. Branch shall: (a) use commercially reasonable efforts to make the online Services available 24 hours a day, 7 days a week, except for: (i) planned downtime (of which Branch shall give advance electronic notice), (ii) emergency maintenance that is reasonably unforeseeable and necessary for purposes of maintaining the integrity or operation of the Services, regardless of the notice provided by Branch and (iii) any unavailability caused by circumstances beyond Branch’s reasonable control, including, for example, an act of God, act of government, flood, fire, earthquake, civil unrest, act of terror, strike or other labor problem (other than one involving Branch employees), Internet service provider failure or delay, integrated third party applications , or denial of service attack, and (b) provide the Services in accordance with laws and government regulations applicable to Branch’s provision of its Services to its customers generally (i.e., without regard for Customer’s particular use of the Services), and subject to Customer’s use of the Services in accordance with the Agreement, the Documentation and the applicable Order Form. Your rights to access and use the Services are limited by all terms set forth in the Agreement.
RESTRICTIONS; UPDATES & SUPPORT
Restrictions
. You must comply with all applicable laws when implementing, configuring, and using the Services. Except as expressly permitted under these Terms, you will not, and will not permit anyone else to: (a) make the functionality of the Services to any third party through any means, including, without limitation, any hosting, application services provider, service bureau, or other type of service; (b) use any automated tool (e.g., robots, spiders) to access or use the Services; (c) rent, lease, or sublicense your access to the Services to another person; (d) circumvent or disable any digital rights management, usage rules, or other security features of the Services or attempt to gain unauthorized access to the Services or its related systems or networks; (e) use the Services in a manner that overburdens, or that threatens the integrity, performance, or availability of, the Services; (f) remove, alter, or obscure any proprietary notices (including copyright and trademark notices) on any portion of the Services; (g) send material containing software viruses, worms, trojan horses, or other harmful computer code, files, scripts, agents, or programs; or (h) use the Services in connection with any Apps or websites that are directed to children under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), without employing appropriate settings within the Branch SDKs to limit data collection from such children in accordance with applicable law. More information on these settings is available
here
. If you have questions about how to use these settings or have any reason to believe that these resources may not address your particular use case, please reach out to the Branch Support team via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Agreement, use of the Services in violation of the foregoing restrictions by Customer that, in Branch’s judgment, threatens the integrity, performance, availability, or security of the Services may result in Branch’s immediate suspension of, or limitation in Customer’s access to, the Services.
Updates and Support
. Branch will maintain, support, update, and provide error corrections for the Services to the same extent it does so for its customers generally. Ultimately, you are responsible for timely integration and launch of the Services. If Branch provides you with an update or maintenance release for the offline components of the Branch Services, unless you receive a separate license from Branch for that update or release that expressly supersedes these Terms, such update or release will be subject to the terms and conditions of these Terms. Branch shall have no liability for any damages that may result from Customer’s failure to implement upgrades or updates to the Services provided that Customer is notified in writing by Branch of an upgrade or update. All support requests must be sent to the Branch Support team via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
.
BETA SERVICES
From time to time, Branch may invite You to try Beta Services. “
Beta Services
” means Our services or functionality that are not generally available to customers at no additional charge and that may be made available to You to try at Your option which are designated as beta, pilot, limited release, developer preview, non-production, evaluation, or by a similar description. You may accept or decline any such trial in Your sole discretion. Beta Services are for evaluation purposes only and not for production use, are not subject to any service level agreements (SLAs) agreed to between you and Branch, and may be subject to additional terms. Branch is under no obligation to, maintain, support, update, or provide error corrections for the Beta Services. Branch may discontinue Beta Services at any time in Branch’s sole discretion and reserves the right to never make them generally available. BRANCH WILL HAVE NO LIABILITY FOR ANY HARM OR DAMAGE ARISING OUT OF, OR IN CONNECTION WITH, CUSTOMER’S USE OF A BETA SERVICE. THE BETA SERVICES ARE PROVIDED “AS IS” AND AS AVAILABLE, AND ARE EXCLUSIVE OF ANY WARRANTY WHATSOEVER.
Without limiting the foregoing, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE
. In the event of a conflict or inconsistency between this section and any other provision of the Agreement, the terms of this section “BETA SERVICES” shall control and prevail with respect to Beta Services.
PAID SERVICE TERMS
Fees
. You will pay to Branch all fees specified in an Order Form (“Fees”). You are responsible for all undisputed Fees, even if such Fees are due and payable after termination of the Agreement or any portion thereof. Fees are non-cancellable and failure to use the Services does not constitute a basis for refusing to pay any Fees. Except as expressly provided in the Agreement, you will not receive any refund or prorated refund for amounts previously paid or amounts owed up to the effective date of termination.
Payments & Invoicing
. Any relevant paid service-specific terms including, for example, contract duration, monthly fees, billing frequency, payment forms, and payment term will be addressed within an associated Order Form. All charges shall be invoiced in advance in accordance with the billing frequency stated in the applicable Order Form. You shall be responsible for the payment of any fees associated with an electronic funds transfer (i.e., ACH, wire transfer) when issuing payment to Branch, which includes fees from Your financial institution and intermediary banks. You are responsible for providing complete and accurate billing and contact information to Branch and notifying Branch of any changes to such information. In certain instances where your payment method is via credit card, the issuer of the credit card may charge a transaction fee or related charges, which you will be responsible to pay.
Payment by Credit Card
. In certain instances where your payment method is via credit card, the issuer of the credit card may charge a transaction fee or related charges, which you will be responsible to pay. Fees will be billed to the credit card nominated by you and you authorize the card issuer to pay all such amounts and authorize Branch (or its billing agent) to charge the credit card account until you or Branch cancels or terminates the Services as set forth herein; provided that if payment is not received from the credit card issuer, the transaction is returned after the payment has been settled, otherwise known as chargeback, or if there are insufficient funds in the case of check or debit card payments, you agree to pay all amounts plus any applicable transaction fees (e.g., NSF fees, chargeback fees) due upon demand.
Payment Disputes
. If you have concerns about any charges on your invoice, you agree to the following dispute resolution process: (i) all billing disputes must be submitted in writing to billing@branch.io, (ii) billing disputes must be submitted within 90 days of the date the invoice was generated, and (iii) undisputed amounts will be subject to the Agreement and total payment for undisputed invoices or amounts must be submitted when due.
Suspension or Cancellation of Service; Payment Acceleration
. Without derogating from any other remedies available to Branch under the Agreement or by applicable law, if you owe any undisputed Fees 30 days or more past due in connection with any Services provided by Branch under any applicable Order Form, then, without affecting any of your payment obligations under the Agreement (including, any payment obligations under an Order Form), Branch is entitled to take further action including but not limited to accelerating your unpaid fee obligations under such agreement so that all such obligations become immediately due and payable, and suspending and/or cancelling your access to the Services until such amounts are paid in full. Branch reserves the right to send your account to a collections agency for nonpayment (which may, in turn, report the uncollected debt to credit bureaus) and to use your contact information for debt collection purposes if the Agreement is terminated for non-payment as set forth herein following a 10-day cure period.
Taxes
. Branch’s Fees do not include any local, state, or federal sales, use, excise, personal property, VAT, or other similar taxes, duties, levies, tariffs, and other governmental charges (including, without limitation, any withholding tax, and any such taxes, to the extent legally applicable, which shall be borne and paid by Customer) (collectively, "
Taxes
"). If Branch has the legal obligation to pay or collect Taxes for which you are responsible under this section, Branch will invoice you and you will pay that amount unless you provide Branch with a valid tax exemption certificate authorized by the appropriate taxing authority. For clarity, you are responsible for payment of all Taxes resulting from any Fees payable hereunder, other than any taxes based on Branch’s net income, property, and employees.
Withholding Taxes
. In the event Fees payable by you to Branch under the Agreement are subject to any applicable withholding tax, goods and services tax, or similar taxes required by any tax authority and you are required by applicable law to remit such withholding tax, you: (a) may withhold and deduct from any payments to Branch under the Agreement an amount equivalent to any applicable withholding tax to the extent required by applicable law ("
Withholding Tax
"), (b) will pay to the relevant taxation authority the amount of such applicable withholdings in accordance with applicable law; and (c) will pay to Branch the applicable amounts under this Agreement net of such Withholding Tax. You shall be discharged from the obligation to pay Withholding Tax amounts to Branch provided that (1) you have remitted such amount to the relevant taxation authority and (2) you furnish Branch with (i) your tax registration certificate(s) as proof of registration with the applicable taxation authority, and (ii) any and all relevant tax forms and/or statements with proof of Withholding Tax remittance amount to the taxation authority, the applicable rate, and other information which may reasonably be requested for the purpose of assisting Branch to seek any allowable credits or deductions for the Withholding Tax so withheld in each jurisdiction where you are subject to tax.
Overdue Charges
. If any invoiced amount is not received by Branch by the due date set forth in the applicable invoice, then without limiting Branch’s rights or remedies, (a) those charges may accrue late interest at the rate of 2.5% of the outstanding balance per month, and (b) Branch may condition future Order Form renewals on payment terms shorter than those specified in the applicable Order Form.
Term for Paid Services
. Except as expressly set forth herein, the terms set forth in these Terms shall be in force for as long as an Order Form referencing the Agreement is in effect. Except as otherwise agreed to by you and Branch in a superseding Order Form, at the end of an applicable term, your access to the Services will automatically renew under the same Order Form terms (contract duration, billing frequency, payment period, etc.), unless and until your access to the Services is terminated in accordance with this section or either party to these Terms provides the other with notice of non-renewal (email sufficient; if to Branch, please email billing@branch.io) at least thirty (30) days prior to the commencement of any renewal period.
Termination by Branch
. Except as expressly agreed to by you and Branch in a superseding Order Form, Branch reserves the right to modify or discontinue, temporarily or permanently, all or any portion of the Services immediately upon at least thirty (30) days’ written notice (email sufficient), provided that Branch will promptly provide a pro-rated refund of all pre-paid and unearned amounts based on the period of suspension or the date of discontinuance, as applicable. Branch may also, in its sole discretion, terminate your access to the Services or any portion thereof if you violate any terms of the Agreement, unless you cure such breach within thirty (30) days of the date Branch provides written notice to you of such violation. Termination by Branch for your violation of these Terms will be effective as of the last day of the 30-day cure period provided herein or immediately to the extent such violation reasonably cannot be cured. Upon termination of the Agreement, any outstanding balance through the effective date of termination and other unpaid payment obligations will be immediately due and payable in full.
TERMINATION
Except with respect to paid services, as to which the terms and conditions governing termination are set forth above in the section "PAID SERVICE TERMS" of these Terms above, You acknowledge and agree that Branch, in its sole discretion, may terminate your use of the Services without prior notice for any reason at any time. You agree that Branch shall not be liable to you or any third party for termination by Branch. Except when subject to a binding contract duration (see any applicable Order Form), you may terminate your access to and use of the Services at any time by providing written notice to Branch via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
). Such termination will be effective as of the last day of the calendar month during which such termination notice is received.
SURVIVAL
Upon termination of the Agreement, those sections of these Terms that by their nature would reasonably be expected to survive will survive termination or expiration of these Terms, including but not limited to the sections on Termination, Privacy Policy & Data Rights, Confidential Information, Proprietary Rights, Limitation of Liability, and Legal Notices.
PRIVACY POLICY & DATA RIGHTS
Privacy Policy
. You acknowledge and agree that you will provide a privacy policy to your end users, which shall be in compliance with applicable laws and self-regulatory guidelines, including, without limitation each of the Self-Regulatory Principles of the Digital Advertising Alliance ("
DAA
"), currently available at
http://www.aboutads.info/principles
, and the Principles of the European Interactive Digital Alliance ("
EDAA
"), currently available at
http://www.edaa.eu/european-principles/
, as each set of principles may be amended from time to time.
Your privacy policy will further include clear, meaningful, and conspicuous notice consistent with applicable laws, regulations, and self-regulatory guidelines that includes, at minimum, the following: (a) disclosure regarding your practices with regard to cookies and/or targeting and online behavioral advertising; the types of data you collect for this purpose; and your data collection, use and disclosure practices (including that by visiting your Digital Properties, third parties may place cookies on end user browsers, or use non-cookie technology, to collect data that you may use for this purpose); and (b) information regarding how end users may opt out from receiving targeted advertisements by visiting the NAI website opt-out page
here:
http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices/
, the DAA opt-out page
here:
http://www.aboutads.info/
, and/or the EDAA opt-out page
here:
http://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
. Your “
Digital Properties
” means your mobile applications, websites and program code created by or for you using a Service or for use by you with the Services. You further agree to obtain consent to your practices from your end users with regard to cookies and/or targeting and online behavioral advertising to the extent required by applicable laws, regulations, and self-regulatory guidelines. If you use Branch’s Engagement Builder feature, you agree to respect opt-out flags passed by Branch to you if you use Engagement Builder data for targeted advertisements. You acknowledge and agree that your use of the Services is subject to Branch’s Privacy Policy, located at https://branch.io/policies/#privacy. Branch’s Privacy Policy does not cover your Digital Properties, or the use of your Digital Properties, by your end users. It is your obligation to provide your own privacy policy to your end users. You acknowledge that Branch has no direct relationship or interface with your end users and that Branch’s ability to comply with certain applicable data protection and privacy laws is dependent on your compliance with the terms of this section of the Terms.
Data Analytics
. You acknowledge and agree that Branch may collect and process data from your Digital Properties as set forth in
Branch’s Privacy Policy
with respect to your use of the Services. You grant to Branch a limited, non-exclusive, non-sublicensable, non-transferable license to use the data collected through the Services to provide, maintain, optimize and improve the Services.
Data Security
. Branch will maintain appropriate technical, administrative, and physical safeguards for the protection of information on its servers, including customer data, against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. However, you acknowledge and agree that no method of transmission over the Internet or method of electronic storage is completely secure, and that Branch cannot guarantee the absolute security of such information.
Compliance with Applicable Law
. You will comply with all laws, regulations, and self-regulatory guidelines applicable to your business and operations and to your use of the Services, including those governing the privacy, security and trans-border transfers of personal data (including, but not limited to, compliance with the General Data Protection Regulation (EU 2016/679) ("
GDPR
") and the California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CCPA
”)). Where required, you shall be responsible for (a) obtaining verifiable consent, in the form required by applicable laws, regulations, and self-regulatory guidelines, related to any personal data collected, used, maintained, and shared with Branch, or that you direct Branch to share with any third party; (b) ensuring that you otherwise have any and all rights required in order to provide such data to Branch or to direct Branch to share it with any third party; and (c) obtaining data properly and in accordance with applicable law, including, without limitation, the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (“
COPPA
”), and the Video Privacy Protection Act (18 U.S.C. § 2710) (“
VPPA
”). To the extent that any of your users request that you not share their data with Branch, or to the extent that you believe that any data you may have provided to Branch was inappropriately obtained, you shall inform Branch immediately. Branch shall have no responsibility or liability to the extent resulting from, or arising out of your use of the Services not in compliance with the Agreement, the Documentation or applicable law.
CCPA
. If any data collected through your use of the Services is deemed personal information and is subject to the CCPA, then the terms set forth in the Branch CCPA Addendum (“
CCPA Addendum
“) available at
https://branch.io/branch-california-privacy-addendum/
(or its successor URL) shall apply to the use and processing of such personal information and shall be incorporated by reference into, and made an integral part of, the Agreement.
RESTRICTED AREAS OF THE SERVICES
Registration Information
. In order to access and use the Services, you will register an account. Any information provided during such registration must be current, complete and accurate (“
Registration Information
”). It is your sole responsibility to ensure Registration Information is up to date at all times.
Access Credentials
. Certain parts of the Services, including account management features, may be password-restricted to registered users or other authorized persons. You may select individuals (your employees or your independent contractors) to access and use such parts and you will obtain separate credentials, e.g., user IDs and passwords, from Branch for such individuals (each, an "
Authorized User
").
Responsibility
. You are responsible for all actions taken under an Authorized User’s account, whether or not such action was taken by an Authorized User or by another party, and whether or not such action was authorized by an Authorized User. You are responsible for the security of each Authorized User’s credentials and shall take all necessary steps to protect each Authorized User’s credentials from disclosure. You will not share (and will instruct each Authorized User not to share) such credentials with any other person or entity or otherwise permit any other person or entity to access or use the Services.
LINKS AND THIRD-PARTY CONTENT
Third Party Content
. You may enable the Services to display, or contain links to, third party products, services, and websites. Any opinions, advice, statements, services, offers, or other information that constitute part of the content expressed, authored, or made available by other users or other third parties on the Services, or which is accessible through or may be located using the Services (collectively, "
Third-Party Content
") are those of the respective authors or producers and not of Branch or its shareholders, directors, officers, employees, agents, or representatives. Branch does not control Third-Party Content and does not guarantee the accuracy, integrity or quality of such Third-Party Content. Branch is not responsible for the performance of, does not endorse, and is not responsible or liable for, any Third-Party Content or any information or materials advertised in any Third-Party Content. By using Branch’s Services, you and/or your end users may be exposed to content that is offensive, indecent, or objectionable. We are not responsible or liable, directly or indirectly, for any damage or loss caused to you by your or a third party’s use of or reliance on any goods, services, or information available on or through any third-party service or Third-Party Content. It is your responsibility to evaluate the information, opinion, advice, or other content available on and through our Services.
USE POLICIES
You are solely responsible for any content and other material that you submit, publish, transmit, or display on, through, or with our Services. Customer will not use Branch’s Services in violation of Branch’s Acceptable Use Policy currently available at https://branch.io/policies/#aup.
TRADEMARKS
Branch Trademark Rights
. "Branch Metrics", the Branch Metrics logo, and any other trademarks or service marks used by Branch or slogan displayed on the Services ("
Branch Marks
") are trademarks of Branch and its suppliers or licensors, and may not be copied, imitated or used, in whole or in part, without the prior written permission of Branch or the applicable trademark holder. You may not use any metatags or any other "hidden text" utilizing "Branch Metrics" or any other Branch Marks without Branch’s prior written permission. In addition, the look and feel of the Services, including all page headers, custom graphics, button icons and scripts, is the trade dress of Branch and may not be copied, imitated or used, in whole or in part, without Branch’s prior written permission. All other trademarks, registered trademarks, product names and company names or logos mentioned in the Services are the property of their respective owners. Reference to any products, services, processes or other information, by trade name, trademark, manufacturer, supplier, or otherwise does not constitute or imply endorsement, sponsorship, or recommendation thereof by Branch.
AGENCIES & PARTNERS
Agency Client
. If you are an agency or a party representing, or providing services for the benefit of, a third party (“
Agency Client
“), you represent and warrant that you are authorized to act on behalf of, and bind to the Agreement, that Agency Client (and upon Branch’s request shall provide evidence thereof). You further represent and warrant that such Agency Client has provided you with explicit permission to collect on its behalf and view Agency Client’s data and that you shall use such data strictly in accordance with the permissions provided to you by such Agency Client and the terms of the Agreement. You shall ensure that each Agency Client agrees to the terms of the Agreement and any applicable Order Form(s) and agrees to abide by its terms, including without limitation, section 4 (Privacy and Data Rights) of these Terms. You acknowledge and agree that: (i) Branch makes no representations or warranties for the direct or indirect benefit of any Agency Client; and (ii) you shall not make any representations or warranties to such Agency Client on behalf of Branch.
Partners
. The Services enable you to measure and analyze its marketing campaigns with certain third parties that you work with, such as advertising networks, publishers and analytics providers (“
Partners
“). For such purpose, you may, through your configuration of the Services (“
Partner Features
”), direct Branch to provide data to, and receive data from Partners relating to end users (“Shared Data”). Pursuant to the foregoing, insofar as you make use of the Partner Features, you hereby grant Branch the right to provide Shared Data with Partners as to which you make use of the Partner Features (the “
Permitted Partners
”) and to obtain and process Shared Data from Permitted Partners. You acknowledge and agree that: (i) the sharing of such Shared Data between Branch and Permitted Partners will be available only to the extent enabled by the Permitted Partner and Branch; (ii) any use of Shared Data by a Permitted Partner shall be subject to your own agreements with Permitted Partner; (iii) Branch shall have no liability or responsibility in connection with any acts or omissions by Permitted Partners; (iv) any use or processing of Shared Data may be subject to certain limitations and restrictions imposed by Permitted Partners, and that Branch is not responsible for fulfilling such limitations and restrictions unless expressly agreed to in writing between you and Branch.
CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION
Definition
. Each party to these Terms (a “
Receiving Party
”) may have access to, or become acquainted with, certain non-public confidential information of the other party (a “
Disclosing Party
”) including without limitation all information clearly identified as confidential at the time of disclosure (“
Confidential Information
”). You and Branch further agree that, subject to the rights and licenses granted herein, each party's Confidential Information shall include all non-public information regarding the Disclosing party, including without limitation any customer, customer prospect, the terms, conditions and pricing set forth in the Agreement and its Order Form(s), marketing, technical, business and/or strategic plans or information provided by the Disclosing Party to the Receiving party in the performance of the Services under the Agreement.
Use and Disclosure
. Each party agrees as follows: (a) to use the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party only for the purposes permitted by the Agreement, or as otherwise permitted by the Agreement; (b) to take all reasonable steps to ensure that the Disclosing Party’s Confidential Information is not disclosed or distributed by the Receiving Party’s employees or agents in violation of the Agreement, but in no event will the Receiving party use less effort to protect the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party than it uses to protect its own Confidential Information of like importance; (c) to restrict access to the Confidential Information disclosed by the Disclosing Party to such of the Receiving Party’s employees, agents and third parties, if any, who have a need to have access and who have been advised of and have agreed in writing or are otherwise bound to treat such information in accordance with the Agreement; and (d) to return or destroy all Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party’s written request, after termination of the Agreement. The Receiving Party will not be obligated under this confidentiality section with respect to information that: (a) is or has become readily publicly available through no act or omission of the Receiving Party or its employees or agents; (b) is received from a third party lawfully in possession of such information and the Receiving Party has no knowledge of any disclosure restrictions on such third party to disclose such information; (c) is disclosed to a third party by the Disclosing Party without restriction on disclosure; (d) was rightfully in the possession of the Receiving Party without restriction prior to its disclosure by the Disclosing Party; or (e) was independently developed by employees or consultants of the Receiving Party without reliance on, or reference to, such Confidential Information.
Permitted Disclosures
. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Confidential Information may be disclosed as required by any governmental agency, provided that before disclosing such information the Receiving Party must provide the Disclosing Party with sufficient advance notice of the agency’s request for the information to enable the Receiving Party to exercise any rights it may have to challenge or limit the agency’s authority to receive such Confidential Information, to the extent permitted by applicable law.
PROPRIETARY RIGHTS
Proprietary Rights
. As between you and Branch, you shall retain all right, title and interest in your Digital Properties. If you choose to use Customer’s Digital Properties with a Service, you grant Branch permission to allow the Services to interoperate with your Digital Properties as required for the interoperation of your Digital Properties with the Service. Subject to the limited licenses granted herein, Branch acquires no right, title or interest from you or your licensors under the Agreement in or to your Digital Properties. Subject to the limited rights expressly granted hereunder, Branch, its Affiliates, and its licensors reserve all of their right, title and interest in and to the Services (including the Branch application programming interfaces and the Branch software development kits), all technology utilized by Branch to provide the Services, and all of their related intellectual property rights related to, embodied by, or incorporated in any of the foregoing and including any updates, upgrades, enhancements, modifications and improvements made to, or derivatives of, the foregoing. No copyright is granted by Branch to Customer hereunder. No rights are granted to Customer hereunder other than as expressly set forth herein.
Feedback
. Branch may provide you with a mechanism to provide feedback, suggestions, and ideas, if you choose, about the Services ("
Feedback
"). You agree that Branch may, in its sole discretion, use the Feedback you provide to Branch in any way, including in future enhancements and modifications to the Services. You hereby grant to Branch and its assigns a perpetual, worldwide, fully transferable, sub-licensable, fully paid-up, irrevocable, royalty-free license to use, reproduce, modify, create derivative works from, distribute, and display the Feedback in any manner for any purpose, in any media, software, or technology of any kind now existing or developed in the future, without any obligation to provide attribution or compensation to you or any third party.
WARRANTY & DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTIES
Warranty
. You represent and warrant to Branch that: (a) you are duly organized under applicable law and have sufficient authority to enter into the Agreement; (b) the person entering into the Agreement is authorized to agree to and execute the Agreement on behalf of such party; and (c) the execution and performance of the Agreement does not conflict with any contractual obligations you have to any third party.
DISCLAIMER
. EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY PROVIDED IN THE AGREEMENT, THE SERVICES, AND THE DOCUMENTATION ARE PROVIDED “AS IS,” WITHOUT REPRESENTATION OR WARRANTY OF ANY KIND. WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE. Branch does not warrant the accuracy, completeness, or usefulness of the Services, and the Documentation, nor does Branch warrant that the Services will be free from errors, or that the operations of the Services will be uninterrupted. You rely on the Services and the Documentation at your own risk. SOME JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW THE EXCLUSION OF CERTAIN WARRANTIES IN CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES. ACCORDINGLY THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH ABOVE APPLY TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW.
LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
BRANCH AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND LICENSORS WILL NOT BE LIABLE FOR ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, PUNITIVE, CONSEQUENTIAL, OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO, DAMAGES FOR LOSS OF PROFITS, LOSS OF REVENUE, GOODWILL, USE, DATA THAT IS INCOMPLETE, MISSING, OR INCORRECT, OR OTHER INTANGIBLE LOSSES (EVEN IF BRANCH HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES), RESULTING FROM THIS AGREEMENT.
UNDER NO CIRCUMSTANCES WILL THE TOTAL LIABILITY OF BRANCH AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND LICENSORS RESULTING FROM THIS AGREEMENT (INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO WARRANTY CLAIMS), REGARDLESS OF THE FORUM AND REGARDLESS OF WHETHER ANY ACTION OR CLAIM IS BASED IN CONTRACT, WARRANTY, NEGLIGENCE, STRICT LIABILITY, OR OTHER TORT, BREACH OF ANY STATUTORY DUTY, INDEMNITY OR CONTRIBUTION, OR OTHERWISE, EXCEED THE AMOUNTS, IF ANY, THAT YOU HAVE PAID TO BRANCH FOR USE OF THE SERVICES FOR THE TWELVE (12) MONTH PERIOD PRIOR TO THE CLAIM IN THE AGGREGATE. SOME OF THE LIMITATIONS PROVIDED HEREIN MAY NOT BE ALLOWED UNDER THE LAWS OF CERTAIN JURISDICTIONS.
IF ANY SUCH LAW IS DEEMED TO APPLY TO THE AGREEMENT THEN THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH HEREIN SHALL APPLY TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED UNDER SUCH LAWS.
INDEMNITY
Indemnity
. You will defend Branch, its Affiliates and their officers, agents, employees, representatives, and assigns (“
Branch Indemnified Parties
”) against any claim, demand suit or action against Branch brought by a third party (a) arising from your use of the Services in a unlawful manner or in violation of the Agreement or applicable Order Form, or usage of the Services in violation of the Documentation or (b) alleging that any of your Digital Properties developed or provided by you, or the combination of your Digital Properties used with the Services, infringes or misappropriates such third party’s intellectual property rights (c) based on your instructions to share Shared Data with a Partner or (d) related to a regulatory investigation (each a “
Claim Against Branch
”). You will indemnify Branch Indemnified Parties from any costs, damages, and expenses finally awarded against Branch Indemnified Parties as a result of, or for any amounts paid by Branch Indemnified Parties under a settlement approved by you in writing of, a Claim Against Branch. The above defense and indemnification obligations do not apply if a Claim Against Branch arises from Branch’s breach of the Agreement, or applicable Order Forms.
Agency Indemnity
. If you are an agency or a party representing, or providing services for the benefit of an Agency Client, in addition to the obligations set forth in the section “AGENCIES & PARTNERS” of these Terms, you further agree to indemnify, hold harmless and defend Branch Indemnified Parties from and against any claim, demand, suit, or action and any related liability against a Branch Indemnified Party brought by a third party, arising out of or relating to: (a) any representations and warranties made by you concerning any aspect of the Services to an Agency Client; (b) any claims made by or on behalf of any Agency Client arising out or relating to your use of the Services; and (c) any claims arising out of or relating to acts or omissions of an Agency Client in connection with the Services.
Indemnification Procedure
. Your obligations to provide indemnification under this Agreement will be contingent upon (a) Branch promptly giving you written notice of any claim for which indemnification is sought (provided that the Branch’s failure to notify you will not diminish your obligations under this Section, except to the extent that you are materially prejudiced as a result of such failure); (b) you having sole control of the defense and settlement of any and all claims for which indemnification is sought (provided that no settlement may be entered into without either (i) the consent of Branch if such settlement would require any action on the part of Branch or (ii) unconditionally releasing Branch of all liability); and (c) Branch giving You all reasonably requested assistance at Your expense. Subject to the foregoing, Branch will at all times have the option to participate in any matter or litigation through counsel of its own selection solely at its own expense.
MISCELLANEOUS
Governing Law
. The Agreement and all matters arising out of or relating to the Agreement shall be governed by and construed under the laws of the State of California, without regard to its conflict of law provisions. The parties expressly disclaim and exclude the application of the United Nations Convention on Contracts for the International Sale of Goods.
Venue
. Any legal action or proceeding arising out of or relating to the Agreement shall be brought exclusively in the state or federal courts located in the Northern District of California. You and Branch hereby agree to submit to the jurisdiction of, and agree that venue is proper in, those courts in any such legal action or proceeding.
No Waiver; Severability
. Our failure to enforce any right or provision in the Agreement will not constitute a waiver of such right or provision unless acknowledged and agreed to by us in writing. If any provision of the Agreement is found to be unenforceable or invalid, that provision will be limited or eliminated to the minimum extent necessary so that the Agreement will otherwise remain in full force and effect and enforceable.
Assignment
. The Agreement is not assignable, transferable or sublicensable by you except with Branch’s prior written consent. Branch may transfer and assign any of its rights and obligations under the Agreement freely and without consent.
Entire Agreement
. Both you and Branch agree that the Agreement is the complete and exclusive statement of the mutual understanding of the Parties and supersedes all previous written and oral agreements, communications and other understandings relating to your use of the Services, and that all waivers and modifications must be in a signed writing by both Parties, except as otherwise provided herein. Preprinted terms in your purchase orders or other customer-generated ordering documents, or terms referenced or linked within them, will have no effect on the Agreement and are hereby rejected, regardless of whether they are signed, clicked through, or otherwise agreed to by Branch and/or purport to take precedence over the Agreement. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency among the following documents, the order of precedence shall be: (1) the applicable Order Form, (2) any exhibit, schedule or addendum to the Agreement, (3) the body of these Terms, and (4) the Documentation.
Relationship between the Parties
. The Parties are independent contractors. No agency, partnership, joint venture, fiduciary or employment relationship is created as a result of the Agreement, and you do not have any authority of any kind to bind Branch in any respect whatsoever.
Export / Trade Compliance
. The Services and any derivatives thereof, may be subject to export control and economic sanctions laws and regulations of the United States and other jurisdictions. Both Customer and Branch each represent that it is not named on any U.S. Government Consolidated Screening denied-party list which may be searched at:
https://www.export.gov/article?id=Consolidated-Screening-List
. Customer shall not permit any entity or individual to access or use any of the Services who is listed on the Consolidated Screening List or located in a U.S. government-embargoed country (currently Cuba, Iran, North Korea, Syria and Crimea), or known to be engaged in proliferation of nuclear, chemical or biological weapons or missiles, or otherwise in violation of any U.S. export law or regulation.
Third Party Beneficiary
. No provision of the Agreement is intended, nor shall it be interpreted, to provide or create any third-party beneficiary rights or any other rights of any kind in any customer, affiliate, stockholder, partner, member, director, officer or employee of any party hereto or any other person or entity.
Marketing Support
. You agree to comply with reasonable requests of Branch to support public relations efforts pertaining to the Services, which efforts may include: (a) a press release highlighting your company’s use of the Services; (b) participation in targeted press and analyst interviews highlighting benefits of implementing the Services; and (c) participation in customer case studies developed by Branch and used on Branch’s website(s) and other collateral. You grant to Branch a non-exclusive, non-transferable, limited right to use your name, trademarks, and logos (collectively, the "
Customer Marks
") (i) for the purpose of referencing You as a customer of Branch on the Branch website(s) and (ii) in the production of marketing materials, provided that such use is in accordance with any trademark and logo use guidelines that you provide to Branch. All goodwill developed from such use shall be solely for your benefit.
Notices
. Except as otherwise specified in the Agreement, all notices of termination or an indemnifiable claim related to the Agreement (“Legal Notices”) will be in writing and will be effective (a) upon receipt if personally delivered to one of the addresses listed below, (b) upon receipt if sent by certified or registered mail (return receipt requested), postage prepaid, to one of the addresses listed below, or (c) upon receipt if transmitted by e-mail as set forth below. If to Branch, all notices shall be provided to the mailing and e-mail address set forth below (“
Branch Notices
”). Billing-related notices to Customer will be addressed to the relevant billing contact designated by Customer on the applicable Order Form. All Legal Notices and other notices to Customer will be addressed to the relevant Services account administrator designated by Customer.
Branch Notices
: Legal notices should be sent to:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
With a copy provided to: legal@branch.io
CONTACTING US
If you have any questions or concerns about our Services or these Terms, you may contact us at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
info@branch.io
Effective January 1st 2023
Download
Table of Contents
California Privacy Addendum
Effective: January 1, 2023
This California Privacy Addendum (“Addendum”) amends and is an integral part of Branch Metrics, Inc.’s Terms & Conditions (or instead, where there is a service agreement in place between you and Branch (“Service Agreement”), of that Service Agreement), which together with one or more Order Forms, addendums, or exhibits forms the “Agreement” between you (“Customer,” “you,” or “your”) and Branch Metrics, Inc. d/b/a Branch Metrics (“Branch,” “Branch Metrics,” “we,” or “us”), each a “Party” and collectively the “Parties”. This Addendum shall prevail over any conflicting term of the Agreement regarding the Personal Information of residents of the State of California.
I. DEFINITIONS
Top
The following terms will have the meanings set forth below. Capitalized terms used in this Addendum that are not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Agreement.
“CCPA” means the California Consumer Privacy Act at Cal. Civ. Code §§ 1798.100 - 1798.199, including its implementing regulations.
“Personal Information” shall have the meaning set forth in the CCPA, limited to the information that Branch processes on behalf of Customer in its performance of its obligations under the Agreement.
The terms “Business,” “Service Provider,” “Share,” and “Sell” shall have the meaning set forth in the CCPA.
II. PARTIES’ ROLES AND PROCESSING DETAILS
Top
The Parties agree that you are a Business and Branch is a Service Provider.
Branch shall process Personal Information as necessary for the performance of the Services, as well as related support and professional services as set forth in the Agreement, or where directed by other reasonable documented instructions provided by Customer (collectively, the “Business Purposes”).
III. BRANCH’S OBLIGATIONS
Top
Customer Instructions. Customer directs Branch to collect, retain, use, disclose, and/or otherwise process Personal Information (i) to fulfill Branch’s obligations to perform the Business Purposes, (ii) to fulfill Branch’s obligations in this Addendum, (iii) internal use as permitted by the CCPA, (iv) to detect data security incidents or protect against fraudulent or illegal activity, and (v) as otherwise directed by Customer in writing.
Use Limitations. Except as authorized by the CCPA, Branch shall:
not Sell or Share Personal Information;
not retain, use, or disclose Personal Information outside of the direct business relationship between Customer and Branch that would render it a “Third Party” under CCPA;
not retain, use, or disclose Personal Information for any commercial purpose other than the Business Purposes;
not attempt to re-identify any pseudonymized, anonymized, aggregate, or de-identified Personal Information without Customer’s express written permission;
not attempt to link, identify, or otherwise create a relationship between Personal Information and other personal information or any other data without the express authorization of Customer;
comply with any applicable restrictions under the CCPA on combining Personal Information with personal information that Branch receives from, or on behalf of, another person or persons, or that Branch collects from any interaction between it and any individual;
provide the same level of protection for Personal Information as is required under the CCPA as to Customer;
not otherwise engage in any processing of Personal Information that is prohibited or not permitted by Service Providers under the CCPA; and
notify Customer if Branch determines it can no longer meet its obligations under the CCPA.
Permitted Uses. In addition to the purposes set forth above, Customer understands and agrees that Branch may collect, retain, use, disclose, and otherwise process Personal Information as follows:
To collect, use, retain, share, or disclose Personal Information that has been (A) aggregated or (B) de-identified in accordance with the CCPA.
To comply with applicable laws.
To comply with a civil, criminal, or regulatory inquiry, investigation, subpoena, or summons by federal, state, or local authorities
To cooperate with law enforcement agencies concerning conduct or activity that Customer, Branch, or a third party reasonably and in good faith believes may violate federal, state, or local law.
To exercise or defend legal claims.
Access, Deletion, and Correction Requests. Upon written request of Customer, Branch shall assist Customer in complying with Customer’s obligations under the CCPA to respond to verifiable consumer requests to access, delete, or correct Personal Information. Branch shall have no obligation to re-identify or otherwise link information that is not maintained in a manner that would be considered Personal Information.
Branch Certification. Branch certifies that it understands the restrictions and obligations set forth above.
IV. CUSTOMER RIGHTS AND OBLIGATIONS.
Top
Compliance with Applicable Law. Customer shall comply with applicable laws, including without limitation, and to the extent required: (i) providing notice; (ii) obtaining consent; (iii) honoring access, deletion, opt-out, and opt-in rights and requests; and (iv) otherwise ensuring that it and Branch have any and all rights required in order for Branch to collect, retain, use, disclose, and otherwise process Personal Information under the Agreement.
Customer Directions. Customer shall not direct Branch to collect, retain, use, disclose, or otherwise process Personal Information in violation of the CCPA or other applicable laws.
Responding to Requests. Customer understands and agrees that it is solely responsible for responding to requests to exercise individual rights and that Branch shall have no responsibility to respond directly to an individual on the Customer’s behalf, absent written instructions from the Customer. Where Branch receives a consumer request to access, correct, or delete Personal Information, it may inform the individual that the request cannot be acted upon because the request has been sent to a Service Provider.
Remediation. Customer may take reasonable and appropriate steps to ensure Branch uses the Personal Information consistent with Customer’s obligations under the CCPA. Customer retains the right to take reasonable and appropriate steps to stop and remediate unauthorized processing of Personal Information, including any Personal Information not expressly authorized in this Addendum.
Effective December 22nd 2022
to
January 1st 2023
Download
Table of Contents
California Privacy Addendum
Effective: January 1, 2023
This California Privacy Addendum (“Addendum”) amends and is an integral part of Branch Metrics, Inc.’s Terms & Conditions (or instead, where there is a service agreement in place between you and Branch (“Service Agreement”), of that Service Agreement), which together with one or more Order Forms, addendums, or exhibits forms the “Agreement” between you (“Customer,” “you,” or “your”) and Branch Metrics, Inc. d/b/a Branch Metrics (“Branch,” “Branch Metrics,” “we,” or “us”), each a “Party” and collectively the “Parties”. This Addendum shall prevail over any conflicting term of the Agreement regarding the Personal Information of residents of the State of California.
I. DEFINITIONS
Top
The following terms will have the meanings set forth below. Capitalized terms used in this Addendum that are not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Agreement.
“CCPA” means the California Consumer Privacy Act at Cal. Civ. Code §§ 1798.100 - 1798.199, including its implementing regulations.
“Personal Information” shall have the meaning set forth in the CCPA, limited to the information that Branch processes on behalf of Customer in its performance of its obligations under the Agreement.
The terms “Business,” “Service Provider,” “Share,” and “Sell” shall have the meaning set forth in the CCPA.
II. PARTIES’ ROLES AND PROCESSING DETAILS
Top
The Parties agree that you are a Business and Branch is a Service Provider.
Branch shall process Personal Information as necessary for the performance of the Services, as well as related support and professional services as set forth in the Agreement, or where directed by other reasonable documented instructions provided by Customer (collectively, the “Business Purposes”).
III. BRANCH’S OBLIGATIONS
Top
Customer Instructions. Customer directs Branch to collect, retain, use, disclose, and/or otherwise process Personal Information (i) to fulfill Branch’s obligations to perform the Business Purposes, (ii) to fulfill Branch’s obligations in this Addendum, (iii) internal use as permitted by the CCPA, (iv) to detect data security incidents or protect against fraudulent or illegal activity, and (v) as otherwise directed by Customer in writing.
Use Limitations. Except as authorized by the CCPA, Branch shall:
not Sell or Share Personal Information;
not retain, use, or disclose Personal Information outside of the direct business relationship between Customer and Branch that would render it a “Third Party” under CCPA;
not retain, use, or disclose Personal Information for any commercial purpose other than the Business Purposes;
not attempt to re-identify any pseudonymized, anonymized, aggregate, or de-identified Personal Information without Customer’s express written permission;
not attempt to link, identify, or otherwise create a relationship between Personal Information and other personal information or any other data without the express authorization of Customer;
comply with any applicable restrictions under the CCPA on combining Personal Information with personal information that Branch receives from, or on behalf of, another person or persons, or that Branch collects from any interaction between it and any individual;
provide the same level of protection for Personal Information as is required under the CCPA as to Customer;
not otherwise engage in any processing of Personal Information that is prohibited or not permitted by Service Providers under the CCPA; and
notify Customer if Branch determines it can no longer meet its obligations under the CCPA.
Permitted Uses. In addition to the purposes set forth above, Customer understands and agrees that Branch may collect, retain, use, disclose, and otherwise process Personal Information as follows:
To collect, use, retain, share, or disclose Personal Information that has been (A) aggregated or (B) de-identified in accordance with the CCPA.
To comply with applicable laws.
To comply with a civil, criminal, or regulatory inquiry, investigation, subpoena, or summons by federal, state, or local authorities
To cooperate with law enforcement agencies concerning conduct or activity that Customer, Branch, or a third party reasonably and in good faith believes may violate federal, state, or local law.
To exercise or defend legal claims.
Access, Deletion, and Correction Requests. Upon written request of Customer, Branch shall assist Customer in complying with Customer’s obligations under the CCPA to respond to verifiable consumer requests to access, delete, or correct Personal Information. Branch shall have no obligation to re-identify or otherwise link information that is not maintained in a manner that would be considered Personal Information.
Branch Certification. Branch certifies that it understands the restrictions and obligations set forth above.
IV. CUSTOMER RIGHTS AND OBLIGATIONS.
Top
Compliance with Applicable Law. Customer shall comply with applicable laws, including without limitation, and to the extent required: (i) providing notice; (ii) obtaining consent; (iii) honoring access, deletion, opt-out, and opt-in rights and requests; and (iv) otherwise ensuring that it and Branch have any and all rights required in order for Branch to collect, retain, use, disclose, and otherwise process Personal Information under the Agreement.
Customer Directions. Customer shall not direct Branch to collect, retain, use, disclose, or otherwise process Personal Information in violation of the CCPA or other applicable laws.
Responding to Requests. Customer understands and agrees that it is solely responsible for responding to requests to exercise individual rights and that Branch shall have no responsibility to respond directly to an individual on the Customer’s behalf, absent written instructions from the Customer. Where Branch receives a consumer request to access, correct, or delete Personal Information, it may inform the individual that the request cannot be acted upon because the request has been sent to a Service Provider.
Remediation. Customer may take reasonable and appropriate steps to ensure Branch uses the Personal Information consistent with Customer’s obligations under the CCPA. Customer retains the right to take reasonable and appropriate steps to stop and remediate unauthorized processing of Personal Information, including any Personal Information not expressly authorized in this Addendum.
Effective October 11th 2022
to
December 22nd 2022
Download
Table of Contents
California Privacy Addendum
Updated: September 9th, 2021
This California Privacy Addendum (“Addendum”) amends and is an integral part of Branch Metrics, Inc.’s Terms & Conditions (or instead, where there is a service agreement in place between you and Branch (“Service Agreement”), of that Service Agreement), which together with one or more Order Forms, addendums, or exhibits forms the “Agreement” between you (“Business,” “you,” or “your”) and Branch Metrics, Inc. d/b/a Branch Metrics (“Branch,” “Branch Metrics,” “we,” or “us”), each a “Party” and collectively the “Parties”. This Addendum shall prevail over any conflicting term of the Agreement with regard to the Personal Information of residents of the State of California.
I. DEFINITIONS
Top
The following terms will have the meanings set forth below. Capitalized terms used in this Addendum that are not defined herein shall have the meanings set forth in the Agreement.
“CCPA” means the California Consumer Privacy Act at Cal. Civ. Code §§ 1798.100 - 1798.199.
“Personal Information” shall have the meaning set forth in the CCPA, limited to the information that Branch processes on behalf of Business.
The terms “Business” and “Sell” shall have the meaning set forth in the CCPA.
II. PARTIES’ ROLES
Top
The Parties agree that you are a Business and Branch is a Service Provider, as those terms are defined in the CCPA.
III. BRANCH’S OBLIGATIONS
Top
Business Instructions
. Business directs Branch to collect, retain, use, disclose, and/or otherwise process Personal Information for (i) to fulfill Branch’s obligations to perform the Branch Services under the Agreement, (ii) to fulfill Branch’s obligations in this Addendum, (iii) internal use as permitted by the CCPA, (iv) to detect data security incidents or protect against fraudulent or illegal activity, and (v) as otherwise directed by Business in writing.
Use Limitations
. Branch shall not Sell Personal Information or otherwise retain, use, or disclose Personal Information for any commercial purpose other than for the specific purposes set forth herein.
Permitted Uses
. In addition to the purposes set forth above, Business understands and agrees that Branch may collect, retain, use, disclose, and otherwise process Personal Information as follows:
To collect, use, retain, share, or disclose Personal Information that has been (A) aggregated or (B) de-identified in accordance with the CCPA.
To comply with applicable laws.
To comply with a civil, criminal, or regulatory inquiry, investigation, subpoena, or summons by federal, state, or local authorities
To cooperate with law enforcement agencies concerning conduct or activity that Business, Branch, or a third party reasonably and in good faith believes may violate federal, state, or local law.
To exercise or defend legal claims.
Access and Deletion Requests
. Upon written request of Business, Branch shall assist Business in complying with Business’ obligations under the CCPA to respond to verifiable consumer requests to access or delete Personal Information. Branch shall have no obligation to reidentify or otherwise link information that is not maintained in a manner that would be considered Personal Information.
Branch Certification
. Branch certifies that it understands the restrictions and obligations set forth above.
IV. BUSINESS OBLIGATIONS
Top
Compliance with Applicable Law
. Business shall comply with applicable laws, including without limitation, and to the extent required: (i) providing notice; (ii) obtaining consent; (iii) honoring access, deletion, opt-out, and opt-in rights and requests; and (iv) otherwise ensuring that it and Branch have any and all rights required in order for Branch to collect, retain, use, disclose, and otherwise process Personal Information under the Agreement.
Business Directions
. Business shall not direct Branch to collect, retain, use, disclose, or otherwise process Personal Information in violation of the CCPA or other applicable laws.
Responding to Requests
. Business understands and agrees that it is solely responsible for responding to requests to exercise individual rights and that Branch shall have no responsibility to respond directly to an individual on the Business’ behalf, absent written instructions from the Business. Where Branch receives a consumer request to access or delete Personal Information, it may inform the individual that the request cannot be acted upon because the request has been sent to a Service Provider.
Effective December 13th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Branch, CCPA, and CPRA
On January 1, 2020, the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) took effect. The California Privacy Rights Act (“CPRA”) amendments to the CCPA become effective January 1, 2023. Building on the privacy foundation established through our GDPR compliance efforts, Branch is committed to ensuring that our services continue to comply with the CCPA.
We have created this CCPA resource page to help you understand the steps that Branch has taken regarding its own CCPA compliance, and the tools available to our customers to enable the use of Branch’s services in a CCPA-compliant way.
In this guide, we have capitalized terms
defined by the CCPA
, as amended by the CPRA, so you can easily identify them.
The role of Branch under the CCPA
How does the CCPA apply to the relationship between Branch and its customers?
If you are using Branch analytics and deep-linking services as a customer, there is an agreement between you and Branch that describes the services that Branch provides to you. This agreement may include order forms, exhibits, or addenda, and serves as your instruction to Branch to process personal data as part of Branch’s performance of our services. For the purposes of the CCPA, the data that Branch collects on behalf of its customers may include Personal Information.
When using our analytics and deep-linking services, if you are subject to the CCPA, you are a “Business” and Branch is your “Service Provider,” as those terms are defined in the CCPA. Your disclosure of Personal Information related to your end users with Branch, and Branch’s collection on your behalf of Personal Information related to your end users, are done to facilitate Branch’s performance of its services that you contracted for.
Branch Will Never Sell or Share Personal Information
As part of its provision of analytics and deep-linking services to you, Branch does not “Sell” or “Share” Personal Information of your end users as defined under the CCPA.
This Addendum supplements our agreement with you and confirms our commitment to not Sell or Share Personal Information as part of our analytics and deep-linking services.
How Branch supports CCPA compliance for our customers
CCPA Addendum
Branch has updated its terms to codify our position as your Service Provider (as defined by CCPA). We’ve made our California Privacy addendum available for review, which reflects our CCPA standards. This
California Privacy Addendum
supplements our agreement with you and confirms our commitment to not Sell or Share Personal Information in violation of the CCPA.
California Privacy Addendum
Handling Consumer Rights Requests
As a Business, it is your responsibility under the CCPA to respond to requests relating to the Personal Information of your end users, including end user requests to access, delete, or correct their Personal Information.
Verifiable Consumer Requests
As a Service Provider under the CCPA, Branch works with you when your end users contact you to exercise their rights under the CCPA to obtain access to, delete, or correct Personal Information.
Branch will follow your instructions to delete or rectify Personal Information as required under the law, unless Branch concludes that it is necessary for Branch to maintain such Personal Information for one or more permitted purposes under applicable law (e.g., to detect fraudulent or illegal activity, or to prosecute those responsible for these activities).
To submit an end-user request to our team, reach out to us through our data subject request portal
here
.
Submit Request
CCPA & CPRA - Updated Privacy Policy
Branch’s
Privacy Policy
reflects applicable disclosure requirements under the CCPA, as amended by the CPRA. If you have any questions related to Branch’s CCPA compliance efforts, please contact our Privacy Team at:
privacy@branch.io
.
How to make a request to Branch under the CCPA
If you are a Branch customer who has end users that are California residents and that wish to exercise their CCPA rights, please click below to submit your request on their behalf.
Submit Request
Other Resources
Data collected by Branch
Read our Privacy Policy for full details on the types of data Branch collects, and how we use each one to provide our services.
Privacy Policy
List of third-party vendors
We maintain a list of vendors that process personal data on Branch's behalf, and the purpose for which we share data with each of these vendors.
Third Party Vendors
California Privacy Addendum
California Privacy Addendum
Effective January 1st 2023
to
December 13th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Branch, CCPA, and CPRA
On January 1, 2020, the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) took effect. The California Privacy Rights Act (“CPRA”) amendments to the CCPA become effective January 1, 2023. Building on the privacy foundation established through our GDPR compliance efforts, Branch is committed to ensuring that our services continue to comply with the CCPA.
We have created this CCPA resource page to help you understand the steps that Branch has taken regarding its own CCPA compliance, and the tools available to our customers to enable the use of Branch’s services in a CCPA-compliant way.
In this guide, we have capitalized terms
defined by the CCPA
, as amended by the CPRA, so you can easily identify them.
The role of Branch under the CCPA
How does the CCPA apply to the relationship between Branch and its customers?
If you are using Branch analytics and deep-linking services as a customer, there is an agreement between you and Branch that describes the services that Branch provides to you. This agreement may include order forms, exhibits, or addenda, and serves as your instruction to Branch to process personal data as part of Branch’s performance of our services. For the purposes of the CCPA, the data that Branch collects on behalf of its customers may include Personal Information.
When using our analytics and deep-linking services, if you are subject to the CCPA, you are a “Business” and Branch is your “Service Provider,” as those terms are defined in the CCPA. Your disclosure of Personal Information related to your end users with Branch, and Branch’s collection on your behalf of Personal Information related to your end users, are done to facilitate Branch’s performance of its services that you contracted for.
Branch Will Never Sell or Share Personal Information
As part of its provision of analytics and deep-linking services to you, Branch does not “Sell” or “Share” Personal Information of your end users as defined under the CCPA.
This Addendum supplements our agreement with you and confirms our commitment to not Sell or Share Personal Information as part of our analytics and deep-linking services.
How Branch supports CCPA compliance for our customers
CCPA Addendum
Branch has updated its terms to codify our position as your Service Provider (as defined by CCPA). We’ve made our California Privacy addendum available for review, which reflects our CCPA standards. This
California Privacy Addendum
supplements our agreement with you and confirms our commitment to not Sell or Share Personal Information in violation of the CCPA.
California Privacy Addendum
Handling Consumer Rights Requests
As a Business, it is your responsibility under the CCPA to respond to requests relating to the Personal Information of your end users, including end user requests to access, delete, or correct their Personal Information.
Verifiable Consumer Requests
As a Service Provider under the CCPA, Branch works with you when your end users contact you to exercise their rights under the CCPA to obtain access to, delete, or correct Personal Information.
Branch will follow your instructions to delete or rectify Personal Information as required under the law, unless Branch concludes that it is necessary for Branch to maintain such Personal Information for one or more permitted purposes under applicable law (e.g., to detect fraudulent or illegal activity, or to prosecute those responsible for these activities).
To submit an end-user request to our team, reach out to us through our data subject request portal and we will work with you to fulfill your end user’s request for Personal Information we process on your behalf. Please include in that request the end-user’s advertising identifier (e.g., IDFA/GAID), and the date you received the end-user’s request. For further information about how to submit these requests to Branch on behalf of your end users, please click
here
.
Submit Request
CCPA & CPRA - Updated Privacy Policy
Branch’s
privacy policy
reflects applicable disclosure requirements under the CCPA, as amended by the CPRA. If you have any questions related to Branch’s CCPA compliance efforts, please contact our Privacy Team at:
privacy@branch.io
.
How to make a request to Branch under the CCPA
If you are a Branch customer who has end users that are California residents and that wish to exercise their CCPA rights, please click below to submit your request on their behalf.
Submit Request
Other Resources
Data collected by Branch
Read our Privacy Policy for full details on the types of data Branch collects, and how we use each one to provide our services.
Privacy Policy
List of third-party vendors
We maintain a list of vendors that process personal data on Branch's behalf, and the purpose for which we share data with each of these vendors.
Third Party Vendors
California Privacy Addendum
California Privacy Addendum
Effective December 22nd 2022
to
January 1st 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Branch, CCPA, and CPRA
On January 1, 2020, the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) took effect. The California Privacy Rights Act (“CPRA”) amendments to the CCPA become effective January 1, 2023. Building on the privacy foundation established through our GDPR compliance efforts, Branch is committed to ensuring that our services continue to comply with the CCPA.
We have created this CCPA resource page to help you understand the steps that Branch has taken regarding its own CCPA compliance, and the tools available to our customers to enable the use of Branch’s services in a CCPA-compliant way.
In this guide, we have capitalized terms
defined by the CCPA
, as amended by the CPRA, so you can easily identify them.
The role of Branch under the CCPA
How does the CCPA apply to the relationship between Branch and its customers?
If you are using Branch analytics and deep-linking services as a customer, there is an agreement between you and Branch that describes the services that Branch provides to you. This agreement may include order forms, exhibits, or addenda, and serves as your instruction to Branch to process personal data as part of Branch’s performance of our services. For the purposes of the CCPA, the data that Branch collects on behalf of its customers may include Personal Information.
When using our analytics and deep-linking services, if you are subject to the CCPA, you are a “Business” and Branch is your “Service Provider,” as those terms are defined in the CCPA. Your disclosure of Personal Information related to your end users with Branch, and Branch’s collection on your behalf of Personal Information related to your end users, are done to facilitate Branch’s performance of its services that you contracted for.
Branch Will Never Sell or Share Personal Information
As part of its provision of analytics and deep-linking services to you, Branch does not “Sell” or “Share” Personal Information of your end users as defined under the CCPA.
This Addendum supplements our agreement with you and confirms our commitment to not Sell or Share Personal Information as part of our analytics and deep-linking services.
How Branch supports CCPA compliance for our customers
CCPA Addendum
Branch has updated its terms to codify our position as your Service Provider (as defined by CCPA). We’ve made our California Privacy addendum available for review, which reflects our CCPA standards. This
California Privacy Addendum
supplements our agreement with you and confirms our commitment to not Sell or Share Personal Information in violation of the CCPA.
California Privacy Addendum
Handling Consumer Rights Requests
As a Business, it is your responsibility under the CCPA to respond to requests relating to the Personal Information of your end users, including end user requests to access, delete, or correct their Personal Information.
Verifiable Consumer Requests
As a Service Provider under the CCPA, Branch works with you when your end users contact you to exercise their rights under the CCPA to obtain access to, delete, or correct Personal Information.
Branch will follow your instructions to delete or rectify Personal Information as required under the law, unless Branch concludes that it is necessary for Branch to maintain such Personal Information for one or more permitted purposes under applicable law (e.g., to detect fraudulent or illegal activity, or to prosecute those responsible for these activities).
To submit an end-user request to our team, reach out to us through our data subject request portal and we will work with you to fulfill your end user’s request for Personal Information we process on your behalf. Please include in that request the end-user’s advertising identifier (e.g., IDFA/GAID), and the date you received the end-user’s request. For further information about how to submit these requests to Branch on behalf of your end users, please click
here
.
Submit Request
CCPA & CPRA - Updated Privacy Policy
Branch’s
privacy policy
reflects applicable disclosure requirements under the CCPA, as amended by the CPRA. If you have any questions related to Branch’s CCPA compliance efforts, please contact our Privacy Team at:
privacy@branch.io
.
How to make a request to Branch under the CCPA
If you are a Branch customer who has end users that are California residents and that wish to exercise their CCPA rights, please click below to submit your request on their behalf.
Submit Request
Other Resources
Data collected by Branch
Read our Privacy Policy for full details on the types of data Branch collects, and how we use each one to provide our services.
Privacy Policy
List of third-party vendors
We maintain a list of vendors that process personal data on Branch's behalf, and the purpose for which we share data with each of these vendors.
Third Party Vendors
California Privacy Addendum
California Privacy Addendum
Effective December 12th 2022
to
December 22nd 2022
Download
Table of Contents
Branch and CCPA
On January 1, 2020, the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (CCPA) took effect. Building on the privacy foundation established through our GDPR compliance efforts, Branch is committed to ensuring that our services comply with CCPA.
We have created this CCPA resource page to help you understand the steps that Branch has taken regarding its own CCPA compliance, and the tools available to our customers to enable the use of Branch’s services in a CCPA-compliant way.
In this guide, we have capitalized terms
defined by CCPA
so you can easily identify them.
The role of Branch under CCPA
How does CCPA apply to the relationship between Branch and its customers?
If you are using Branch services as a customer, there is an agreement between you and Branch that describes the services that Branch provides to you. This agreement may include order forms, exhibits, or addenda, and serves as your instruction to Branch to process personal data as part of Branch’s performance of our services. For the purposes of CCPA, the data that Branch collects on behalf of its customers may include Personal Information.
In this context, if you are subject to CCPA, you are a Business and Branch is your Service Provider. Your sharing of Personal Information related to your end users with Branch, and Branch’s collection of Personal Information related to your end users, are done to facilitate Branch’s performance of its services that you contracted for.
Branch Will Never Sell Personal Information
Branch does not Sell Personal Information of your end users as defined under CCPA, or under any other circumstances. Pursuant to the terms of your agreement with Branch, you pay fees or other valuable consideration only in return for the services that Branch performs on your behalf. Branch does not receive from you, and you do not pay Branch, any monetary or other valuable consideration for making Personal Information available to Branch.
How Branch supports CCPA compliance for our customers
CCPA Addendum
Branch has updated its terms to codify our position as your Service Provider (as defined by CCPA). We’ve made our CCPA addendum available for review, which reflects our CCPA standards. This
California Privacy Addendum
supplements our agreement with you and confirms our commitment to not Sell Personal Information.
California Privacy Addendum
Handling Consumer Rights Requests
As a Business, it is your responsibility under CCPA to respond to requests relating to the Personal Information of your end users. It is at your sole discretion whether to accept or deny any request, and how to respond to the end user.
Verifiable Consumer Requests
When your end users exercise their rights under CCPA to obtain access to or delete certain Personal Information that Branch processes, Branch is committed to working with you to fulfill these requests, provided the request comes directly from you.
Branch will follow your instructions to delete Personal Information following a Verifiable Consumer Request as required under CCPA, unless Branch concludes that it is necessary for Branch to maintain such Personal Information for one or more permitted purposes under the CCPA (e.g., to detect fraudulent or illegal activity, or to prosecute those responsible for these activities), or Branch does not consider the information to be “Personal Information” (e.g., because it has been de-identified).
To submit a CCPA end-user request to our team, reach out to us through our data subject request portal and we will work with you to fulfill your end user’s request. Please include in that request the end-user’s advertising identifier (e.g., IDFA/GAID), and the date you received the end-user’s request. For further information about how to submit CCPA requests to Branch on behalf of your end users, please click
here
.
Submit Request
CCPA-Updated Privacy Policy
Branch’s
privacy policy
reflects applicable disclosure requirements under CCPA. If you have any questions related to Branch’s CCPA compliance efforts, please contact our Privacy Team at:
privacy@branch.io
.
How to make a request to Branch under CCPA
If you are a California resident and wish to exercise your CCPA rights, please click below to submit your request.
Submit Request
Other Resources
Data collected by Branch
Read our Privacy Policy for full details on the types of data Branch collects, and how we use each one to provide our services.
Privacy Policy
List of third-party vendors
We maintain a list of vendors that process personal data on Branch's behalf, and the purpose for which we share data with each of these vendors.
Third Party Vendors
California Privacy Addendum
This Addendum supplements our agreement with you and confirms our commitment to not Sell Personal Information.
CCPA Addendum
Effective December 31st 2024
Download
Table of Contents
CA Privacy Notice & Additional Information for Other U.S. States
Information for California Residents
Top
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“
CCPA
”) provides certain rights to residents of California. If you are a California resident interacting with us through our provision of services to our Clients, your personal information is controlled by the applicable Client(s), and you should contact them to exercise your rights under the CCPA. This section applies to you if you are a resident of California about whom we collect personal information independent of the services we provide to Clients (“
California Consumer
”), such as if you provide us personal information on our Website. This section does not apply to personal information we collect from our employees and job applicants in their capacity as employees and job applicants. This notice supplements the information in our Privacy Policy available
here
.
Certain terms used below have the meanings given to them in the CCPA.
1. Categories of personal information we collect, purposes of use, and to whom we disclose
Top
As described in our Privacy Policy in the preceding twelve months, we may have collected the following categories of personal information about you for business or commercial purposes:
Identifiers, e.g., name, email address, Github ID
Device Information and Device Identifiers, e.g., IP address, browser type and device locale, operating system, mobile platform, device model
Financial Information, e.g., credit or debit card number, verification number, and expiration date
Commercial Information, e.g., delivery information and information about your transactions and purchases with us
Connection and Usage Data, e.g., web browsing activity on the Website
General location, e.g., information inferred from IP addresses
Other Information, e.g., any other information you provide to us through the Website
Inferences drawn from any of the above, e.g. information on your employer inferred from an IP address
We collect the categories of personal information identified above from the following sources: (1) directly from you; (2) through your use of the Website; and (3) affiliates; and (4) other parties such as data brokers providing business information and social networking providers if you connect Branch to your use of those services.
As described in our Privacy Policy, we collect the categories of personal information identified above for the following business and commercial purposes:
Communicate with you, such as (1) to respond to your requests for information and provide you with customer service and technical support; (2) to send communications or content that you have requested; (3) to provide you with transactional updates and information about the Services (e.g., inform you about updates to our Services, information about your account); and/or (4) in accordance with applicable legal requirements, contact you by email, postal mail, phone, advertising or SMS regarding our business and products and services offered by other parties, surveys, promotions, special events and other subjects that we think may be of interest to you.
Transact with you if you use our products or services
Provide the Services, such as (1) to process and fulfill your transactions or requests; (2) to engage in analysis, research, and reports to better understand how you use the Services, so we can improve them; (3) to administer entries into promotions or surveys; and/or (4) to understand and resolve technical issues with our Services.
Tell you about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
Personalize your experience, such as (1) to customize the advertising and content on the Services based on your activities and interests; (2) to create and update audience segments that can be used for targeted advertising and marketing on the Services, services and platforms offered by other parties, and mobile apps; and/or (3) to create profiles about you, including adding and combining information we obtain from other parties, which may be used for analytics, marketing, and advertising.
Improve our offerings.
Secure our Services and fraud prevention, such as (1) to monitor, prevent, and detect fraud, such as through verifying your identity; (2) to combat spam or other malware or security risks; and/or (3) to monitor, enforce, and improve the security of our Services.
Defending our legal rights and complying with the law, such as (1) to comply with any applicable procedures, laws, and regulations where it is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others; and/or (2) to establish, exercise, or defend our legal rights where it is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others (e.g., to enforce compliance with our Terms and Conditions, Privacy Policy, or to protect our Services, Users, or others).
Additional information concerning the business and commercial purposes is set forth in the “
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected?
” section of our Privacy Policy. We may disclose the categories of personal information identified in this California Privacy Notice about our California Consumers for our operational purposes where the use of such personal information is reasonably necessary and proportionate to achieve the operational purpose for which the personal information was collected or processed or for another operational purpose that is compatible with the context in which the personal information was collected.
How We Disclose Your Information
Top
We disclose the information collected from and about you as discussed above for various business purposes. The chart below explains the categories of information that we may disclose to other parties and the categories of those parties.
Other Parties to whom we disclose information and why
Categories of information
disclosed
Our Affiliates
. We may disclose information we collect within our family of companies to deliver products and services to you, and enhance our products, services, and your customer experience.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed to our affiliates
Service Providers that perform services on our behalf
: including billing and payment processing, sales, marketing, advertising, data analysis and insight, research, technical support and customer service, data storage, security, fraud prevention, and legal services.
All categories of information we collect
may be disclosed to our vendors
Other Individuals, Services, and Vendors at Your Request
. We will disclose your information to other businesses and services at your request. For example, if you direct us to communicate information to one of your vendors.
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Communications with event vendors
Location
Other Information
Unaffiliated Partners for Marketing Purposes.
We may disclose your information to partners whose offerings we think may interest you. For example, if you participate in co-sponsored promotions, then we may disclose information to our affiliates and other parties for their marketing and other purposes.
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Unaffiliated Partners to Provide Co-Branded Products and Services
. In some cases, we may disclose information to unaffiliated partners to provide co-branded products or services (e.g., co-sponsored promotions).
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Location
Other Parties for Legal Purposes
. By using the Services, you acknowledge and agree that we may access, retain, and disclose the information we collect and maintain about you if required to do so by law or in a good faith belief that such access, retention or disclosure is reasonably necessary to: (a) comply with legal process or a regulatory investigation (e.g. a subpoena or court order); (b) enforce our Terms and Conditions, this Privacy Policy, or other contracts with you, including investigation of potential violations thereof; (c) respond to claims that any content violates the rights of other parties; and/or (d) protect our rights, property or personal safety, or that of our agents and affiliates, our users and/or the public. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for information security, fraud protection, spam/malware prevention, and similar purposes.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed as necessary
Other Parties in a Business Transaction.
We may disclose information in connection with an actual or contemplated corporate transaction, including for example a merger, investment, acquisition, reorganization, consolidation, bankruptcy, liquidation, or sale of some or all of our assets.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed as necessary
Online Advertisers and Ad Networks.
As discussed in the “Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website” Section of our Privacy Policy, the Services may rely on advertising technologies that allow for the delivery of relevant content and advertising on the Services, as well as on other websites you visit and other applications you use, and these technologies will collect certain information from your use of the Services to assist in delivering such ads.
Identifiers
Device information and device identifiers
Connection and usage data
Geolocation
2. Sales and sharing of Website User personal information
Top
We may disclose Website Users’ personal information to third parties for purposes of Website analytics and advertising the Website and Services. We provide Website User information to analytics providers to better understand how Website Users use the Website so we can improve the Website and create new products and services. We may also provide Website Users’ personal information to third- party advertising providers for targeted advertising purposes, so we can provide Website Users with more relevant and tailored ads regarding our Website and Services. Under the CCPA, disclosing Website User personal information to these third parties may be considered a “sale” of personal information or the “sharing” of personal information for purposes of “cross-context behavioral advertising.” In the last 12 months, we have disclosed the following categories of Website User personal information to advertisers and ad networks: identifiers, device information and device identifiers, connection and usage data, and general location data. This may be considered “sharing” or a “sale” under the CCPA.
We do not knowingly “sell” or “share” the personal information of children under 16.
3. California Rights and Choices
Top
Without being discriminated against for exercising these rights, California residents have the right to request that we disclose what personal information we collect about you, to request access to and correction of such personal information, and to delete that information, subject to certain restrictions. You also have the right to designate an agent to exercise these rights on your behalf. This section describes how to exercise those rights and our process for handling those requests. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
Right to limit the use and disclosure of “sensitive personal information”
The CCPA allows you to limit the use or disclosure of your “sensitive personal information” (as defined in the CCPA) if your sensitive personal information is used for certain purposes. Your account log-in and password or other credentials allowing access to your account constitutes “sensitive personal information” under the CCPA. Please note that we do not use or disclose sensitive personal information other than for purposes for which you cannot opt-out under the CCPA.
Right to request access to your personal information
California residents have the right to request that we disclose the categories of personal information we have collected or disclosed about you, the categories of sources of such information, the business or commercial purpose for collecting, “selling,” or “sharing” your personal information, the categories of third parties to whom we disclose or “sell,” or with whom we “share,” personal information, and the categories of personal information we “sell” or “share”. You may also request the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected from you. However, we may withhold some personal information as permitted under applicable law. For example, to protect your security, we may withhold your account password from the information provided in response to a request for the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected about you.
Right to correct inaccurate personal information
You may request that we correct inaccurate personal information about you. We may deny your request as permitted by the CCPA. For example, we may not correct personal information stored in backups or archives except where required by the CCPA.
Right to request deletion of your personal information
You may also request that we delete any personal information that we collected from you. However, we may retain personal information necessary to (a) protect our business, systems, and users from fraudulent activity, (b) to address technical issues that impair existing functionality, (c) necessary for us, or others, to exercise their free speech or other rights, (d) comply with law enforcement requests pursuant to lawful process, (e) for our own internal purposes reasonably related to your relationship with us, or to comply with legal obligations. Additionally, we need certain types of information so that we can provide our Services to you. If you ask us to delete it, you may no longer be able to access or use our Services.
Right to nondiscrimination
We will not deny, charge different prices for, or provide a different level of quality of goods or services if you choose to exercise these rights.
Right to Opt-out of the Sale or Sharing of Personal Information
You also have the right to opt out of the “sale” or “sharing” of your personal information. Branch shares personal information as described above, which may be considered a “sale” or “sharing” of personal information under the CCPA. You may opt out of such “sales” or “sharing” of your personal information, by clicking the “Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information" link located at the bottom of our website and selecting your preferences on that page. Please note that we also respond to and abide by opt-out preference signals sent through the Global Privacy Control. Any opt out preferences you have exercised through these methods will only apply to the specific device/browser on which you made them. For more information on how to use the Global Privacy Control, see www.globalprivacycontrol.org.
Financial Incentives
You may have the right to receive information about the financial incentives that we offer to you, if any.
Authorized Agents
You may also designate an agent to make requests to exercise your rights under CCPA as described above. We will take steps both to verify the identity of the person seeking to exercise their rights as listed above, and to verify that your agent has been authorized to make a request on your behalf (e.g. through providing us with a signed written authorization or a copy of a power of attorney).
How to exercise your access and deletion rights
Subject to restrictions under applicable law, California residents may exercise their California privacy rights by
submitting your request to us here
, or by contacting us at
privacy@branch.io
,
or at (650) 209-6461.
For security purposes, when you request to exercise your California privacy rights we will verify your identity. Once we have verified your identity
(and your agent, as applicable)
, we will respond to your request as appropriate:
Transparency
. Where you have requested the categories of personal information that we have collected about you, we will direct you to the sections of our Privacy Policy relevant to your request.
Access
. Where you have requested specific pieces of personal information, we will provide the information you have requested, except where not permitted under applicable law or otherwise exempted by the CCPA.
Deletion
. Where you have requested that we delete personal information that we have collected from you, we will delete any information about you that is not necessary for the purposes indicated above. Upon completion, we will send you a notice confirming that we deleted the information we collected from you. Certain information may be exempt from such requests under applicable law.
If we are unable to complete your requests fully for any of the reasons above, we will provide you additional information about the reasons that we could not comply with your request.
Submitting CCPA Requests
For our Website:
If you are a California Consumer, please
submit a CCPA request here
, or contact us at
privacy@branch.io
or at (650) 209-6461. To protect your privacy and maintain security, we take steps to verify your identity before granting you access to your personal information or complying with your request. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
Requests from Our Client’s Users:
Because Branch is a vendor that processes data on behalf of its Clients, any requests from Users who are California residents seeking to exercise their rights of access and deletion under the CCPA should be provided to the Client directly. Branch will support Clients as needed with responding to User requests within a reasonable timeframe.
4. Additional Information for Residents of Certain Other States
Top
Depending on where you reside, in addition to the rights described under “
Your Rights
” in our Privacy Policy, you may have certain rights with respect to your Personal Data that we process in our capacity as a data controller, subject to applicable law:
Right to Opt out of Sale or Processing for Targeted Advertising:
You have the right to opt out of the “sale” of your personal information, or the processing of your personal information for targeted advertising. You may opt out, by clicking the “
Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information
.
" link located at the bottom of our website and selecting your preferences on that page.  Alternatively, you may opt out by sending a legally recognized opt-out preference signal such as Global Privacy Control. Any opt out preferences you have exercised will only apply to the specific device/browser on which you made them. For more information on how to use the Global Privacy Control, see www.globalprivacycontrol.org.
Your Privacy Rights relating to Client data:
If personal information pertaining to you as an individual has been submitted to the Service by or on behalf of a Branch Client and you wish to exercise any data protection rights you may have in respect of that information under applicable law, including (as applicable) the right to access, correct, amend or delete such information, please inquire with the relevant Client directly. We may only access a Client’s data at their instruction but will support them as needed in responding to your request.
Certain information may be exempt from such requests under applicable law. Depending on applicable law, if we deny your request to exercise your rights in whole or in part, you may have the right to appeal the decision. In such circumstances, you can contact us
privacy@branch.io
with the subject line “Data Privacy Request Appeal” to provide us with information about why you are appealing the decision.
5. Retention of Your Personal Information
Top
Please see the
Our Data Retention Policy
section provided in the Privacy Policy.
Effective December 17th 2024
to
December 31st 2024
Download
Table of Contents
California Consumer Privacy Act
Top
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (
“CCPA”
) provides certain rights to residents of California. If you are a California resident interacting with us through our provision of services to our Clients, your personal information is controlled by the applicable Client(s), and you should contact them to exercise your rights under the CCPA. This section applies to you if you are a resident of California about whom we collect personal information independent of the services we provide to Clients (“
California Consumer
”), such as if you provide us personal information on our Website. This section does not apply to personal information we collect from our employees and job applicants in their capacity as employees and job applicants. This notice supplements the information in our
Privacy Policy
. Certain terms used below have the meanings given to them in the CCPA.
1. Categories of personal information we collect, purposes of use, and to whom we disclose
Top
As described in our Privacy Policy in the preceding twelve months, we may have collected the following categories of personal information about you for business or commercial purposes:
Identifiers, e.g., name, email address, Github ID
Device Information and Device Identifiers, e.g., IP address, browser type and device locale, operating system, mobile platform, device model
Financial Information, e.g., credit or debit card number, verification number, and expiration date
Commercial Information, e.g., delivery information and information about your transactions and purchases with us
Connection and Usage Data, e.g., web browsing activity on the Website,
General location, e.g., information inferred from IP addresses
Other Information, e.g., any other information you provide to us through the Website
Inferences drawn from any of the above, e.g. information on your employer inferred from an IP address.
We collect the categories of personal information identified above from the following sources: (1) directly from you; (2) through your use of the Website; and (3) affiliates; and (4) other parties such as data brokers providing business information and social networking providers if you connect Branch to your use of those services.
As described in our Privacy Policy, we collect the categories of personal information identified above for the following business and commercial
purposes
:
Communicate with you, such as (1) to respond to your requests for information and provide you with customer service and technical support; (2) to send communications or content that you have requested; (3) to provide you with transactional updates and information about the Services (e.g., inform you about updates to our Services, information about your account); and/or (4) in accordance with applicable legal requirements, contact you by email, postal mail, phone, advertising or SMS regarding our business and products and services offered by other parties, surveys, promotions, special events and other subjects that we think may be of interest to you.
Transact with you if you use our products or services.
Provide the Services, such as (1) to process and fulfill your transactions or requests; (2) to engage in analysis, research, and reports to better understand how you use the Services, so we can improve them; (3) to administer entries into promotions or surveys; and/or (4) to understand and resolve technical issues with our Services.
Tell you about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners.
Personalize your experience, such as (1) to customize the advertising and content on the Services based on your activities and interests; (2) to create and update audience segments that can be used for targeted advertising and marketing on the Services, services and platforms offered by other parties, and mobile apps; and/or (3) to create profiles about you, including adding and combining information we obtain from other parties, which may be used for analytics, marketing, and advertising.
Improve our offerings.
Secure our Services and fraud prevention, such as (1) to monitor, prevent, and detect fraud, such as through verifying your identity; (2) to combat spam or other malware or security risks; and/or (3) to monitor, enforce, and improve the security of our Services.
Defending our legal rights and complying with the law, such as (1) to comply with any applicable procedures, laws, and regulations where it is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others; and/or (2) to establish, exercise, or defend our legal rights where it is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others (e.g., to enforce compliance with our Terms and Conditions, Privacy Policy, or to protect our Services, Users, or others).
Additional information concerning the business and commercial purposes is set forth in the “
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected
?” section of our Privacy Policy. We may disclose the categories of personal information identified in this California Privacy Notice about our California Consumers for our operational purposes where the use of such personal information is reasonably necessary and proportionate to achieve the operational purpose for which the personal information was collected or processed or for another operational purpose that is compatible with the context in which the personal information was collected.
How We Disclose Your Information
Top
We disclose the information collected from and about you as discussed above for various business purposes. The chart below explains the categories of information that we may disclose to other parties and the categories of those parties.
Other Parties to whom we disclose information and why
Categories of information disclosed
Our Affiliates
. We may disclose information we collect within our family of companies to deliver products and services to you, and enhance our products, services, and your customer experience.
All categories of
information we collect
may be disclosed to our
affiliates
Service Providers that perform services on our behalf
: including billing and payment processing, sales, marketing, advertising, data analysis and insight, research, technical support and customer service, data storage, security, fraud prevention, and legal services.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed to our vendors
Other Individuals, Services, and Vendors at Your Request
. We will disclose your information to other businesses and services at your request. For example, if you direct us to communicate information to one of your vendors.
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Communications with event vendors
Location
Other Information
Unaffiliated Partners for Marketing Purposes
. We may disclose your information to partners whose offerings we think may interest you. For example, if you participate in co-sponsored promotions, then we may disclose information to our affiliates and other parties for their marketing and other purposes.
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Unaffiliated Partners to Provide Co-Branded Products and Services
. In some cases, we may disclose information to unaffiliated partners to provide co-branded products or services (e.g., co-sponsored promotions).
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Location
Other Parties for Legal Purposes
. By using the Services, you acknowledge and agree that we may access, retain, and disclose the information we collect and maintain about you if required to do so by law or in a good faith belief that such access, retention or disclosure is reasonably necessary to: (a) comply with legal process or a regulatory investigation (e.g. a subpoena or court order); (b) enforce our Terms and Conditions, this Privacy Policy, or other contracts with you, including investigation of potential violations thereof; (c) respond to claims that any content violates the rights of other parties; and/or (d) protect our rights, property or personal safety, or that of our agents and affiliates, our users and/or the public. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for information security, fraud protection, spam/malware prevention, and similar purposes.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed as necessary
Other Parties in a Business Transaction
. We may disclose information in connection with an actual or contemplated corporate transaction, including for example a merger, investment, acquisition, reorganization, consolidation, bankruptcy, liquidation, or sale of some or all of our assets.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed as necessary
Online Advertisers and Ad Networks
. As discussed in the “Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website” Section of our Privacy Policy, the Services may rely on advertising technologies that allow for the delivery of relevant content and advertising on the Services, as well as on other websites you visit and other applications you use, and these technologies will collect certain information from your use of the Services to assist in delivering such ads.
Identifiers
Device information and device identifiers
Connection and usage data
Geolocation
2. Sales and sharing of Website User personal information
Top
We may disclose Website Users’ personal information to third parties for purposes of Website analytics and advertising the Website and Services. We provide Website User information to analytics providers to better understand how Website Users use the Website so we can improve the Website and create new products and services. We may also provide Website Users’ personal information to third- party advertising providers for targeted advertising purposes, so we can provide Website Users with more relevant and tailored ads regarding our Website and Services. Under the CCPA, disclosing Website User personal information to these third parties may be considered a “sale” of personal information or the “sharing” of personal information for purposes of “cross-context behavioral advertising.” In the last 12 months, we have disclosed the following categories of Website User personal information to advertisers and ad networks: identifiers, device information and device identifiers, connection and usage data, and general location data. This may be considered “sharing” or a “sale” under the CCPA.
We do not knowingly “sell” or “share” the personal information of children under 16.
3. California Rights and Choices
Without being discriminated against for exercising these rights, California residents have the right to request that we disclose what personal information we collect about you, to request access to and correction of such personal information, and to delete that information, subject to certain restrictions. You also have the right to designate an agent to exercise these rights on your behalf. This section describes how to exercise those rights and our process for handling those requests. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
Right to limit the use and disclosure of "sensitive personal information"
The CCPA allows you to limit the use or disclosure of your “sensitive personal information” (as defined in the CCPA) if your sensitive personal information is used for certain purposes. Your account log-in and password or other credentials allowing access to your account constitutes “sensitive personal information” under the CCPA. Please note that we do not use or disclose sensitive personal information other than for purposes for which you cannot opt-out under the CCPA.
Right to request access to your personal information
California residents have the right to request that we disclose the categories of personal information we have collected or disclosed about you, the categories of sources of such information, the business or commercial purpose for collecting, “selling,” or “sharing” your
personal information, the categories of third parties to whom we disclose or “sell,” or with whom we “share,” personal information, and the categories of personal information we “sell” or “share”. You may also request the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected from you. However, we may withhold some personal information as permitted under applicable law. For example, to protect your security, we may withhold your account password from the information provided in response to a request for the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected about you.
Right to correct inaccurate personal information
You may request that we correct inaccurate personal information about you. We may deny your request as permitted by the CCPA. For example, we may not correct personal information stored in backups or archives except where required by the CCPA.
Right to request deletion of your personal information
You may also request that we delete any personal information that we collected from you. However, we may retain personal information necessary to (a) protect our business, systems, and users from fraudulent activity, (b) to address technical issues that impair existing functionality, (c) necessary for us, or others, to exercise their free speech or other rights, (d) comply with law enforcement requests pursuant to lawful process, (e) for our own internal purposes reasonably related to your relationship with us, or to comply with legal obligations. Additionally, we need certain types of information so that we can provide our Services to you. If you ask us to delete it, you may no longer be able to access or use our Services.
Right to nondiscrimination
We will not deny, charge different prices for, or provide a different level of quality of goods or services if you choose to exercise these rights.
Right to Opt-out of the Sale or Sharing of Personal Information
You also have the right to opt out of the “sale” or “sharing” of your personal information. Branch shares personal information as described above, which may be considered a “sale” or “sharing” of personal information under the CCPA. You may opt out of such “sales” or “sharing” of your personal information, by clicking  this link:
Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information.
located at the bottom of
our website
and selecting your preferences on that page. Please note that we also respond to and abide by opt-out preference signals sent through the Global Privacy Control. Any opt out preferences you have exercised through these methods will only apply to the specific device/browser on which you made them. For more information on how to use the Global Privacy Control, see www.globalprivacycontrol.org.
Other rights
You may have the right to receive information about the financial incentives that we offer to you, if any.
Authorized Agents
You may also designate an agent to make requests to exercise your rights under CCPA as described above. We will take steps both to verify the identity of the person seeking to exercise their rights as listed above, and to verify that your agent has been authorized to make a request on your behalf (e.g. through providing us with a signed written authorization or a copy of a power of attorney).
How to exercise your access and deletion rights
Subject to restrictions under applicable law, California residents may exercise their California privacy rights by
submitting your request
to us
here
, or by contacting us at
privacy@branch.io,
or at (650) 209-6461.
For security purposes, when you request to exercise your California privacy rights we will verify your identity. Once we have verified your identity
(and your agent, as applicable)
, we will respond to your request as appropriate:
Transparency
. Where you have requested the categories of personal information that we have collected about you, we will direct you to the sections of our Privacy Policy relevant to your request.
Access
. Where you have requested specific pieces of personal information, we will provide the information you have requested, except where not permitted under applicable law or otherwise exempted by the CCPA.
Deletion
. Where you have requested that we delete personal information that we have collected from you, we will delete any information about you that is not necessary for the purposes indicated above. Upon completion, we will send you a notice confirming that we deleted the information we collected from you. Certain information may be exempt from such requests under applicable law.
If we are unable to complete your requests fully for any of the reasons above, we will provide you additional information about the reasons that we could not comply with your request.
Submitting CCPA Requests
For our Website: If you are a California Consumer, please
submit a CCPA request here
, or contact us at
privacy@branch.io
or at (650) 209-6461. To protect your privacy and maintain security, we take steps to verify your identity before granting you access to your personal information or complying with your request. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
Requests from Our Client’s Users: Because Branch is a vendor that processes data on behalf of its Clients, any requests from Users who are California residents seeking to exercise their rights of access and deletion under the CCPA must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
4. Retention of Your Personal Information
Top
Please see the
Our Data Retention Policy
section provided in Branch’s Privacy Policy.
Effective December 28th 2023
to
December 17th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
California Consumer Privacy Act
Top
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (
“CCPA”
) provides certain rights to residents of California. If you are a California resident interacting with us through our provision of services to our Clients, your personal information is controlled by the applicable Client(s), and you should contact them to exercise your rights under the CCPA. This section applies to you if you are a resident of California about whom we collect personal information independent of the services we provide to Clients (“
California Consumer
”), such as if you provide us personal information on our Website. This section does not apply to personal information we collect from our employees and job applicants in their capacity as employees and job applicants. This notice supplements the information in our
Privacy Policy
. Certain terms used below have the meanings given to them in the CCPA.
1. Categories of personal information we collect, purposes of use, and to whom we disclose
Top
As described in our Privacy Policy, in the preceding twelve months, we may have collected the following categories of personal information about you for business or commercial purposes:
Identifiers, e.g., name, email address, Github ID
Device Information and Device Identifiers, e.g., IP address, browser type and device locale, operating system, mobile platform, device model
Financial Information, e.g., credit or debit card number, verification number, and expiration date
Commercial Information, e.g., delivery information and information about your transactions and purchases with us
Connection and Usage Data, e.g., web browsing activity on the Website
General location, e.g., information inferred from IP addresses
Inferences, e.g. information on your employer inferred from an IP address
Other Information, e.g., any other information you provide to us through the Website
We collect the categories of personal information identified above from the following sources: (1) directly from you; (2) through your use of the Website; and (3) affiliates; and (4) other parties such as data brokers providing business information and social networking providers if you connect Branch to your use of those services.
As described above in our Privacy Policy, we collect the categories of personal information identified above for the following business and commercial purposes:
Communicate with you, such as (1) to respond to your requests for information and provide you with customer service and technical support; (2) to send communications or content that you have requested; (3) to provide you with transactional updates and information about the Services (e.g., inform you about updates to our Services, information about your account); and/or (4) in accordance with applicable legal requirements, contact you by email, postal mail, phone, advertising or SMS regarding our business and products and services offered by other parties, surveys, promotions, special events and other subjects that we think may be of interest to you.
Transact with you if you use our products or services
Provide the Services, such as (1) to process and fulfill your transactions or requests; (2) to engage in analysis, research, and reports to better understand how you use the Services, so we can improve them; (3) to administer entries into promotions or surveys; and/or (4) to understand and resolve technical issues with our Services.
Tell you about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
Personalize your experience, such as (1) to customize the advertising and content on the Services based on your activities and interests; (2) to create and update audience segments that can be used for targeted advertising and marketing on the Services, services and platforms offered by other parties, and mobile apps; and/or (3) to create profiles about you, including adding and combining information we obtain from other parties, which may be used for analytics, marketing, and advertising.
Improve our offerings.
Secure our Services and fraud prevention, such as (1) to monitor, prevent, and detect fraud, such as through verifying your identity; (2) to combat spam or other malware or security risks; and/or (3) to monitor, enforce, and improve the security of our Services.
Defending our legal rights and complying with the law, such as (1) to comply with any applicable procedures, laws, and regulations where it is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others; and/or (2) to establish, exercise, or defend our legal rights where it is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others (e.g., to enforce compliance with our Terms and Conditions,
Privacy Policy
, or to protect our Services, Users, or others).
Additional information concerning the business and commercial purposes is set forth in the “
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected?
” section of our
Privacy Policy
. We may disclose the categories of personal information identified in this California Privacy Notice about our California Consumers for our operational purposes where the use of such personal information is reasonably necessary and proportionate to achieve the operational purpose for which the personal information was collected or processed or for another operational purpose that is compatible with the context in which the personal information was collected.
How We Disclose Your Information
Top
We disclose the information collected from and about you as discussed above for various business purposes. The chart below explains the categories of information that we may disclose to other parties and the categories of those parties.
Other Parties to whom we disclose information and why
Categories of information disclosed
Our Affiliates
. We may disclose information we collect within our family of companies to deliver products and services to you, and enhance our products, services, and your customer experience.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed to our affiliates
Service Providers that perform services on our behalf
: including billing and payment processing, sales, marketing, advertising, data analysis and insight, research, technical support and customer service, data storage, security, fraud prevention, and legal services.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed to our vendors
Other Individuals, Services, and Vendors at Your Request
. We will disclose your information to other businesses and services at your request. For example, if you direct us to communicate information to one of your vendors.
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Communications with event vendors
Location
Other Information
Unaffiliated Partners for Marketing Purposes
. We may disclose your information to partners whose offerings we think may interest you. For example, if you participate in co-sponsored promotions, then we may disclose information to our affiliates and other parties for their marketing and other purposes.
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Unaffiliated Partners to Provide Co-Branded Products and Services
. In some cases, we may disclose information to unaffiliated partners to provide co-branded products or services (e.g., co-sponsored promotions).
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Location
Other Parties for Legal Purposes
. By using the Services, you acknowledge and agree that we may access, retain, and disclose the information we collect and maintain about you if required to do so by law or in a good faith belief that such access, retention or disclosure is reasonably necessary to: (a) comply with legal process or a regulatory investigation (e.g. a subpoena or court order); (b) enforce our Terms and Conditions, this Privacy Policy, or other contracts with you, including investigation of potential violations thereof; (c) respond to claims that any content violates the rights of other parties; and/or (d) protect our rights, property or personal safety, or that of our agents and affiliates, our users and/or the public. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for information security, fraud protection, spam/malware prevention, and similar purposes.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed as necessary
Other Parties in a Business Transaction
. We may disclose information in connection with an actual or contemplated corporate transaction, including for example a merger, investment, acquisition, reorganization, consolidation, bankruptcy, liquidation, or sale of some or all of our assets.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed as necessary
Online Advertisers and Ad Networks
. As discussed in the “Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website” Section of our Privacy Policy, the Services may rely on advertising technologies that allow for the delivery of relevant content and advertising on the Services, as well as on other websites you visit and other applications you use, and these technologies will collect certain information from your use of the Services to assist in delivering such ads.
Identifiers
Device information and device identifiers
Connection and usage data
Geolocation
The CCPA allows you to limit the use or disclosure of your “sensitive personal information” (as defined in the CCPA) if your sensitive personal information is used for certain purposes. Your account log-in and password or other credentials allowing access to your account constitutes “sensitive personal information” under the CCPA. Please note that we do not use or disclose sensitive personal information other than for purposes for which you cannot opt-out under the CCPA.
2. Sales and sharing of Website User personal information
Top
We may disclose Website Users’ personal information to third parties for purposes of Website analytics and advertising the Website and Services. We provide Website User information to analytics providers to better understand how Website Users use the Website so we can improve the Website and create new products and services. We may also provide Website Users’ personal information to third-party advertising providers for targeted advertising purposes, so we can provide Website Users with more relevant and tailored ads regarding our Website and Services. Under the CCPA, disclosing Website User personal information to these third parties may be considered a “sale” of personal information or the “sharing” of personal information for purposes of “cross-context behavioral advertising.” In the last 12 months, we have sold or shared the following categories of Website User personal information to advertisers and ad networks: identifiers, device information and device identifiers, connection and usage data, and general location data.
To opt out of such “sales” or “sharing” of your personal information, please visit this link:
Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information.
Please note that we also respond to and abide by opt-out preference signals sent through the Global Privacy Control. Any opt out preferences you have exercised through these methods will only apply to the specific device/browser on which you made them. For more information on how to use the Global Privacy Control, see
www.globalprivacycontrol.org
.
We do not knowingly “sell” or “share” the personal information of children under 16.
3. California Rights and Choices
Top
Without being discriminated against for exercising these rights, California residents have the right to request that we disclose what personal information we collect about you, correction of such personal information, and to delete that information, subject to certain restrictions. You also have the right to designate an agent to exercise these rights on your behalf. This section describes how to exercise those rights and our process for handling those requests. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
Right to request access to your personal information
California residents have the right to request that we disclose the categories of personal information we have collected or disclosed about you, the categories of sources of such information, the business or commercial purpose for collecting, “selling,” or “sharing” your personal information, the categories of third parties to whom we disclose or “sell,” or with whom we “share,” personal information, and the categories of personal information we “sell” or “share”. You may also request the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected from you. However, we may withhold some personal information as permitted under applicable law. For example, to protect your security, we may withhold your account password from the information provided in response to a request for the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected about you.
Right to correct inaccurate personal information
You may request that we correct inaccurate personal information about you. We may deny your request as permitted by the CCPA. For example, we may not correct personal information stored in backups or archives except where required by the CCPA.
Right to request deletion of your personal information
You may also request that we delete any personal information that we collected from you. However, we may retain personal information necessary to (a) protect our business, systems, and users from fraudulent activity, (b) to address technical issues that impair existing functionality, (c) necessary for us, or others, to exercise their free speech or other rights, (d) comply with law enforcement requests pursuant to lawful process, (e) for our own internal purposes reasonably related to your relationship with us, or to comply with legal obligations. Additionally, we need certain types of information so that we can provide our Services to you. If you ask us to delete it, you may no longer be able to access or use our Services.
How to exercise your access and deletion rights
Subject to restrictions under applicable law, California residents may exercise their California privacy rights by
submitting your request
to us, or by contacting us at privacy@branch.io, or at (650) 209-6461.
For security purposes, when you request to exercise your California privacy rights we will verify your identity. Once we have verified your identity
(and your agent, as applicable)
, we will respond to your request as appropriate:
Transparency.
Where you have requested the categories of personal information that we have collected about you, we will direct you to the sections of our Privacy Policy relevant to your request.
Access.
Where you have requested specific pieces of personal information, we will provide the information you have requested, except where not permitted under applicable law or otherwise exempted by the CCPA.
Deletion.
Where you have requested that we delete personal information that we have collected from you, we will delete any information about you that is not necessary for the purposes indicated above. Upon completion, we will send you a notice confirming that we deleted the information we collected from you. Certain information may be exempt from such requests under applicable law.
If we are unable to complete your requests fully for any of the reasons above, we will provide you additional information about the reasons that we could not comply with your request.
Right to nondiscrimination
We will not deny, charge different prices for, or provide a different level of quality of goods or services if you choose to exercise these rights.
Other rights
You may have the right to receive information about the financial incentives that we offer to you, if any. You also have the right to opt out of the “sale” or “sharing” of your personal information as described above.
Authorized Agents
You may also designate an agent to make requests to exercise your rights under CCPA as described above. We will take steps both to verify the identity of the person seeking to exercise their rights as listed above, and to verify that your agent has been authorized to make a request on your behalf (e.g. through providing us with a signed written authorization or a copy of a power of attorney).
Submitting CCPA Requests
For our Website:
If you are a California Consumer, please
submit a CCPA request here
, or contact us at
privacy@branch.io
or at (650) 209-6461. To protect your privacy and maintain security, we take steps to verify your identity before granting you access to your personal information or complying with your request. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
Requests from Our Client’s Users:
Because Branch is a vendor that processes data on behalf of its Clients, any requests from Users who are California residents seeking to exercise their rights of access and deletion under the CCPA must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
4. Retention of Your Personal Information
Top
Please see the
Our Data Retention Policy
section provided in Branch’s Privacy Policy.
Effective April 7th 2023
to
December 28th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
California Consumer Privacy Act
Top
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (
“CCPA”
) provides certain rights to residents of California. If you are a California resident interacting with us through our provision of services to our Clients, your personal information is controlled by the applicable Client(s), and you should contact them to exercise your rights under the CCPA. This section applies to you if you are a resident of California about whom we collect personal information independent of the services we provide to Clients (“
California Consumer
”), such as if you provide us personal information on our Website. This section does not apply to personal information we collect from our employees and job applicants in their capacity as employees and job applicants. This notice supplements the information in our
Privacy Policy
. Certain terms used below have the meanings given to them in the CCPA.
1. Categories of personal information we collect, purposes of use, and to whom we disclose
Top
As described in our Privacy Policy, in the preceding twelve months, we may have collected the following categories of personal information about you for business or commercial purposes:
Identifiers, e.g., name, email address, Github ID
Device Information and Device Identifiers, e.g., IP address, browser type and device locale, operating system, mobile platform, device model
Financial Information, e.g., credit or debit card number, verification number, and expiration date
Commercial Information, e.g., delivery information and information about your transactions and purchases with us
Connection and Usage Data, e.g., web browsing activity on the Website
General location, e.g., information inferred from IP addresses
Inferences, e.g. information on your employer inferred from an IP address
Other Information, e.g., any other information you provide to us through the Website
We collect the categories of personal information identified above from the following sources: (1) directly from you; (2) through your use of the Website; and (3) affiliates; and (4) other parties such as data brokers providing business information and social networking providers if you connect Branch to your use of those services.
As described above in our Privacy Policy, we collect the categories of personal information identified above for the following business and commercial purposes:
Communicate with you, such as (1) to respond to your requests for information and provide you with customer service and technical support; (2) to send communications or content that you have requested; (3) to provide you with transactional updates and information about the Services (e.g., inform you about updates to our Services, information about your account); and/or (4) in accordance with applicable legal requirements, contact you by email, postal mail, phone, advertising or SMS regarding our business and products and services offered by other parties, surveys, promotions, special events and other subjects that we think may be of interest to you.
Transact with you if you use our products or services
Provide the Services, such as (1) to process and fulfill your transactions or requests; (2) to engage in analysis, research, and reports to better understand how you use the Services, so we can improve them; (3) to administer entries into promotions or surveys; and/or (4) to understand and resolve technical issues with our Services.
Tell you about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
Personalize your experience, such as (1) to customize the advertising and content on the Services based on your activities and interests; (2) to create and update audience segments that can be used for targeted advertising and marketing on the Services, services and platforms offered by other parties, and mobile apps; and/or (3) to create profiles about you, including adding and combining information we obtain from other parties, which may be used for analytics, marketing, and advertising.
Improve our offerings.
Secure our Services and fraud prevention, such as (1) to monitor, prevent, and detect fraud, such as through verifying your identity; (2) to combat spam or other malware or security risks; and/or (3) to monitor, enforce, and improve the security of our Services.
Defending our legal rights and complying with the law, such as (1) to comply with any applicable procedures, laws, and regulations where it is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others; and/or (2) to establish, exercise, or defend our legal rights where it is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others (e.g., to enforce compliance with our Terms and Conditions,
Privacy Policy
, or to protect our Services, Users, or others).
Additional information concerning the business and commercial purposes is set forth in the “
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected through its Website?
” section of our
Privacy Policy
. We may disclose the categories of personal information identified in this California Privacy Notice about our California Consumers for our operational purposes where the use of such personal information is reasonably necessary and proportionate to achieve the operational purpose for which the personal information was collected or processed or for another operational purpose that is compatible with the context in which the personal information was collected.
How We Disclose Your Information
Top
We disclose the information collected from and about you as discussed above for various business purposes. The chart below explains the categories of information that we may disclose to other parties and the categories of those parties.
Other Parties to whom we disclose information and why
Categories of information disclosed
Our Affiliates
. We may disclose information we collect within our family of companies to deliver products and services to you, and enhance our products, services, and your customer experience.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed to our affiliates
Service Providers that perform services on our behalf
: including billing and payment processing, sales, marketing, advertising, data analysis and insight, research, technical support and customer service, data storage, security, fraud prevention, and legal services.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed to our vendors
Other Individuals, Services, and Vendors at Your Request
. We will disclose your information to other businesses and services at your request. For example, if you direct us to communicate information to one of your vendors.
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Communications with event vendors
Location
Other Information
Unaffiliated Partners for Marketing Purposes
. We may disclose your information to partners whose offerings we think may interest you. For example, if you participate in co-sponsored promotions, then we may disclose information to our affiliates and other parties for their marketing and other purposes.
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Unaffiliated Partners to Provide Co-Branded Products and Services
. In some cases, we may disclose information to unaffiliated partners to provide co-branded products or services (e.g., co-sponsored promotions).
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Location
Other Parties for Legal Purposes
. By using the Services, you acknowledge and agree that we may access, retain, and disclose the information we collect and maintain about you if required to do so by law or in a good faith belief that such access, retention or disclosure is reasonably necessary to: (a) comply with legal process or a regulatory investigation (e.g. a subpoena or court order); (b) enforce our Terms and Conditions, this Privacy Policy, or other contracts with you, including investigation of potential violations thereof; (c) respond to claims that any content violates the rights of other parties; and/or (d) protect our rights, property or personal safety, or that of our agents and affiliates, our users and/or the public. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for information security, fraud protection, spam/malware prevention, and similar purposes.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed as necessary
Other Parties in a Business Transaction
. We may disclose information in connection with an actual or contemplated corporate transaction, including for example a merger, investment, acquisition, reorganization, consolidation, bankruptcy, liquidation, or sale of some or all of our assets.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed as necessary
Online Advertisers and Ad Networks
. As discussed in the “Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website” Section of our Privacy Policy, the Services may rely on advertising technologies that allow for the delivery of relevant content and advertising on the Services, as well as on other websites you visit and other applications you use, and these technologies will collect certain information from your use of the Services to assist in delivering such ads.
Identifiers
Device information and device identifiers
Connection and usage data
Geolocation
The CCPA allows you to limit the use or disclosure of your “sensitive personal information” (as defined in the CCPA) if your sensitive personal information is used for certain purposes. Your account log-in and password or other credentials allowing access to your account constitutes “sensitive personal information” under the CCPA. Please note that we do not use or disclose sensitive personal information other than for purposes for which you cannot opt-out under the CCPA.
2. Sales and sharing of Website User personal information
Top
We may disclose Website Users’ personal information to third parties for purposes of Website analytics and advertising the Website and Services. We provide Website User information to analytics providers to better understand how Website Users use the Website so we can improve the Website and create new products and services. We may also provide Website Users’ personal information to third-party advertising providers for targeted advertising purposes, so we can provide Website Users with more relevant and tailored ads regarding our Website and Services. Under the CCPA, disclosing Website User personal information to these third parties may be considered a “sale” of personal information or the “sharing” of personal information for purposes of “cross-context behavioral advertising.” In the last 12 months, we have sold or shared the following categories of Website User personal information to advertisers and ad networks: identifiers, device information and device identifiers, connection and usage data, and general location data.
To opt out of such “sales” or “sharing” of your personal information, please visit this link:
Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information.
Please note that we also respond to and abide by opt-out preference signals sent through the Global Privacy Control. Any opt out preferences you have exercised through these methods will only apply to the specific device/browser on which you made them. For more information on how to use the Global Privacy Control, see
www.globalprivacycontrol.org
.
We do not knowingly “sell” or “share” the personal information of children under 16.
3. California Rights and Choices
Top
Without being discriminated against for exercising these rights, California residents have the right to request that we disclose what personal information we collect about you, correction of such personal information, and to delete that information, subject to certain restrictions. You also have the right to designate an agent to exercise these rights on your behalf. This section describes how to exercise those rights and our process for handling those requests. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
Right to request access to your personal information
California residents have the right to request that we disclose the categories of personal information we have collected or disclosed about you, the categories of sources of such information, the business or commercial purpose for collecting, “selling,” or “sharing” your personal information, the categories of third parties to whom we disclose or “sell,” or with whom we “share,” personal information, and the categories of personal information we “sell”. You may also request the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected from you. However, we may withhold some personal information as permitted under applicable law. For example, to protect your security, we may withhold your account password from the information provided in response to a request for the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected about you.
Right to correct inaccurate personal information
You may request that we correct inaccurate personal information about you. We may deny your request as permitted by the CCPA. For example, we may not correct personal information stored in backups or archives except where required by the CCPA.
Right to request deletion of your personal information
You may also request that we delete any personal information that we collected from you. However, we may retain personal information necessary to (a) protect our business, systems, and users from fraudulent activity, (b) to address technical issues that impair existing functionality, (c) necessary for us, or others, to exercise their free speech or other rights, (d) comply with law enforcement requests pursuant to lawful process, (e) for our own internal purposes reasonably related to your relationship with us, or to comply with legal obligations. Additionally, we need certain types of information so that we can provide our Services to you. If you ask us to delete it, you may no longer be able to access or use our Services.
How to exercise your access and deletion rights
Subject to restrictions under applicable law, California residents may exercise their California privacy rights by
submitting your request
to us, or by contacting us at privacy@branch.io, or at (650) 209-6461.
For security purposes, when you request to exercise your California privacy rights we will verify your identity. Once we have verified your identity
(and your agent, as applicable)
, we will respond to your request as appropriate:
Transparency.
Where you have requested the categories of personal information that we have collected about you, we will direct you to the sections of our Privacy Policy relevant to your request.
Access.
Where you have requested specific pieces of personal information, we will provide the information you have requested, except where not permitted under applicable law or otherwise exempted by the CCPA.
Deletion.
Where you have requested that we delete personal information that we have collected from you, we will delete any information about you that is not necessary for the purposes indicated above. Upon completion, we will send you a notice confirming that we deleted the information we collected from you. Certain information may be exempt from such requests under applicable law.
If we are unable to complete your requests fully for any of the reasons above, we will provide you additional information about the reasons that we could not comply with your request.
Right to nondiscrimination
We will not deny, charge different prices for, or provide a different level of quality of goods or services if you choose to exercise these rights.
Other rights
You may have the right to receive information about the financial incentives that we offer to you, if any. You also have the right to opt out of the “sale” or “sharing” of your personal information as described above.
Authorized Agents
You may also designate an agent to make requests to exercise your rights under CCPA as described above. We will take steps both to verify the identity of the person seeking to exercise their rights as listed above, and to verify that your agent has been authorized to make a request on your behalf (e.g. through providing us with a signed written authorization or a copy of a power of attorney).
Submitting CCPA Requests
For our Website:
If you are a California Consumer, please
submit a CCPA request here
, or contact us at
privacy@branch.io
or at (650) 209-6461. To protect your privacy and maintain security, we take steps to verify your identity before granting you access to your personal information or complying with your request. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
Requests from Our Client’s Users:
Because Branch is a vendor that processes data on behalf of its Clients, any requests from Users who are California residents seeking to exercise their rights of access and deletion under the CCPA must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
4. Retention of Your Personal Information
Top
Please see the
Our Data Retention Policy
section provided in Branch’s Privacy Policy.
Effective January 4th 2023
to
April 7th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
California Consumer Privacy Act
Top
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (
“CCPA”
) provides certain rights to residents of California. If you are a California resident interacting with us through our provision of services to our Clients, your personal information is controlled by the applicable Client(s), and you should contact them to exercise your rights under the CCPA. This section applies to you if you are a resident of California about whom we collect personal information independent of the services we provide to Clients (“
California Consumer
”), such as if you provide us personal information on our Website. This section does not apply to personal information we collect from our employees and job applicants in their capacity as employees and job applicants. This notice supplements the information in our
Privacy Policy
. Certain terms used below have the meanings given to them in the CCPA.
1. Categories of personal information we collect, purposes of use, and to whom we disclose
Top
As described in our Privacy Policy, in the preceding twelve months, we may have collected the following categories of personal information about you for business or commercial purposes:
Identifiers, e.g., name, email address, Github ID
Device Information and Device Identifiers, e.g., IP address, browser type and device locale, operating system, mobile platform, device model
Financial Information, e.g., credit or debit card number, verification number, and expiration date
Commercial Information, e.g., delivery information and information about your transactions and purchases with us
Connection and Usage Data, e.g., web browsing activity on the Website
General location, e.g., information inferred from IP addresses
Inferences, e.g. information on your employer inferred from an IP address
Other Information, e.g., any other information you provide to us through the Website
We collect the categories of personal information identified above from the following sources: (1) directly from you; (2) through your use of the Website; and (3) affiliates; and (4) other parties such as data brokers providing business information and social networking providers if you connect Branch to your use of those services.
As described above in our Privacy Policy, we collect the categories of personal information identified above for the following business and commercial purposes:
Communicate with you, such as (1) to respond to your requests for information and provide you with customer service and technical support; (2) to send communications or content that you have requested; (3) to provide you with transactional updates and information about the Services (e.g., inform you about updates to our Services, information about your account); and/or (4) in accordance with applicable legal requirements, contact you by email, postal mail, phone, advertising or SMS regarding our business and products and services offered by other parties, surveys, promotions, special events and other subjects that we think may be of interest to you.
Transact with you if you use our products or services
Provide the Services, such as (1) to process and fulfill your transactions or requests; (2) to engage in analysis, research, and reports to better understand how you use the Services, so we can improve them; (3) to administer entries into promotions or surveys; and/or (4) to understand and resolve technical issues with our Services.
Tell you about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
Personalize your experience, such as (1) to customize the advertising and content on the Services based on your activities and interests; (2) to create and update audience segments that can be used for targeted advertising and marketing on the Services, services and platforms offered by other parties, and mobile apps; and/or (3) to create profiles about you, including adding and combining information we obtain from other parties, which may be used for analytics, marketing, and advertising.
Improve our offerings.
Secure our Services and fraud prevention, such as (1) to monitor, prevent, and detect fraud, such as through verifying your identity; (2) to combat spam or other malware or security risks; and/or (3) to monitor, enforce, and improve the security of our Services.
Defending our legal rights and complying with the law, such as (1) to comply with any applicable procedures, laws, and regulations where it is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others; and/or (2) to establish, exercise, or defend our legal rights where it is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others (e.g., to enforce compliance with our Terms and Conditions,
Privacy Policy
, or to protect our Services, Users, or others).
Additional information concerning the business and commercial purposes is set forth in the “
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected through its Website?
” section of our
Privacy Policy
. We may disclose the categories of personal information identified in this California Privacy Notice about our California Consumers for our operational purposes where the use of such personal information is reasonably necessary and proportionate to achieve the operational purpose for which the personal information was collected or processed or for another operational purpose that is compatible with the context in which the personal information was collected.
How We Disclose Your Information
Top
We disclose the information collected from and about you as discussed above for various business purposes. The chart below explains the categories of information that we may disclose to other parties and the categories of those parties.
Other Parties to whom we disclose information and why
Categories of information disclosed
Our Affiliates
. We may disclose information we collect within our family of companies to deliver products and services to you, and enhance our products, services, and your customer experience.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed to our affiliates
Service Providers that perform services on our behalf
: including billing and payment processing, sales, marketing, advertising, data analysis and insight, research, technical support and customer service, data storage, security, fraud prevention, and legal services.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed to our vendors
Other Individuals, Services, and Vendors at Your Request
. We will disclose your information to other businesses and services at your request. For example, if you direct us to communicate information to one of your vendors.
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Communications with event vendors
Location
Other Information
Unaffiliated Partners for Marketing Purposes
. We may disclose your information to partners whose offerings we think may interest you. For example, if you participate in co-sponsored promotions, then we may disclose information to our affiliates and other parties for their marketing and other purposes.
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Unaffiliated Partners to Provide Co-Branded Products and Services
. In some cases, we may disclose information to unaffiliated partners to provide co-branded products or services (e.g., co-sponsored promotions).
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Location
Other Parties for Legal Purposes
. By using the Services, you acknowledge and agree that we may access, retain, and disclose the information we collect and maintain about you if required to do so by law or in a good faith belief that such access, retention or disclosure is reasonably necessary to: (a) comply with legal process or a regulatory investigation (e.g. a subpoena or court order); (b) enforce our Terms and Conditions, this Privacy Policy, or other contracts with you, including investigation of potential violations thereof; (c) respond to claims that any content violates the rights of other parties; and/or (d) protect our rights, property or personal safety, or that of our agents and affiliates, our users and/or the public. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for information security, fraud protection, spam/malware prevention, and similar purposes.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed as necessary
Other Parties in a Business Transaction
. We may disclose information in connection with an actual or contemplated corporate transaction, including for example a merger, investment, acquisition, reorganization, consolidation, bankruptcy, liquidation, or sale of some or all of our assets.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed as necessary
Online Advertisers and Ad Networks
. As discussed in the “Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website” Section of our Privacy Policy, the Services may rely on advertising technologies that allow for the delivery of relevant content and advertising on the Services, as well as on other websites you visit and other applications you use, and these technologies will collect certain information from your use of the Services to assist in delivering such ads.
Identifiers
Device information and device identifiers
Connection and usage data
Geolocation
The CCPA allows you to limit the use or disclosure of your “sensitive personal information” (as defined in the CCPA) if your sensitive personal information is used for certain purposes. Your account log-in and password or other credentials allowing access to your account constitutes “sensitive personal information” under the CCPA. Please note that we do not use or disclose sensitive personal information other than for purposes for which you cannot opt-out under the CCPA.
2. Sales and sharing of Website User personal information
Top
We may disclose Website Users’ personal information to third parties for purposes of Website analytics and advertising the Website and Services. We provide Website User information to analytics providers to better understand how Website Users use the Website so we can improve the Website and create new products and services. We may also provide Website Users’ personal information to third-party advertising providers for targeted advertising purposes, so we can provide Website Users with more relevant and tailored ads regarding our Website and Services. Under the CCPA, disclosing Website User personal information to these third parties may be considered a “sale” of personal information or the “sharing” of personal information for purposes of “cross-context behavioral advertising.” In the last 12 months, we have sold or shared the following categories of Website User personal information to advertisers and ad networks: identifiers, device information and device identifiers, connection and usage data, and general location data.
To opt out of such “sales” or “sharing” of your personal information, please visit this link:
Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information.
Please note that we also respond to and abide by opt-out preference signals sent through the Global Privacy Control. Any opt out preferences you have exercised through these methods will only apply to the specific device/browser on which you made them. For more information on how to use the Global Privacy Control, see
www.globalprivacycontrol.org
.
We do not knowingly “sell” or “share” the personal information of children under 16.
3. California Rights and Choices
Top
Without being discriminated against for exercising these rights, California residents have the right to request that we disclose what personal information we collect about you, correction of such personal information, and to delete that information, subject to certain restrictions. You also have the right to designate an agent to exercise these rights on your behalf. This section describes how to exercise those rights and our process for handling those requests. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
Right to request access to your personal information
California residents have the right to request that we disclose the categories of personal information we have collected or disclosed about you, the categories of sources of such information, the business or commercial purpose for collecting, “selling,” or “sharing” your personal information, the categories of third parties to whom we disclose or “sell,” or with whom we “share,” personal information, and the categories of personal information we “sell”. You may also request the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected from you. However, we may withhold some personal information as permitted under applicable law. For example, to protect your security, we may withhold your account password from the information provided in response to a request for the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected about you.
Right to correct inaccurate personal information
You may request that we correct inaccurate personal information about you. We may deny your request as permitted by the CCPA. For example, we may not correct personal information stored in backups or archives except where required by the CCPA.
Right to request deletion of your personal information
You may also request that we delete any personal information that we collected from you. However, we may retain personal information necessary to (a) protect our business, systems, and users from fraudulent activity, (b) to address technical issues that impair existing functionality, (c) necessary for us, or others, to exercise their free speech or other rights, (d) comply with law enforcement requests pursuant to lawful process, (e) for our own internal purposes reasonably related to your relationship with us, or to comply with legal obligations. Additionally, we need certain types of information so that we can provide our Services to you. If you ask us to delete it, you may no longer be able to access or use our Services.
How to exercise your access and deletion rights
Subject to restrictions under applicable law, California residents may exercise their California privacy rights by
submitting your request
to us, or by contacting us at privacy@branch.io, or at (650) 209-6461.
For security purposes, when you request to exercise your California privacy rights we will verify your identity. Once we have verified your identity
(and your agent, as applicable)
, we will respond to your request as appropriate:
Transparency.
Where you have requested the categories of personal information that we have collected about you, we will direct you to the sections of our Privacy Policy relevant to your request.
Access.
Where you have requested specific pieces of personal information, we will provide the information you have requested, except where not permitted under applicable law or otherwise exempted by the CCPA.
Deletion.
Where you have requested that we delete personal information that we have collected from you, we will delete any information about you that is not necessary for the purposes indicated above. Upon completion, we will send you a notice confirming that we deleted the information we collected from you. Certain information may be exempt from such requests under applicable law.
If we are unable to complete your requests fully for any of the reasons above, we will provide you additional information about the reasons that we could not comply with your request.
Right to nondiscrimination
We will not deny, charge different prices for, or provide a different level of quality of goods or services if you choose to exercise these rights.
Other rights
You may have the right to receive information about the financial incentives that we offer to you, if any. You also have the right to opt out of the “sale” or “sharing” of your personal information as described above.
Authorized Agents
You may also designate an agent to make requests to exercise your rights under CCPA as described above. We will take steps both to verify the identity of the person seeking to exercise their rights as listed above, and to verify that your agent has been authorized to make a request on your behalf (e.g. through providing us with a signed written authorization or a copy of a power of attorney).
Submitting CCPA Requests
For our Website:
If you are a California Consumer, please
submit a CCPA request here
, or contact us at
privacy@branch.io
or at (650) 209-6461. To protect your privacy and maintain security, we take steps to verify your identity before granting you access to your personal information or complying with your request. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
Requests from Our Client’s Users:
Because Branch is a vendor that processes data on behalf of its Clients, any requests from Users who are California residents seeking to exercise their rights of access and deletion under the CCPA must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
4. Retention of Your Personal Information
Top
Please see the
Our Data Retention Policy
section provided in Branch’s Privacy Policy.
Effective January 4th 2023
to
January 4th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
California Consumer Privacy Act
Top
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (
“CCPA”
) provides certain rights to residents of California. If you are a California resident interacting with us through our provision of services to our Clients, your personal information is controlled by the applicable Client(s), and you should contact them to exercise your rights under the CCPA. This section applies to you if you are a resident of California about whom we collect personal information independent of the services we provide to Clients (“
California Consumer
”), such as if you provide us personal information on our Website. This section does not apply to personal information we collect from our employees and job applicants in their capacity as employees and job applicants. This notice supplements the information in our
Privacy Policy
. Certain terms used below have the meanings given to them in the CCPA.
1. Categories of personal information we collect, purposes of use, and to whom we disclose
Top
As described in our Privacy Policy, in the preceding twelve months, we may have collected the following categories of personal information about you for business or commercial purposes:
Identifiers, e.g., name, email address, Github ID
Device Information and Device Identifiers, e.g., IP address, browser type and device locale, operating system, mobile platform, device model
Financial Information, e.g., credit or debit card number, verification number, and expiration date
Commercial Information, e.g., delivery information and information about your transactions and purchases with us
Connection and Usage Data, e.g., web browsing activity on the Website
General location, e.g., information inferred from IP addresses
Inferences, e.g. information on your employer inferred from an IP address
Other Information, e.g., any other information you provide to us through the Website
We collect the categories of personal information identified above from the following sources: (1) directly from you; (2) through your use of the Website; and (3) affiliates; and (4) other parties such as data brokers providing business information and social networking providers if you connect Branch to your use of those services.
As described above in our Privacy Policy, we collect the categories of personal information identified above for the following business and commercial purposes:
Communicate with you, such as (1) to respond to your requests for information and provide you with customer service and technical support; (2) to send communications or content that you have requested; (3) to provide you with transactional updates and information about the Services (e.g., inform you about updates to our Services, information about your account); and/or (4) in accordance with applicable legal requirements, contact you by email, postal mail, phone, advertising or SMS regarding our business and products and services offered by other parties, surveys, promotions, special events and other subjects that we think may be of interest to you.
Transact with you if you use our products or services
Provide the Services, such as (1) to process and fulfill your transactions or requests; (2) to engage in analysis, research, and reports to better understand how you use the Services, so we can improve them; (3) to administer entries into promotions or surveys; and/or (4) to understand and resolve technical issues with our Services.
Tell you about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
Personalize your experience, such as (1) to customize the advertising and content on the Services based on your activities and interests; (2) to create and update audience segments that can be used for targeted advertising and marketing on the Services, services and platforms offered by other parties, and mobile apps; and/or (3) to create profiles about you, including adding and combining information we obtain from other parties, which may be used for analytics, marketing, and advertising.
Improve our offerings.
Secure our Services and fraud prevention, such as (1) to monitor, prevent, and detect fraud, such as through verifying your identity; (2) to combat spam or other malware or security risks; and/or (3) to monitor, enforce, and improve the security of our Services.
Defending our legal rights and complying with the law, such as (1) to comply with any applicable procedures, laws, and regulations where it is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others; and/or (2) to establish, exercise, or defend our legal rights where it is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others (e.g., to enforce compliance with our Terms and Conditions,
Privacy Policy
, or to protect our Services, Users, or others).
Additional information concerning the business and commercial purposes is set forth in the “
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected through its Website?
” section of our
Privacy Policy
. We may disclose the categories of personal information identified in this California Privacy Notice about our California Consumers for our operational purposes where the use of such personal information is reasonably necessary and proportionate to achieve the operational purpose for which the personal information was collected or processed or for another operational purpose that is compatible with the context in which the personal information was collected.
How We Disclose Your Information
Top
We disclose the information collected from and about you as discussed above for various business purposes. The chart below explains the categories of information that we may disclose to other parties and the categories of those parties.
Other Parties to whom we disclose information and why
Categories of information disclosed
Our Affiliates
. We may disclose information we collect within our family of companies to deliver products and services to you, and enhance our products, services, and your customer experience.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed to our affiliates
Service Providers that perform services on our behalf
: including billing and payment processing, sales, marketing, advertising, data analysis and insight, research, technical support and customer service, data storage, security, fraud prevention, and legal services.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed to our vendors
Other Individuals, Services, and Vendors at Your Request
. We will disclose your information to other businesses and services at your request. For example, if you direct us to communicate information to one of your vendors.
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Communications with event vendors
Location
Other Information
Unaffiliated Partners for Marketing Purposes
. We may disclose your information to partners whose offerings we think may interest you. For example, if you participate in co-sponsored promotions, then we may disclose information to our affiliates and other parties for their marketing and other purposes.
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Unaffiliated Partners to Provide Co-Branded Products and Services
. In some cases, we may disclose information to unaffiliated partners to provide co-branded products or services (e.g., co-sponsored promotions).
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Location
Other Parties for Legal Purposes
. By using the Services, you acknowledge and agree that we may access, retain, and disclose the information we collect and maintain about you if required to do so by law or in a good faith belief that such access, retention or disclosure is reasonably necessary to: (a) comply with legal process or a regulatory investigation (e.g. a subpoena or court order); (b) enforce our Terms and Conditions, this Privacy Policy, or other contracts with you, including investigation of potential violations thereof; (c) respond to claims that any content violates the rights of other parties; and/or (d) protect our rights, property or personal safety, or that of our agents and affiliates, our users and/or the public. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for information security, fraud protection, spam/malware prevention, and similar purposes.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed as necessary
Other Parties in a Business Transaction
. We may disclose information in connection with an actual or contemplated corporate transaction, including for example a merger, investment, acquisition, reorganization, consolidation, bankruptcy, liquidation, or sale of some or all of our assets.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed as necessary
Online Advertisers and Ad Networks
. As discussed in the “Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website” Section of our Privacy Policy, the Services may rely on advertising technologies that allow for the delivery of relevant content and advertising on the Services, as well as on other websites you visit and other applications you use, and these technologies will collect certain information from your use of the Services to assist in delivering such ads.
Identifiers
Device information and device identifiers
Connection and usage data
Geolocation
The CCPA allows you to limit the use or disclosure of your “sensitive personal information” (as defined in the CCPA) if your sensitive personal information is used for certain purposes. Your account log-in and password or other credentials allowing access to your account constitutes “sensitive personal information” under the CCPA. Please note that we do not use or disclose sensitive personal information other than for purposes for which you cannot opt-out under the CCPA.
2. Sales and sharing of Website User personal information
Top
We may disclose Website Users’ personal information to third parties for purposes of Website analytics and advertising the Website and Services. We provide Website User information to analytics providers to better understand how Website Users use the Website so we can improve the Website and create new products and services. We may also provide Website Users’ personal information to third-party advertising providers for targeted advertising purposes, so we can provide Website Users with more relevant and tailored ads regarding our Website and Services. Under the CCPA, disclosing Website User personal information to these third parties may be considered a “sale” of personal information or the “sharing” of personal information for purposes of “cross-context behavioral advertising.” In the last 12 months, we have sold or shared the following categories of Website User personal information to advertisers and ad networks: identifiers, device information and device identifiers, connection and usage data, and general location data.
To opt out of such “sales” or “sharing” of your personal information, please visit this link:
Please note that we also respond to and abide by opt-out preference signals sent through the Global Privacy Control. Any opt out preferences you have exercised through these methods will only apply to the specific device/browser on which you made them. For more information on how to use the Global Privacy Control, see
www.globalprivacycontrol.org
.
We do not knowingly “sell” or “share” the personal information of children under 16.
3. California Rights and Choices
Top
Without being discriminated against for exercising these rights, California residents have the right to request that we disclose what personal information we collect about you, correction of such personal information, and to delete that information, subject to certain restrictions. You also have the right to designate an agent to exercise these rights on your behalf. This section describes how to exercise those rights and our process for handling those requests. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
Right to request access to your personal information
California residents have the right to request that we disclose the categories of personal information we have collected or disclosed about you, the categories of sources of such information, the business or commercial purpose for collecting, “selling,” or “sharing” your personal information, the categories of third parties to whom we disclose or “sell,” or with whom we “share,” personal information, and the categories of personal information we “sell”. You may also request the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected from you. However, we may withhold some personal information as permitted under applicable law. For example, to protect your security, we may withhold your account password from the information provided in response to a request for the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected about you.
Right to correct inaccurate personal information
You may request that we correct inaccurate personal information about you. We may deny your request as permitted by the CCPA. For example, we may not correct personal information stored in backups or archives except where required by the CCPA.
Right to request deletion of your personal information
You may also request that we delete any personal information that we collected from you. However, we may retain personal information necessary to (a) protect our business, systems, and users from fraudulent activity, (b) to address technical issues that impair existing functionality, (c) necessary for us, or others, to exercise their free speech or other rights, (d) comply with law enforcement requests pursuant to lawful process, (e) for our own internal purposes reasonably related to your relationship with us, or to comply with legal obligations. Additionally, we need certain types of information so that we can provide our Services to you. If you ask us to delete it, you may no longer be able to access or use our Services.
How to exercise your access and deletion rights
Subject to restrictions under applicable law, California residents may exercise their California privacy rights by
submitting your request
to us, or by contacting us at privacy@branch.io, or at (650) 209-6461.
For security purposes, when you request to exercise your California privacy rights we will verify your identity. Once we have verified your identity
(and your agent, as applicable)
, we will respond to your request as appropriate:
Transparency.
Where you have requested the categories of personal information that we have collected about you, we will direct you to the sections of our Privacy Policy relevant to your request.
Access.
Where you have requested specific pieces of personal information, we will provide the information you have requested, except where not permitted under applicable law or otherwise exempted by the CCPA.
Deletion.
Where you have requested that we delete personal information that we have collected from you, we will delete any information about you that is not necessary for the purposes indicated above. Upon completion, we will send you a notice confirming that we deleted the information we collected from you. Certain information may be exempt from such requests under applicable law.
If we are unable to complete your requests fully for any of the reasons above, we will provide you additional information about the reasons that we could not comply with your request.
Right to nondiscrimination
We will not deny, charge different prices for, or provide a different level of quality of goods or services if you choose to exercise these rights.
Other rights
You may have the right to receive information about the financial incentives that we offer to you, if any. You also have the right to opt out of the “sale” or “sharing” of your personal information as described above.
Authorized Agents
You may also designate an agent to make requests to exercise your rights under CCPA as described above. We will take steps both to verify the identity of the person seeking to exercise their rights as listed above, and to verify that your agent has been authorized to make a request on your behalf (e.g. through providing us with a signed written authorization or a copy of a power of attorney).
Submitting CCPA Requests
For our Website:
If you are a California Consumer, please
submit a CCPA request here
, or contact us at
privacy@branch.io
or at (650) 209-6461. To protect your privacy and maintain security, we take steps to verify your identity before granting you access to your personal information or complying with your request. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
Requests from Our Client’s Users:
Because Branch is a vendor that processes data on behalf of its Clients, any requests from Users who are California residents seeking to exercise their rights of access and deletion under the CCPA must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
4. Retention of Your Personal Information
Top
Please see the
Our Data Retention Policy
section provided in Branch’s Privacy Policy.
Effective January 4th 2023
to
January 4th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
California Consumer Privacy Act
Top
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (
“CCPA”
) provides certain rights to residents of California. If you are a California resident interacting with us through our provision of services to our Clients, your personal information is controlled by the applicable Client(s), and you should contact them to exercise your rights under the CCPA. This section applies to you if you are a resident of California about whom we collect personal information independent of the services we provide to Clients (“
California Consumer
”), such as if you provide us personal information on our Website. This section does not apply to personal information we collect from our employees and job applicants in their capacity as employees and job applicants. This notice supplements the information in our
Privacy Policy
. Certain terms used below have the meanings given to them in the CCPA.
1. Categories of personal information we collect, purposes of use, and to whom we disclose
Top
As described in our Privacy Policy, in the preceding twelve months, we may have collected the following categories of personal information about you for business or commercial purposes:
Identifiers, e.g., name, email address, Github ID
Device Information and Device Identifiers, e.g., IP address, browser type and device locale, operating system, mobile platform, device model
Financial Information, e.g., credit or debit card number, verification number, and expiration date
Commercial Information, e.g., delivery information and information about your transactions and purchases with us
Connection and Usage Data, e.g., web browsing activity on the Website
General location, e.g., information inferred from IP addresses
Inferences, e.g. information on your employer inferred from an IP address
Other Information, e.g., any other information you provide to us through the Website
We collect the categories of personal information identified above from the following sources: (1) directly from you; (2) through your use of the Website; and (3) affiliates; and (4) other parties such as data brokers providing business information and social networking providers if you connect Branch to your use of those services.
As described above in our Privacy Policy, we collect the categories of personal information identified above for the following business and commercial purposes:
Communicate with you, such as (1) to respond to your requests for information and provide you with customer service and technical support; (2) to send communications or content that you have requested; (3) to provide you with transactional updates and information about the Services (e.g., inform you about updates to our Services, information about your account); and/or (4) in accordance with applicable legal requirements, contact you by email, postal mail, phone, advertising or SMS regarding our business and products and services offered by other parties, surveys, promotions, special events and other subjects that we think may be of interest to you.
Transact with you if you use our products or services
Provide the Services, such as (1) to process and fulfill your transactions or requests; (2) to engage in analysis, research, and reports to better understand how you use the Services, so we can improve them; (3) to administer entries into promotions or surveys; and/or (4) to understand and resolve technical issues with our Services.
Tell you about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
Personalize your experience, such as (1) to customize the advertising and content on the Services based on your activities and interests; (2) to create and update audience segments that can be used for targeted advertising and marketing on the Services, services and platforms offered by other parties, and mobile apps; and/or (3) to create profiles about you, including adding and combining information we obtain from other parties, which may be used for analytics, marketing, and advertising.
Improve our offerings.
Secure our Services and fraud prevention, such as (1) to monitor, prevent, and detect fraud, such as through verifying your identity; (2) to combat spam or other malware or security risks; and/or (3) to monitor, enforce, and improve the security of our Services.
Defending our legal rights and complying with the law, such as (1) to comply with any applicable procedures, laws, and regulations where it is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others; and/or (2) to establish, exercise, or defend our legal rights where it is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others (e.g., to enforce compliance with our Terms and Conditions,
Privacy Policy
, or to protect our Services, Users, or others).
Additional information concerning the business and commercial purposes is set forth in the “
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected through its Website?
” section of our
Privacy Policy
. We may disclose the categories of personal information identified in this California Privacy Notice about our California Consumers for our operational purposes where the use of such personal information is reasonably necessary and proportionate to achieve the operational purpose for which the personal information was collected or processed or for another operational purpose that is compatible with the context in which the personal information was collected.
How We Disclose Your Information
Top
We disclose the information collected from and about you as discussed above for various business purposes. The chart below explains the categories of information that we may disclose to other parties and the categories of those parties.
Other Parties to whom we disclose information and why
Categories of information disclosed
Our Affiliates
. We may disclose information we collect within our family of companies to deliver products and services to you, and enhance our products, services, and your customer experience.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed to our affiliates
Service Providers that perform services on our behalf
: including billing and payment processing, sales, marketing, advertising, data analysis and insight, research, technical support and customer service, data storage, security, fraud prevention, and legal services.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed to our vendors
Other Individuals, Services, and Vendors at Your Request
. We will disclose your information to other businesses and services at your request. For example, if you direct us to communicate information to one of your vendors.
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Communications with event vendors
Location
Other Information
Unaffiliated Partners for Marketing Purposes
. We may disclose your information to partners whose offerings we think may interest you. For example, if you participate in co-sponsored promotions, then we may disclose information to our affiliates and other parties for their marketing and other purposes.
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Unaffiliated Partners to Provide Co-Branded Products and Services
. In some cases, we may disclose information to unaffiliated partners to provide co-branded products or services (e.g., co-sponsored promotions).
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Location
Other Parties for Legal Purposes
. By using the Services, you acknowledge and agree that we may access, retain, and disclose the information we collect and maintain about you if required to do so by law or in a good faith belief that such access, retention or disclosure is reasonably necessary to: (a) comply with legal process or a regulatory investigation (e.g. a subpoena or court order); (b) enforce our Terms and Conditions, this Privacy Policy, or other contracts with you, including investigation of potential violations thereof; (c) respond to claims that any content violates the rights of other parties; and/or (d) protect our rights, property or personal safety, or that of our agents and affiliates, our users and/or the public. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for information security, fraud protection, spam/malware prevention, and similar purposes.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed as necessary
Other Parties in a Business Transaction
. We may disclose information in connection with an actual or contemplated corporate transaction, including for example a merger, investment, acquisition, reorganization, consolidation, bankruptcy, liquidation, or sale of some or all of our assets.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed as necessary
Online Advertisers and Ad Networks
. As discussed in the “Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website” Section of our Privacy Policy, the Services may rely on advertising technologies that allow for the delivery of relevant content and advertising on the Services, as well as on other websites you visit and other applications you use, and these technologies will collect certain information from your use of the Services to assist in delivering such ads.
Identifiers
Device information and device identifiers
Connection and usage data
Geolocation
The CCPA allows you to limit the use or disclosure of your “sensitive personal information” (as defined in the CCPA) if your sensitive personal information is used for certain purposes. Your account log-in and password or other credentials allowing access to your account constitutes “sensitive personal information” under the CCPA. Please note that we do not use or disclose sensitive personal information other than for purposes for which you cannot opt-out under the CCPA.
2. Sales and sharing of Website User personal information
Top
We may disclose Website Users’ personal information to third parties for purposes of Website analytics and advertising the Website and Services. We provide Website User information to analytics providers to better understand how Website Users use the Website so we can improve the Website and create new products and services. We may also provide Website Users’ personal information to third-party advertising providers for targeted advertising purposes, so we can provide Website Users with more relevant and tailored ads regarding our Website and Services. Under the CCPA, disclosing Website User personal information to these third parties may be considered a “sale” of personal information or the “sharing” of personal information for purposes of “cross-context behavioral advertising.” In the last 12 months, we have sold or shared the following categories of Website User personal information to advertisers and ad networks: identifiers, device information and device identifiers, connection and usage data, and general location data.
To opt out of such “sales” or “sharing” of your personal information, please visit this link:
Please note that we also respond to and abide by opt-out preference signals sent through the Global Privacy Control. Any opt out preferences you have exercised through these methods will only apply to the specific device/browser on which you made them. For more information on how to use the Global Privacy Control, see
www.globalprivacycontrol.org
.
We do not knowingly “sell” or “share” the personal information of children under 16.
3. California Rights and Choices
Top
Without being discriminated against for exercising these rights, California residents have the right to request that we disclose what personal information we collect about you, correction of such personal information, and to delete that information, subject to certain restrictions. You also have the right to designate an agent to exercise these rights on your behalf. This section describes how to exercise those rights and our process for handling those requests. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
Right to request access to your personal information
California residents have the right to request that we disclose the categories of personal information we have collected or disclosed about you, the categories of sources of such information, the business or commercial purpose for collecting, “selling,” or “sharing” your personal information, the categories of third parties to whom we disclose or “sell,” or with whom we “share,” personal information, and the categories of personal information we “sell”. You may also request the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected from you. However, we may withhold some personal information as permitted under applicable law. For example, to protect your security, we may withhold your account password from the information provided in response to a request for the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected about you.
Right to correct inaccurate personal information
You may request that we correct inaccurate personal information about you. We may deny your request as permitted by the CCPA. For example, we may not correct personal information stored in backups or archives except where required by the CCPA.
Right to request deletion of your personal information
You may also request that we delete any personal information that we collected from you. However, we may retain personal information necessary to (a) protect our business, systems, and users from fraudulent activity, (b) to address technical issues that impair existing functionality, (c) necessary for us, or others, to exercise their free speech or other rights, (d) comply with law enforcement requests pursuant to lawful process, (e) for our own internal purposes reasonably related to your relationship with us, or to comply with legal obligations. Additionally, we need certain types of information so that we can provide our Services to you. If you ask us to delete it, you may no longer be able to access or use our Services.
How to exercise your access and deletion rights
Subject to restrictions under applicable law, California residents may exercise their California privacy rights by
submitting your request
to us, or by contacting us at privacy@branch.io, or at (650) 209-6461.
For security purposes, when you request to exercise your California privacy rights we will verify your identity. Once we have verified your identity
(and your agent, as applicable)
, we will respond to your request as appropriate:
Transparency.
Where you have requested the categories of personal information that we have collected about you, we will direct you to the sections of our Privacy Policy relevant to your request.
Access.
Where you have requested specific pieces of personal information, we will provide the information you have requested, except where not permitted under applicable law or otherwise exempted by the CCPA.
Deletion.
Where you have requested that we delete personal information that we have collected from you, we will delete any information about you that is not necessary for the purposes indicated above. Upon completion, we will send you a notice confirming that we deleted the information we collected from you. Certain information may be exempt from such requests under applicable law.
If we are unable to complete your requests fully for any of the reasons above, we will provide you additional information about the reasons that we could not comply with your request.
Right to nondiscrimination
We will not deny, charge different prices for, or provide a different level of quality of goods or services if you choose to exercise these rights.
Other rights
You may have the right to receive information about the financial incentives that we offer to you, if any. You also have the right to opt out of the “sale” or “sharing” of your personal information as described above.
Authorized Agents
You may also designate an agent to make requests to exercise your rights under CCPA as described above. We will take steps both to verify the identity of the person seeking to exercise their rights as listed above, and to verify that your agent has been authorized to make a request on your behalf (e.g. through providing us with a signed written authorization or a copy of a power of attorney).
Submitting CCPA Requests
For our Website:
If you are a California Consumer, please
submit a CCPA request here
, or contact us at
privacy@branch.io
or at (650) 209-6461. To protect your privacy and maintain security, we take steps to verify your identity before granting you access to your personal information or complying with your request. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
Requests from Our Client’s Users:
Because Branch is a vendor that processes data on behalf of its Clients, any requests from Users who are California residents seeking to exercise their rights of access and deletion under the CCPA must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
4. Retention of Your Personal Information
Top
Please see the
Our Data Retention Policy
section provided in Branch’s Privacy Policy.
Effective January 1st 2023
to
January 4th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
California Consumer Privacy Act
Top
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (
“CCPA”
) provides certain rights to residents of California. If you are a California resident interacting with us through our provision of services to our Clients, your personal information is controlled by the applicable Client(s), and you should contact them to exercise your rights under the CCPA. This section applies to you if you are a resident of California about whom we collect personal information independent of the services we provide to Clients (“
California Consumer
”), such as if you provide us personal information on our Website. This section does not apply to personal information we collect from our employees and job applicants in their capacity as employees and job applicants. This notice supplements the information in our
Privacy Policy
. Certain terms used below have the meanings given to them in the CCPA.
1. Categories of personal information we collect, purposes of use, and to whom we disclose
Top
As described in our Privacy Policy, in the preceding twelve months, we may have collected the following categories of personal information about you for business or commercial purposes:
Identifiers, e.g., name, email address, Github ID
Device Information and Device Identifiers, e.g., IP address, browser type and device locale, operating system, mobile platform, device model
Financial Information, e.g., credit or debit card number, verification number, and expiration date
Commercial Information, e.g., delivery information and information about your transactions and purchases with us
Connection and Usage Data, e.g., web browsing activity on the Website
General location, e.g., information inferred from IP addresses
Inferences, e.g. information on your employer inferred from an IP address
Other Information, e.g., any other information you provide to us through the Website
We collect the categories of personal information identified above from the following sources: (1) directly from you; (2) through your use of the Website; and (3) affiliates; and (4) other parties such as data brokers providing business information and social networking providers if you connect Branch to your use of those services.
As described above in our Privacy Policy, we collect the categories of personal information identified above for the following business and commercial purposes:
Communicate with you, such as (1) to respond to your requests for information and provide you with customer service and technical support; (2) to send communications or content that you have requested; (3) to provide you with transactional updates and information about the Services (e.g., inform you about updates to our Services, information about your account); and/or (4) in accordance with applicable legal requirements, contact you by email, postal mail, phone, advertising or SMS regarding our business and products and services offered by other parties, surveys, promotions, special events and other subjects that we think may be of interest to you.
Transact with you if you use our products or services
Provide the Services, such as (1) to process and fulfill your transactions or requests; (2) to engage in analysis, research, and reports to better understand how you use the Services, so we can improve them; (3) to administer entries into promotions or surveys; and/or (4) to understand and resolve technical issues with our Services.
Tell you about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
Personalize your experience, such as (1) to customize the advertising and content on the Services based on your activities and interests; (2) to create and update audience segments that can be used for targeted advertising and marketing on the Services, services and platforms offered by other parties, and mobile apps; and/or (3) to create profiles about you, including adding and combining information we obtain from other parties, which may be used for analytics, marketing, and advertising.
Improve our offerings.
Secure our Services and fraud prevention, such as (1) to monitor, prevent, and detect fraud, such as through verifying your identity; (2) to combat spam or other malware or security risks; and/or (3) to monitor, enforce, and improve the security of our Services.
Defending our legal rights and complying with the law, such as (1) to comply with any applicable procedures, laws, and regulations where it is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others; and/or (2) to establish, exercise, or defend our legal rights where it is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others (e.g., to enforce compliance with our Terms and Conditions,
Privacy Policy
, or to protect our Services, Users, or others).
Additional information concerning the business and commercial purposes is set forth in the “
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected through its Website?
” section of our
Privacy Policy
. We may disclose the categories of personal information identified in this California Privacy Notice about our California Consumers for our operational purposes where the use of such personal information is reasonably necessary and proportionate to achieve the operational purpose for which the personal information was collected or processed or for another operational purpose that is compatible with the context in which the personal information was collected.
How We Disclose Your Information
Top
We disclose the information collected from and about you as discussed above for various business purposes. The chart below explains the categories of information that we may disclose to other parties and the categories of those parties.
Other Parties to whom we disclose information and why
Categories of information disclosed
Our Affiliates
. We may disclose information we collect within our family of companies to deliver products and services to you, and enhance our products, services, and your customer experience.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed to our affiliates
Service Providers that perform services on our behalf
: including billing and payment processing, sales, marketing, advertising, data analysis and insight, research, technical support and customer service, data storage, security, fraud prevention, and legal services.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed to our vendors
Other Individuals, Services, and Vendors at Your Request
. We will disclose your information to other businesses and services at your request. For example, if you direct us to communicate information to one of your vendors.
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Communications with event vendors
Location
Other Information
Unaffiliated Partners for Marketing Purposes
. We may disclose your information to partners whose offerings we think may interest you. For example, if you participate in co-sponsored promotions, then we may disclose information to our affiliates and other parties for their marketing and other purposes.
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Unaffiliated Partners to Provide Co-Branded Products and Services
. In some cases, we may disclose information to unaffiliated partners to provide co-branded products or services (e.g., co-sponsored promotions).
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Location
Other Parties for Legal Purposes
. By using the Services, you acknowledge and agree that we may access, retain, and disclose the information we collect and maintain about you if required to do so by law or in a good faith belief that such access, retention or disclosure is reasonably necessary to: (a) comply with legal process or a regulatory investigation (e.g. a subpoena or court order); (b) enforce our Terms and Conditions, this Privacy Policy, or other contracts with you, including investigation of potential violations thereof; (c) respond to claims that any content violates the rights of other parties; and/or (d) protect our rights, property or personal safety, or that of our agents and affiliates, our users and/or the public. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for information security, fraud protection, spam/malware prevention, and similar purposes.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed as necessary
Other Parties in a Business Transaction
. We may disclose information in connection with an actual or contemplated corporate transaction, including for example a merger, investment, acquisition, reorganization, consolidation, bankruptcy, liquidation, or sale of some or all of our assets.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed as necessary
Online Advertisers and Ad Networks
. As discussed in the “Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website” Section of our Privacy Policy, the Services may rely on advertising technologies that allow for the delivery of relevant content and advertising on the Services, as well as on other websites you visit and other applications you use, and these technologies will collect certain information from your use of the Services to assist in delivering such ads.
Identifiers
Device information and device identifiers
Connection and usage data
Geolocation
The CCPA allows you to limit the use or disclosure of your “sensitive personal information” (as defined in the CCPA) if your sensitive personal information is used for certain purposes. Your account log-in and password or other credentials allowing access to your account constitutes “sensitive personal information” under the CCPA. Please note that we do not use or disclose sensitive personal information other than for purposes for which you cannot opt-out under the CCPA.
2. Sales and sharing of Website User personal information
Top
We may disclose Website Users’ personal information to third parties for purposes of Website analytics and advertising the Website and Services. We provide Website User information to analytics providers to better understand how Website Users use the Website so we can improve the Website and create new products and services. We may also provide Website Users’ personal information to third-party advertising providers for targeted advertising purposes, so we can provide Website Users with more relevant and tailored ads regarding our Website and Services. Under the CCPA, disclosing Website User personal information to these third parties may be considered a “sale” of personal information or the “sharing” of personal information for purposes of “cross-context behavioral advertising.” In the last 12 months, we have sold or shared the following categories of Website User personal information to advertisers and ad networks: identifiers, device information and device identifiers, connection and usage data, and general location data.
To opt out of such “sales” or “sharing” of your personal information, please visit this link:
Do Not Sell My Information.
Please note that we also respond to and abide by opt-out preference signals sent through the Global Privacy Control. Any opt out preferences you have exercised through these methods will only apply to the specific device/browser on which you made them. For more information on how to use the Global Privacy Control, see
www.globalprivacycontrol.org
.
We do not knowingly “sell” or “share” the personal information of children under 16.
3. California Rights and Choices
Top
Without being discriminated against for exercising these rights, California residents have the right to request that we disclose what personal information we collect about you, correction of such personal information, and to delete that information, subject to certain restrictions. You also have the right to designate an agent to exercise these rights on your behalf. This section describes how to exercise those rights and our process for handling those requests. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
Right to request access to your personal information
California residents have the right to request that we disclose the categories of personal information we have collected or disclosed about you, the categories of sources of such information, the business or commercial purpose for collecting, “selling,” or “sharing” your personal information, the categories of third parties to whom we disclose or “sell,” or with whom we “share,” personal information, and the categories of personal information we “sell”. You may also request the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected from you. However, we may withhold some personal information as permitted under applicable law. For example, to protect your security, we may withhold your account password from the information provided in response to a request for the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected about you.
Right to correct inaccurate personal information
You may request that we correct inaccurate personal information about you. We may deny your request as permitted by the CCPA. For example, we may not correct personal information stored in backups or archives except where required by the CCPA.
Right to request deletion of your personal information
You may also request that we delete any personal information that we collected from you. However, we may retain personal information necessary to (a) protect our business, systems, and users from fraudulent activity, (b) to address technical issues that impair existing functionality, (c) necessary for us, or others, to exercise their free speech or other rights, (d) comply with law enforcement requests pursuant to lawful process, (e) for our own internal purposes reasonably related to your relationship with us, or to comply with legal obligations. Additionally, we need certain types of information so that we can provide our Services to you. If you ask us to delete it, you may no longer be able to access or use our Services.
How to exercise your access and deletion rights
Subject to restrictions under applicable law, California residents may exercise their California privacy rights by
submitting your request
to us, or by contacting us at privacy@branch.io, or at (650) 209-6461.
For security purposes, when you request to exercise your California privacy rights we will verify your identity. Once we have verified your identity
(and your agent, as applicable)
, we will respond to your request as appropriate:
Transparency.
Where you have requested the categories of personal information that we have collected about you, we will direct you to the sections of our Privacy Policy relevant to your request.
Access.
Where you have requested specific pieces of personal information, we will provide the information you have requested, except where not permitted under applicable law or otherwise exempted by the CCPA.
Deletion.
Where you have requested that we delete personal information that we have collected from you, we will delete any information about you that is not necessary for the purposes indicated above. Upon completion, we will send you a notice confirming that we deleted the information we collected from you. Certain information may be exempt from such requests under applicable law.
If we are unable to complete your requests fully for any of the reasons above, we will provide you additional information about the reasons that we could not comply with your request.
Right to nondiscrimination
We will not deny, charge different prices for, or provide a different level of quality of goods or services if you choose to exercise these rights.
Other rights
You may have the right to receive information about the financial incentives that we offer to you, if any. You also have the right to opt out of the “sale” or “sharing” of your personal information as described above.
Authorized Agents
You may also designate an agent to make requests to exercise your rights under CCPA as described above. We will take steps both to verify the identity of the person seeking to exercise their rights as listed above, and to verify that your agent has been authorized to make a request on your behalf (e.g. through providing us with a signed written authorization or a copy of a power of attorney).
Submitting CCPA Requests
For our Website:
If you are a California Consumer, please
submit a CCPA request here
, or contact us at
privacy@branch.io
or at (650) 209-6461. To protect your privacy and maintain security, we take steps to verify your identity before granting you access to your personal information or complying with your request. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
Requests from Our Client’s Users:
Because Branch is a vendor that processes data on behalf of its Clients, any requests from Users who are California residents seeking to exercise their rights of access and deletion under the CCPA must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
4. Retention of Your Personal Information
Top
Please see the
Our Data Retention Policy
section provided in Branch’s Privacy Policy.
Effective December 29th 2022
to
January 1st 2023
Download
Table of Contents
California Consumer Privacy Act
Top
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (
“CCPA”
) provides certain rights to residents of California. If you are a California resident interacting with us through our provision of services to our Clients, your personal information is controlled by the applicable Client(s), and you should contact them to exercise your rights under the CCPA. This section applies to you if you are a resident of California about whom we collect personal information independent of the services we provide to Clients (“
California Consumer
”), such as if you provide us personal information on our Website. This section does not apply to personal information we collect from our employees and job applicants in their capacity as employees and job applicants. This notice supplements the information in our Privacy Policy. Certain terms used below have the meanings given to them in the CCPA.
1. Categories of personal information we collect, purposes of use, and to whom we disclose
Top
As described in our Privacy Policy, in the preceding twelve months, we may have collected the following categories of personal information about you for business or commercial purposes:
Identifiers, e.g., name, email address, Github ID
Device Information and Device Identifiers, e.g., IP address, browser type and device locale, operating system, mobile platform, device model
Financial Information, e.g., credit or debit card number, verification number, and expiration date
Commercial Information, e.g., delivery information and information about your transactions and purchases with us
Connection and Usage Data, e.g., web browsing activity on the Website
General location, e.g., information inferred from IP addresses
Inferences, e.g. information on your employer inferred from an IP address
Other Information, e.g., any other information you provide to us through the Website
We collect the categories of personal information identified above from the following sources: (1) directly from you; (2) through your use of the Website; (3) affiliates; and (4) other parties such as data brokers providing business information and social networking providers if you connect Branch to your use of those services.
As described above in our Privacy Policy, we collect the categories of personal information identified above for the following business and commercial purposes:
Communicate with you, such as (1) to respond to your requests for information and provide you with customer service and technical support; (2) to send communications or content that you have requested; (3) to provide you with transactional updates and information about the Services (e.g., inform you about updates to our Services, information about your account); and/or (4) in accordance with applicable legal requirements, contact you by email, postal mail, phone, advertising or SMS regarding our business and products and services offered by other parties, surveys, promotions, special events and other subjects that we think may be of interest to you.
Transact with you if you use our products or services.
Provide the Services, such as (1) to process and fulfill your transactions or requests; (2) to engage in analysis, research, and reports to better understand how you use the Services, so we can improve them; (3) to administer entries into promotions or surveys; and/or (4) to understand and resolve technical issues with our Services.
Tell you about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners.
Personalize your experience, such as (1) to customize the advertising and content on the Services based on your activities and interests; (2) to create and update audience segments that can be used for targeted advertising and marketing on the Services, services and platforms offered by other parties, and mobile apps; and/or (3) to create profiles about you, including adding and combining information we obtain from other parties, which may be used for analytics, marketing, and advertising.
Improve our offerings.
Secure our Services and fraud prevention, such as (1) to monitor, prevent, and detect fraud, such as through verifying your identity; (2) to combat spam or other malware or security risks; and/or (3) to monitor, enforce, and improve the security of our Services.
Defending our legal rights and complying with the law, such as (1) to comply with any applicable procedures, laws, and regulations where it is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others; and/or (2) to establish, exercise, or defend our legal rights where it is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others (e.g., to enforce compliance with our Terms and Conditions, Privacy Policy, or to protect our Services, Users, or others).
Additional information concerning the business and commercial purposes is set forth in the “
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected through its Website?
” section of our Privacy Policy. We may disclose the categories of personal information identified in this California Privacy Notice about our California Consumers for our operational purposes where the use of such personal information is reasonably necessary and proportionate to achieve the operational purpose for which the personal information was collected or processed or for another operational purpose that is compatible with the context in which the personal information was collected.
How We Disclose Your Information
We disclose the information collected from and about you as discussed above for various business purposes. The chart below explains the categories of information that we may disclose to other parties and the categories of those parties.
Other Parties to whom we disclose information and why
Categories of information disclosed
Our Affiliates
. We may disclose information we collect within our family of companies to deliver products and services to you, and enhance our products, services, and your customer experience.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed to our affiliates
Vendors that perform services on our behalf
: including billing and payment processing, sales, marketing, advertising, data analysis and insight, research, technical support and customer service, data storage, security, fraud prevention, and legal services.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed to our vendors
Other Individuals, Services, and Vendors at Your Request
. We will disclose your information to other businesses and services at your request. For example, if you direct us to communicate information to one of your vendors.
·  Contact and account registration
·  Demographic and statistical information
·  Communications with event vendors
·  Location
·  Other Information
Unaffiliated Partners for Marketing Purposes
. We may disclose your information to partners whose offerings we think may interest you. For example, if you participate in co-sponsored promotions, then we may disclose information to our affiliates and other parties for their marketing and other purposes.
·  Contact and account registration
·  Demographic and statistical information
Unaffiliated Partners to Provide Co-Branded Products and Services
. In some cases, we may disclose information to unaffiliated partners to provide co-branded products or services (e.g., co-sponsored promotions).
·  Contact and account registration
·  Demographic and statistical information
·  Location
Other Parties for Legal Purposes
. By using the Services, you acknowledge and agree that we may access, retain, and disclose the information we collect and maintain about you if required to do so by law or in a good faith belief that such access, retention or disclosure is reasonably necessary to: (a) comply with legal process or a regulatory investigation (e.g. a subpoena or court order); (b) enforce our Terms and Conditions, this Privacy Policy, or other contracts with you, including investigation of potential violations thereof; (c) respond to claims that any content violates the rights of other parties; and/or (d) protect our rights, property or personal safety, or that of our agents and affiliates, our users and/or the public. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for information security, fraud protection, spam/malware prevention, and similar purposes.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed as necessary
Other Parties in a Business Transaction
. We may disclose information in connection with an actual or contemplated corporate transaction, including for example a merger, investment, acquisition, reorganization, consolidation, bankruptcy, liquidation, or sale of some or all of our assets.
All categories of information we collect may be disclosed as necessary
Online Advertisers and Ad Networks
. As discussed in the “Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website” Section of our Privacy Policy, the Services may rely on advertising technologies that allow for the delivery of relevant content and advertising on the Services, as well as on other websites you visit and other applications you use, and these technologies will collect certain information from your use of the Services to assist in delivering such ads.
·  Identifiers
·  Device information and device identifiers
·  Connection and usage data
·
Geolocation
The CCPA allows you to limit the use or disclosure of your “sensitive personal information” (as defined in the CCPA) if your sensitive personal information is used for certain purposes. Your account log-in and password or other credentials allowing access to your account constitutes “sensitive personal information” under the CCPA. Please note that we do not use or disclose sensitive personal information other than for purposes for which you cannot opt-out under the CCPA.
2. Sales and sharing of Website User personal information
Top
We may disclose Website Users’ personal information to third parties for purposes of Website analytics and advertising the Website and Services. We provide Website User information to analytics providers to better understand how Website Users use the Website so we can improve the Website and create new products and services. We may also provide Website Users’ personal information to third-party advertising providers for targeted advertising purposes, so we can provide Website Users with more relevant and tailored ads regarding our Website and Services. Under the CCPA, disclosing Website User personal information to these third parties may be considered a “sale” of personal information or the “sharing” of personal information for purposes of “cross-context behavioral advertising.” In the last 12 months, we have sold or shared the following categories of Website User personal information to advertisers and ad networks: identifiers, device information and device identifiers, connection and usage data, and general location data.
To opt out of such “sales” or “sharing” of your personal information, please visit this link:
Do Not Sell My Information
.
Please note that we also respond to and abide by opt-out preference signals sent through the Global Privacy Control. Any opt out preferences you have exercised through these methods will only apply to the specific device/browser on which you made them. For more information on how to use the Global Privacy Control, see
www.globalprivacycontrol.org
.
We do not knowingly “sell” or “share” the personal information of children under 16.
3. California Rights and Choices
Top
Without being discriminated against for exercising these rights, California residents have the right to request that we disclose what personal information we collect about you, correction of such personal information, and to delete that information, subject to certain restrictions. You also have the right to designate an agent to exercise these rights on your behalf. This section describes how to exercise those rights and our process for handling those requests. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
Right to request access to your personal information
California residents have the right to request that we disclose the categories of personal information we have collected or disclosed about you, the categories of sources of such information, the business or commercial purpose for collecting, “selling,” or “sharing” your personal information, the categories of third parties to whom we disclose or “sell,” or with whom we “share,” personal information, and the categories of personal information we “sell”. You may also request the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected from you. However, we may withhold some personal information as permitted under applicable law. For example, to protect your security, we may withhold your account password from the information provided in response to a request for the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected about you.
Right to
correct inaccurate personal information
You
may request that we correct inaccurate personal information about you. We may deny your request as permitted by the CCPA. For example, we may not correct personal information stored in backups or archives except where required by the CCPA.
Right to request deletion of your personal information
You may also request that we delete any personal information that we collected from you. However, we may retain personal information necessary to (a) protect our business, systems, and users from fraudulent activity, (b) to address technical issues that impair existing functionality, (c) necessary for us, or others, to exercise their free speech or other rights, (d) comply with law enforcement requests pursuant to lawful process, (e) for our own internal purposes reasonably related to your relationship with us, or to comply with legal obligations. Additionally, we need certain types of information so that we can provide our Services to you. If you ask us to delete it, you may no longer be able to access or use our Services.
How to exercise your access and deletion rights
Subject to restrictions under applicable law, California residents may exercise their California privacy rights by
submitting your request
to us, or by contacting us at
privacy@branch.io
, or at (650) 209-6461.
For security purposes, when you request to exercise your California privacy rights we will verify your identity. Once we have verified your identity
(and your agent, as applicable)
, we will respond to your request as appropriate:
Transparency.
Where you have requested the categories of personal information that we have collected about you, we will direct you to the sections of our Privacy Policy relevant to your request.
Access.
Where you have requested specific pieces of personal information, we will provide the information you have requested, except where not permitted under applicable law or otherwise exempted by the CCPA.
Deletion.
Where you have requested that we delete personal information that we have collected from you, we will delete any information about you that is not necessary for the purposes indicated above. Upon completion, we will send you a notice confirming that we deleted the information we collected from you. Certain information may be exempt from such requests under applicable law.
If we are unable to complete your requests fully for any of the reasons above, we will provide you additional information about the reasons that we could not comply with your request.
Right to nondiscrimination
We will not deny, charge different prices for, or provide a different level of quality of goods or services if you choose to exercise these rights.
Other rights
You may have the right to receive information about the financial incentives that we offer to you, if any. You also have the right to opt out of the “sale” or “sharing” of your personal information as described above.
Authorized Agents
You may also designate an agent to make requests to exercise your rights under CCPA as described above. We will take steps both to verify the identity of the person seeking to exercise their rights as listed above, and to verify that your agent has been authorized to make a request on your behalf (e.g. through providing us with a signed written authorization or a copy of a power of attorney).
Submitting CCPA Requests
For our Website:
If you are a California Consumer, please
submit a CCPA request here
, or contact us at
privacy@branch.io
or at (650) 209-6461.
To protect your privacy and maintain security, we take steps to verify your identity before granting you access to your personal information or complying with your request. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
Requests from Our Client’s Users:
Because Branch is a vendor that processes data on behalf of its Clients, any requests from Users who are California residents seeking to exercise their rights of access and deletion under the CCPA must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
4. Retention of Your Personal Information
Top
Please see the
Our Data Retention Policy
section provided in Branch’s Privacy Policy.
Effective October 11th 2022
to
December 29th 2022
Download
Table of Contents
California Consumer Privacy Act
Top
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (
“CCPA”
) provides certain rights to residents of California. If you are a California resident interacting with us through our provision of services to our Clients, your personal information is controlled by the applicable Client(s), and you should contact them to exercise your rights under the CCPA. This section applies to you if you are a resident of California about whom we collect personal information independent of the services we provide to Clients (“
California Consumer
”), such as if you provide us personal information on our Website.This section does not apply to personal information we collect from our employees and job applicants in their capacity as employees and job applicants, or personal information we collect from employees, owners, directors, officers, or contractors of businesses in the course of our provision or receipt of business-related services. This notice supplements the information in our
Privacy Policy
. Certain terms used below have the meanings given to them in the CCPA.
As described in our Privacy Policy, in the preceding twelve months, we may have collected the following categories of personal information about you for business or commercial purposes:
Identifiers, e.g., name, email address, Github ID
Device Information and Device Identifiers, e.g., IP address, browser type and device locale, operating system, mobile platform, device model
Financial Information, e.g., credit or debit card number, verification number, and expiration date
Commercial Information, e.g., delivery information and information about your transactions and purchases with us
Connection and Usage Data, e.g., web browsing activity on the Website
Geolocation, e.g., information inferred from IP addresses Inferences, e.g. information on your employer inferred from an IP address
Other Information, e.g., any other information you provide to us through the Website
We collect the categories of personal information identified above from the following sources: (1) directly from you; (2) through your use of the Website; and (3) third parties such as from social networking providers if you connect Branch to your use of those services.
As described above in our Privacy Policy, we collect the categories of personal information identified above for the following business and commercial purposes:
Communicate with you, such as (1) to respond to your requests for information and provide you with customer service and technical support; (2) to send communications or content that you have requested; (3) to provide you with transactional updates and information about the Services (e.g., inform you about updates to our Services, information about your account); and/or (4) in accordance with applicable legal requirements, contact you by email, postal mail, phone, advertising or SMS regarding Business and third-party products, services, surveys, promotions, special events and other subjects that we think may be of interest to you.
Transact with you if you use our products or services.
Provide the Services, such as (1) to process and fulfill your transactions or requests; (2) to engage in analysis, research, and reports to better understand how you use the Services, so we can improve them; (3) to administer entries into promotions or surveys; and/or (4) to understand and resolve technical issues with our Services.
Tell you about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners.
Personalize your experience, such as (1) to customize the advertising and content on the Services based on your activities and interests; (2) to create and update audience segments that can be used for targeted advertising and marketing on the Services, third party services and platforms, and mobile apps; and/or (3) to create profiles about you, including adding and combining information we obtain from third parties, which may be used for analytics, marketing, and advertising.
Improve our offerings.
Secure our Services and fraud prevention, such as (1) to monitor, prevent, and detect fraud, such as through verifying your identity; (2) to combat spam or other malware or security risks; and/or (3) to monitor, enforce, and improve the security of our Services.
Defending our legal rights and complying with the law, such as (1) to comply with any applicable procedures, laws, and regulations where it is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others; and/or (2) to establish, exercise, or defend our legal rights where it is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others (e.g., to enforce compliance with our Terms and Conditions,
Privacy Policy
, or to protect our Services, Users, or others).
Additional information concerning the business and commercial purposes is set forth in the
“
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected through its Website?
” section of our
Privacy Policy
. We may disclose the categories of personal information identified in this California Privacy Notice about our California Consumers for our operational purposes where the use of such personal information is reasonably necessary and proportionate to achieve the operational purpose for which the personal information was collected or processed or for another operational purpose that is compatible with the context in which the personal information was collected.
How We Share and Disclose Your Information
Top
We share the information collected from and about you as discussed above for various business purposes. The chart below explains the categories of information that we may share with other parties and the categories of those parties.
Other Parties with which we share information and why
Categories of information shared
Our Affiliates
. We may share information we collect within our family of companies to deliver products and services to you, and enhance our products, services, and your customer experience.
All categories of information we collect may be shared with our affiliates
Service Providers that perform services on our behalf
: including billing and payment processing, sales, marketing, advertising, data analysis and insight, research, technical support and customer service, data storage, security, fraud prevention, and legal services.
All categories of information we collect may be shared with our service providers
Other Individuals, Services, and Vendors at Your Request
. We will share your information with other businesses and services at your request. For example, if you direct us to communicate information to one of your vendors.
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Communications with event vendors
Geolocation
Other Information
Third Party Partners for Marketing Purposes
. We may share your information with partners whose offerings we think may interest you. For example, if you participate in co-sponsored promotions, then we may share information with our affiliates and other third parties for their marketing and other purposes.
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Third Party Partners to Provide Co-Branded Products and Services
. In some cases, we may share information with third-party partners to provide co-branded products or services (e.g., co-sponsored promotions).
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Geolocation
Other Parties for Legal Purposes
. By using the Services, you acknowledge and agree that we may access, retain, and disclose the information we collect and maintain about you if required to do so by law or in a good faith belief that such access, retention or disclosure is reasonably necessary to: (a) comply with legal process or a regulatory investigation (e.g. a subpoena or court order); (b) enforce our Terms and Conditions, this Privacy Policy, or other contracts with you, including investigation of potential violations thereof; (c) respond to claims that any content violates the rights of third parties; and/or (d) protect our rights, property or personal safety, or that of our agents and affiliates, our users and/or the public. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for information security, fraud protection, spam/malware prevention, and similar purposes.
All categories of information we collect may be shared as necessary
Other Parties in a Business Transaction
. We may disclose information in connection with an actual or contemplated corporate transaction, including for example a merger, investment, acquisition, reorganization, consolidation, bankruptcy, liquidation, or sale of some or all of our assets.
All categories of information we collect may be shared as necessary
Third-Party Online Advertisers and Ad Networks
. As discussed in the “Third Party Tools / Analytics on the Website” Section of our Privacy Policy, the Services may rely on third-party advertising technologies that allow for the delivery of relevant content and advertising on the Services, as well as on other websites you visit and other applications you use, and these technologies will collect certain information from your use of the Services to assist in delivering such ads.
Identifiers
Device information and device identifiers
Connection and usage data
Geolocation
The CCPA sets forth certain obligations for businesses that “sell” personal information. Based on the definition of “sell” under the CCPA and under current regulatory guidance, we do not believe we engage in such activity and have not engaged in such activity in the past twelve months. Instead, we limit our sharing of information as set forth in the
“
How does Branch Share Information?
”
section of this Privacy Policy, and to allow third parties to collect certain information about your activity for limited purposes, for example through cookies, as explained in the
“
Third-Party Tools / Analytics on the Website
”
section of our
Privacy Policy
.
California Rights and Choices
Top
Without being discriminated against for exercising these rights, California residents have the right to request that we disclose what personal information we collect about you and to delete that information, subject to certain restrictions. You also have the right to designate an agent to exercise these rights on your behalf. This section describes how to exercise those rights and our process for handling those requests. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
Right to request access to your personal information
California residents have the right to request that we disclose what categories of your personal information that we collect, use, or sell. You may also request the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected from you. However, we may withhold some personal information as permitted under applicable law. For example, to protect your security, we may withhold your account password from the information provided in response to a request for the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected about you.
Right to request deletion of your personal information
You may also request that we delete any personal information that we collected from you. However, we may retain personal information necessary to (a) protect our business, systems, and users from fraudulent activity, (b) to address technical issues that impair existing functionality, (c) necessary for us, or others, to exercise their free speech or other rights, (d) comply with law enforcement requests pursuant to lawful process, (e) for our own internal purposes reasonably related to your relationship with us, or to comply with legal obligations. Additionally, we need certain types of information so that we can provide our Services to you. If you ask us to delete it, you may no longer be able to access or use our Services.
How to exercise your access and deletion rights
Subject to restrictions under applicable law, California residents may exercise their California privacy rights by
submitting your request
to us, or by contacting us at privacy@branch.io.
For security purposes, when you request to exercise your California privacy rights we will verify your identity. Once we have verified your identity
(and your agent, as applicable)
, we will respond to your request as appropriate:
Transparency.
Where you have requested the categories of personal information that we have collected about you, we will direct you to the sections of our Privacy Policy relevant to your request.
Access.
Where you have requested specific pieces of personal information, we will provide the information you have requested, except where not permitted under applicable law or otherwise exempted by the CCPA.
Deletion.
Where you have requested that we delete personal information that we have collected from you, we will delete any information about you that is not necessary for the purposes indicated above. Upon completion, we will send you a notice confirming that we deleted the information we collected from you. Certain information may be exempt from such requests under applicable law.
If we are unable to complete your requests fully for any of the reasons above, we will provide you additional information about the reasons that we could not comply with your request.
Right to nondiscrimination
We will not deny, charge different prices for, or provide a different level of quality of goods or services if you choose to exercise these rights.
Authorized Agents
You may also designate an agent to make requests to exercise your rights under CCPA as described above. We will take steps both to verify the identity of the person seeking to exercise their rights as listed above, and to verify that your agent has been authorized to make a request on your behalf (e.g. through providing us with a signed written authorization or a copy of a power of attorney).
Submitting CCPA Requests
For our Website:
If you are a California Consumer, please
s
ubmit a CCPA request here
, or contact us at
privacy@branch.io
. To protect your privacy and maintain security, we take steps to verify your identity before granting you access to your personal information or complying with your request. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
Requests from Our Client’s Users:
Because Branch is a service provider that processes data on behalf of its Clients, any requests from Users who are California residents seeking to exercise their rights of access and deletion under the CCPA must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
Effective June 1st 2022
to
October 11th 2022
Download
Table of Contents
California Consumer Privacy Act
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (
“CCPA”
) provides certain rights to residents of California. If you are a California resident interacting with us through our provision of services to our Clients, your personal information is controlled by the applicable Client(s), and you should contact them to exercise your rights under the CCPA. This section applies to you if you are a resident of California about whom we collect personal information independent of the services we provide to Clients (“
California Consumer
”), such as if you provide us personal information on our Website.This section does not apply to personal information we collect from our employees and job applicants in their capacity as employees and job applicants, or personal information we collect from employees, owners, directors, officers, or contractors of businesses in the course of our provision or receipt of business-related services. This notice supplements the information in our
Privacy Policy
. Certain terms used below have the meanings given to them in the CCPA.
As described in our Privacy Policy, in the preceding twelve months, we may have collected the following categories of personal information about you for business or commercial purposes:
Identifiers, e.g., name, email address, Github ID
Device Information and Device Identifiers, e.g., IP address, browser type and device locale, operating system, mobile platform, device model
Financial Information, e.g., credit or debit card number, verification number, and expiration date
Commercial Information, e.g., delivery information and information about your transactions and purchases with us
Connection and Usage Data, e.g., web browsing activity on the Website
Geolocation, e.g., information inferred from IP addresses Inferences, e.g. information on your employer inferred from an IP address
Other Information, e.g., any other information you provide to us through the Website
We collect the categories of personal information identified above from the following sources: (1) directly from you; (2) through your use of the Website; and (3) third parties such as from social networking providers if you connect Branch to your use of those services.
As described above in our Privacy Policy, we collect the categories of personal information identified above for the following business and commercial purposes:
Communicate with you, such as (1) to respond to your requests for information and provide you with customer service and technical support; (2) to send communications or content that you have requested; (3) to provide you with transactional updates and information about the Services (e.g., inform you about updates to our Services, information about your account); and/or (4) in accordance with applicable legal requirements, contact you by email, postal mail, phone, advertising or SMS regarding Business and third-party products, services, surveys, promotions, special events and other subjects that we think may be of interest to you.
Transact with you if you use our products or services.
Provide the Services, such as (1) to process and fulfill your transactions or requests; (2) to engage in analysis, research, and reports to better understand how you use the Services, so we can improve them; (3) to administer entries into promotions or surveys; and/or (4) to understand and resolve technical issues with our Services.
Tell you about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners.
Personalize your experience, such as (1) to customize the advertising and content on the Services based on your activities and interests; (2) to create and update audience segments that can be used for targeted advertising and marketing on the Services, third party services and platforms, and mobile apps; and/or (3) to create profiles about you, including adding and combining information we obtain from third parties, which may be used for analytics, marketing, and advertising.
Improve our offerings.
Secure our Services and fraud prevention, such as (1) to monitor, prevent, and detect fraud, such as through verifying your identity; (2) to combat spam or other malware or security risks; and/or (3) to monitor, enforce, and improve the security of our Services.
Defending our legal rights and complying with the law, such as (1) to comply with any applicable procedures, laws, and regulations where it is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others; and/or (2) to establish, exercise, or defend our legal rights where it is necessary for our legitimate interests or the legitimate interests of others (e.g., to enforce compliance with our Terms and Conditions,
Privacy Policy
, or to protect our Services, Users, or others).
Additional information concerning the business and commercial purposes is set forth in the “
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected through its Website?
” section of our
Privacy Policy
. We may disclose the categories of personal information identified in this California Privacy Notice about our California Consumers for our operational purposes where the use of such personal information is reasonably necessary and proportionate to achieve the operational purpose for which the personal information was collected or processed or for another operational purpose that is compatible with the context in which the personal information was collected.
How We Share and Disclose Your Information
We share the information collected from and about you as discussed above for various business purposes. The chart below explains the categories of information that we may share with other parties and the categories of those parties.
Other Parties with which we share information and why
Categories of information shared
Our Affiliates
. We may share information we collect within our family of companies to deliver products and services to you, and enhance our products, services, and your customer experience.
All categories of information we collect may be shared with our affiliates
Service Providers that perform services on our behalf
: including billing and payment processing, sales, marketing, advertising, data analysis and insight, research, technical support and customer service, data storage, security, fraud prevention, and legal services.
All categories of information we collect may be shared with our service providers
Other Individuals, Services, and Vendors at Your Request
. We will share your information with other businesses and services at your request. For example, if you direct us to communicate information to one of your vendors.
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Communications with event vendors
Geolocation
Other Information
Third Party Partners for Marketing Purposes
. We may share your information with partners whose offerings we think may interest you. For example, if you participate in co-sponsored promotions, then we may share information with our affiliates and other third parties for their marketing and other purposes.
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Third Party Partners to Provide Co-Branded Products and Services
. In some cases, we may share information with third-party partners to provide co-branded products or services (e.g., co-sponsored promotions).
Contact and account registration
Demographic and statistical information
Geolocation
Other Parties for Legal Purposes
. By using the Services, you acknowledge and agree that we may access, retain, and disclose the information we collect and maintain about you if required to do so by law or in a good faith belief that such access, retention or disclosure is reasonably necessary to: (a) comply with legal process or a regulatory investigation (e.g. a subpoena or court order); (b) enforce our Terms and Conditions, this Privacy Policy, or other contracts with you, including investigation of potential violations thereof; (c) respond to claims that any content violates the rights of third parties; and/or (d) protect our rights, property or personal safety, or that of our agents and affiliates, our users and/or the public. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for information security, fraud protection, spam/malware prevention, and similar purposes.
All categories of information we collect may be shared as necessary
Other Parties in a Business Transaction
. We may disclose information in connection with an actual or contemplated corporate transaction, including for example a merger, investment, acquisition, reorganization, consolidation, bankruptcy, liquidation, or sale of some or all of our assets.
All categories of information we collect may be shared as necessary
Third-Party Online Advertisers and Ad Networks
. As discussed in the “Third Party Tools / Analytics on the Website” Section of our Privacy Policy, the Services may rely on third-party advertising technologies that allow for the delivery of relevant content and advertising on the Services, as well as on other websites you visit and other applications you use, and these technologies will collect certain information from your use of the Services to assist in delivering such ads.
Identifiers
Device information and device identifiers
Connection and usage data
Geolocation
The CCPA sets forth certain obligations for businesses that “sell” personal information. Based on the definition of “sell” under the CCPA and under current regulatory guidance, we do not believe we engage in such activity and have not engaged in such activity in the past twelve months. Instead, we limit our sharing of information as set forth in the
“How does Branch Share Information?”
section of this Privacy Policy, and to allow third parties to collect certain information about your activity for limited purposes, for example through cookies, as explained in the
“Third-Party Tools / Analytics on the Website”
section of our
Privacy Policy
.
California Rights and Choices
Without being discriminated against for exercising these rights, California residents have the right to request that we disclose what personal information we collect about you and to delete that information, subject to certain restrictions. You also have the right to designate an agent to exercise these rights on your behalf. This section describes how to exercise those rights and our process for handling those requests. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
Right to request access to your personal information
California residents have the right to request that we disclose what categories of your personal information that we collect, use, or sell. You may also request the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected from you. However, we may withhold some personal information as permitted under applicable law. For example, to protect your security, we may withhold your account password from the information provided in response to a request for the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected about you.
Right to request deletion of your personal information
You may also request that we delete any personal information that we collected from you. However, we may retain personal information necessary to (a) protect our business, systems, and users from fraudulent activity, (b) to address technical issues that impair existing functionality, (c) necessary for us, or others, to exercise their free speech or other rights, (d) comply with law enforcement requests pursuant to lawful process, (e) for our own internal purposes reasonably related to your relationship with us, or to comply with legal obligations. Additionally, we need certain types of information so that we can provide our Services to you. If you ask us to delete it, you may no longer be able to access or use our Services.
How to exercise your access and deletion rights
Subject to restrictions under applicable law, California residents may exercise their California privacy rights by
submitting your request
to us, or by contacting us at privacy@branch.io.
For security purposes, when you request to exercise your California privacy rights we will verify your identity. Once we have verified your identity
(and your agent, as applicable)
, we will respond to your request as appropriate:
Transparency.
Where you have requested the categories of personal information that we have collected about you, we will direct you to the sections of our Privacy Policy relevant to your request.
Access.
Where you have requested specific pieces of personal information, we will provide the information you have requested, except where not permitted under applicable law or otherwise exempted by the CCPA.
Deletion.
Where you have requested that we delete personal information that we have collected from you, we will delete any information about you that is not necessary for the purposes indicated above. Upon completion, we will send you a notice confirming that we deleted the information we collected from you. Certain information may be exempt from such requests under applicable law.
If we are unable to complete your requests fully for any of the reasons above, we will provide you additional information about the reasons that we could not comply with your request.
Right to nondiscrimination
We will not deny, charge different prices for, or provide a different level of quality of goods or services if you choose to exercise these rights.
Authorized Agents
You may also designate an agent to make requests to exercise your rights under CCPA as described above. We will take steps both to verify the identity of the person seeking to exercise their rights as listed above, and to verify that your agent has been authorized to make a request on your behalf (e.g. through providing us with a signed written authorization or a copy of a power of attorney).
Submitting CCPA Requests
For our Website:
If you are a California Consumer, please
submit a CCPA request here
, or contact us at
privacy@branch.io
. To protect your privacy and maintain security, we take steps to verify your identity before granting you access to your personal information or complying with your request. To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may charge a reasonable fee to comply with your request.
Requests from Our Client’s Users:
Because Branch is a service provider that processes data on behalf of its Clients, any requests from Users who are California residents seeking to exercise their rights of access and deletion under the CCPA must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
Effective December 13th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Rights For Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
Top
Services:
Because Branch is a vendor (acting as a data processor) that processes data on behalf of its Clients (acting as data controllers), any requests relating to European and United Kingdom Users’ exercise of their Personal Data rights under the European General Data Protection Regulation, or equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation, must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
Moreover, Branch supports functionality to allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data privacy rights.
Clients can flag in the Branch SDK
that a particular User has requested that their data not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Website and Business Contacts:
Under applicable law, Branch is the data controller of Personal Data we collect from the Website and from offline sources and vendors for marketing purposes. The laws of some jurisdictions such as the laws of the European Economic Area and the United Kingdom require data controllers to tell you about the legal ground that they rely on for using, sharing, or disclosing of your information. To the extent those laws apply, our legal grounds are as follows:
Contractual Commitments: We may use, share, or disclose information to honor our contractual commitments to you. For example, we will process your Personal Data to comply with our agreements with you, and to honor our commitments in any contracts that we have with you.
With Your Consent: Where required by law, and in some other cases, we use, share, or disclose information on the basis of your consent.
Legitimate Interests: In many cases, we use, share, or disclose information on the ground that it furthers our legitimate business interests in ways that are not overridden by the interests or fundamental rights and freedoms of the affected individuals, such as customer service, certain promotional activities, analyzing and improving our business, providing security for the Services, preventing fraud, and managing legal issues.
Legal Compliance: We need to use, share, and disclose information in certain ways to comply with our legal obligations.
Website Users and others who are residents of the European Economic Area or United Kingdom may (1) seek confirmation regarding whether Branch is processing Personal Data about you, (2) request access to such data, (3) ask that we correct, amend, or delete it where it is inaccurate, (4) ask us to restrict how we process and disclose certain of your Personal Data, (5) transfer your Personal Data to another party, or (6) revoke consent for the processing of your Personal Data (if your consent is the legal basis we rely on to process your Personal Data).
You can submit such requests at
https://preferences.branch.io/
, which will be processed in line with applicable law. Although we make good faith efforts to provide you with access to your Personal Data, there may be circumstances in which we are unable to provide access, including but not limited to: where the information contains legal privilege, would compromise others’ privacy or other legitimate rights, where the burden or expense of providing access would be disproportionate to the risks to your privacy in the case in question, or where it is commercially proprietary. To protect your privacy, we will take commercially reasonable steps to verify your identity before granting access to or making any changes to your Personal Data.
Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom have the right to file a complaint regarding their Personal Data directly with the appropriate data protection authority. For information on who those parties are and how they can be reached please go to
http://ec.europa.eu/justice/article-29/structure/data-protection-authorities/index_en.htm
for EU residents and
https://ico.org.uk/
for residents of the United Kingdom.
Effective April 7th 2023
to
December 13th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Rights For Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
Top
Services:
Because Branch is a vendor (acting as a data processor) that processes data on behalf of its Clients (acting as data controllers), any requests relating to European and United Kingdom Users’ exercise of their Personal Data rights under the European General Data Protection Regulation, or equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation, must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
Moreover, Branch supports functionality to allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data privacy rights.
Clients can flag in the Branch SDK
that a particular User has requested that their data not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Website and Business Contacts:
Under applicable law, Branch is the data controller of Personal Data we collect from the Website and from offline sources and vendors for marketing purposes. The laws of some jurisdictions such as the laws of the European Economic Area and the United Kingdom require data controllers to tell you about the legal ground that they rely on for using, sharing, or disclosing of your information. To the extent those laws apply, our legal grounds are as follows:
Contractual Commitments: We may use, share, or disclose information to honor our contractual commitments to you. For example, we will process your Personal Data to comply with our agreements with you, and to honor our commitments in any contracts that we have with you.
With Your Consent: Where required by law, and in some other cases, we use, share, or disclose information on the basis of your consent.
Legitimate Interests: In many cases, we use, share, or disclose information on the ground that it furthers our legitimate business interests in ways that are not overridden by the interests or fundamental rights and freedoms of the affected individuals, such as customer service, certain promotional activities, analyzing and improving our business, providing security for the Services, preventing fraud, and managing legal issues.
Legal Compliance: We need to use, share, and disclose information in certain ways to comply with our legal obligations.
Website Users and others who are residents of the European Economic Area or United Kingdom may (1) seek confirmation regarding whether Branch is processing Personal Data about you, (2) request access to such data, (3) ask that we correct, amend, or delete it where it is inaccurate, (4) ask us to restrict how we process and disclose certain of your Personal Data, (5) transfer your Personal Data to another party, or (6) revoke consent for the processing of your Personal Data (if your consent is the legal basis we rely on to process your Personal Data).
You can submit such requests at
https://privacy.branch.io/hc/en-us/requests/new
, which will be processed in line with applicable law. Although we make good faith efforts to provide you with access to your Personal Data, there may be circumstances in which we are unable to provide access, including but not limited to: where the information contains legal privilege, would compromise others’ privacy or other legitimate rights, where the burden or expense of providing access would be disproportionate to the risks to your privacy in the case in question, or where it is commercially proprietary. To protect your privacy, we will take commercially reasonable steps to verify your identity before granting access to or making any changes to your Personal Data.
Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom have the right to file a complaint regarding their Personal Data directly with the appropriate data protection authority. For information on who those parties are and how they can be reached please go to
http://ec.europa.eu/justice/article-29/structure/data-protection-authorities/index_en.htm
for EU residents and
https://ico.org.uk/
for residents of the United Kingdom.
Effective January 1st 2023
to
April 7th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Rights For Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
Top
Services:
Because Branch is a vendor (acting as a data processor) that processes data on behalf of its Clients (acting as data controllers), any requests relating to European and United Kingdom Users’ exercise of their Personal Data rights under the European General Data Protection Regulation, or equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation, must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
Moreover, Branch supports functionality to allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data privacy rights.
Clients can flag in the Branch SDK
that a particular User has requested that their data not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Website and Business Contacts:
Under applicable law, Branch is the data controller of Personal Data we collect from the Website and from offline sources and vendors for marketing purposes. The laws of some jurisdictions such as the laws of the European Economic Area and the United Kingdom require data controllers to tell you about the legal ground that they rely on for using, sharing, or disclosing of your information. To the extent those laws apply, our legal grounds are as follows:
Contractual Commitments: We may use, share, or disclose information to honor our contractual commitments to you. For example, we will process your Personal Data to comply with our agreements with you, and to honor our commitments in any contracts that we have with you.
With Your Consent: Where required by law, and in some other cases, we use, share, or disclose information on the basis of your consent.
Legitimate Interests: In many cases, we use, share, or disclose information on the ground that it furthers our legitimate business interests in ways that are not overridden by the interests or fundamental rights and freedoms of the affected individuals, such as customer service, certain promotional activities, analyzing and improving our business, providing security for the Services, preventing fraud, and managing legal issues.
Legal Compliance: We need to use, share, and disclose information in certain ways to comply with our legal obligations.
Website Users and others who are residents of the European Economic Area or United Kingdom may (1) seek confirmation regarding whether Branch is processing Personal Data about you, (2) request access to such data, (3) ask that we correct, amend, or delete it where it is inaccurate, (4) ask us to restrict how we process and disclose certain of your Personal Data, (5) transfer your Personal Data to another party, or (6) revoke consent for the processing of your Personal Data (if your consent is the legal basis we rely on to process your Personal Data).
You can submit such requests at
https://privacy.branch.io/hc/en-us/requests/new
, which will be processed in line with applicable law. Although we make good faith efforts to provide you with access to your Personal Data, there may be circumstances in which we are unable to provide access, including but not limited to: where the information contains legal privilege, would compromise others’ privacy or other legitimate rights, where the burden or expense of providing access would be disproportionate to the risks to your privacy in the case in question, or where it is commercially proprietary. To protect your privacy, we will take commercially reasonable steps to verify your identity before granting access to or making any changes to your Personal Data.
Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom have the right to file a complaint regarding their Personal Data directly with the appropriate data protection authority. For information on who those parties are and how they can be reached please go to
http://ec.europa.eu/justice/article-29/structure/data-protection-authorities/index_en.htm
for EU residents and
https://ico.org.uk/
for residents of the United Kingdom.
Effective December 29th 2022
to
January 1st 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Rights For Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
Services:
Because Branch is a vendor (acting as a data processor) that processes data on behalf of its Clients (acting as data controllers), any requests relating to European and United Kingdom Users’ exercise of their Personal Data rights under the European General Data Protection Regulation, or equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation, must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
Moreover, Branch supports functionality to allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data privacy rights.
Clients can flag in the Branch SDK
that a particular User has requested that their data not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Website and Business Contacts:
Under applicable law, Branch is the data controller of Personal Data we collect from the Website and from offline sources and vendors for marketing purposes. The laws of some jurisdictions such as the laws of the European Economic Area and the United Kingdom require data controllers to tell you about the legal ground that they rely on for using, sharing, or disclosing of your information. To the extent those laws apply, our legal grounds are as follows:
Contractual Commitments: We may use, share, or disclose information to honor our contractual commitments to you. For example, we will process your Personal Data to comply with our agreements with you, and to honor our commitments in any contracts that we have with you.
With Your Consent: Where required by law, and in some other cases, we use, share, or disclose information on the basis of your consent.
Legitimate Interests: In many cases, we use, share, or disclose information on the ground that it furthers our legitimate business interests in ways that are not overridden by the interests or fundamental rights and freedoms of the affected individuals, such as customer service, certain promotional activities, analyzing and improving our business, providing security for the Services, preventing fraud, and managing legal issues.
Legal Compliance: We need to use, share, and disclose information in certain ways to comply with our legal obligations.
Website Users and others who are residents of the European Economic Area or United Kingdom may (1) seek confirmation regarding whether Branch is processing Personal Data about you, (2) request access to such data, (3) ask that we correct, amend, or delete it where it is inaccurate, (4) ask us to restrict how we process and disclose certain of your Personal Data, (5) transfer your Personal Data to another party, or (6) revoke consent for the processing of your Personal Data (if your consent is the legal basis we rely on to process your Personal Data).
You can submit such requests at
https://privacy.branch.io/hc/en-us/requests/new
, which will be processed in line with applicable law. Although we make good faith efforts to provide you with access to your Personal Data, there may be circumstances in which we are unable to provide access, including but not limited to: where the information contains legal privilege, would compromise others’ privacy or other legitimate rights, where the burden or expense of providing access would be disproportionate to the risks to your privacy in the case in question, or where it is commercially proprietary. To protect your privacy, we will take commercially reasonable steps to verify your identity before granting access to or making any changes to your Personal Data.
Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom have the right to file a complaint regarding their Personal Data directly with the appropriate data protection authority. For information on who those parties are and how they can be reached please go to
http://ec.europa.eu/justice/article-29/structure/data-protection-authorities/index_en.htm
for EU residents and
https://ico.org.uk/
for residents of the United Kingdom.
Effective October 11th 2022
to
December 29th 2022
Download
Table of Contents
Rights For Residents of the European Economic Area and United K
ingdom
Top
Services:
Because Branch is a service provider (acting as a data processor) that processes data on behalf of its Clients (acting as data controllers), any requests relating to European and United Kingdom Users’ exercise of their Personal Data rights under the European General Data Protection Regulation, or equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation, must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
Moreover, Branch supports functionality to allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data privacy rights.
Clients can flag in the Branch SDK
that a particular User has requested that their data not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Website and Business Contacts:
Under applicable law, Branch is the data controller of Personal Data we collect from the Website and from offline sources and service providers for marketing purposes. Website Users and others who are residents of the European Economic Area or United Kingdom may (1) seek confirmation regarding whether Branch is processing Personal Data about you, (2) request access to such data, (3) ask that we correct, amend, or delete it where it is inaccurate, (4) ask us to restrict how we process and disclose certain of your Personal Data, (5) transfer your Personal Data to a third party, or (6) revoke consent for the processing of your Personal Data (if your consent is the legal basis we rely on to process your Personal Data).
You can submit such requests at
https://privacy.branch.io/hc/en-us/requests/new
, which will be processed in line with applicable law. Although we make good faith efforts to provide you with access to your Personal Data, there may be circumstances in which we are unable to provide access, including but not limited to: where the information contains legal privilege, would compromise others’ privacy or other legitimate rights, where the burden or expense of providing access would be disproportionate to the risks to your privacy in the case in question, or where it is commercially proprietary. To protect your privacy, we will take commercially reasonable steps to verify your identity before granting access to or making any changes to your Personal Data.
Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom have the right to file a complaint regarding their Personal Data directly with the appropriate data protection authority. For information on who those parties are and how they can be reached please go to
http://ec.europa.eu/justice/article-29/structure/data-protection-authorities/index_en.htm
for EU residents and
https://ico.org.uk/
for residents of the United Kingdom.
Effective June 1st 2022
to
October 11th 2022
Download
Table of Contents
Rights For Residents of the European Economic Area and United K
ingdom
Services:
Because Branch is a service provider (acting as a data processor) that processes data on behalf of its Clients (acting as data controllers), any requests relating to European and United Kingdom Users’ exercise of their Personal Data rights under the European General Data Protection Regulation, or equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation, must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
Moreover, Branch supports functionality to allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data privacy rights.
Clients can flag in the Branch SDK
that a particular User has requested that their data not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Website and Business Contacts:
Under applicable law, Branch is the data controller of Personal Data we collect from the Website and from offline sources and service providers for marketing purposes. Website Users and others who are residents of the European Economic Area or United Kingdom may (1) seek confirmation regarding whether Branch is processing Personal Data about you, (2) request access to such data, (3) ask that we correct, amend, or delete it where it is inaccurate, (4) ask us to restrict how we process and disclose certain of your Personal Data, (5) transfer your Personal Data to a third party, or (6) revoke consent for the processing of your Personal Data (if your consent is the legal basis we rely on to process your Personal Data).
You can submit such requests at
https://privacy.branch.io/hc/en-us/requests/new
, which will be processed in line with applicable law. Although we make good faith efforts to provide you with access to your Personal Data, there may be circumstances in which we are unable to provide access, including but not limited to: where the information contains legal privilege, would compromise others’ privacy or other legitimate rights, where the burden or expense of providing access would be disproportionate to the risks to your privacy in the case in question, or where it is commercially proprietary. To protect your privacy, we will take commercially reasonable steps to verify your identity before granting access to or making any changes to your Personal Data.
Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom have the right to file a complaint regarding their Personal Data directly with the appropriate data protection authority. For information on who those parties are and how they can be reached please go to
http://ec.europa.eu/justice/article-29/structure/data-protection-authorities/index_en.htm
for EU residents and
https://ico.org.uk/
for residents of the United Kingdom.
Effective December 13th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Data Subject Rights under Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”)
Top
This supplemental privacy notice applies to personal data processing activities in accordance with Brazilian data protection law. This notice supplements the information in our Privacy Policy. Certain terms used below have the meanings given to them in Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (
“LGPD”
). If you have any questions about this supplemental privacy notice, you can contact our Data Protection Officer, Ayisha Gelin, at privacy@branch.io.
Services:
Because Branch is a vendor that processes data on behalf of its Clients, any requests relating to Brazilian Users’ exercise of their rights under LGPD must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
Moreover, Branch supports functionality to allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data privacy rights.
Clients can flag in the Branch SDK
that a particular User has requested that their data not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Website:
Under applicable law, Branch is the data controller of Personal Data we collect from the Website. If you are a Website User who is a resident of Brazil, you may have certain rights under LGPD. Brazilian law may permit you to request that we: confirm whether we process your data; provide access to and/or a copy of certain information we hold about you; correct incomplete, inaccurate and outdated data; anonymize, block or delete data that is unnecessary, excessive or not being processed in accordance with Brazilian data protection law; port your personal data to another service or product vendor; delete personal data processed with your consent, when applicable; provide you with information regarding the public and private entities to which we disclose data; provide you with information about the possibility of withdrawing consent and the consequences of such withdrawal, where applicable; and / or withdraw your consent.
You can submit such requests at
https://preferences.branch.io/
, which will be processed in line with applicable law. To protect your privacy, we will take commercially reasonable steps to verify your identity before granting access to or making any changes to your Personal Data.
Effective July 8th 2024
to
December 13th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Data Subject Rights under Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”)
Top
This supplemental privacy notice applies to personal data processing activities in accordance with Brazilian data protection law. This notice supplements the information in our Privacy Policy. Certain terms used below have the meanings given to them in Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (
“LGPD”
). If you have any questions about this supplemental privacy notice, you can contact our Data Protection Officer, Ayisha Gelin, at privacy@branch.io.
Services:
Because Branch is a vendor that processes data on behalf of its Clients, any requests relating to Brazilian Users’ exercise of their rights under LGPD must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
Moreover, Branch supports functionality to allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data privacy rights.
Clients can flag in the Branch SDK
that a particular User has requested that their data not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Website:
Under applicable law, Branch is the data controller of Personal Data we collect from the Website. If you are a Website User who is a resident of Brazil, you may have certain rights under LGPD. Brazilian law may permit you to request that we: confirm whether we process your data; provide access to and/or a copy of certain information we hold about you; correct incomplete, inaccurate and outdated data; anonymize, block or delete data that is unnecessary, excessive or not being processed in accordance with Brazilian data protection law; port your personal data to another service or product vendor; delete personal data processed with your consent, when applicable; provide you with information regarding the public and private entities to which we disclose data; provide you with information about the possibility of withdrawing consent and the consequences of such withdrawal, where applicable; and / or withdraw your consent.
You can submit such requests at
https://privacy.branch.io/hc/en-us/requests/new
, which will be processed in line with applicable law. To protect your privacy, we will take commercially reasonable steps to verify your identity before granting access to or making any changes to your Personal Data.
Effective April 7th 2023
to
July 8th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Data Subject Rights under Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”)
Top
This supplemental privacy notice applies to personal data processing activities in accordance with Brazilian data protection law. This notice supplements the information in our Privacy Policy. Certain terms used below have the meanings given to them in Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (
“LGPD”
). If you have any questions about this supplemental privacy notice, you can contact our Data Protection Officer, Cathleen Hartge, at privacy@branch.io.
Services:
Because Branch is a vendor that processes data on behalf of its Clients, any requests relating to Brazilian Users’ exercise of their rights under LGPD must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
Moreover, Branch supports functionality to allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data privacy rights.
Clients can flag in the Branch SDK
that a particular User has requested that their data not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Website:
Under applicable law, Branch is the data controller of Personal Data we collect from the Website. If you are a Website User who is a resident of Brazil, you may have certain rights under LGPD. Brazilian law may permit you to request that we: confirm whether we process your data; provide access to and/or a copy of certain information we hold about you; correct incomplete, inaccurate and outdated data; anonymize, block or delete data that is unnecessary, excessive or not being processed in accordance with Brazilian data protection law; port your personal data to another service or product vendor; delete personal data processed with your consent, when applicable; provide you with information regarding the public and private entities to which we disclose data; provide you with information about the possibility of withdrawing consent and the consequences of such withdrawal, where applicable; and / or withdraw your consent.
You can submit such requests at
https://privacy.branch.io/hc/en-us/requests/new
, which will be processed in line with applicable law. To protect your privacy, we will take commercially reasonable steps to verify your identity before granting access to or making any changes to your Personal Data.
Effective January 1st 2023
to
April 7th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Data Subject Rights under Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”)
Top
This supplemental privacy notice applies to personal data processing activities in accordance with Brazilian data protection law. This notice supplements the information in our Privacy Policy. Certain terms used below have the meanings given to them in Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (
“LGPD”
). If you have any questions about this supplemental privacy notice, you can contact our Data Protection Officer, Cathleen Hartge, at privacy@branch.io.
Services:
Because Branch is a vendor that processes data on behalf of its Clients, any requests relating to Brazilian Users’ exercise of their rights under LGPD must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
Moreover, Branch supports functionality to allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data privacy rights.
Clients can flag in the Branch SDK
that a particular User has requested that their data not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Website:
Under applicable law, Branch is the data controller of Personal Data we collect from the Website. If you are a Website User who is a resident of Brazil, you may have certain rights under LGPD. Brazilian law may permit you to request that we: confirm whether we process your data; provide access to and/or a copy of certain information we hold about you; correct incomplete, inaccurate and outdated data; anonymize, block or delete data that is unnecessary, excessive or not being processed in accordance with Brazilian data protection law; port your personal data to another service or product vendor; delete personal data processed with your consent, when applicable; provide you with information regarding the public and private entities to which we disclose data; provide you with information about the possibility of withdrawing consent and the consequences of such withdrawal, where applicable; and / or withdraw your consent.
You can submit such requests at
https://privacy.branch.io/hc/en-us/requests/new
, which will be processed in line with applicable law. To protect your privacy, we will take commercially reasonable steps to verify your identity before granting access to or making any changes to your Personal Data.
Effective December 29th 2022
to
January 1st 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Data Subject Rights under Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”)
This supplemental privacy notice applies to personal data processing activities in accordance with Brazilian data protection law. This notice supplements the information in our Privacy Policy. Certain terms used below have the meanings given to them in Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (
“LGPD”
). If you have any questions about this supplemental privacy notice, you can contact our Data Protection Officer, Cathleen Hartge, at privacy@branch.io.
Services:
Because Branch is a vendor that processes data on behalf of its Clients, any requests relating to Brazilian Users’ exercise of their rights under LGPD must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
Moreover, Branch supports functionality to allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data privacy rights.
Clients can flag in the Branch SDK
that a particular User has requested that their data not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Website:
Under applicable law, Branch is the data controller of Personal Data we collect from the Website. If you are a Website User who is a resident of Brazil, you may have certain rights under LGPD. Brazilian law may permit you to request that we: confirm whether we process your data; provide access to and/or a copy of certain information we hold about you; correct incomplete, inaccurate and outdated data; anonymize, block or delete data that is unnecessary, excessive or not being processed in accordance with Brazilian data protection law; port your personal data to another service or product vendor; delete personal data processed with your consent, when applicable; provide you with information regarding the public and private entities to which we disclose data; provide you with information about the possibility of withdrawing consent and the consequences of such withdrawal, where applicable; and / or withdraw your consent.
You can submit such requests at
https://privacy.branch.io/hc/en-us/requests/new
, which will be processed in line with applicable law. To protect your privacy, we will take commercially reasonable steps to verify your identity before granting access to or making any changes to your Personal Data.
Effective October 11th 2022
to
December 29th 2022
Download
Table of Contents
Data Subject Rights under Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”)
Top
This supplemental privacy notice applies to personal data processing activities in accordance with Brazilian data protection law. This notice supplements the information in our Privacy Policy. Certain terms used below have the meanings given to them in Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (
“LGPD”
). If you have any questions about this supplemental privacy notice, you can contact our Data Protection Officer, Cathleen Hartge, at privacy@branch.io.
Services:
Because Branch is a service provider that processes data on behalf of its Clients, any requests relating to Brazilian Users’ exercise of their rights under LGPD must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
Moreover, Branch supports functionality to allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data privacy rights.
Clients can flag in the Branch SDK
that a particular User has requested that their data not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Website:
Under applicable law, Branch is the data controller of Personal Data we collect from the Website. If you are a Website User who is a resident of Brazil, you may have certain rights under LGPD. Brazilian law may permit you to request that we: confirm whether we process your data; provide access to and/or a copy of certain information we hold about you; correct incomplete, inaccurate and outdated data; anonymize, block or delete data that is unnecessary, excessive or not being processed in accordance with Brazilian data protection law; port your personal data to another service or product vendor; delete personal data processed with your consent, when applicable; provide you with information regarding the public and private entities with which we share data; provide you with information about the possibility of withdrawing consent and the consequences of such withdrawal, where applicable; and / or withdraw your consent.
You can submit such requests at
https://privacy.branch.io/hc/en-us/requests/new
, which will be processed in line with applicable law. To protect your privacy, we will take commercially reasonable steps to verify your identity before granting access to or making any changes to your Personal Data.
Effective June 1st 2022
to
October 11th 2022
Download
Table of Contents
Data Subject Rights under Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados
(“LGPD”)
This supplemental privacy notice applies to personal data processing activities in accordance with Brazilian data protection law. This notice supplements the information in our Privacy Policy. Certain terms used below have the meanings given to them in Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (
“LGPD”
). If you have any questions about this supplemental privacy notice, you can contact our Data Protection Officer, Cathleen Hartge, at privacy@branch.io.
Services:
Because Branch is a service provider that processes data on behalf of its Clients, any requests relating to Brazilian Users’ exercise of their rights under LGPD must be provided to Branch by a Client. Clients can notify Branch of these requests
here
.
Moreover, Branch supports functionality to allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data privacy rights.
Clients can flag in the Branch SDK
that a particular User has requested that their data not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Website:
Under applicable law, Branch is the data controller of Personal Data we collect from the Website. If you are a Website User who is a resident of Brazil, you may have certain rights under LGPD. Brazilian law may permit you to request that we: confirm whether we process your data; provide access to and/or a copy of certain information we hold about you; correct incomplete, inaccurate and outdated data; anonymize, block or delete data that is unnecessary, excessive or not being processed in accordance with Brazilian data protection law; port your personal data to another service or product vendor; delete personal data processed with your consent, when applicable; provide you with information regarding the public and private entities with which we share data; provide you with information about the possibility of withdrawing consent and the consequences of such withdrawal, where applicable; and / or withdraw your consent.
You can submit such requests at
https://privacy.branch.io/hc/en-us/requests/new
, which will be processed in line with applicable law. To protect your privacy, we will take commercially reasonable steps to verify your identity before granting access to or making any changes to your Personal Data.
Effective December 12th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Branch Information Security and Privacy Standards
Branch Metrics, Inc. is committed to adopt and adhere to the following technical and organizational security measures for software development, business operations and data privacy to provide a secure and safe platform service to our customers:
Governance
Branch shall implement and maintain an Information Security Management System (ISMS) that meets or exceeds industry standards and that includes, without limitation, appropriate policies, governance structures, staffing, monitoring and assessment procedures.
Security policies shall be approved by the Chief Operating Officer (COO) or the Information Security Management Committee (ISMC).  Any exception must be authorized by the Head of Security or ISMC.
Branch shall update security policies at least annually.
Workplace Security
Branch shall install a visitor check-in system.  All visitors must sign in at the front desk, and the visitor management application will notify the hosting employee to pick up the visitors.  The visitor management application will issue a visitor badge.  While visiting office premises, visitors must be accompanied by the hosting employee and wear their visitor badge in a publicly visible fashion at all times.
Branch shall implement and maintain a secure mobile device management system to secure assets and information access for work. Company-issued devices and laptops are secured using a tested image and are protected using anti-virus and malware scanning software. To protect business data from data theft or exploit, external USB storage devices for laptops are prohibited (mitigated by mobile device management tool). Under Branch’s BYOD (Bring Your Own Device) policy, personal mobile devices are required to access a separate guest wifi network if used in the office.
Physical Security
Branch shall implement and maintain a program to ensure personnel physical access is revoked immediately upon termination or when access is no longer required.
Employees must use an issued security access card to access office premises. Branch shall use physical locks inside the office building to secure network equipment and company assets.  Access to server rooms should be restricted to authorized IT administrative staff. Security surveillance recordings are for review in case of any incident.
Organizational Controls
Branch shall implement and maintain policies and procedures, which shall be documented and approved by its senior management, to support the hiring, termination, code of conduct, ethics and background screening of all employees and contractors.
Branch shall perform a background check using a reliable third-party service for each employee.
Branch shall implement and maintain a security awareness program for employees, which provides basic IT security standards (during employee on-boarding), annual privacy and security awareness training, and individual personnel acknowledgment of intent to comply with corporate security policies.
Network Security Measures
Authentication and Password Policy Control
Branch shall implement and maintain strong password management policies for all end user and system accounts related to the processing environment. Such procedures must follow recognized industry best practices in their configuration and management, including length and structure (commonly referred to as strong passwords).
Branch shall implement a strong and complex password policy enforced for employees and developers. This should require at least 8 characters in length, including at least 1 uppercase character, 1 lowercase character, 1 number, and 1 special character.  For employees, an industry-strength Mobile Device Management tool is used to enforce password policy in company-issued laptops.  MFA (Multi-factor Authentication) is required to access Branch Metrics dashboard and applications.
Branch shall implement an account lockout policy when users exceed the threshold of invalid login attempts.
System and Data Access
Branch shall implement and maintain a secure system access mechanism and a remote access mechanism.  Only authorized production support members and customer data administrators can access Branch’s production systems backend and customer data on an as-needed basis via secured channels using virtual private network (VPN), jump boxes, secure shell (SSH) and multi-factor authentication (MFA).
Branch’s Web services require the use of service accounts and secure API tokens.
Logical Data Access
Branch shall implement and maintain a logical system access provisioning process that meets or exceeds industry standards for all systems that access, process or store customer data and confidential information.
Branch shall implement role-based security access.
Branch shall implement and maintain a periodic logical access control review.
Operations Security Measures
Secure Software Development Lifecycle Process
Branch shall implement a secure software development lifecycle process using agile development methodology, and periodically review security issues identified from static code analysis (SAST), Web application vulnerability scanning (DAST), penetration testing, and container security vulnerability scanning automated in the build pipeline.
Branch shall engage third party professional security firms to perform network and application penetration testing in production environments annually. In addition,  Branch will use security researchers from crowdsourcing communities to identify exploits and security vulnerabilities.
Risk Management
Branch shall implement and maintain a vendor and technology risk assessment strategy and risk mitigation methodology.  The due diligence process will ensure systems security and data privacy details are reviewed, and security risks are mitigated before adoption.
Backup and Restore
Branch shall implement and maintain data backup and restore processes to secure business data. Daily backups (snapshots) of data are made and stored in redundant locations.  Only authorized personnel may access or restore any data from the backup datasets.
Security Monitoring and Logging
Branch shall implement comprehensive system monitoring for Branch’s cloud applications and microservices.
Branch shall implement vulnerability and network intrusion detection controls.  These controls will generate proactive alerts to notify the platform infrastructure team about any system events and suspicious activities that may be potential security incidents.  Detailed logging and audit reports are available upon request for security incident diagnosis and forensics.
Branch shall implement and maintain security information and event management (SIEM) system.  All system logs are redirected to a central infrastructure for event tracking, diagnosis and audit trail.  In addition, with the use of SIEM, security team members can continuously monitor for any possible suspicious application behavior and unusual system events and respond timely to active and emerging security threats.
Security Incident Response Process
Branch shall implement and maintain a security incident response program. The security incident response program shall define steps to be coordinated with the cross-functional incident response team in order to mitigate security incidents in a timely manner.   All verified security incidents will be reported to the security incident response team in a timely manner. Depending on the levels of response, and pursuant to the applicable customer agreement, customers will be notified timely about the status and the remediation.
Branch shall test the security incident response process annually.
Business Continuity
Branch shall implement and maintain a business continuity program that meets or exceeds industry standards and that provides a formal framework and methodology, including without limitation, a business impact analysis and risk assessment process to identify and prioritize critical business functions (“Business Continuity Program”).
Branch shall conduct a business continuity test every twelve (12) months, including a review of the Business Continuity Program, roles and responsibilities, business documentation requirements, recovery strategies, Mean Time to Recovery (MTTR), Recovery Time Objectives (RTOs), Recovery Point Objectives (RPOs), testing strategy and frequency.
Branch shall implement and maintain a disaster recovery program that meets or exceeds industry standards and that provides a formal framework and methodology, including without limitation, a business impact analysis and risk assessment process to identify and prioritize critical business functions.
Change Management
Branch shall implement and manage a change management system for planned and emergency software changes. There will be a workflow approval process in place to ensure change requests are prioritized and assigned.
Branch shall implement a security patch management program. Software and security updates are pushed out periodically and on-demand.  Critical security updates will be applied in a timely manner to mitigate any immediate security risks.
Branch shall implement and manage a configuration management system. Configuration of systems and services is performed automatically by programs vetted for security deficits.
Data Security and Privacy Measures
Data Encryption and Integrity
Branch shall provide industry standard encryption of customer data and confidential information in transit over public or leased circuits.
Branch shall provide industry standard encryption of customer data and confidential information at rest on local laptops, mobile devices, shared drives, as well as on backend data stores.
Branch shall implement and maintain logical data segregation that meets or exceeds industry standards to ensure customer data and confidential information is not viewable by unauthorized users.
Branch shall implement input and output validation for data protection in the dashboard application.  Business data is validated and checked for integrity in the backend microservices and in the API Web services.  A data loss prevention tool shall be deployed in Branch’s backend storage infrastructure to ensure data integrity.
Data Management and Protection
Branch has implemented different data protection controls to ensure data privacy of customer data in accordance with applicable law.  This includes protecting data at rest (data encryption), data in transit (secure data transport) and role-based system access control. Data access is restricted to authorized personnel, and production backend systems can be only accessible using MFA, VPN and company-issued laptops.
Branch shall have the necessary processes and procedures in place to execute Data Subject Requests regarding personal data in accordance with applicable law in order to meet applicable legal requirements.
Branch shall follow industry security best practices (e.g. Amazon, NIST) to destroy storage media, including cloud storage and also laptop hard drive before disposal.
Data Privacy
Branch maintains a documented data privacy statement that describes what data Branch collects, how it is used and how it is shared available at
https://branch.io/privacy
.
Effective February 19th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Branch Metrics Modern Slavery and Human Trafficking Statement
Purpose of this Statement
This statement is made by Branch Metrics, Inc. and its subsidiaries (collectively,
“Branch,” “us,” “we” or “our”
) pursuant to section 54(1) of the United Kingdom Modern Slavery Act 2015.
Introduction
Branch is committed to providing a fair and ethical workplace and operating its business in a socially responsible way that supports the protection of human rights globally. We respect the standards embodied in the Universal Declaration of Human Rights and the International Labour Organization conventions. Specifically, Branch is strongly opposed to slavery and human trafficking and will not knowingly support or conduct business with any organization involved in such activities.
Our Business Activities and Organization
Branch provides the leading mobile linking platform, with solutions that unify user experience and measurement across different devices, platforms, and channels. Top brands use Branch to grow their business, improve their customer experience, and measure and optimize campaign performance. We are a Delaware corporation headquartered in Mountain View, California with subsidiaries and operations around the world, including the United Kingdom. More information about us can be found at
branch.io
.
Our key suppliers are primarily based in the United States and are typically in the fields of technology, data, office and facilities, and professional advisory services. We only use reputable providers of goods and services. Based on the geography of our business and suppliers, the industry in which we operate, and the structure of our business, there is a low risk of slavery and human trafficking taking place within our supply chain. However, we remain vigilant against the risk of human trafficking and any form of slavery and take steps to assess and manage that risk.
Relevant Policies and Processes
Our Global Code of Conduct applies to all employees, officers, directors, independent contractors, contingent workers and other service providers and helps to ensure that we are conducting business in an ethical and transparent manner. All Personnel are expected to read and comply with our Global Code of Conduct. Our Global Code of Conduct requires, among other things, that our personnel not engage in any unlawful activity in conducting our business or in performing their day-to-day duties. Branch also employs a third-party whistleblowing platform that allows for anonymous reporting of good-faith concerns in order for Branch to address inappropriate conduct. In addition, Branch is committed to acting in accordance with applicable law and requests its suppliers and partners to maintain at least the same standards by complying with Branch’s Supplier Code Of Conduct (“
Supplier Code
”). The Supplier Code encompasses compliance with all applicable laws, which includes the UK Modern Slavery Act.
Branch also has a robust employee recruitment process, effectively attracting, training, and integrating a large number of new employees, including conducting, where permitted and in compliance with applicable law, background and eligibility to work in the country of employment checks for all employees to safeguard against human trafficking or individuals being forced to work against their will.
Continuing Action To Address Modern Slavery
Branch is committed to continuing to improve its operational and management systems and controls to combat slavery and human trafficking by, among other actions, conducting additional risk-based due diligence prior to supplier onboarding and continually assessing and improving the effectiveness of our ethics and compliance programs.
This statement is made pursuant to section 54(1) of the Modern Slavery Act 2015 and constitutes Branch's slavery and human trafficking statement for the financial year ending December 31, 2025. This statement was approved by the Board of Directors of Branch Metrics, Inc. on February 6, 2024 and last reviewed for accuracy on February 11, 2025.
David Karnstedt
Chief Executive Officer
Branch Metrics, Inc.
Effective February 15th 2023
to
February 19th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Branch Metrics Modern Slavery and Human Trafficking Statement
Purpose of this Statement
This statement is made by Branch Metrics, Inc. and its subsidiaries (collectively,
“Branch,” “us,” “we” or “our”
) pursuant to section 54(1) of the United Kingdom Modern Slavery Act 2015.
Introduction
Branch is committed to providing a fair and ethical workplace and operating its business in a socially responsible way that supports the protection of human rights globally. We respect the standards embodied in the Universal Declaration of Human Rights and the International Labour Organization conventions. Specifically, Branch is strongly opposed to slavery and human trafficking and will not knowingly support or conduct business with any organization involved in such activities.
Our Business Activities and Organization
Branch provides the leading mobile linking platform, with solutions that unify user experience and measurement across different devices, platforms, and channels. Top brands use Branch to grow their business, improve their customer experience, and measure and optimize campaign performance. We are a Delaware corporation headquartered in Palo Alto, California with subsidiaries and operations around the world, including the United Kingdom. More information about us can be found at
branch.io
.
Our key suppliers are primarily based in the United States and are typically in the fields of technology, data, office and facilities, and professional advisory services. We only use reputable providers of goods and services. Based on the geography of our business and suppliers, the industry in which we operate, and the structure of our business, there is a low risk of slavery and human trafficking taking place within our supply chain. However, we remain vigilant against the risk of human trafficking and any form of slavery and take steps to assess and manage that risk.
Relevant Policies and Processes
Our Global Code of Conduct applies to all employees, officers, directors, independent contractors, contingent workers and other service providers and helps to ensure that we are conducting business in an ethical and transparent manner. All Personnel are expected to read and comply with our Global Code of Conduct. Our Global Code of Conduct requires, among other things, that our personnel not engage in any unlawful activity in conducting our business or in performing their day-to-day duties. In addition, Branch is committed to acting in accordance with applicable law and requests its suppliers and partners to maintain at least the same standards by complying with Branch’s Supplier Code Of Conduct (“
Supplier Code
”). The Supplier Code encompasses compliance with all applicable laws, which includes the UK Modern Slavery Act.
Branch also has a robust employee recruitment process, effectively attracting, training, and integrating a large number of new employees, including conducting, where permitted and in compliance with applicable law, background and eligibility to work in the country of employment checks for all employees to safeguard against human trafficking or individuals being forced to work against their will.
Continuing Action To Address Modern Slavery
Branch is committed to continuing to improve its operational and management systems and controls to combat slavery and human trafficking by, among other actions, conducting additional risk-based due diligence prior to supplier onboarding and continually assessing and improving the effectiveness of our ethics and compliance programs.
This statement is made pursuant to section 54(1) of the Modern Slavery Act 2015 and constitutes Branch's slavery and human trafficking statement for the financial year ending December 31, 2022. This statement was approved by the Board of Directors of Branch Metrics, Inc. on January 25, 2023.
Alex Austin
Chief Executive Officer
Branch Metrics, Inc.
Effective January 1st 2023
to
February 15th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Branch Metrics Modern Slavery and Human Trafficking Statement
Purpose of this Statement
This statement is made by Branch Metrics, Inc. and its subsidiaries (collectively,
“Branch,” “us,” “we” or “our”
) pursuant to section 54(1) of the United Kingdom Modern Slavery Act 2015.
Introduction
Branch is committed to providing a fair and ethical workplace and operating its business in a socially responsible way that supports the protection of human rights globally. We respect the standards embodied in the Universal Declaration of Human Rights and the International Labour Organization conventions. Specifically, Branch is strongly opposed to slavery and human trafficking and will not knowingly support or conduct business with any organization involved in such activities.
Our Business Activities and Organization
Branch provides the leading mobile linking platform, with solutions that unify user experience and measurement across different devices, platforms, and channels. Top brands use Branch to grow their business, improve their customer experience, and measure and optimize campaign performance. We are a Delaware corporation headquartered in Palo Alto, California with subsidiaries and operations around the world, including the United Kingdom. More information about us can be found at
branch.io
.
Our key suppliers are primarily based in the United States and are typically in the fields of technology, data, office and facilities, and professional advisory services. We only use reputable providers of goods and services. Based on the geography of our business and suppliers, the industry in which we operate, and the structure of our business, there is a low risk of slavery and human trafficking taking place within our supply chain. However, we remain vigilant against the risk of human trafficking and any form of slavery and take steps to assess and manage that risk.
Relevant Policies and Processes
Our Global Code of Conduct applies to all employees, officers, directors, independent contractors, contingent workers and other service providers and helps to ensure that we are conducting business in an ethical and transparent manner. All Personnel are expected to read and comply with our Global Code of Conduct. Our Global Code of Conduct requires, among other things, that our personnel not engage in any unlawful activity in conducting our business or in performing their day-to-day duties.
Branch also has a robust employee recruitment process, effectively attracting, training, and integrating a large number of new employees, including conducting, where permitted and in compliance with applicable law, background and eligibility to work in the country of employment checks for all employees to safeguard against human trafficking or individuals being forced to work against their will.
Continuing Action To Address Modern Slavery
Branch is committed to continuing to improve its operational and management systems and controls to combat slavery and human trafficking by, among other actions, conducting additional risk-based due diligence prior to supplier onboarding and continually assessing and improving the effectiveness of our ethics and compliance programs.
This statement is made pursuant to section 54(1) of the Modern Slavery Act 2015 and constitutes Branch's slavery and human trafficking statement for the financial year ending December 31, 2021. This statement was approved by the Board of Directors of Branch Metrics, Inc. on August 9, 2022.
Mike Molinet
Chief Operating Officer
Branch Metrics, Inc.
Date: June 6, 2022
Effective October 28th 2022
to
January 1st 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Branch Metrics Modern Slavery and Human Trafficking Statement
Purpose of this Statement
This statement is made by Branch Metrics, Inc. and its subsidiaries (collectively,
“Branch,” “us,” “we” or “our”
) pursuant to section 54(1) of the United Kingdom Modern Slavery Act 2015.
Introduction
Branch is committed to providing a fair and ethical workplace and operating its business in a socially responsible way that supports the protection of human rights globally. We respect the standards embodied in the Universal Declaration of Human Rights and the International Labour Organization conventions. Specifically, Branch is strongly opposed to slavery and human trafficking and will not knowingly support or conduct business with any organization involved in such activities.
Our Business Activities and Organization
Branch provides the leading mobile linking platform, with solutions that unify user experience and measurement across different devices, platforms, and channels. Top brands use Branch to grow their business, improve their customer experience, and measure and optimize campaign performance. We are a Delaware corporation headquartered in Palo Alto, California with subsidiaries and operations around the world, including the United Kingdom. More information about us can be found at
branch.io
.
Our key suppliers are primarily based in the United States and are typically in the fields of technology, data, office and facilities, and professional advisory services. We only use reputable providers of goods and services. Based on the geography of our business and suppliers, the industry in which we operate, and the structure of our business, there is a low risk of slavery and human trafficking taking place within our supply chain. However, we remain vigilant against the risk of human trafficking and any form of slavery and take steps to assess and manage that risk.
Relevant Policies and Processes
Our Global Code of Conduct applies to all employees, officers, directors, independent contractors, contingent workers and other service providers and helps to ensure that we are conducting business in an ethical and transparent manner. All Personnel are expected to read and comply with our Global Code of Conduct. Our Global Code of Conduct requires, among other things, that our personnel not engage in any unlawful activity in conducting our business or in performing their day-to-day duties.
Branch also has a robust employee recruitment process, effectively attracting, training, and integrating a large number of new employees, including conducting, where permitted and in compliance with applicable law, background and eligibility to work in the country of employment checks for all employees to safeguard against human trafficking or individuals being forced to work against their will.
Continuing Action To Address Modern Slavery
Branch is committed to continuing to improve its operational and management systems and controls to combat slavery and human trafficking by, among other actions, conducting additional risk-based due diligence prior to supplier onboarding and continually assessing and improving the effectiveness of our ethics and compliance programs.
This statement is made pursuant to section 54(1) of the Modern Slavery Act 2015 and constitutes Branch's slavery and human trafficking statement for the financial year ending December 31, 2021. This statement was approved by the Board of Directors of Branch Metrics, Inc. on August 9, 2022.
Mike Molinet
Chief Operating Officer
Branch Metrics, Inc.
Date: June 6, 2022
Effective January 1st 2023
Download
Table of Contents
BRANCH METRICS, INC. SOFTWARE LICENSE TERMS
BRANCH NATIVE COMPUTE SDK LIBRARY (hereinafter referred to as the “software”)
These terms are an agreement between you and Branch Metrics, Inc. ("Branch"). They apply to the software named above. The software includes, but is not limited to SDK, content, visual interfaces, interactive features, information, graphics, design, compilation, computer code, products, services, and all other elements of the SDK and related documentation. The terms also apply to any Branch services or updates for the software, except to the extent those have different terms.
IF YOU COMPLY WITH THESE TERMS, YOU HAVE THE FOLLOWING LIMITED, NON-EXCLUSIVE, NON-TRANSFERABLE, NON-SUBLICENSABLE, REVOCABLE RIGHTS BELOW. BY DOWNLOADING, INSTALLING, OR OTHERWISE ACCESSING OR USING THE SOFTWARE, YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE READ, UNDERSTOOD, AND AGREE TO BE BOUND BY THESE TERMS. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE, YOU MAY NOT USE THE SOFTWARE.
INSTALLATION AND USE RIGHTS.
You may install and use any number of copies of the software to develop and test your applications.
THIRD PARTY COMPONENTS.
The software may include third party components with separate legal notices or governed by other agreements, as may be described in the third party notices file(s) accompanying the software.
ADDITIONAL LICENSING REQUIREMENTS AND/OR USE RIGHTS.
DISTRIBUTABLE CODE.
The software is comprised of Distributable Code. “Distributable Code” is code that you are permitted to distribute in applications you develop if you comply with the terms below.
Right to Use and Distribute.
You may copy and distribute the object code form of the software.
Third Party Distribution.
You may permit distributors of your applications to copy and distribute the Distributable Code as part of those applications
Distribution Requirements.
For any Distributable Code you distribute, you must (i) use the Distributable Code in your applications and not as a standalone distribution; (ii) require distributors and external end users to agree to terms that protect it at least as much as this agreement; and (iii) indemnify, defend, and hold harmless Branch from any claims, including attorneys’ fees, related to the distribution or use of your applications, except to the extent that any claim is based solely on the unmodified Distributable Code.
Distribution Restrictions.
You may not: (i) use Branch’s trademarks in your applications’ names or in a way that suggests your applications come from or are endorsed by Branch; or (ii) modify or distribute the source code of any Distributable Code so that any part of it becomes subject to an Excluded License. An “Excluded License” is one that requires, as a condition of use, modification or distribution of code, that (a) it be disclosed or distributed in source code form; or (b) others have the right to modify it.
DATA
Data Collection.
The software may collect information about you and your use of the software, and send that to Branch. Branch may use this information to provide services and improve our products and services. There are also features in the software that may enable you and Branch to collect data from users of your applications. If you use these features, you must comply with applicable law, including providing appropriate notices to users of your applications together with Branch’s Privacy Policy. Branch’s Privacy Policy is located at
https://branch.io/policies/privacy-policy/
. You can learn more about data collection and its use from the software documentation and Branch's Privacy Policy. Your use of the software operates as your consent to these practices
b. Processing of Personal Data.
To the extent Branch is a processor or subprocessor of personal data in connection with the software, Branch makes the commitments with respect to data subjects as set forth in the “Rights For Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom” section of Branch’s Privacy Policy to all customers effective May 25, 2018, at
https://branch.io/policies/data-subject-rights/#data-subject-rights-european-general-data-protection-regulation
(or its successor URL).
SCOPE OF LICENSE.
The software is licensed, not sold. This agreement only gives you some rights to use the software. Branch reserves all other rights. Unless applicable law gives you more rights despite this limitation, you may use the software only as expressly permitted in this agreement. In doing so, you must comply with any technical limitations in the software that only allow you to use it in certain ways. You may not (i) work around any technical limitations in the software; (ii) reverse engineer, decompile or disassemble the software, or otherwise attempt to derive the source code for the software, except and to the extent required by third party licensing terms governing use of certain open source components that may be included in the software; (iii) remove, minimize, block or modify any notices of Branch or its suppliers in the software; (iv) use the software in any way that is against the law; or (v) share, publish, rent or lease the software, provide the software as a stand-alone offering for others to use, or transfer the software or this agreement to any third party.
FEEDBACK.
If you provide Branch with any verbal or written comments, bug reports, feedback, enhancements, optimizations, or modifications proposed or suggested by you for the software ("Feedback"), such Feedback is provided on a non-confidential basis (notwithstanding any notice to the contrary you may include in any accompanying communication), and Branch shall have the right to use such Feedback at its discretion, including, but not limited to the incorporation of such suggested changes into the software. You hereby grant Branch a worldwide, perpetual, irrevocable, royalty-free, fully paid, transferable, sublicensable, non-exclusive right and license under all rights necessary to so incorporate, use, and exploit your Feedback in any manner, without restriction, for any purpose, including to make and sell Branch products and services.
RESERVATION OF RIGHTS.
The software is owned by Branch and is licensed, not sold, to you. The software is protected by copyright, trade dress, patent, and trademark laws of the United States and other jurisdictions, international conventions, and all other relevant intellectual property and proprietary rights, and applicable laws. As between you and Branch, all aspects of the software, including intellectual property rights therein and thereto, are the sole and exclusive property of Branch or its subsidiaries or affiliated companies and/or its third-party licensors. You may not sell, license, distribute, copy, modify, publicly perform or display, transmit, publish, edit, adapt, create derivative works from, or make any use of the software except as expressly authorized hereunder. Branch reserves all rights not expressly granted in this agreement. You do not acquire any right, title or interest to the software, whether by implication, estoppel, or otherwise, except for the limited rights set forth in this agreement.
SOFTWARE EXPECTATIONS.
The software: (i) is not an official product and has not been commercially released; (ii) may not be in final form or be fully functional; (iii) may contain errors, design flaws or other problems; (iv) may generate or produce inaccurate information or unexpected or incorrect results; (v) may cause loss of data or communications, project delays or other unpredictable damage or loss; (vi) may never be released as a commercial version; and (vii) may be discontinued by Branch in whole or in part, at any time and without any obligation or liability to you or your users. Use of the software may be conditional on your acceptance of additional terms and conditions accompanying the software. In the event of any conflict between this agreement and additional terms and conditions accompanying the software, the latter will govern and control unless expressly stated otherwise.
EXPORT RESTRICTIONS.
You must comply with all domestic and international trade export laws and regulations that apply to the software, which include restrictions on destinations, end users, and end use. You represent that you are not named on any U.S. Government Consolidated Screening denied-party list which may be searched at:
https://www.export.gov/article?id=Consolidated-Screening-List
. You shall not permit any entity or individual to access or use the software who is listed on the Consolidated Screening List or located in a U.S. government-embargoed country, or known to be engaged in proliferation of nuclear, chemical or biological weapons or missiles, or otherwise in violation of any U.S. export law or regulation.
SUPPORT SERVICES.
Because this software is “as is,” Branch may not provide support services for it.
ENTIRE AGREEMENT.
This agreement, and the terms for supplements, updates, Internet-based services and support services that you use, are the entire agreement for the software and support services.
APPLICABLE LAW.
If you acquired the software in the United States, California law applies to interpretation of and claims for breach of this agreement, and the laws of the state where you live apply to all other claims. If you acquired the software in any other country, its laws apply.
CONSUMER RIGHTS; REGIONAL VARIATIONS.
This agreement describes certain legal rights. You may have other rights, including consumer rights, under the laws of your state or country. Separate and apart from your relationship with Branch, you may also have rights with respect to the party from which you acquired the software. This agreement does not change those other rights if the laws of your state or country do not permit it to do so. For example, if you acquired the software in one of the below regions, or mandatory country law applies, then the following provisions apply to you:
Australia.
You have statutory guarantees under the Australian Consumer Law and nothing in this agreement is intended to affect those rights.
Canada.
If you acquired this software in Canada, the product documentation, if any, may specify how to update the software integrated into your digital properties.
Germany and Austria.
Warranty.
The software will perform substantially as described in any Branch materials that accompany it. However, Branch gives no contractual guarantee in relation to the software.
Limitation of Liability.
In case of intentional conduct, gross negligence, claims based on the Product Liability Act, as well as in case of death or personal or physical injury, Branch is liable according to the statutory law. Subject to the foregoing clause (ii), Branch will only be liable for slight negligence if Branch is in breach of such material contractual obligations, the fulfillment of which facilitate the due performance of this agreement, the breach of which would endanger the purpose of this agreement and the compliance with which a party may constantly trust in (so-called "cardinal obligations"). In other cases of slight negligence, Branch will not be liable for slight negligence.
DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTY.
THE SOFTWARE IS LICENSED “AS-IS.” YOU BEAR THE RISK OF USING IT. BRANCH GIVES NO EXPRESS WARRANTIES, GUARANTEES OR CONDITIONS. TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED UNDER YOUR LOCAL LAWS, BRANCH EXCLUDES THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NON-INFRINGEMENT.
LIMITATION ON AND EXCLUSION OF REMEDIES AND DAMAGES. YOU CAN RECOVER FROM BRANCH AND ITS SUPPLIERS ONLY DIRECT DAMAGES UP TO U.S. $100.00. YOU CANNOT RECOVER ANY OTHER DAMAGES, INCLUDING CONSEQUENTIAL, LOST PROFITS, SPECIAL, INDIRECT OR INCIDENTAL DAMAGES.
This limitation applies to (a) anything related to the software, services, content (including code) on third party Internet sites, or third party applications; and (b) claims for breach of contract, breach of warranty, guarantee or condition, strict liability, negligence, or other tort to the extent permitted by applicable law. It also applies even if Branch knew or should have known about the possibility of the damages. The above limitation or exclusion may not apply to you because your state or country may not allow the exclusion or limitation of incidental, consequential or other damages.
Effective December 6th 2022
to
January 1st 2023
Download
Table of Contents
BRANCH METRICS, INC. SOFTWARE LICENSE TERMS
BRANCH NATIVE COMPUTE SDK LIBRARY (hereinafter referred to as the “software”)
These terms are an agreement between you and Branch Metrics, Inc. ("Branch"). They apply to the software named above. The software includes, but is not limited to SDK, content, visual interfaces, interactive features, information, graphics, design, compilation, computer code, products, services, and all other elements of the SDK and related documentation. The terms also apply to any Branch services or updates for the software, except to the extent those have different terms.
IF YOU COMPLY WITH THESE TERMS, YOU HAVE THE FOLLOWING LIMITED, NON-EXCLUSIVE, NON-TRANSFERABLE, NON-SUBLICENSABLE, REVOCABLE RIGHTS BELOW. BY DOWNLOADING, INSTALLING, OR OTHERWISE ACCESSING OR USING THE SOFTWARE, YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE READ, UNDERSTOOD, AND AGREE TO BE BOUND BY THESE TERMS. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE, YOU MAY NOT USE THE SOFTWARE.
1. INSTALLATION AND USE RIGHTS.
You may install and use any number of copies of the software to develop and test your applications.
2. THIRD PARTY COMPONENTS.
The software may include third party components with separate legal notices or governed by other agreements, as may be described in the third party notices file(s) accompanying the software.
3. ADDITIONAL LICENSING REQUIREMENTS AND/OR USE RIGHTS.
a. DISTRIBUTABLE CODE.
The software is comprised of Distributable Code. “Distributable Code” is code that you are permitted to distribute in applications you develop if you comply with the terms below.
Right to Use and Distribute.
You may copy and distribute the object code form of the software.
Third Party Distribution.
You may permit distributors of your applications to copy and distribute the Distributable Code as part of those applications
Distribution Requirements.
For any Distributable Code you distribute, you must (i) use the Distributable Code in your applications and not as a standalone distribution; (ii) require distributors and external end users to agree to terms that protect it at least as much as this agreement; and (iii) indemnify, defend, and hold harmless Branch from any claims, including attorneys’ fees, related to the distribution or use of your applications, except to the extent that any claim is based solely on the unmodified Distributable Code.
Distribution Restrictions.
You may not: (i) use Branch’s trademarks in your applications’ names or in a way that suggests your applications come from or are endorsed by Branch; or (ii) modify or distribute the source code of any Distributable Code so that any part of it becomes subject to an Excluded License. An “Excluded License” is one that requires, as a condition of use, modification or distribution of code, that (a) it be disclosed or distributed in source code form; or (b) others have the right to modify it.
4. DATA
a. Data Collection.
The software may collect information about you and your use of the software, and send that to Branch. Branch may use this information to provide services and improve our products and services. There are also features in the software that may enable you and Branch to collect data from users of your applications. If you use these features, you must comply with applicable law, including providing appropriate notices to users of your applications together with Branch’s Privacy Policy. Branch’s Privacy Policy is located at
https://branch.io/policies/privacy-policy/
. You can learn more about data collection and its use from the software documentation and Branch's Privacy Policy. Your use of the software operates as your consent to these practices.
b. Processing of Personal Data.
To the extent Branch is a processor or subprocessor of personal data in connection with the software, Branch makes the commitments with respect to data subjects as set forth in the “Rights For Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom” section of Branch’s Privacy Policy to all customers effective May 25, 2018, at
https://branch.io/policies/data-subject-rights/#data-subject-rights-european-general-data-protection-regulation
(or its successor URL).
5. SCOPE OF LICENSE.
The software is licensed, not sold. This agreement only gives you some rights to use the software. Branch reserves all other rights. Unless applicable law gives you more rights despite this limitation, you may use the software only as expressly permitted in this agreement. In doing so, you must comply with any technical limitations in the software that only allow you to use it in certain ways. You may not (i) work around any technical limitations in the software; (ii) reverse engineer, decompile or disassemble the software, or otherwise attempt to derive the source code for the software, except and to the extent required by third party licensing terms governing use of certain open source components that may be included in the software; (iii) remove, minimize, block or modify any notices of Branch or its suppliers in the software; (iv) use the software in any way that is against the law; or (v) share, publish, rent or lease the software, provide the software as a stand-alone offering for others to use, or transfer the software or this agreement to any third party.
6. FEEDBACK.
If you provide Branch with any verbal or written comments, bug reports, feedback, enhancements, optimizations, or modifications proposed or suggested by you for the software ("Feedback"), such Feedback is provided on a non-confidential basis (notwithstanding any notice to the contrary you may include in any accompanying communication), and Branch shall have the right to use such Feedback at its discretion, including, but not limited to the incorporation of such suggested changes into the software. You hereby grant Branch a worldwide, perpetual, irrevocable, royalty-free, fully paid, transferable, sublicensable, non-exclusive right and license under all rights necessary to so incorporate, use, and exploit your Feedback in any manner, without restriction, for any purpose, including to make and sell Branch products and services.
7. RESERVATION OF RIGHTS.
The software is owned by Branch and is licensed, not sold, to you. The software is protected by copyright, trade dress, patent, and trademark laws of the United States and other jurisdictions, international conventions, and all other relevant intellectual property and proprietary rights, and applicable laws. As between you and Branch, all aspects of the software, including intellectual property rights therein and thereto, are the sole and exclusive property of Branch or its subsidiaries or affiliated companies and/or its third-party licensors. You may not sell, license, distribute, copy, modify, publicly perform or display, transmit, publish, edit, adapt, create derivative works from, or make any use of the software except as expressly authorized hereunder. Branch reserves all rights not expressly granted in this agreement. You do not acquire any right, title or interest to the software, whether by implication, estoppel, or otherwise, except for the limited rights set forth in this agreement.
8. SOFTWARE EXPECTATIONS.
The software: (i) is not an official product and has not been commercially released; (ii) may not be in final form or be fully functional; (iii) may contain errors, design flaws or other problems; (iv) may generate or produce inaccurate information or unexpected or incorrect results; (v) may cause loss of data or communications, project delays or other unpredictable damage or loss; (vi) may never be released as a commercial version; and (vii) may be discontinued by Branch in whole or in part, at any time and without any obligation or liability to you or your users. Use of the software may be conditional on your acceptance of additional terms and conditions accompanying the software. In the event of any conflict between this agreement and additional terms and conditions accompanying the software, the latter will govern and control unless expressly stated otherwise.
9. EXPORT RESTRICTIONS.
You must comply with all domestic and international trade export laws and regulations that apply to the software, which include restrictions on destinations, end users, and end use. You represent that you are not named on any U.S. Government Consolidated Screening denied-party list which may be searched at:
https://www.export.gov/article?id=Consolidated-Screening-List
. You shall not permit any entity or individual to access or use the software who is listed on the Consolidated Screening List or located in a U.S. government-embargoed country, or known to be engaged in proliferation of nuclear, chemical or biological weapons or missiles, or otherwise in violation of any U.S. export law or regulation.
10. SUPPORT SERVICES.
Because this software is “as is,” Branch may not provide support services for it.
11. ENTIRE AGREEMENT.
This agreement, and the terms for supplements, updates, Internet-based services and support services that you use, are the entire agreement for the software and support services.
12. APPLICABLE LAW.
If you acquired the software in the United States, California law applies to interpretation of and claims for breach of this agreement, and the laws of the state where you live apply to all other claims. If you acquired the software in any other country, its laws apply.
13. CONSUMER RIGHTS; REGIONAL VARIATIONS.
This agreement describes certain legal rights. You may have other rights, including consumer rights, under the laws of your state or country. Separate and apart from your relationship with Branch, you may also have rights with respect to the party from which you acquired the software. This agreement does not change those other rights if the laws of your state or country do not permit it to do so. For example, if you acquired the software in one of the below regions, or mandatory country law applies, then the following provisions apply to you:
a. Australia.
You have statutory guarantees under the Australian Consumer Law and nothing in this agreement is intended to affect those rights.
b. Canada.
If you acquired this software in Canada, the product documentation, if any, may specify how to update the software integrated into your digital properties.
c. Germany and Austria.
Warranty.
The software will perform substantially as described in any Branch materials that accompany it. However, Branch gives no contractual guarantee in relation to the software.
Limitation of Liability.
In case of intentional conduct, gross negligence, claims based on the Product Liability Act, as well as in case of death or personal or physical injury, Branch is liable according to the statutory law. Subject to the foregoing clause (ii), Branch will only be liable for slight negligence if Branch is in breach of such material contractual obligations, the fulfillment of which facilitate the due performance of this agreement, the breach of which would endanger the purpose of this agreement and the compliance with which a party may constantly trust in (so-called "cardinal obligations"). In other cases of slight negligence, Branch will not be liable for slight negligence.
14. DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTY.
THE SOFTWARE IS LICENSED “AS-IS.” YOU BEAR THE RISK OF USING IT. BRANCH GIVES NO EXPRESS WARRANTIES, GUARANTEES OR CONDITIONS. TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED UNDER YOUR LOCAL LAWS, BRANCH EXCLUDES THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NON-INFRINGEMENT.
15. LIMITATION ON AND EXCLUSION OF REMEDIES AND DAMAGES. YOU CAN RECOVER FROM BRANCH AND ITS SUPPLIERS ONLY DIRECT DAMAGES UP TO U.S. $100.00. YOU CANNOT RECOVER ANY OTHER DAMAGES, INCLUDING CONSEQUENTIAL, LOST PROFITS, SPECIAL, INDIRECT OR INCIDENTAL DAMAGES.
This limitation applies to (a) anything related to the software, services, content (including code) on third party Internet sites, or third party applications; and (b) claims for breach of contract, breach of warranty, guarantee or condition, strict liability, negligence, or other tort to the extent permitted by applicable law. It also applies even if Branch knew or should have known about the possibility of the damages. The above limitation or exclusion may not apply to you because your state or country may not allow the exclusion or limitation of incidental, consequential or other damages.
Effective March 27th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Addendum to Order Form
Onboarding Services Statement of Work
This Onboarding Services Statement of Work (“SOW”) describes Onboarding Services (“Onboarding Services” or “Professional Services”) to be performed by Branch for Customer (each a “party”, collectively the “Parties”) to the extent Customer has purchased Onboarding Services, as set forth in Customer’s Order Form. By executing an Order Form that references this SOW, Customer agrees to the terms of this SOW and the Professional Services Terms & Conditions available at
https://legal.branch.io/#professional-services
(the “PS Terms”). Any capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein shall have the meaning set forth in the PS Terms. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency between this SOW and an Order Form referencing this SOW or this SOW and the PS Terms, the terms of this SOW shall control.
SCOPE OF SERVICES
.
Branch will provide Customer with resources to assist Customer’s staff as set forth below (the “Project”), subject to Customer’s payment of all applicable fees as set forth in the applicable Order Form. Branch and Customer (collectively, the “Project Team”) agree to  collectively commit adequate resources to complete the Project.
Service
Onboarding Service Description
Discovery
●
Conduct remote discovery sessions to assist with identifying integration requirements for key use cases to work within client tech stack
●
Provide assistance with defining Branch integration strategy to leverage deep linking and channel best practices
●
Assist Customer in identifying new opportunities to drive additional value from Branch within existing and new channels
●
Provide guidance with the creation and execution of Customer’s business case in implementing Branch’s Services
Engagement Management
●
Provide guidance and assistance identifying key integration tasks, owners, and dependencies to support sprint planning
●
Assist Customer in tracking and communicating task completion and next steps with project stakeholders
●
Actively monitor for and escalate integration risks and issues
Engagement Support
●
Assist customer with building links for testing, and social/email/ads/site campaigns
●
Support the creation of Journeys and Deepview templates
●
Provide guidance and support to Customer in creating custom link builders, test pages, webhooks, and API scripts to streamline integration usage
●
Support analytics tagging strategy, retrieval of Branch data, and creation of performance reporting and collateral
Software Configuration
●
Support configuration of default redirect, social, and domain settings
●
Assign and coordinate user access permissions
●
Support setup of premium feature (Journeys, Email, Ads, Analytics) dashboard configurations
Enablement
●
Conduct training sessions for project stakeholders on content which may include Branch functionality, Premium features, Specific Use Cases, and Dashboard Usage
PROJECT ROLES & RESPONSIBILITIES
.
This is a list of anticipated Project roles. A single individual may take responsibility for any number of roles, or a single role may require more than one individual. Customer acknowledges its participation is required.
ONBOARDING
SERVICE ASSUMPTIONS
.
The assumptions for Branch’s required time, level of effort, resource allocation, and fee estimation are derived from information provided by the Customer. Any deviations from these assumptions that affect project scope, timeline, or fees will be addressed through a formal Change Order.
Role
Responsibility
Frequency
Estimated Hours
Sponsor
Responsible for providing Customer resources needed for successful Project Completion, and promote process change where necessary
Monthly
5 Hours per Month
Project Manager
Responsible for the oversight of Customer resources, schedules, and responsibilities including:
Attending all key Project meetings
Being a point of contact for day-to-day operations
Securing participation (as required) of key business process owners
Participating in Project meetings
Weekly
10 Hours per Week
Administrator
Responsible for ongoing administration of Branch’s Services, once Professional Services are delivered
Manages user acceptance tasks, including QA testing, training, and adoption
Manages organization’s ongoing use of Branch’s Services
Weekly
5-8 Hours per Week
Functional Consultant(s) / Business Process Owner(s)
Responsible for review and acceptance of Branch integration, and identification of exceptions/risks
Attends Project meetings related to area of ownership
Assists in the definition of unique processes outside of standard Branch practices
Participates in user acceptance testing activities
Weekly
5-10 Hours per Week
Extended Team
Additional Customer resources as needed to support the scope of the Project
Weekly
2-5 Hours per Week
GENERAL TERMS
Professional Services Assumptions
.
The Professional Services will be rendered only for the Branch App ID(s) specified in this SOW. In addition to the PS Terms Customer agrees to: (i) allocate appropriate resources necessary to support the completion of the Project, (ii) delegate a single Project Owner prior to commencement of the Project; (iii) test Branch integration and products for quality assurance purposes to ensure that the Branch integration and products are working as intended; (iv) manage third party vendors or agencies and ensure cooperation with Branch; and (v)  grant all necessary access rights and permissions to Branch’s Project team members
to enable them to perform integration development and testing.
Term Length
.
The term of Branch’s obligation to provide Onboarding Services is as specified in the Customer’s Order Form, commencing from the SOW Effective Date (“Term”). Any extension beyond this term requires mutual agreement via a Change Order, ensuring continuity with the PS Terms regarding term and termination.
Delay
.
Should the Customer defer going live with any deployment aspect and later require additional onboarding services, a new SOW or Change Order.
Change Orders Process
.
A Customer may request modifications to this SOW by submitting a written request via email to its respective point of contact. Upon receipt, Branch will prepare an updated quote for review which may include modification or clarification on the scope of work requested. Branch reserves the right to extend the Term or offer additional work at a different pricing structure than specified in this SOW or the Order Form. Acceptance of this offer will only occur after Customer affirmatively responds to the update quote with explicit authorization to proceed with the Change Order at the price quoted by Branch.
Overages
:
Customer will be responsible for overages that exceed initial staffing commitments or for additional services necessitated by delays attributable to Customer actions.
Cancellation / Postponement
:
Both parties commit to reasonable efforts to adhere to Branch PS, and Customer will use reasonable efforts to attend all scheduled Project meetings. Branch reserves the right to charge customers for repeated cancellation of Project meetings.
Fees
.
Customer will pay Branch all fees for Onboarding Services in accordance with this SOW and at the rates specified in the applicable Order Form.
Effective June 7th 2023
to
March 27th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Addendum to Order Form
Onboarding Services Statement of Work
This Onboarding Services Statement of Work (“SOW”) describes Onboarding Services (“Onboarding Services” or “Professional Services”) to be performed by Branch for Customer (each a “party”, collectively the “Parties”) to the extent Customer has purchased Onboarding Services, as set forth in Customer’s Order Form. By executing an Order Form that references this SOW, Customer agrees to the terms of this SOW and the Professional Services Terms & Conditions available at
https://legal.branch.io/#professional-services
(the “PS Terms”). Any capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein shall have the meaning set forth in the PS Terms. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency between this SOW and an Order Form referencing this SOW, the SOW shall control.
SCOPE OF SERVICES.
Branch PS will provide Customer with resources to assist Customer’s staff as set forth below (the “Project”), subject to Customer’s payment of all applicable fees as set forth in the applicable Order Form. Branch PS and Customer (collectively, the “Project Team”) will commit reasonable resources to work on the Project.
Service
Onboarding Service Description
Discovery
Conduct remote discovery sessions to assist with identifying integration requirements for key use cases to work within client tech stack
Provide assistance with defining Branch integration strategy to leverage deep linking and channel best practices
Assist Customer in identifying new opportunities to drive additional value from Branch within existing and new channels
Provide guidance with the creation and execution of Customer’s business case in implementing Branch’s Services
Engagement Management
Provide guidance and assistance identifying key integration tasks, owners, and dependencies to support sprint planning
Assist Customer in tracking and communicating task completion and next steps with project stakeholders
Actively monitor for and escalate integration risks and issues
Engagement Support
Assist customer with building links for testing, and social/email/ads/site campaigns
Support the creation of Journeys and Deepview templates
Provide guidance and support to Customer in creating custom link builders, test pages, webhooks, and API scripts to streamline integration usage
Support analytics tagging strategy, retrieval of Branch data, and creation of performance reporting and collateral
Software Configuration
Support configuration of default redirect, social, and domain settings
Assign and coordinate user access permissions
Support setup of premium feature (Journeys, Email, Ads, Analytics) dashboard configurations
Enablement
Conduct training sessions for project stakeholders on content which may include Branch functionality, Premium features, Specific Use Cases, and Dashboard Usage
PROJECT ROLES & RESPONSIBILITIES.
This is a list of Project roles, NOT individuals, required to complete the Project. A single individual may take responsibility for any number of roles, or a single role may require more than one individual. Customer acknowledges its participation is critical for Project success.
Role
Responsibility
Frequency
Estimated Hours
Sponsor
Responsible for providing Customer resources needed for successful Project Completion, and promote process change where necessary
Monthly
5 Hours per Month
Project Manager
Responsible for the oversight of Customer resources, schedules, and responsibilities including:
Attending all key Project meetings
Being a point of contact for day-to-day operations
Securing participation (as required) of key business process owners
Participating in Project meetings
Weekly
10 Hours per Week
Administrator
Responsible for ongoing administration of Branch’s Services, once Professional Services are delivered
Manages user acceptance tasks, including QA testing, training, and adoption
Manages organization’s ongoing use of Branch’s Services
Weekly
5-8 Hours per Week
Functional Consultant(s) / Business Process Owner(s)
Responsible for review and acceptance of Branch integration, and identification of exceptions/risks
Attends Project meetings related to area of ownership
Assists in the definition of unique processes outside of standard Branch practices
Participates in user acceptance testing activities
Weekly
5-10 Hours per Week
Extended Team
Additional Customer resources as needed to support the scope of the Project
Weekly
2-5 Hours per Week
ONBOARDING SERVICE ASSUMPTIONS.
Unless otherwise noted in this SOW or agreed to in writing by the Parties, the following assumptions are based on information provided by the Customer relating to the Project and have been used to estimate Branch PS’s required time, level of effort, and fees. Deviations from these assumptions may lead to commensurate changes in the timeline and fees and will be handled through a formal Change Order.
Term Length:
Unless otherwise agreed upon by both Parties and executed in a Change Order, the obligation of Branch to provide Onboarding Services under this SOW expires after the timeframe identified in the Order Form, following the SOW “Effective Date.”
Reasonable Work Hours:
Customer agrees that (1) Branch PS staffing commitments (“Staffing Commitments”) include up to the amount set forth in the Order Form (if any); (2) Staffing Commitments in this SOW may not have been fully scoped, and there is no assurance that the work identified by the Customer for Branch PS subject to Staffing Commitments can be completed within the time period scoped or even that such work can be completed at all; (3) Branch PS reserves the right to reject any request for work identified by Customer to be provided by Branch PS as Staffing Commitments, if Branch PS reasonably believes such work is outside of the type of services normally provided by Branch PS; and (4) Staffing Commitments may be consumed by Branch PS in completing preparations for meetings, completing offline research, and completing offline configurations or other action items.
Overages:
Branch PS will secure Customer’s approval to bill against overages that exceed initial Staffing Commitments or arising from delays caused by Customer before the provisioning of any such overage services.
Cancellation / Postponement:
Branch PS and Customer will use commercially reasonable efforts to attend all scheduled Project meetings. The repeated cancellation of Project meetings may result in Project delay and additional costs.
CUSTOMER RESOURCE AVAILABILITY.
Customer acknowledges and agrees that the Branch PS team’s performance is contingent upon Customer’s timely performance of its obligations under this SOW. Project timeline estimates provided by Branch PS are dependent on the availability of Customer resources and key decision makers. Lack of access to, or any material change to, Customer’s resources and/or Project stakeholders may impact estimated timelines, costs, fees, and whether additional Onboarding Services may be needed. As such, Customer agrees to promptly: (a) acknowledge, review, and respond to communications from Branch PS to support and progress the Project; (b) sign or e-sign any documents necessary to enable integration features with third-party partners selected by Customer to enable Branch PS to continue the provisioning of the Onboarding Services; connect the Branch PS team with Customer’s relevant contacts and subject matter experts as may be necessary to facilitate the Onboarding Services. Should Customer choose not to go live with any aspect of the deployment, and then at a future date need additional Onboarding Services, this will require another statement of work or Change Order to extend the Onboarding Services term and may result in additional costs. Customer is solely responsible for its engagement with and management of any third-party vendors that Customer integrates into, or uses in conjunction with, Branch.
FEES.
Customer will pay Branch all fees for Onboarding Services in accordance with this SOW and at the rates specified in the applicable Order Form.
Effective April 13th 2023
to
June 7th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Addendum to Order Form
Onboarding Services Statement of Work
This Onboarding Services Statement of Work (“SOW”) describes Onboarding Services to be performed by Branch for Customer (each a “party”, collectively “Parties”) to the extent Customer has purchased Onboarding Services, as set forth in Customer’s Order Form. By executing an Order Form that references this SOW, Customer agrees to the terms of this SOW and the Professional Services Terms & Conditions available at
https://legal.branch.io/#professional-services
(the “PS Terms”). Any capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein shall have the meaning set forth in the PS Terms.
SCOPE OF SERVICES
. Branch PS will provide Customer with resources to assist Customer’s staff as set forth below (the “Project”), subject to Customer’s payment of all applicable fees as set forth in the applicable Order Form. Branch PS and Customer (collectively, the “Project Team”) will commit resources to work on the Project. In providing the Onboarding Services hereunder, Branch PS will employ reasonable, industry-standard Onboarding processes and activities.
Service
Onboarding Service Description
Discovery
Conduct remote discovery sessions to assist with identifying integration requirements for key use cases to work within client tech stack
Provide assistance with defining Branch integration strategy to leverage deep linking and channel best practices
Assist Customer in identifying new opportunities to drive additional value from Branch within existing and new channels
Provide guidance with the creation and execution of Customer’s business case in implementing Branch’s Services
Engagement Management
Provide guidance and assistance identifying key integration tasks, owners, and dependencies to support sprint planning
Assist Customer in tracking and communicating task completion and next steps with project stakeholders
Actively monitor for and escalate integration risks and issues
Engagement Support
Assist customer with building links for testing, and social/email/ads/site campaigns
Support the creation of Journeys and Deepview templates
Provide guidance and support to Customer in creating custom link builders, test pages, webhooks, and API scripts to streamline integration usage
Support analytics tagging strategy, retrieval of Branch data, and creation of performance reporting and collateral
Software Configuration
Support configuration of default redirect, social, and domain settings
Assign and coordinate user access permissions
Support setup of premium feature (Journeys, Email, Ads, Analytics) dashboard configurations
Enablement
Conduct training sessions for project stakeholders on content which may include Branch functionality, Premium features, Specific Use Cases, and Dashboard Usage
PROJECT ROLES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
. This is a list of Project roles, NOT individuals, required to complete the Project. A single individual may take responsibility for any number of roles, or a single role may require more than one individual. Customer acknowledges its participation is critical for Project success.
Role
Branch PS
Customer
Sponsor
Responsible for allocating Branch PS resources
Serve as escalation contact for issues not resolvable by Branch Project Manager (“PM”)
Advises the Branch PS team
Manages project resources
Responsible for providing Customer resources needed for successful onboarding, and promote process change where necessary
Project Manager
Responsible for oversight of Branch PS resources, schedules. Supporting responsibilities include:
Attending all key Project meetings
Being a point of contact for day-to-day operations
Providing guidance and assistance for management of Project issues
Leading Project meetings
Responsible for the oversight of Customer resources, schedules and responsibilities including:
Attending all key Project meetings
Being a point of contact for day-to-day operations
Securing participation (as required) of key business process owners
Participating in Project meetings
Administrator
N/A
Responsible for ongoing Branch administration, once onboarding is complete
Manage user acceptance tasks, including QA testing, training and adoption
Manage organization’s ongoing Branch use
Functional Consultant(s) / Business Process Owner(s)
Responsible for providing leadership and guidance on the overall usage of Branch
Define Branch integration strategy
Support ongoing onboarding setup
Conduct training of Branch best practices
Support QA of Branch integration
Responsible for review and acceptance of Branch integration, and identification of exceptions/risks
Attend Project meetings related to area of ownership
Assist in the definition of unique processes outside of standard Branch practices
Participate in user acceptance testing activities
Extended Team
As needed Branch PS resources (including Solution Architects, Subject Matter Experts, Technical and/or Education resources) to support the scope of the Project
Additional Customer resources as needed to support the scope of the Project
ONBOARDING SERVICE ASSUMPTIONS
. Unless otherwise noted in this SOW or agreed to in writing by the Parties, the following assumptions are based on information provided by the Customer relating to the Project and have been used to estimate Branch PS’s required level of effort and fees. Deviations from these assumptions may lead to commensurate changes in the timeline and fees and will be handled through a formal Change Order.
Term Length:
Unless otherwise agreed upon by both Parties and duly executed in writing, the obligation of Branch to provide Onboarding Services under this SOW expires after the timeframe identified in the Order Form, following the SOW “Effective Date.”
Reasonable Work Hours:
Customer agrees that (1) Branch PS staffing commitments (“Staffing Commitments”) include up to the amount set forth in the Order Form (if any); (2) Staffing Commitments in this SOW may not have been fully scoped, and there is no assurance that the work identified by the Customer for Branch PS subject to Staffing Commitments can be completed within the time period scoped or even that such work can be completed at all; (3) Branch PS reserves the right to reject any request for work identified by Customer to be provided by Branch PS as Staffing Commitments, if Branch PS reasonably believes such work is outside of the type of services normally provided by Branch PS; and (4) Staffing Commitments may be consumed by Branch PS in completing preparations for meetings, completing offline research, and completing offline configurations or other action items.
Overages:
Branch PS will secure Customer’s approval to bill against overages that exceed initial Staffing Commitments before the provisioning of any such overage services.
Cancellation / Postponement:
Branch PS and Customer will use commercially reasonable efforts to attend all scheduled Project meetings. The repeated cancellation of Project meetings may result in Project delay and additional costs.
CUSTOMER RESOURCE AVAILABILITY.
Project timeline estimates provided by Branch PS are dependent on the availability of Customer resources and key decision makers. Lack of access to or the material change to resources and/or Project stakeholders may impact estimated timelines and whether additional Onboarding Services may be needed. Customer is responsible for acknowledging, reviewing, and responding to communications from Branch PS to support this Project. Some integration features may require Customer’s contractual signature / e-signature with a third party before Branch PS can continue with the provisioning of services, and Customer is responsible for responding and executing such third party agreements in a timely and collaborative fashion. Customer is responsible for any engagement and management of third-party vendors that Customer uses in conjunction with Branch. Customer will provide relevant contacts and subject matter experts in a timely fashion to be made available for any necessary work to conduct this SOW according to a mutually agreed upon Project schedule. Should Customer choose not to go live with any aspect of the deployment, and then at a future date need additional Onboarding Services, this will require another statement of work or Change Order to extend the Onboarding Services term and may result in additional costs.
FEES
. Customer will pay Branch for the Onboarding Services at the rates specified in the applicable Order Form.
Effective January 1st 2023
to
April 13th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Addendum to Order Form
Onboarding Services Statement of Work
This Onboarding Services Statement of Work (“SOW”) describes Onboarding Services to be performed by Branch for Customer (each a “party”, collectively “Parties”) to the extent Customer has purchased Onboarding Services, as set forth in Customer’s Order Form. By executing an Order Form that references this SOW, Customer agrees to the terms of this SOW. Except where otherwise expressly indicated within this SOW, this SOW is subject to the terms of the applicable Order Form and Branch’s Terms and Conditions, or instead, where there is a service agreement in place between Customer and Branch, that service agreement, as applicable, between the Parties as referenced in the relevant Order Form (“Service Agreement”).
Customer may not receive Onboarding Services if Customer is Branch’s direct competitor, except with Branch’s prior written consent. In addition, Customer may not receive Onboarding Services for the purposes of evaluating or monitoring their quality or performance, or for any other benchmarking or competitive purposes.
I. DEFINITIONS
“
Affiliate
” means any entity which directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the subject entity. “Control,” for purposes of this definition, means direct or indirect ownership or control of more than 50% of the voting interests of the subject entity.
“
Branch
” means Branch Metrics, Inc., the entity you are hereby contracting with.
“
Branch OS
” means Branch’s Onboarding Services organization.
“
Customer
” means the company or other legal entity for which you are accepting this SOW together with Affiliates of that company or entity which have signed SOWs or Order Forms for Onboarding Services.
“
Change
Order
” means any change to an SOW or Order Form, as applicable, as described in the “Change Orders” section below. Change Orders will be deemed incorporated by reference in the applicable SOW or Order Form, as applicable in the absence of an SOW.
“Order Form”
means an ordering document specifying the Onboarding Services to be provided hereunder and that is entered into between Customer and Branch, including any addenda and supplements thereto.
“
Onboarding Services
” means work performed by Branch under a SOW or Order Form, including Branch’s Onboarding assistance specified in such SOW or Order Form. For clarity, the “Service(s)” under the Service Agreement do not include Onboarding Services.
“
SOW
” or “
Statement of Work
” means a statement of work describing Onboarding Services to be provided hereunder, that is entered into between Customer and Branch which is incorporated into an Order Form that is entered into between Customer and Branch.
“
Effective Date
” means the date signed by both Parties in the Order Form; if the Parties signed on different dates, the later of the two dates will constitute the Effective Date.
“
Work Product
” means all works of authorship, inventions, know-how, ideas, materials, information, designs, and files made or conceived or reduced to practice, in whole or in part by Branch or its subcontractors in connection with the Onboarding Services, and all intellectual property rights relating thereto.
II. SCOPE OF SERVICES
. Branch OS will provide Customer with resources to assist Customer’s staff as set forth below (the “Project”), subject to Customer’s payment of all applicable fees as set forth in the applicable Order Form. Branch OS and Customer (collectively, the “Project Team”) will commit resources to work on the Project. In providing the Onboarding Services hereunder, Branch OS will employ reasonable, industry-standard Onboarding processes and activities.
Service
Onboarding Service Description
Discovery
Conduct remote discovery sessions to assist with identifying integration requirements for key use cases to work within client tech stack
Provide assistance with defining Branch integration strategy to leverage deep linking and channel best practices
Assist Customer in identifying new opportunities to drive additional value from Branch within existing and new channels
Provide guidance with the creation and execution of Customer’s business case in implementing Branch’s Services
Engagement Management
Provide guidance and assistance identifying key integration tasks, owners, and dependencies to support sprint planning
Assist Customer in tracking and communicating task completion and next steps with project stakeholders
Actively monitor for and escalate integration risks and issues
Engagement Support
Assist customer with building links for testing, and social/email/ads/site campaigns
Support the creation of Journeys and Deepview templates
Provide guidance and support to Customer in creating custom link builders, test pages, webhooks, and API scripts to streamline integration usage
Support analytics tagging strategy, retrieval of Branch data, and creation of performance reporting and collateral
Software Configuration
Support configuration of default redirect, social, and domain settings
Assign and coordinate user access permissions
Support setup of premium feature (Journeys, Email, Ads, Analytics) dashboard configurations
Enablement
Conduct training sessions for project stakeholders on content which may include Branch functionality, Premium features, Specific Use Cases, and Dashboard Usage
III. PROJECT ROLES AND RESPONSIBILITIES.
This is a list of Project roles, NOT individuals, required to complete the Project. A single individual may take responsibility for any number of roles, or a single role may require more than one individual. Customer acknowledges its participation is critical for Project success.
Role
Branch OS
Customer
Sponsor
Responsible for allocating Branch OS resources
Serve as escalation contact for issues not resolvable by Branch Project Manager (“PM”)
Advises the Branch OS team
Manages project resources
Responsible for providing Customer resources needed for successful onboarding, and promote process change where necessary
Project Manager
Responsible for oversight of Branch OS resources, schedules. Supporting
r
esponsibilities include:
Attending all key Project meetings
Being a point of contact for day-to-day operations
Providing guidance and assistance for management of Project issues
Leading Project meetings
Responsible for the oversight of Customer resources, schedules and responsibilities including:
Attending all key Project meetings
Being a point of contact for day-to-day operations
Securing participation (as required) of key business process owners
Participating in Project meetings
Administrator
N/A
Responsible for ongoing Branch administration, once onboarding is complete
Manage user acceptance tasks, including QA testing, training and adoption
Manage organization’s ongoing Branch use
Functional Consultant(s) / Business Process Owner(s)
Responsible for providing leadership and guidance on the overall usage of Branch
Define Branch integration strategy
Support ongoing onboarding setup
Conduct training of Branch best practices
Support QA of Branch integration
Responsible for review and acceptance of Branch integration, and identification of exceptions/risks
Attend Project meetings related to area of ownership
Assist in the definition of unique processes outside of standard Branch practices
Participate in user acceptance testing activities
Extended Team
As needed Branch OS resources (including Solution Architects, Subject Matter Experts, Technical and/or Education resources) to support the scope of the Project
Additional Customer resources as needed to support the scope of the Project
IV. ONBOARDING
SERVICE ASSUMPTIONS.
Unless otherwise noted in this SOW or agreed to in writing by the Parties, the following assumptions are based on information provided by the Customer relating to the Project and have been used to estimate Branch OS’s required level of effort and fees. Deviations from these assumptions may lead to commensurate changes in the timeline and fees and will be handled through a formal Change Order.
Term Length
: Unless otherwise agreed upon by both Parties and duly executed in writing, the obligation of Branch to provide Onboarding Services under this SOW expires after the timeframe identified in the Order Form, following the SOW “Effective Date.”
Scope:
Any item or activity not specifically included within the scope of this SOW is deemed outside the scope of this SOW and may require a Change Order, or separate SOW. Services referenced herein are in support of standard Branch software functionality as defined by the applicable Service Agreement, except as may otherwise be specified in this SOW. Any changes to the software functionality supplied are outside the scope of this SOW.
No Recording
: Customer will not film or record Branch delivery of Onboarding Services or Branch materials.
Reasonable Work Hours
: Customer agrees that:
Branch OS staffing commitments (“Staffing Commitments”) include up to the amount set forth in the Order Form (if any);
Staffing Commitments in this SOW may not have been fully scoped, and there is no assurance that the work identified by the Customer for Branch OS subject to Staffing Commitments can be completed within the time period scoped or even that such work can be completed at all;
Branch OS reserves the right to reject any request for work identified by Customer to be provided by Branch OS as Staffing Commitments, if Branch OS reasonably believes such work is outside of the type of services normally provided by Branch OS; and
Staffing Commitments may be consumed by Branch OS in completing preparations for meetings, completing offline research, and completing offline configurations or other action items.
Overages
: Branch OS will secure Customer’s approval to bill against overages that exceed initial Staffing Commitments before the provisioning of any such overage services.
Cancellation / Postponement
: Branch OS and Customer will use commercially reasonable efforts to attend all scheduled Project meetings. The repeated cancelation of Project meetings may result in Project delay and additional costs.
Business Hours
: Branch OS resources will be reachable over email during normal business hours (9 am - 6 pm local time, Monday – Friday, excluding nationally recognized holidays), and issues escalated outside of normal business hours may be sent to support@branch.io.
Non-Solicitation
: During the term of the SOW and for a period of three (3) years thereafter, Customer shall not interfere with Branch’s relationship with, or endeavor to entice away from Branch, any person who, on the date of the termination of or expiration of the Agreement, was an employee of Branch.
V. CUSTOMER RESOURCE AVAILABILITY.
Project timeline estimates provided by Branch OS are dependent on the availability of Customer resources and key decision makers. Lack of access to or the material change to resources and/or Project stakeholders may impact estimated timelines and whether additional Onboarding Services may be needed. Customer is responsible for acknowledging, reviewing, and responding to communications from Branch OS to support this Project. Some integration features may require Customer’s contractual signature / e-signature with a third party before Branch OS can continue with the provisioning of services, and Customer is responsible for responding and executing such third party agreements in a timely and collaborative fashion. Customer is responsible for any engagement and management of third-party vendors that Customer uses in conjunction with Branch. Customer will provide relevant contacts and subject matter experts in a timely fashion to be made available for any necessary work to conduct this SOW according to a mutually agreed upon Project schedule. Should Customer choose not to go live with any aspect of the deployment, and then at a future date need additional Onboarding Services, this will require another statement of work or Change Order to extend the Onboarding Services term and may result in additional costs.
VI. CHANGE ORDERS.
Changes to a SOW or Order Form will require a written Change Order signed by the Parties prior to implementation of the changes. Such changes many include, for example, changes to the scope of work and any corresponding changes to the estimated fees and schedule.
VII. FEES.
Customer will pay Branch for the Onboarding Services at the rates specified in the applicable Order Form.
VIII. LICENSES PROCUREMENT AND ACCEPTANCE OF TERMS
Any rights for Customer to use and access Branch software (including without limitation any service functionalities, products, modules and features) are outside the scope of this SOW and must be separately procured by Customer from Branch pursuant to an Order Form or the applicable Service Agreement.
Customer is responsible for separately procuring, at its own expense, all necessary rights for its and/or Branch OS’s use of any Customer or third-party technology that will be used within the scope of this SOW, including any applications and/or services with which the Branch Service can be connected through integrations. Customer represents and warrants that it will procure all such rights prior to using or permitting Branch OS’s use of any such third-party technology hereunder. Customer acknowledges that use of third-party technology and/or services not already licensed or purchased by Customer may require additional licenses and fee(s) that must be obtained separately by the Customer from the specific third-party provider of such applications and/or services.
IX. INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY
Customer will retain all right, title, and interest in and to any materials provided to Branch OS and the Branch OS resources pursuant to this SOW (“Customer Materials”). Customer grants Branch (including Branch OS) and its contractors a worldwide, non-exclusive, right to use, copy, distribute, create derivative works based on, display, and perform its Customer Materials as reasonably necessary for Branch OS to provide the Onboarding Services and Services to Customer.
Except for the rights granted in this Section, and subject to Customer’s rights in the Customer Materials, Branch owns and reserves all right, title, and interest in and to the Work Product. Branch grants Customer a limited, non-exclusive, non-transferable license to access and use the Work Product with the Services for Customer’s internal business purposes during the Term of the applicable Service Agreement.
Customer will not (and will not allow any third party to): (a) remove or alter proprietary notices from the Work Product or (b) use, sell, copy, modify, create derivative works based on, publicly perform, publicly display, or distribute the Work Product outside of the Services.
X. DISCLAIMER
. TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW, BRANCH AND ITS AFFILIATES (A) MAKES NO WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EITHER EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, STATORY OR OTHERWISE REGARDING THE ONBOARDING SERVICES AND WORK PRODUCT, AND (B) DISCLAIMS ALL WARRANTIES, INCLUDING ANY IMPLIED OR EXPRESS WARRANTIES (I) OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, AND NON-INFRINGEMENT OR (II) THAT THE ONBOARDING SERVICES AND WORK PRODUCT ARE ACCURATE, COMPLETE, OR RELIABLE. THE ONBOARDING SERVICES AND WORK PRODUCT ARE PROVIDED “AS IS” AND “AS AVAILABLE.” NO ADVICE OR INFORMATION OBTAINED FROM THE ONBOARDING SERVICES AND WORK PRODUCT WILL CREATE ANY WARRANTY NOT EXPRESSLY MADE IN THIS SOW.
XI. TERM AND TERMINATION
Term.
This SOW will expire or terminate in accordance with the Section on “Term Length” above.
Termination for Cause.
Either party may terminate this SOW if the other party is in material breach of the SOW and fails to cure that breach within thirty days after receipt of written notice. Any termination of the applicable Service Agreement will also terminate this SOW.
Surviving Provisions.
The Sections on “Intellectual Property” and the “Disclaimer” will survive termination of this SOW.
Effective December 6th 2022
to
January 1st 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Addendum to Order Form
Onboarding Services Statement of Work
This Onboarding Services Statement of Work (“SOW”) describes Onboarding Services to be performed by Branch for Customer (each a “party”, collectively “Parties”) to the extent Customer has purchased Onboarding Services, as set forth in Customer’s Order Form. By executing an Order Form that references this SOW, Customer agrees to the terms of this SOW. Except where otherwise expressly indicated within this SOW, this SOW is subject to the terms of the applicable Order Form and Branch’s Terms and Conditions, or instead, where there is a service agreement in place between Customer and Branch, that service agreement, as applicable, between the Parties as referenced in the relevant Order Form (“Service Agreement”).
Customer may not receive Onboarding Services if Customer is Branch’s direct competitor, except with Branch’s prior written consent. In addition, Customer may not receive Onboarding Services for the purposes of evaluating or monitoring their quality or performance, or for any other benchmarking or competitive purposes.
I. DEFINITIONS
“
Affiliate
” means any entity which directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the subject entity. “Control,” for purposes of this definition, means direct or indirect ownership or control of more than 50% of the voting interests of the subject entity.
“
Branch
” means Branch Metrics, Inc., the entity you are hereby contracting with.
“
Branch OS
” means Branch’s Onboarding Services organization.
“
Customer
” means the company or other legal entity for which you are accepting this SOW together with Affiliates of that company or entity which have signed SOWs or Order Forms for Onboarding Services.
“
Change
Order
” means any change to an SOW or Order Form, as applicable, as described in the “Change Orders” section below. Change Orders will be deemed incorporated by reference in the applicable SOW or Order Form, as applicable in the absence of an SOW.
“Order Form”
means an ordering document specifying the Onboarding Services to be provided hereunder and that is entered into between Customer and Branch, including any addenda and supplements thereto.
“
Onboarding Services
” means work performed by Branch under a SOW or Order Form, including Branch’s Onboarding assistance specified in such SOW or Order Form. For clarity, the “Service(s)” under the Service Agreement do not include Onboarding Services.
“
SOW
” or “
Statement of Work
” means a statement of work describing Onboarding Services to be provided hereunder, that is entered into between Customer and Branch which is incorporated into an Order Form that is entered into between Customer and Branch.
“
Effective Date
” means the date signed by both Parties in the Order Form; if the Parties signed on different dates, the later of the two dates will constitute the Effective Date.
“
Work Product
” means all works of authorship, inventions, know-how, ideas, materials, information, designs, and files made or conceived or reduced to practice, in whole or in part by Branch or its subcontractors in connection with the Onboarding Services, and all intellectual property rights relating thereto.
II. SCOPE OF SERVICES
. Branch OS will provide Customer with resources to assist Customer’s staff as set forth below (the “Project”), subject to Customer’s payment of all applicable fees as set forth in the applicable Order Form. Branch OS and Customer (collectively, the “Project Team”) will commit resources to work on the Project. In providing the Onboarding Services hereunder, Branch OS will employ reasonable, industry-standard Onboarding processes and activities.
Service
Onboarding Service Description
Discovery
Conduct remote discovery sessions to assist with identifying integration requirements for key use cases to work within client tech stack
Provide assistance with defining Branch integration strategy to leverage deep linking and channel best practices
Assist Customer in identifying new opportunities to drive additional value from Branch within existing and new channels
Provide guidance with the creation and execution of Customer’s business case in implementing Branch’s Services
Engagement Management
Provide guidance and assistance identifying key integration tasks, owners, and dependencies to support sprint planning
Assist Customer in tracking and communicating task completion and next steps with project stakeholders
Actively monitor for and escalate integration risks and issues
Engagement Support
Assist customer with building links for testing, and social/email/ads/site campaigns
Support the creation of Journeys and Deepview templates
Provide guidance and support to Customer in creating custom link builders, test pages, webhooks, and API scripts to streamline integration usage
Support analytics tagging strategy, retrieval of Branch data, and creation of performance reporting and collateral
Software Configuration
Support configuration of default redirect, social, and domain settings
Assign and coordinate user access permissions
Support setup of premium feature (Journeys, Email, Ads, Analytics) dashboard configurations
Enablement
Conduct training sessions for project stakeholders on content which may include Branch functionality, Premium features, Specific Use Cases, and Dashboard Usage
III. PROJECT ROLES AND RESPONSIBILITIES.
This is a list of Project roles, NOT individuals, required to complete the Project. A single individual may take responsibility for any number of roles, or a single role may require more than one individual. Customer acknowledges its participation is critical for Project success.
Role
Branch OS
Customer
Sponsor
Responsible for allocating Branch OS resources
Serve as escalation contact for issues not resolvable by Branch Project Manager (“PM”)
Advises the Branch OS team
Manages project resources
Responsible for providing Customer resources needed for successful onboarding, and promote process change where necessary
Project Manager
Responsible for oversight of Branch OS resources, schedules. Supporting
r
esponsibilities include:
Attending all key Project meetings
Being a point of contact for day-to-day operations
Providing guidance and assistance for management of Project issues
Leading Project meetings
Responsible for the oversight of Customer resources, schedules and responsibilities including:
Attending all key Project meetings
Being a point of contact for day-to-day operations
Securing participation (as required) of key business process owners
Participating in Project meetings
Administrator
N/A
Responsible for ongoing Branch administration, once onboarding is complete
Manage user acceptance tasks, including QA testing, training and adoption
Manage organization’s ongoing Branch use
Functional Consultant(s) / Business Process Owner(s)
Responsible for providing leadership and guidance on the overall usage of Branch
Define Branch integration strategy
Support ongoing onboarding setup
Conduct training of Branch best practices
Support QA of Branch integration
Responsible for review and acceptance of Branch integration, and identification of exceptions/risks
Attend Project meetings related to area of ownership
Assist in the definition of unique processes outside of standard Branch practices
Participate in user acceptance testing activities
Extended Team
As needed Branch OS resources (including Solution Architects, Subject Matter Experts, Technical and/or Education resources) to support the scope of the Project
Additional Customer resources as needed to support the scope of the Project
IV. ONBOARDING
SERVICE ASSUMPTIONS.
Unless otherwise noted in this SOW or agreed to in writing by the Parties, the following assumptions are based on information provided by the Customer relating to the Project and have been used to estimate Branch OS’s required level of effort and fees. Deviations from these assumptions may lead to commensurate changes in the timeline and fees and will be handled through a formal Change Order.
Term Length
: Unless otherwise agreed upon by both Parties and duly executed in writing, the obligation of Branch to provide Onboarding Services under this SOW expires after the timeframe identified in the Order Form, following the SOW “Effective Date.”
Scope:
Any item or activity not specifically included within the scope of this SOW is deemed outside the scope of this SOW and may require a Change Order, or separate SOW. Services referenced herein are in support of standard Branch software functionality as defined by the applicable Service Agreement, except as may otherwise be specified in this SOW. Any changes to the software functionality supplied are outside the scope of this SOW.
No Recording
: Customer will not film or record Branch delivery of Onboarding Services or Branch materials.
Reasonable Work Hours
: Customer agrees that:
Branch OS staffing commitments (“Staffing Commitments”) include up to the amount set forth in the Order Form (if any);
Staffing Commitments in this SOW may not have been fully scoped, and there is no assurance that the work identified by the Customer for Branch OS subject to Staffing Commitments can be completed within the time period scoped or even that such work can be completed at all;
Branch OS reserves the right to reject any request for work identified by Customer to be provided by Branch OS as Staffing Commitments, if Branch OS reasonably believes such work is outside of the type of services normally provided by Branch OS; and
Staffing Commitments may be consumed by Branch OS in completing preparations for meetings, completing offline research, and completing offline configurations or other action items.
Overages
: Branch OS will secure Customer’s approval to bill against overages that exceed initial Staffing Commitments before the provisioning of any such overage services.
Cancellation / Postponement
: Branch OS and Customer will use commercially reasonable efforts to attend all scheduled Project meetings. The repeated cancelation of Project meetings may result in Project delay and additional costs.
Business Hours
: Branch OS resources will be reachable over email during normal business hours (9 am - 6 pm local time, Monday – Friday, excluding nationally recognized holidays), and issues escalated outside of normal business hours may be sent to support@branch.io.
Non-Solicitation
: During the term of the SOW and for a period of three (3) years thereafter, Customer shall not interfere with Branch’s relationship with, or endeavor to entice away from Branch, any person who, on the date of the termination of or expiration of the Agreement, was an employee of Branch.
V. CUSTOMER RESOURCE AVAILABILITY.
Project timeline estimates provided by Branch OS are dependent on the availability of Customer resources and key decision makers. Lack of access to or the material change to resources and/or Project stakeholders may impact estimated timelines and whether additional Onboarding Services may be needed. Customer is responsible for acknowledging, reviewing, and responding to communications from Branch OS to support this Project. Some integration features may require Customer’s contractual signature / e-signature with a third party before Branch OS can continue with the provisioning of services, and Customer is responsible for responding and executing such third party agreements in a timely and collaborative fashion. Customer is responsible for any engagement and management of third-party vendors that Customer uses in conjunction with Branch. Customer will provide relevant contacts and subject matter experts in a timely fashion to be made available for any necessary work to conduct this SOW according to a mutually agreed upon Project schedule. Should Customer choose not to go live with any aspect of the deployment, and then at a future date need additional Onboarding Services, this will require another statement of work or Change Order to extend the Onboarding Services term and may result in additional costs.
VI. CHANGE ORDERS.
Changes to a SOW or Order Form will require a written Change Order signed by the Parties prior to implementation of the changes. Such changes many include, for example, changes to the scope of work and any corresponding changes to the estimated fees and schedule.
VII. FEES.
Customer will pay Branch for the Onboarding Services at the rates specified in the applicable Order Form.
VIII. LICENSES PROCUREMENT AND ACCEPTANCE OF TERMS
Any rights for Customer to use and access Branch software (including without limitation any service functionalities, products, modules and features) are outside the scope of this SOW and must be separately procured by Customer from Branch pursuant to an Order Form or the applicable Service Agreement.
Customer is responsible for separately procuring, at its own expense, all necessary rights for its and/or Branch OS’s use of any Customer or third-party technology that will be used within the scope of this SOW, including any applications and/or services with which the Branch Service can be connected through integrations. Customer represents and warrants that it will procure all such rights prior to using or permitting Branch OS’s use of any such third-party technology hereunder. Customer acknowledges that use of third-party technology and/or services not already licensed or purchased by Customer may require additional licenses and fee(s) that must be obtained separately by the Customer from the specific third-party provider of such applications and/or services.
IX. INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY
Customer will retain all right, title, and interest in and to any materials provided to Branch OS and the Branch OS resources pursuant to this SOW (“Customer Materials”).  Customer grants Branch (including Branch OS) and its contractors a worldwide, non-exclusive, right to use, copy, distribute, create derivative works based on, display, and perform its Customer Materials as reasonably necessary for Branch OS to provide the Onboarding Services and Services to Customer.
Except for the rights granted in this Section, and subject to Customer’s rights in the Customer Materials, Branch owns and reserves all right, title, and interest in and to the Work Product.  Branch grants Customer a limited, non-exclusive, non-transferable license to access and use the Work Product with the Services for Customer’s internal business purposes during the Term of the applicable Service Agreement.
Customer will not (and will not allow any third party to): (a) remove or alter proprietary notices from the Work Product or (b) use, sell, copy, modify, create derivative works based on, publicly perform, publicly display, or distribute the Work Product outside of the Services.
X. DISCLAIMER
. TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW, BRANCH AND ITS AFFILIATES (A) MAKES NO WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EITHER EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, STATORY OR OTHERWISE REGARDING THE ONBOARDING SERVICES AND WORK PRODUCT, AND (B) DISCLAIMS ALL WARRANTIES, INCLUDING ANY IMPLIED OR EXPRESS WARRANTIES (I) OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, AND NON-INFRINGEMENT OR (II) THAT THE ONBOARDING SERVICES AND WORK PRODUCT ARE ACCURATE, COMPLETE, OR RELIABLE.  THE ONBOARDING SERVICES AND WORK PRODUCT ARE PROVIDED “AS IS” AND “AS AVAILABLE.”  NO ADVICE OR INFORMATION OBTAINED FROM THE ONBOARDING SERVICES AND WORK PRODUCT WILL CREATE ANY WARRANTY NOT EXPRESSLY MADE IN THIS SOW.
XI. TERM AND TERMINATION
Term.
This SOW will expire or terminate in accordance with the Section on “Term Length” above.
Termination for Cause.
Either party may terminate this SOW if the other party is in material breach of the SOW and fails to cure that breach within thirty days after receipt of written notice.  Any termination of the applicable Service Agreement will also terminate this SOW.
Surviving Provisions.
The Sections on “Intellectual Property” and the “Disclaimer” will survive termination of this SOW.
Effective January 7th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
User Tracking Opt-out
We take our customers’ privacy very seriously and provide mechanisms for opting out of data collection features, which are identified below. You can learn more about the types of data that we need to collect for our core service here:
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-privacypolicy
. We collect limited device information to improve our deep linking technology and to provide attribution and analytics services, but we understand that some users would like to opt out of this data processing.
BROWSER-BASED OPT-OUTS
Top
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer set cookies (beyond the opt-out cookie itself). Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality will be degraded or no longer work as a result. Cookie-based opt-outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt-out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”). NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt-out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from data collection by participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
NAI OTT/CTV Opt-Out:
NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt-out of digital advertising data collection on various connected streaming devices to the extent that the device manufacturer will allow. That opt-out is available
here
.
DEVICE-BASED OPT-OUTS & CHOICES
Top
Mobile Device Identifier:
To exercise the mobile device privacy settings controls, please visit the privacy settings of your Android or iOS device and select
“opt-out of interest based ads” (Android)
or
“
limit ad tracking” (Apple iOS)
. Branch will only be able to collect information as permitted by these settings.
Branch’s Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt-out of the Branch Services on a particular device by submitting a request
here
. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality will be degraded or no longer work once that request is executed.
Effective September 4th 2024
to
January 7th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
User Tracking Opt-out
We take our customers’ privacy very seriously and provide mechanisms for opting out of data collection features, which are identified below. You can learn more about the types of data that we need to collect for our core service here:
https://branch.io/policies/#privacy
. We collect limited device information to improve our deep linking technology and to provide attribution and analytics services, but we understand that some users would like to opt out of this data processing.
BROWSER-BASED OPT-OUTS
Top
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer set cookies (beyond the opt-out cookie itself). Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality will be degraded or no longer work as a result. Cookie-based opt-outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt-out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”), and adheres to its Codes of Conduct. NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt-out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from data collection by participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
DEVICE-BASED OPT-OUTS & CHOICES
Top
Mobile Device Identifier:
To exercise the mobile device privacy settings controls, please visit the privacy settings of your Android or iOS device and select
“opt-out of interest based ads” (Android)
or
“
limit ad tracking” (Apple iOS)
. Branch will only be able to collect information as permitted by these settings.
Branch’s Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt-out of the Branch Services on a particular device by submitting a request
here
. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality will be degraded or no longer work once that request is executed.
Effective December 31st 2022
to
September 4th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
User Tracking Opt-out
We take our customers’ privacy very seriously and provide mechanisms for opting out of data collection features, which are identified below. You can learn more about the types of data that we need to collect for our core service here:
https://branch.io/policies/#privacy
. We collect limited device information to improve our deep linking technology and to provide attribution and analytics services, but we understand that some users would like to opt out of this data processing.
BROWSER-BASED OPT-OUTS
Top
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer set cookies (beyond the opt-out cookie itself). Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality will be degraded or no longer work as a result. Cookie-based opt-outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt-out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”), and adheres to its Codes of Conduct. NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt-out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from data collection by participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
DEVICE-BASED OPT-OUTS & CHOICES
Top
Mobile Device Identifier:
To exercise the mobile device privacy settings controls, please visit the privacy settings of your Android or iOS device and select
“opt-out of interest based ads” (Android)
or
“
limit ad tracking” (Apple iOS)
. Branch will only be able to collect information as permitted by these settings.
Branch’s Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt-out of the Branch Services on a particular device by submitting a request
here
. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality will be degraded or no longer work once that request is executed.
Effective October 11th 2022
to
December 31st 2022
Download
Table of Contents
User Tracking Opt-out
We take our customers’ privacy very seriously and provide mechanisms for opting out of data collection features, which are identified below. You can learn more about the types of data that we need to collect for our core service here:
https://branch.io/policies/#privacy
. We collect limited device information to improve our deep linking technology and to provide attribution and analytics services, but we understand that some users would like to opt out of this data processing.
BROWSER-BASED OPT-OUTS
Top
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer set cookies (beyond the opt-out cookie itself). Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality will be degraded or no longer work as a result. Cookie-based opt-outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt-out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”), and adheres to its Codes of Conduct. NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt-out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from data collection by participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
DEVICE-BASED OPT-OUTS & CHOICES
Top
Mobile Device Identifier:
To exercise the mobile device privacy settings controls, please visit the privacy settings of your Android or iOS device and select
“opt-out of interest based ads” (Android)
or
“
limit ad tracking” (Apple iOS)
. Branch will only be able to collect information as permitted by these settings.
Branch’s Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt-out of the Branch Services on a particular device by submitting a request
here
. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality will be degraded or no longer work once that request is executed.
Effective June 1st 2022
to
October 11th 2022
Download
Table of Contents
User Tracking Opt-out
We take our customers’ privacy very seriously and provide mechanisms for opting out of data collection features, which are identified below. You can learn more about the types of data that we need to collect for our core service here:
https://branch.io/policies/#privacy
. We collect limited device information to improve our deep linking technology and to provide attribution and analytics services, but we understand that some users would like to opt out of this data processing.
BRO
WSER-BASED
OPT-OUTS
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer set cookies (beyond the opt-out cookie itself). Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality will be degraded or no longer work as a result. Cookie-based opt-outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt-out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”), and adheres to its Codes of Conduct. NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt-out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from data collection by participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
DEVICE
-BASED OPT-OUTS & CHOICES
Mobile Device Identifier:
To exercise the mobile device privacy settings controls, please visit the privacy settings of your Android or iOS device and select
“opt-out of interest based ads” (Android)
or
“limit ad tracking” (Apple iOS)
. Branch will only be able to collect information as permitted by these settings.
Branch’s Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt-out of the Branch Services on a particular device by submitting a request
here
. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality will be degraded or no longer work once that request is executed.
Effective January 30th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Privacy Policy
The Branch Guiding Privacy Principles
Top
Branch is a deep linking and attribution analytics platform for app and website developers. We are proud of our commitment to providing our services in a privacy-first way. So we thought it would be helpful to lay out, in plain English, the Branch Guiding Privacy Principles that drive how we’ve chosen to design our services with privacy as a top priority. We further describe our privacy practices in the official
Privacy Policy
below this section, but we hope you’ll find this summary of our principles helpful.
We limit the data we collect. We practice data minimization, which means that we take steps to avoid collecting or storing information that we don’t need to provide our services. The personal data that we collect to provide our services is limited to data like advertising identifiers, IP address, and information derived from resettable cookies (the full list is below in our privacy policy). We do not collect or store information such as names, email addresses, physical addresses, or SSNs to provide our services. Nor do we want to. In fact, our
Terms & Conditions
prohibit our customers from providing Branch with any kind of sensitive end-user information.
We will only provide you with data about actual end-user activity on your apps or websites. Customers who subscribe to our linking and analytics platform can only access “earned” cookies or identifiers. This means that an end user must visit a customer’s site before our customer can see the cookie; and an end user must download a customer’s app in order for Branch to collect the end user’s advertising identifier for that customer. In short, the Branch services benefit customers who already have seen an end user across their platforms and want to understand the relationship between those web visits and app sessions.
We do not rent or sell customer end user data. No Branch customer can access another Branch customer’s end-user data. And we are not in the business of renting or selling any customer’s end-user data to anyone else. To enable customers to control their end-user personal data, they can request deletion
here
of that data at any time, whether in bulk or for a specific end user. These controls are available to customers worldwide, although we designed them to comply with the CCPA and GDPR requirements.
Beyond these principles stated above, Branch will continue to find ways to design our services to respect end user privacy. We’re committed to making sure our customers understand how we use data they entrust to us and how they can control it so that they can, in turn, be transparent with their end users.
Introduction
Top
Branch Metrics, Inc. ( "Branch", "us", "our" or "we") offers a linking and analytics platform enabling developers of applications (our "Clients")--whether those applications are websites or "apps," and across different types of devices ("Digital Properties")--to improve their end users’ ("Users") cross-application experiences, and to derive additional insights into how their Users download and utilize those applications. Branch recognizes and believes that data privacy is important to all Internet users, and therefore we design and operate our services in a privacy-first manner.
This Privacy Policy is divided into three parts:
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services: This section explains how Branch collects and uses information about Users in connection with our linking and analytics products and services (the "Branch Services" or the "Services").
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes: This section explains how we collect and use information about our website visitors through our website located at branch.io (the “Website”), which includes the dashboard we provide to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. So, if you are a Client using our Branch dashboard, this section applies to the data we collect from you. It also explains how we collect information about potential Clients from vendors and other sources to enhance our marketing efforts.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website: This section lays out the parts of the Branch Privacy Policy that apply to both the Services and to the Website.
Branch and its Clients have entered into an agreement that governs the provision of Services by Branch and their use by Clients ("Agreement(s)"). Such Agreements may contain obligations on the parties with respect to the handling of information processed in the Services. Nothing in this Privacy Policy derogates from such obligations.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services
What Information Does Branch Collect from Our Services?
Top
Below, we explain what information we collect on behalf of our Clients through the Services, and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
The Branch Services: Overview
Top
Branch provides a variety of Services intended to help Clients understand the use of their Digital Properties by their Users across a wide array of platforms, devices and applications. Branch helps Clients by connecting User interactions across siloed applications (email, SMS, web browsers, social platforms, native applications and others), so that Clients understand the multiple steps that a User took to ultimately complete a transaction with the Client. The Client can use this information to better inform marketing and product decisions as well as to provide improved user experiences by using their knowledge of continuity.
Branch has no direct relationship with Users. Branch’s Services are provided when Branch Clients install on their platforms “Branch Mechanisms” (including links, pixels, direct platform integrations, etc.) that capture User action on behalf of the Client. Using the information collected from these Branch Mechanisms, Branch uses a variety of attribution techniques to connect User actions across different channels and platforms. Some of these attribution techniques include a direct pass-through of identifiers from platform to platform, creating and storing identifiers unique to the Branch platform to connect User actions and identifiers together, and predictive modeling algorithms using real-time and historical data parameters observed from User interactions where there are no shared identifiers available, as well as using historical connections Branch has derived over time using our technology. In some cases, these connections are made without the use of cookies. These techniques help Clients match Users with devices they use, including matching the same User across multiple devices.
The key use cases of Branch’s Services are:
To support Clients in implementing deep linking, which uses Branch’s connection information in real time to improve the User experience. For example, if a User clicks on a link in an email or ad to a specific page in a Client’s app, Branch helps the User get to that page after they download the app.
To report individualized and aggregated analytics metrics about the performance of the Client’s product and marketing initiatives to the Client directly. For example, Branch can tell a Client how many Users that downloaded an app or that went to a specific page in an app came from clicking on a specific link and provide corresponding advertising or other identifiers.
To assist the Client by presenting real time, targeted messaging to their Users depending on past behavior observed across the Client’s tracked platforms with the purpose of driving more engagement to the Client. For example, Branch can use Branch Mechanisms to provide a tailored message like a coupon code or special offer in your website to users who have interacted with your app and/or website in the past.
Branch requires that each Client commit to disclose to Branch only information that it has lawfully obtained (including, where necessary, by obtaining consent from Users), and that it has the right to disclose to Branch. We prohibit Clients from providing us with data relating to children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 18).
Branch collects data through various methods, including:
When the Client integrates Branch’s SDK’s, API’s, pixels, redirect links, JavaScript tags, cookies or similar data collection technologies into their Digital Properties and/or ads;
From the various advertising networks and third parties that are used by the Client in connection with the measurement and analysis of Client’s marketing campaigns and that have partnered with Branch;
When provided voluntarily by the Client as part of the Branch account registration process.
Clients are also required to inform us if they are using Branch’s Services to analyze information protected by HIPAA so that Branch can process such information in a protected environment. In the charts below, we summarize the information collected automatically by the Services.
Information Collected By Branch Links, Pixels, and Similar Technologies
Top
Branch collects the following information from URLs created by the Client (i.e., Branch Links) and pixels placed on Client websites. Branch Links may be embedded into QR Codes as configured by the Client. Some of this information is considered personal data under applicable law (in other words, information that itself may identify a unique individual or can be linked back to an individual) (“Personal Data”). Since Clients have sole control over their Digital Properties and configuration of the Services, Clients are contractually prohibited from configuring the Services to collect directly identifiable personal information , unless otherwise agreed by Branch. If a Client has configured the Services to collect directly identifiable personal information, then Branch may receive and process such data. This includes, for example, a Client using an End User’s email address as a Client issued Developer ID.
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for attribution and to understand general location
Cookie
Standard web cookies, used for device identification and attribution
Link Data
Metadata controlled by the Client, which may be used to interpret the data for reporting, or for analytics
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; used for device identification and attribution
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the webpage from which such ads were displayed, and webpages on Client’s website visited by a User.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their website (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
Information Collected by Branch SDKs
Top
SDKs are Software Development Kits that include code that allows Clients to use the Branch Services. The Branch Mobile App SDKs, Web SDKs, and Over-the-Top (OTT) SDKs collect the following information when Clients use these SDKs in their applications or websites, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
Advertising identifier (e.g., GAID, Android ID, IDFA, IDFV, RIDA)
Used for device identification and attribution
Branch Cookie ID
Used for device identification and attribution
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for device identification, attribution, and to understand general location
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Central Processing Unit (CPU) Type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
System build version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Internet connection type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Application version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device model
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Manufacturer / Brand
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen size (height, width)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen resolution
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile network status (Wi-Fi, etc.)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device locale (country and language)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Local IP address
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile platform
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Branch SDK version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Developer ID
(optional) Client-supplied unique identifier; metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Carrier ID
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Environment
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
UI Mode
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the application page from which such ads were displayed, pages on Client’s application visited by a User, downloads, opt-in status for certain tracking mechanisms, and installations of applications.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their application (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
In addition to the information identified above, the Branch Desktop SDKs collect the following identifiers when Clients use these SDKs in their desktop applications, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
MAC address
Used for device identification and attribution
Windows Advertising ID
Used for device identification and attribution
CPU ID
Used for device identification and attribution
Information Collected By Other Parties
Top
As part of Branch’s Services, Branch’s Clients may direct certain of their vendors or business partners (such as an ad network or vendor) that have partnered with Branch to provide certain Engagement Data to Branch on the Client’s behalf in connection with the measurement and analysis of the Client's marketing campaigns.
How Does Branch Use Information Collected by Our Services?
Top
Subject to Agreements with our Clients, data that Branch collects through the Services is processed to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Services we provide our Clients, including to support other Branch products and services, to perform anti- fraud protection analysis, develop new products and services, and market products or services; to support the products and services of our Clients; and as permitted or required by applicable law.
Where authorized by Agreements with our Clients, we may aggregate and/or de-identify the data we collect through the Services. After data has been aggregated and/or de-identified, Branch cannot use it to personally identify an individual. We may use de-identified and/or aggregated data for any purpose, including without limitation for research and marketing purposes, and may also disclose such data to any other parties, including business partners, Clients, and/or others.
Our Clients’ Use of Information
Top
Our Clients may use the information collected via the Services to improve their Users’ app experiences, customize their Digital Properties to Users, and to better understand their app marketing programs and how Users discover their apps. For example, a User may want to disclose information about a hotel that she found in a travel app to a friend. When that User sends her friend a Branch link to that hotel, after clicking the link the friend is brought directly to the content relating to that hotel within the app, rather than landing on the app’s homepage and having to search for the hotel. The travel app would also gain insights and analytics as to how the content is being disclosed from its app.
We require that our Clients utilize our Services responsibly and in accordance with our
Terms & Conditions
, Agreements, or other contracts with us. Branch is not responsible for the data practices of any of our Clients through the Services or otherwise. Each Client’s practices are subject to each Client’s individual privacy policy. Users should review the privacy policy of each Client to understand how that Client uses User information collected through the Services.
User Choices
Top
Branch recognizes a number of consumer choice mechanisms. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality may be degraded or no longer work as a result if you exercise certain of the opt-outs below.
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer read or set cookies (beyond the opt-out cookie itself). Cookie-based opt outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”). NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt-out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from interest-based advertising by participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
NAI OTT/CTV Opt-Out:
NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt-out of digital advertising data collection on various connected streaming devices to the extent that the device manufacturer will allow. That opt-out is available
here
.
Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt out of the Branch Services on a particular device by submitting a request
here
.
Device Identifiers:
To use your device’s privacy settings controls, please visit the privacy settings menu of your device to review and access the privacy controls made available on the device. Branch will only be able to collect information from the device as permitted by these settings.
Client App Opt-out Controls:
Branch‘s
SDK Privacy Controls
allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data. Clients can flag in the Branch SDK that a particular User’s data should not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Global Privacy Control:
Please note that we also respond to and abide by opt-out preference signals sent through the Global Privacy Control. Any opt out preferences you have exercised through these methods will only apply to the specific device/browser on which you made them. For more information on how to use the Global Privacy Control, see
www.globalprivacycontrol.org
.
Engagement Builder:
Branch's Engagement Builder feature may be used to help Clients conduct re-engagement and re-targeting campaigns. We require that Clients using Branch’s Engagement Builder feature for such purposes respect User opt-out preferences passed to them by Branch.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website
and for Marketing Purposes
What Information Does Branch Collect about Website Visitors and Potential Customers?
Top
Branch collects information from Website visitors (“you” or “Website Users”) located at
www.branch.io
( the “Website”), which includes the dashboard provided to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. The types of information we may collect and our privacy practices depend on the nature of the relationship you have with us and the requirements of applicable law. Below are the legal bases and some of the ways we collect information and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
What We Collect from Clients that Use the Website
Top
Branch collects Personal Data and non-personal data via the Website. For example, when Clients register to use our Services, we ask them to provide us with Personal Data, including first and last name and email address.
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for limited security login controls
Cookie (ours)
Standard web cookie used for dashboard session management
Cookie (other-party)
Other-party web tracking tools used for business intelligence
First, Last Name
Used for team user identification
Work Email
Used as the primary login identifier
Password
Account registration, secure our Services and prevent fraud
Account Holder Primary Role
Account registration, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; may be used for limited security login controls
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for general internal business analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for general internal business analytics
Github ID
(optional) Can be used as a login method
Billing Information
Payment account registration
Log Data
Provide the Services, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners, personalize our experience, secure our Services and prevent fraud, and defend our legal rights and comply with the law
Account holder feedback
Help us improve your experience on the account dashboard
Dashboard Information:
Information we collect from visitors who register for an account on our dashboard includes the following, some of which is considered Personal Data under applicable law:When a Client creates an account and uses the Services, Branch may collect certain log data, such as IP address from which a Client is connecting to the Services, information related to the device being used to connect to the Services (e.g., browser type and version, device type, OS version) and the features and functions of the Services used by the Client (“Log Data”).
We also require Clients to set up a user ID and unique password for account security purposes. Clients must not disclose their passwords to anyone. Clients also have the option of adding other team members to their account. This account information enables us to set up an account for Clients, to provide the Services, and to otherwise manage Client accounts. We may also use this information to notify Clients about updates to our Services and provide them with promotional emails. We offer a mechanism to opt out from promotional emails as described in the “Opt-Out from Promotional Emails” section below.
Account and Billing Information:
To the extent that we charge a fee for the Services, we may also collect limited billing, payment, and contract information from Clients through our payment and contract vendors.
Connection Information with Other Parties:
Some features of the dashboard Services allow you to disclose your information through your accounts to other companies such as Facebook and Google. If you choose to connect Branch to such services provided by other parties, we may collect information related to your use of those services provided by other parties, such as authentication tokens that allow us to connect to your accounts with those other parties. We will ask you for permission before you authorize our collection of this information. We may also collect information about how you are using the Services to interact with those connected services.
Information from Other Sources:
In addition to the information collected through our Website, we or our vendors may obtain and disclose additional information, such as job title or contact information, from other public and non-public sources such as business websites, social networking platforms, or databases maintained by other parties. We use this information to better enable Branch to identify and contact businesses that might be interested in engaging our Services, and to gain a better understanding of a potential Client’s business needs.
Communications with Branch:
Some Website Users may provide Personal Data to Branch by sending us an email or filling out an online form, downloading content that we make available on the Website, or registering for or attending our events, programs, trainings, or contests. Such information we may receive may include contact and professional details about you which you have chosen to share with us including name, email address, phone number, office or other mailing address, and professional data including organization you are affiliated with, your job title, and industry. We use this information to answer your question(s) and process requests, and may store that information for our record keeping, marketing, and advertising purposes.
Research/Survey Solicitations:
From time to time, we may perform research (online and offline) via surveys. We may engage vendors to conduct such surveys on our behalf. All survey responses are voluntary, and the information collected will be used for research and reporting purposes to help us better serve individuals by learning more about their needs and the quality of the products and services we provide. The survey responses may be utilized to determine the effectiveness of our Website, various types of communications, advertising campaigns and/or promotional activities.
Cookies, Pixels and Web Beacons:
We also collect other data via the Website from Website Users, including Website Users employed by or affiliated with Clients, through cookies and/or web beacons. Such information, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law, may include IP address, pages viewed, browser type, Internet browsing and usage habits, how you browse and navigate the Website, Internet Service Provider, domain name, the time/date of your visit to the Website, the referring URL, and your computer’s operating system. For example, we may collect on a real-time basis information on how you use and navigate the Website.
If your browser settings permit the use of cookies and web beacons when you visit and continue to use the Website, we will collect information through those tools. Cookies are small data files stored on your hard drive by a website and web beacons are electronic images that may be used on our Website or in our emails. Cookies help us improve your experience on the Website as well as our marketing activities. We use cookies to see which areas and features are popular and to count visits to our Website. For more information about cookies and web beacons, please visit
https://www.cookiepro.com/knowledgebase/knowledge_categories/cookies- 101/
. For more information about how to opt-out of cookies and web beacons after you have consented to their use, see the “Opt-out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons” section below.
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected?
Top
Branch processes the data described in the section above for the following purposes:
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Website;
to fulfill your and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services;
to send information about the Services including confirmations, invoices, payment processing, technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
to communicate about products and services offered by Branch and Branch's selected partners. We receive opt-in consent to send promotional and marketing messages to Website Users where required by applicable law. You can opt-out of receiving these messages at any time as described below in the section titled: “Opt-out from Promotional Emails”;
to conduct research;
to manage your information and account, to improve and administer our Website, to contact Website Users to answer questions or resolve problems, or to verify your identity;
to conduct research to help us to optimally deliver our existing Services or develop new products, processes and services;
for ad delivery and reporting purposes and to create data and analytics products and services;
to make the Website easier to use by reducing the need for Clients and Website Users to enter information;
for other purposes disclosed to you at the time you provide data to us;
with your consent; or
where Branch otherwise has a legitimate interest in collecting the data, such as direct marketing, individual or market research, product improvement, anti-fraud protection, protecting the safety of us, our Website Users, or other parties, or where required by law.
Opt-Out & Do Not Track - Your Choice Mechanisms
Top
In some cases, we rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you. In those cases, and where you have consented to Branch's processing of your Personal Data in connection with your use of the Website, you may withdraw that consent at any time by following the instructions below. Additionally, before we use Personal Data collected with your consent for any new purpose not originally authorized by you, we will provide information regarding the new purpose and ask for your consent for the new purpose. Where your consent for the processing of Personal Data is otherwise required by law or contract, we will comply with the law or contract. In other cases, we do not rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you (for example, if we have a different legal basis to process that data).
Opt-Out from Promotional Emails
Top
You can opt-out of receiving promotional emails from us by following the instructions in those emails, or by visiting our
Preference Center
. You can also opt-out of certain categories of emails using
this form
. If you opt-out using any of these tools, we may still send you non-promotional emails, such as certain updates about your account or updates to our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy and/or use of the Services.
Opt-Out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons
Top
We will only use cookies consistent with your cookie settings and permissions granted on our Website. If you permit us to use cookies/web beacons as discussed above (“What Information Does Branch Collect from our Website”), but would like to opt-out:
For dashboard users, visit
https://dashboard.branch.io/account-settings/user
, and toggle off “Cookie Consent”.
For all other users, click on “Cookie Consent” at the bottom right-hand corner of our homepage (
https://branch.io
/
), and click on the opt-out link.
Also, you can choose to set your browser to remove cookies and to reject cookies. To exercise the "Do Not Track" settings available on certain web browsers, please visit the privacy settings of your browser. Where Branch is able to see that such a selection has been made, we will not use information collected from that device to target advertising on that browser. Dashboard users must use the “Cookie Consent” feature to revoke permission to place cookies. Please note that "Do Not Track" is a different privacy mechanism than the Global Privacy Control browser choice referenced below.
Note that, even if you opt out, we may still collect and use non-personal data regarding your activities on our Website. This also does not opt you out of being served advertising altogether; you will continue to receive generic advertisements.
Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website
Top
The Website utilizes tracking tools from vendors, which may enable these vendors to analyze our Website traffic for analytics purposes. Some of these vendors may collect information from this Website for retargeting and interest-based advertising purposes. For more information about these forms of ad targeting and to understand your right to opt-out from these practices, please visit
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
. All of these tools are hosted by the parties who provide them, and your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policies of the parties providing them. These tools include, but are not limited to, those below.
Google
. We may use Google Analytics and Google Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting to collect information regarding visitor behavior and visitor demographics on our Website, and to develop website content. For more information about Google Analytics, please visit
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
. You can opt-out of Google’s collection and processing of data generated by your use of the Website by going to
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
Mixpanel
. We use a service provided by Mixpanel, Inc. (“Mixpanel”) to provide us with analytics data regarding Website Users’ interactions with our Website and Services. You may opt-out of Mixpanel’s automatic retention of data that is collected while using the Services by visiting
https://mixpanel.com/optout/
. To track opt-outs, Mixpanel uses a persistent opt-out cookie placed on your device. Please note that if you get a new computer, install a new browser, erase or otherwise alter the browser’s cookie file (including upgrading certain browsers), you may delete the Mixpanel opt-out cookie.
Facebook
. We may use certain tools offered by Facebook, Inc. (“Facebook”) that enable it to collect or receive information about actions Website Users take on our Website through use of cookies, web beacons and other storage technologies or in order to provide measurement services, targeted ads and other services. For more information regarding the collection and use of such information by Facebook, please see the Facebook Data Policy, available at:
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php
.
Drift
. We use certain tools offered by Drift to power our Website’s live-chat experience. If you provide information about yourself through that live-chat experience, then we may store that information for marketing purposes. Drift may also infer information about the company that you work for you based on your IP address.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website
When does Branch Disclose Information?
Top
In addition to the ways described in our
Terms & Conditions
, applicable Agreements, and this Privacy Policy, Branch may also disclose information to others under the following circumstances:
With vendors, consultants, global partners, and other parties who assist Branch to provide, support, and maintain the Services and the Website and need access to information we collect to do so;
With our Clients and their agents, as described in this Policy;
To other parties (such as advertising networks or vendors used by our Clients), as directed by our Clients;
To comply with laws or to respond to lawful requests and legal process including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements;
To investigate, prevent, or take action regarding suspected, or actual, prohibited activities, including but not limited to fraud and situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person;
To protect the rights and property of Branch, our agents, Clients, Users, Website Users, and others including to enforce our agreements, policies, and Terms & Conditions;
To Branch’s subsidiaries and affiliates as necessary to help us provide, support, and maintain the Services; and
In connection with or during negotiation of any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
Updating Your Information and Contact Preferences
Top
We provide Clients with a mechanism to access, review and update information via the dashboard. If you wish to review or update your information, please visit branch.io and login using the username and password you created. Next, please select “Account Settings”
which can be found in the lower left corner of the dashboard screen, then select the “User” tab near the top. If you would like to delete your account, please email
support@branch.io
.
We Secure the Information We Collect
Top
Securing the information provided by our Clients and collected through our Website is important to us. Branch has implemented industry-standard technical, administrative, and physical safeguards to help protect the information on our servers against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. You are responsible for maintaining the secrecy of your own passwords. If you have reason to believe that your passwords or Personal Data are no longer secure, please promptly notify us at
privacy@branch.io
.
Branch implements technical and organizational measures designed to protect against unauthorized access, accidental loss, destruction or damage of Client’s data. For more information on our security controls, please see
https://www.branch.io/security/
. If you have questions about the security of your personal information, or if you have reason to believe that the personal information that we hold about you is no longer secure, please contact us immediately as described in this Privacy Policy.
Data Retention
Top
Branch retains the information we collect through our Website and Services for no more time than is needed to serve the legitimate business purposes for which it was collected, or as necessary to comply with our legal obligations. When we have no ongoing legitimate business need to process your personal information we either delete it or pseudonymize it unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed to between Branch and a Client.
Links to Other Websites
Top
The Website and/or Services may contain links to other websites and other websites may reference or link to our Website and/or Services. These other domains and websites are not controlled by Branch, and we do not endorse or make any representations about websites or social media platforms operated by other parties. We encourage you to read the privacy policies of each and every website and application that you interact with. We do not endorse, screen, or approve, and are not responsible for the privacy practices or content of such other websites or applications. Visiting these other websites or applications is at your own risk.
International Data Transfers
Top
All information collected via the Website and Services is stored on servers located in the United States. In the process of providing the Services, we may transfer information across borders from other countries or jurisdictions into the United States. Data protection laws in the United States may differ from your country, and the data Branch processes may be accessible to law enforcement and national security authorities under certain circumstances. By using the Services, each Client and Website User consents to the transfer and processing of information to the U.S. in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Data transfers from the European Union, United Kingdom, and Switzerland are transferred on the basis of legal mechanisms approved by the European Commission and other relevant authorities for cross-border data transfers, such as Standard Contractual Clauses or the Data Privacy Framework mechanism discussed in the “Data Privacy Framework For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States” section below.
Data Privacy Framework For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States
Top
Branch complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) (collectively, “Data Privacy Frameworks”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of Personal Data from European Union member countries (including European Economic Area member countries), the United Kingdom, and Switzerland transferred to the United States pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks. Branch has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Branch has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the policies in this Privacy Policy and data subject rights under the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the applicable Principles (“DPF Principles”) shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification page, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
Branch no longer relies on the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield to transfer data that originated in the EEA or the United Kingdom to the U.S.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Branch’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
Pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks we are obliged to inform EU, UK, and Swiss individuals whose data is being transferred into the United States that we may be required to release Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities including to meet national security and law enforcement requirements.
Branch remains liable for the onward transfer of EU, UK, and Swiss personal data to other parties pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks unless we can prove we were not a party to the actions giving rise to the damages.
We acknowledge the right of EU, UK, and Swiss individuals to access their Personal Data pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals wishing to exercise this right may do so by contacting
privacy@branch.io.
In compliance with the Data Privacy Frameworks, Branch commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information transferred to the United States pursuant to the DPF Principles. European Union, UK, and Swiss individuals with DPF inquiries or complaints should first contact Branch at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
1975 W El Camino Real     Ste. 102
Mountain View, CA 94040
or by email at
privacy@branch.io
Branch has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the DPF Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, Data Privacy Framework Services, operated by JAMS, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit
https://www.jamsadr.com/dpf-dispute-resolution
for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your DPF complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms. See
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/framework- article/ANNEX-I-introduction
.
Your Rights
Top
Under applicable law and depending on your jurisdiction, you may have the right to access, correct, erase and restrict the processing of your personal data. You may also have the right to object to Branch’s processing of your data or exercise other rights, all in accordance with applicable law.
You have the right to lodge complaints about our data processing activities by filing a complaint with our Data Protection Officer who can be reached by the “Contact Us” section below or with a supervisory authority.
California and Certain other U.S. States
Top
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) and applicable privacy laws of other U.S. States provide certain rights to natural persons who are residents of California or such other states. Our privacy notice for California and additional information for other states is available
here
.
Rights of Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
The European General Data Protection Regulation of 2018 (“GDPR”) and equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation (“UK Data Protection Law”) provides certain rights to residents of Europe. Information on how you can exercise rights under the GDPR and UK Data Protection Law are set forth
here
.
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”) provides certain rights to residents of Brazil. Information on how you can exercise rights under the LGPD are set forth
here
.
Our Policy Regarding Children
Top
Services:
The Branch Services are not directed to children. We require that Clients agree to not send to us data relating to any children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 18). If you are a Client and want to learn more about Branch
SDK Privacy Controls
that you can use in your compliance with the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA), GDPR, or any other applicable law, please contact
privacy@branch.io.
If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 18) in violation of applicable law, please contact us at
privacy@branch.io
, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any information that it may have been provided inappropriately as required by law.
Website:
The Branch Website is not directed to children. We do not knowingly collect through the Website Personal Data from anyone under the age of 18. If you are under 18, please do not attempt to register or send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, or email address. No one under 18 may provide any Personal Data to us. In the event that we learn that we have collected any such data from a child under 18 through our Website, we will take reasonable steps to delete that information as quickly as possible. If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 18, please contact us at
privacy@branch.io
,
so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any inappropriately obtained information as required by law.
Contact Us, Questions, Changes to This Privacy Policy
Top
We may change this Privacy Policy at any time at our sole discretion. We will post all changes to this Privacy Policy on this page and will indicate at the top of the page the modified Privacy Policy’s effective date. If you have any questions or suggestions regarding this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
1975 W El Camino Real
Ste. 102
Mountain View, CA 94040, USA
or by email at
info@branch.io
Compliance
Top
This Privacy Policy shall be implemented by Branch and all its operating divisions, subsidiaries and affiliates. Branch has put in place mechanisms to verify ongoing compliance with this Privacy Policy.
Effective January 30th 2025
to
January 30th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Privacy Policy
The Branch Guiding Privacy Principles
Top
Branch is a deep linking and attribution analytics platform for app and website developers. We are proud of our commitment to providing our services in a privacy-first way. So we thought it would be helpful to lay out, in plain English, the Branch Guiding Privacy Principles that drive how we’ve chosen to design our services with privacy as a top priority. We further describe our privacy practices in the official
Privacy Policy
below this section, but we hope you’ll find this summary of our principles helpful.
We limit the data we collect. We practice data minimization, which means that we take steps to avoid collecting or storing information that we don’t need to provide our services. The personal data that we collect to provide our services is limited to data like advertising identifiers, IP address, and information derived from resettable cookies (the full list is below in our privacy policy). We do not collect or store information such as names, email addresses, physical addresses, or SSNs to provide our services. Nor do we want to. In fact, our
Terms & Conditions
prohibit our customers from providing Branch with any kind of sensitive end-user information.
We will only provide you with data about actual end-user activity on your apps or websites. Customers who subscribe to our linking and analytics platform can only access “earned” cookies or identifiers. This means that an end user must visit a customer’s site before our customer can see the cookie; and an end user must download a customer’s app in order for Branch to collect the end user’s advertising identifier for that customer. In short, the Branch services benefit customers who already have seen an end user across their platforms and want to understand the relationship between those web visits and app sessions.
We do not rent or sell customer end user data. No Branch customer can access another Branch customer’s end-user data. And we are not in the business of renting or selling any customer’s end-user data to anyone else. To enable customers to control their end-user personal data, they can request deletion
here
of that data at any time, whether in bulk or for a specific end user. These controls are available to customers worldwide, although we designed them to comply with the CCPA and GDPR requirements.
Beyond these principles stated above, Branch will continue to find ways to design our services to respect end user privacy. We’re committed to making sure our customers understand how we use data they entrust to us and how they can control it so that they can, in turn, be transparent with their end users.
Introduction
Top
Branch Metrics, Inc. ( "Branch", "us", "our" or "we") offers a linking and analytics platform enabling developers of applications (our "Clients")--whether those applications are websites or "apps," and across different types of devices ("Digital Properties")--to improve their end users’ ("Users") cross-application experiences, and to derive additional insights into how their Users download and utilize those applications. Branch recognizes and believes that data privacy is important to all Internet users, and therefore we design and operate our services in a privacy-first manner.
This Privacy Policy is divided into three parts:
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services: This section explains how Branch collects and uses information about Users in connection with our linking and analytics products and services (the "Branch Services" or the "Services").
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes: This section explains how we collect and use information about our website visitors through our website located at branch.io (the “Website”), which includes the dashboard we provide to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. So, if you are a Client using our Branch dashboard, this section applies to the data we collect from you. It also explains how we collect information about potential Clients from vendors and other sources to enhance our marketing efforts.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website: This section lays out the parts of the Branch Privacy Policy that apply to both the Services and to the Website.
Branch and its Clients have entered into an agreement that governs the provision of Services by Branch and their use by Clients ("Agreement(s)"). Such Agreements may contain obligations on the parties with respect to the handling of information processed in the Services. Nothing in this Privacy Policy derogates from such obligations.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services
What Information Does Branch Collect from Our Services?
Top
Below, we explain what information we collect on behalf of our Clients through the Services, and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
The Branch Services: Overview
Top
Branch provides a variety of Services intended to help Clients understand the use of their Digital Properties by their Users across a wide array of platforms, devices and applications. Branch helps Clients by connecting User interactions across siloed applications (email, SMS, web browsers, social platforms, native applications and others), so that Clients understand the multiple steps that a User took to ultimately complete a transaction with the Client. The Client can use this information to better inform marketing and product decisions as well as to provide improved user experiences by using their knowledge of continuity.
Branch has no direct relationship with Users. Branch’s Services are provided when Branch Clients install on their platforms “Branch Mechanisms” (including links, pixels, direct platform integrations, etc.) that capture User action on behalf of the Client. Using the information collected from these Branch Mechanisms, Branch uses a variety of attribution techniques to connect User actions across different channels and platforms. Some of these attribution techniques include a direct pass-through of identifiers from platform to platform, creating and storing identifiers unique to the Branch platform to connect User actions and identifiers together, and predictive modeling algorithms using real-time and historical data parameters observed from User interactions where there are no shared identifiers available, as well as using historical connections Branch has derived over time using our technology. In some cases, these connections are made without the use of cookies. These techniques help Clients match Users with devices they use, including matching the same User across multiple devices.
The key use cases of Branch’s Services are:
To support Clients in implementing deep linking, which uses Branch’s connection information in real time to improve the User experience. For example, if a User clicks on a link in an email or ad to a specific page in a Client’s app, Branch helps the User get to that page after they download the app.
To report individualized and aggregated analytics metrics about the performance of the Client’s product and marketing initiatives to the Client directly. For example, Branch can tell a Client how many Users that downloaded an app or that went to a specific page in an app came from clicking on a specific link and provide corresponding advertising or other identifiers.
To assist the Client by presenting real time, targeted messaging to their Users depending on past behavior observed across the Client’s tracked platforms with the purpose of driving more engagement to the Client. For example, Branch can use Branch Mechanisms to provide a tailored message like a coupon code or special offer in your website to users who have interacted with your app and/or website in the past.
Branch requires that each Client commit to disclose to Branch only information that it has lawfully obtained (including, where necessary, by obtaining consent from Users), and that it has the right to disclose to Branch. We prohibit Clients from providing us with data relating to children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 18).
Branch collects data through various methods, including:
When the Client integrates Branch’s SDK’s, API’s, pixels, redirect links, JavaScript tags, cookies or similar data collection technologies into their Digital Properties and/or ads;
From the various advertising networks and third parties that are used by the Client in connection with the measurement and analysis of Client’s marketing campaigns and that have partnered with Branch;
When provided voluntarily by the Client as part of the Branch account registration process.
Clients are also required to inform us if they are using Branch’s Services to analyze information protected by HIPAA so that Branch can process such information in a protected environment. In the charts below, we summarize the information collected automatically by the Services.
Information Collected By Branch Links, Pixels, and Similar Technologies
Top
Branch collects the following information from URLs created by the Client (i.e., Branch Links) and pixels placed on Client websites. Branch Links may be embedded into QR Codes as configured by the Client. Some of this information is considered personal data under applicable law (in other words, information that itself may identify a unique individual or can be linked back to an individual) (“Personal Data”). Since Clients have sole control over their Digital Properties and configuration of the Services, Clients are contractually prohibited from configuring the Services to collect directly identifiable personal information , unless otherwise agreed by Branch. If a Client has configured the Services to collect directly identifiable personal information, then Branch may receive and process such data. This includes, for example, a Client using an End User’s email address as a Client issued Developer ID.
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for attribution and to understand general location
Cookie
Standard web cookies, used for device identification and attribution
Link Data
Metadata controlled by the Client, which may be used to interpret the data for reporting, or for analytics
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; used for device identification and attribution
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the webpage from which such ads were displayed, and webpages on Client’s website visited by a User.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their website (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
Information Collected by Branch SDKs
Top
SDKs are Software Development Kits that include code that allows Clients to use the Branch Services. The Branch Mobile App SDKs, Web SDKs, and Over-the-Top (OTT) SDKs collect the following information when Clients use these SDKs in their applications or websites, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
Advertising identifier (e.g., GAID, Android ID, IDFA, IDFV, RIDA)
Used for device identification and attribution
Branch Cookie ID
Used for device identification and attribution
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for device identification, attribution, and to understand general location
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Central Processing Unit (CPU) Type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
System build version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Internet connection type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Application version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device model
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Manufacturer / Brand
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen size (height, width)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen resolution
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile network status (Wi-Fi, etc.)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device locale (country and language)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Local IP address
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile platform
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Branch SDK version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Developer ID
(optional) Client-supplied unique identifier; metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Carrier ID
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Environment
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
UI Mode
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the application page from which such ads were displayed, pages on Client’s application visited by a User, downloads, opt-in status for certain tracking mechanisms, and installations of applications.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their application (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
In addition to the information identified above, the Branch Desktop SDKs collect the following identifiers when Clients use these SDKs in their desktop applications, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
MAC address
Used for device identification and attribution
Windows Advertising ID
Used for device identification and attribution
CPU ID
Used for device identification and attribution
Information Collected By Other Parties
Top
As part of Branch’s Services, Branch’s Clients may direct certain of their vendors or business partners (such as an ad network or vendor) that have partnered with Branch to provide certain Engagement Data to Branch on the Client’s behalf in connection with the measurement and analysis of the Client's marketing campaigns.
How Does Branch Use Information Collected by Our Services?
Top
Subject to Agreements with our Clients, data that Branch collects through the Services is processed to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Services we provide our Clients, including to support other Branch products and services, to perform anti- fraud protection analysis, develop new products and services, and market products or services; to support the products and services of our Clients; and as permitted or required by applicable law.
Where authorized by Agreements with our Clients, we may aggregate and/or de-identify the data we collect through the Services. After data has been aggregated and/or de-identified, Branch cannot use it to personally identify an individual. We may use de-identified and/or aggregated data for any purpose, including without limitation for research and marketing purposes, and may also disclose such data to any other parties, including business partners, Clients, and/or others.
Our Clients’ Use of Information
Top
Our Clients may use the information collected via the Services to improve their Users’ app experiences, customize their Digital Properties to Users, and to better understand their app marketing programs and how Users discover their apps. For example, a User may want to disclose information about a hotel that she found in a travel app to a friend. When that User sends her friend a Branch link to that hotel, after clicking the link the friend is brought directly to the content relating to that hotel within the app, rather than landing on the app’s homepage and having to search for the hotel. The travel app would also gain insights and analytics as to how the content is being disclosed from its app.
We require that our Clients utilize our Services responsibly and in accordance with our
Terms & Conditions
, Agreements, or other contracts with us. Branch is not responsible for the data practices of any of our Clients through the Services or otherwise. Each Client’s practices are subject to each Client’s individual privacy policy. Users should review the privacy policy of each Client to understand how that Client uses User information collected through the Services.
User Choices
Top
Branch recognizes a number of consumer choice mechanisms. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality may be degraded or no longer work as a result if you exercise certain of the opt-outs below.
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer read or set cookies (beyond the opt-out cookie itself). Cookie-based opt outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”). NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt-out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from interest-based advertising by participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
NAI OTT/CTV Opt-Out:
NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt-out of digital advertising data collection on various connected streaming devices to the extent that the device manufacturer will allow. That opt-out is available
here
.
Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt out of the Branch Services on a particular device by submitting a request
here
.
Device Identifiers:
To use your device’s privacy settings controls, please visit the privacy settings menu of your device to review and access the privacy controls made available on the device. Branch will only be able to collect information from the device as permitted by these settings.
Client App Opt-out Controls:
Branch‘s
SDK Privacy Controls
allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data. Clients can flag in the Branch SDK that a particular User’s data should not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Global Privacy Control:
Please note that we also respond to and abide by opt-out preference signals sent through the Global Privacy Control. Any opt out preferences you have exercised through these methods will only apply to the specific device/browser on which you made them. For more information on how to use the Global Privacy Control, see
www.globalprivacycontrol.org
.
Engagement Builder:
Branch's Engagement Builder feature may be used to help Clients conduct re-engagement and re-targeting campaigns. We require that Clients using Branch’s Engagement Builder feature for such purposes respect User opt-out preferences passed to them by Branch.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website
and for Marketing Purposes
What Information Does Branch Collect about Website Visitors and Potential Customers?
Top
Branch collects information from Website visitors (“you” or “Website Users”) located at
www.branch.io
( the “Website”), which includes the dashboard provided to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. The types of information we may collect and our privacy practices depend on the nature of the relationship you have with us and the requirements of applicable law. Below are the legal bases and some of the ways we collect information and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
What We Collect from Clients that Use the Website
Top
Branch collects Personal Data and non-personal data via the Website. For example, when Clients register to use our Services, we ask them to provide us with Personal Data, including first and last name and email address.
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for limited security login controls
Cookie (ours)
Standard web cookie used for dashboard session management
Cookie (other-party)
Other-party web tracking tools used for business intelligence
First, Last Name
Used for team user identification
Work Email
Used as the primary login identifier
Password
Account registration, secure our Services and prevent fraud
Account Holder Primary Role
Account registration, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; may be used for limited security login controls
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for general internal business analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for general internal business analytics
Github ID
(optional) Can be used as a login method
Billing Information
Payment account registration
Log Data
Provide the Services, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners, personalize our experience, secure our Services and prevent fraud, and defend our legal rights and comply with the law
Account holder feedback
Help us improve your experience on the account dashboard
Dashboard Information:
Information we collect from visitors who register for an account on our dashboard includes the following, some of which is considered Personal Data under applicable law:When a Client creates an account and uses the Services, Branch may collect certain log data, such as IP address from which a Client is connecting to the Services, information related to the device being used to connect to the Services (e.g., browser type and version, device type, OS version) and the features and functions of the Services used by the Client (“Log Data”).
We also require Clients to set up a user ID and unique password for account security purposes. Clients must not disclose their passwords to anyone. Clients also have the option of adding other team members to their account. This account information enables us to set up an account for Clients, to provide the Services, and to otherwise manage Client accounts. We may also use this information to notify Clients about updates to our Services and provide them with promotional emails. We offer a mechanism to opt out from promotional emails as described in the “Opt-Out from Promotional Emails” section below.
Account and Billing Information:
To the extent that we charge a fee for the Services, we may also collect limited billing, payment, and contract information from Clients through our payment and contract vendors.
Connection Information with Other Parties:
Some features of the dashboard Services allow you to disclose your information through your accounts to other companies such as Facebook and Google. If you choose to connect Branch to such services provided by other parties, we may collect information related to your use of those services provided by other parties, such as authentication tokens that allow us to connect to your accounts with those other parties. We will ask you for permission before you authorize our collection of this information. We may also collect information about how you are using the Services to interact with those connected services.
Information from Other Sources:
In addition to the information collected through our Website, we or our vendors may obtain and disclose additional information, such as job title or contact information, from other public and non-public sources such as business websites, social networking platforms, or databases maintained by other parties. We use this information to better enable Branch to identify and contact businesses that might be interested in engaging our Services, and to gain a better understanding of a potential Client’s business needs.
Communications with Branch:
Some Website Users may provide Personal Data to Branch by sending us an email or filling out an online form, downloading content that we make available on the Website, or registering for or attending our events, programs, trainings, or contests. Such information we may receive may include contact and professional details about you which you have chosen to share with us including name, email address, phone number, office or other mailing address, and professional data including organization you are affiliated with, your job title, and industry. We use this information to answer your question(s) and process requests, and may store that information for our record keeping, marketing, and advertising purposes.
Research/Survey Solicitations:
From time to time, we may perform research (online and offline) via surveys. We may engage vendors to conduct such surveys on our behalf. All survey responses are voluntary, and the information collected will be used for research and reporting purposes to help us better serve individuals by learning more about their needs and the quality of the products and services we provide. The survey responses may be utilized to determine the effectiveness of our Website, various types of communications, advertising campaigns and/or promotional activities.
Cookies, Pixels and Web Beacons:
We also collect other data via the Website from Website Users, including Website Users employed by or affiliated with Clients, through cookies and/or web beacons. Such information, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law, may include IP address, pages viewed, browser type, Internet browsing and usage habits, how you browse and navigate the Website, Internet Service Provider, domain name, the time/date of your visit to the Website, the referring URL, and your computer’s operating system. For example, we may collect on a real-time basis information on how you use and navigate the Website.
If your browser settings permit the use of cookies and web beacons when you visit and continue to use the Website, we will collect information through those tools. Cookies are small data files stored on your hard drive by a website and web beacons are electronic images that may be used on our Website or in our emails. Cookies help us improve your experience on the Website as well as our marketing activities. We use cookies to see which areas and features are popular and to count visits to our Website. For more information about cookies and web beacons, please visit
https://www.cookiepro.com/knowledgebase/knowledge_categories/cookies- 101/
. For more information about how to opt-out of cookies and web beacons after you have consented to their use, see the “Opt-out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons” section below.
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected?
Top
Branch processes the data described in the section above for the following purposes:
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Website;
to fulfill your and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services;
to send information about the Services including confirmations, invoices, payment processing, technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
to communicate about products and services offered by Branch and Branch's selected partners. We receive opt-in consent to send promotional and marketing messages to Website Users where required by applicable law. You can opt-out of receiving these messages at any time as described below in the section titled: “Opt-out from Promotional Emails”;
to conduct research;
to manage your information and account, to improve and administer our Website, to contact Website Users to answer questions or resolve problems, or to verify your identity;
to conduct research to help us to optimally deliver our existing Services or develop new products, processes and services;
for ad delivery and reporting purposes and to create data and analytics products and services;
to make the Website easier to use by reducing the need for Clients and Website Users to enter information;
for other purposes disclosed to you at the time you provide data to us;
with your consent; or
where Branch otherwise has a legitimate interest in collecting the data, such as direct marketing, individual or market research, product improvement, anti-fraud protection, protecting the safety of us, our Website Users, or other parties, or where required by law.
Opt-Out & Do Not Track - Your Choice Mechanisms
Top
In some cases, we rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you. In those cases, and where you have consented to Branch's processing of your Personal Data in connection with your use of the Website, you may withdraw that consent at any time by following the instructions below. Additionally, before we use Personal Data collected with your consent for any new purpose not originally authorized by you, we will provide information regarding the new purpose and ask for your consent for the new purpose. Where your consent for the processing of Personal Data is otherwise required by law or contract, we will comply with the law or contract. In other cases, we do not rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you (for example, if we have a different legal basis to process that data).
Opt-Out from Promotional Emails
Top
You can opt-out of receiving promotional emails from us by following the instructions in those emails, or by visiting our
Preference Center
. You can also opt-out of certain categories of emails using
this form
. If you opt-out using any of these tools, we may still send you non-promotional emails, such as certain updates about your account or updates to our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy and/or use of the Services.
Opt-Out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons
Top
We will only use cookies consistent with your cookie settings and permissions granted on our Website. If you permit us to use cookies/web beacons as discussed above (“What Information Does Branch Collect from our Website”), but would like to opt-out:
For dashboard users, visit
https://dashboard.branch.io/account-settings/user
, and toggle off “Cookie Consent”.
For all other users, click on “Cookie Consent” at the bottom right-hand corner of our homepage (
https://branch.io
/
), and click on the opt-out link.
Also, you can choose to set your browser to remove cookies and to reject cookies. To exercise the "Do Not Track" settings available on certain web browsers, please visit the privacy settings of your browser. Where Branch is able to see that such a selection has been made, we will not use information collected from that device to target advertising on that browser. Dashboard users must use the “Cookie Consent” feature to revoke permission to place cookies. Please note that "Do Not Track" is a different privacy mechanism than the Global Privacy Control browser choice referenced below.
Note that, even if you opt out, we may still collect and use non-personal data regarding your activities on our Website. This also does not opt you out of being served advertising altogether; you will continue to receive generic advertisements.
Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website
Top
The Website utilizes tracking tools from vendors, which may enable these vendors to analyze our Website traffic for analytics purposes. Some of these vendors may collect information from this Website for retargeting and interest-based advertising purposes. For more information about these forms of ad targeting and to understand your right to opt-out from these practices, please visit
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
. All of these tools are hosted by the parties who provide them, and your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policies of the parties providing them. These tools include, but are not limited to, those below.
Google
. We may use Google Analytics and Google Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting to collect information regarding visitor behavior and visitor demographics on our Website, and to develop website content. For more information about Google Analytics, please visit
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
. You can opt-out of Google’s collection and processing of data generated by your use of the Website by going to
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
Mixpanel
. We use a service provided by Mixpanel, Inc. (“Mixpanel”) to provide us with analytics data regarding Website Users’ interactions with our Website and Services. You may opt-out of Mixpanel’s automatic retention of data that is collected while using the Services by visiting
https://mixpanel.com/optout/
. To track opt-outs, Mixpanel uses a persistent opt-out cookie placed on your device. Please note that if you get a new computer, install a new browser, erase or otherwise alter the browser’s cookie file (including upgrading certain browsers), you may delete the Mixpanel opt-out cookie.
Facebook
. We may use certain tools offered by Facebook, Inc. (“Facebook”) that enable it to collect or receive information about actions Website Users take on our Website through use of cookies, web beacons and other storage technologies or in order to provide measurement services, targeted ads and other services. For more information regarding the collection and use of such information by Facebook, please see the Facebook Data Policy, available at:
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php
.
Drift
. We use certain tools offered by Drift to power our Website’s live-chat experience. If you provide information about yourself through that live-chat experience, then we may store that information for marketing purposes. Drift may also infer information about the company that you work for you based on your IP address.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website
When does Branch Disclose Information?
Top
In addition to the ways described in our
Terms & Conditions
, applicable Agreements, and this Privacy Policy, Branch may also disclose information to others under the following circumstances:
With vendors, consultants, global partners, and other parties who assist Branch to provide, support, and maintain the Services and the Website and need access to information we collect to do so;
With our Clients and their agents, as described in this Policy;
To other parties (such as advertising networks or vendors used by our Clients), as directed by our Clients;
To comply with laws or to respond to lawful requests and legal process including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements;
To investigate, prevent, or take action regarding suspected, or actual, prohibited activities, including but not limited to fraud and situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person;
To protect the rights and property of Branch, our agents, Clients, Users, Website Users, and others including to enforce our agreements, policies, and Terms & Conditions;
To Branch’s subsidiaries and affiliates as necessary to help us provide, support, and maintain the Services; and
In connection with or during negotiation of any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
Updating Your Information and Contact Preferences
Top
We provide Clients with a mechanism to access, review and update information via the dashboard. If you wish to review or update your information, please visit branch.io and login using the username and password you created. Next, please select “Account Settings”
which can be found in the lower left corner of the dashboard screen, then select the “User” tab near the top. If you would like to delete your account, please email
support@branch.io
.
We Secure the Information We Collect
Top
Securing the information provided by our Clients and collected through our Website is important to us. Branch has implemented industry-standard technical, administrative, and physical safeguards to help protect the information on our servers against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. You are responsible for maintaining the secrecy of your own passwords. If you have reason to believe that your passwords or Personal Data are no longer secure, please promptly notify us at
privacy@branch.io
.
Branch implements technical and organizational measures designed to protect against unauthorized access, accidental loss, destruction or damage of Client’s data. For more information on our security controls, please see
https://www.branch.io/security/
. If you have questions about the security of your personal information, or if you have reason to believe that the personal information that we hold about you is no longer secure, please contact us immediately as described in this Privacy Policy.
Data Retention
Top
Branch retains the information we collect through our Website and Services for no more time than is needed to serve the legitimate business purposes for which it was collected, or as necessary to comply with our legal obligations. When we have no ongoing legitimate business need to process your personal information we either delete it or pseudonymize it unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed to between Branch and a Client.
Links to Other Websites
Top
The Website and/or Services may contain links to other websites and other websites may reference or link to our Website and/or Services. These other domains and websites are not controlled by Branch, and we do not endorse or make any representations about websites or social media platforms operated by other parties. We encourage you to read the privacy policies of each and every website and application that you interact with. We do not endorse, screen, or approve, and are not responsible for the privacy practices or content of such other websites or applications. Visiting these other websites or applications is at your own risk.
International Data Transfers
Top
All information collected via the Website and Services is stored on servers located in the United States. In the process of providing the Services, we may transfer information across borders from other countries or jurisdictions into the United States. Data protection laws in the United States may differ from your country, and the data Branch processes may be accessible to law enforcement and national security authorities under certain circumstances. By using the Services, each Client and Website User consents to the transfer and processing of information to the U.S. in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Data transfers from the European Union, United Kingdom, and Switzerland are transferred on the basis of legal mechanisms approved by the European Commission and other relevant authorities for cross-border data transfers, such as Standard Contractual Clauses or the Data Privacy Framework mechanism discussed in the “Data Privacy Framework For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States” section below.
Data Privacy Framework For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States
Top
Branch complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) (collectively, “Data Privacy Frameworks”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of Personal Data from European Union member countries (including European Economic Area member countries), the United Kingdom, and Switzerland transferred to the United States pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks. Branch has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Branch has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the policies in this Privacy Policy and data subject rights under the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the applicable Principles (“DPF Principles”) shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification page, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
Branch no longer relies on the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield to transfer data that originated in the EEA or the United Kingdom to the U.S.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Branch’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
Pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks we are obliged to inform EU, UK, and Swiss individuals whose data is being transferred into the United States that we may be required to release Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities including to meet national security and law enforcement requirements.
Branch remains liable for the onward transfer of EU, UK, and Swiss personal data to other parties pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks unless we can prove we were not a party to the actions giving rise to the damages.
We acknowledge the right of EU, UK, and Swiss individuals to access their Personal Data pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals wishing to exercise this right may do so by contacting
privacy@branch.io.
In compliance with the Data Privacy Frameworks, Branch commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information transferred to the United States pursuant to the DPF Principles. European Union, UK, and Swiss individuals with DPF inquiries or complaints should first contact Branch at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
1975 W El Camino Real     Ste. 102
Mountain View, CA 94040
or by email at
privacy@branch.io
Branch has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the DPF Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, Data Privacy Framework Services, operated by JAMS, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit
https://www.jamsadr.com/dpf-dispute-resolution
for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your DPF complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms. See
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/framework- article/ANNEX-I-introduction
.
Your Rights
Top
Under applicable law and depending on your jurisdiction, you may have the right to access, correct, erase and restrict the processing of your personal data. You may also have the right to object to Branch’s processing of your data or exercise other rights, all in accordance with applicable law.
You have the right to lodge complaints about our data processing activities by filing a complaint with our Data Protection Officer who can be reached by the “Contact Us” section below or with a supervisory authority.
California and Certain other U.S. States
Top
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) and applicable privacy laws of other U.S. States provide certain rights to natural persons who are residents of California or such other states. Our privacy notice for California and additional information for other states is available
here
.
Rights of Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
The European General Data Protection Regulation of 2018 (“GDPR”) and equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation (“UK Data Protection Law”) provides certain rights to residents of Europe. Information on how you can exercise rights under the GDPR and UK Data Protection Law are set forth
here
.
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”) provides certain rights to residents of Brazil. Information on how you can exercise rights under the LGPD are set forth
here
.
Our Policy Regarding Children
Top
Services:
The Branch Services are not directed to children. We require that Clients agree to not send to us data relating to any children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 18). If you are a Client and want to learn more about Branch
SDK Privacy Controls
that you can use in your compliance with the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA), GDPR, or any other applicable law, please contact
privacy@branch.io.
If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 18) in violation of applicable law, please contact us at
privacy@branch.io
, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any information that it may have been provided inappropriately as required by law.
Website:
The Branch Website is not directed to children. We do not knowingly collect through the Website Personal Data from anyone under the age of 18. If you are under 18, please do not attempt to register or send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, or email address. No one under 18 may provide any Personal Data to us. In the event that we learn that we have collected any such data from a child under 18 through our Website, we will take reasonable steps to delete that information as quickly as possible. If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 18, please contact us at
privacy@branch.io
,
so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any inappropriately obtained information as required by law.
Contact Us, Questions, Changes to This Privacy Policy
Top
We may change this Privacy Policy at any time at our sole discretion. We will post all changes to this Privacy Policy on this page and will indicate at the top of the page the modified Privacy Policy’s effective date. If you have any questions or suggestions regarding this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
1975 W El Camino Real
Ste. 102
Mountain View, CA 94040, USA
or by email at
info@branch.io
Compliance
Top
This Privacy Policy shall be implemented by Branch and all its operating divisions, subsidiaries and affiliates. Branch has put in place mechanisms to verify ongoing compliance with this Privacy Policy.
Effective December 31st 2024
to
January 30th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Privacy Policy
The Branch Guiding Privacy Principles
Top
Branch is a deep linking and attribution analytics platform for app and website developers. We are proud of our commitment to providing our services in a privacy-first way. So we thought it would be helpful to lay out, in plain English, the Branch Guiding Privacy Principles that drive how we’ve chosen to design our services with privacy as a top priority. We further describe our privacy practices in the official
Privacy Policy
below this section, but we hope you’ll find this summary of our principles helpful.
We limit the data we collect. We practice data minimization, which means that we take steps to avoid collecting or storing information that we don’t need to provide our services. The personal data that we collect to provide our services is limited to data like advertising identifiers, IP address, and information derived from resettable cookies (the full list is below in our privacy policy). We do not collect or store information such as names, email addresses, physical addresses, or SSNs to provide our services. Nor do we want to. In fact, our
Terms & Conditions
prohibit our customers from providing Branch with any kind of sensitive end-user information.
We will only provide you with data about actual end-user activity on your apps or websites. Customers who subscribe to our linking and analytics platform can only access “earned” cookies or identifiers. This means that an end user must visit a customer’s site before our customer can see the cookie; and an end user must download a customer’s app in order for Branch to collect the end user’s advertising identifier for that customer. In short, the Branch services benefit customers who already have seen an end user across their platforms and want to understand the relationship between those web visits and app sessions.
We do not rent or sell customer end user data. No Branch customer can access another Branch customer’s end-user data. And we are not in the business of renting or selling any customer’s end-user data to anyone else. To enable customers to control their end-user personal data, they can request deletion
here
of that data at any time, whether in bulk or for a specific end user. These controls are available to customers worldwide, although we designed them to comply with the CCPA and GDPR requirements.
Beyond these principles stated above, Branch will continue to find ways to design our services to respect end user privacy. We’re committed to making sure our customers understand how we use data they entrust to us and how they can control it so that they can, in turn, be transparent with their end users.
Introduction
Top
Branch Metrics, Inc. ( "Branch", "us", "our" or "we") offers a linking and analytics platform enabling developers of applications (our "Clients")--whether those applications are websites or "apps," and across different types of devices ("Digital Properties")--to improve their end users’ ("Users") cross-application experiences, and to derive additional insights into how their Users download and utilize those applications. Branch recognizes and believes that data privacy is important to all Internet users, and therefore we design and operate our services in a privacy-first manner.
This Privacy Policy is divided into three parts:
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services: This section explains how Branch collects and uses information about Users in connection with our linking and analytics products and services (the "Branch Services" or the "Services").
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes: This section explains how we collect and use information about our website visitors through our website located at branch.io (the “Website”), which includes the dashboard we provide to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. So, if you are a Client using our Branch dashboard, this section applies to the data we collect from you. It also explains how we collect information about potential Clients from vendors and other sources to enhance our marketing efforts.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website: This section lays out the parts of the Branch Privacy Policy that apply to both the Services and to the Website.
Branch and its Clients have entered into an agreement that governs the provision of Services by Branch and their use by Clients ("Agreement(s)"). Such Agreements may contain obligations on the parties with respect to the handling of information processed in the Services. Nothing in this Privacy Policy derogates from such obligations.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services
What Information Does Branch Collect from Our Services?
Top
Below, we explain what information we collect on behalf of our Clients through the Services, and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
The Branch Services: Overview
Top
Branch provides a variety of Services intended to help Clients understand the use of their Digital Properties by their Users across a wide array of platforms, devices and applications. Branch helps Clients by connecting User interactions across siloed applications (email, SMS, web browsers, social platforms, native applications and others), so that Clients understand the multiple steps that a User took to ultimately complete a transaction with the Client. The Client can use this information to better inform marketing and product decisions as well as to provide improved user experiences by using their knowledge of continuity.
Branch has no direct relationship with Users. Branch’s Services are provided when Branch Clients install on their platforms “Branch Mechanisms” (including links, pixels, direct platform integrations, etc.) that capture User action on behalf of the Client. Using the information collected from these Branch Mechanisms, Branch uses a variety of attribution techniques to connect User actions across different channels and platforms. Some of these attribution techniques include a direct pass-through of identifiers from platform to platform, creating and storing identifiers unique to the Branch platform to connect User actions and identifiers together, and predictive modeling algorithms using real-time and historical data parameters observed from User interactions where there are no shared identifiers available, as well as using historical connections Branch has derived over time using our technology. In some cases, these connections are made without the use of cookies. These techniques help Clients match Users with devices they use, including matching the same User across multiple devices.
The key use cases of Branch’s Services are:
To support Clients in implementing deep linking, which uses Branch’s connection information in real time to improve the User experience. For example, if a User clicks on a link in an email or ad to a specific page in a Client’s app, Branch helps the User get to that page after they download the app.
To report individualized and aggregated analytics metrics about the performance of the Client’s product and marketing initiatives to the Client directly. For example, Branch can tell a Client how many Users that downloaded an app or that went to a specific page in an app came from clicking on a specific link and provide corresponding advertising or other identifiers.
To assist the Client by presenting real time, targeted messaging to their Users depending on past behavior observed across the Client’s tracked platforms with the purpose of driving more engagement to the Client. For example, Branch can use Branch Mechanisms to provide a tailored message like a coupon code or special offer in your website to users who have interacted with your app and/or website in the past.
Branch requires that each Client commit to disclose to Branch only information that it has lawfully obtained (including, where necessary, by obtaining consent from Users), and that it has the right to disclose to Branch. We prohibit Clients from providing us with data relating to children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 18).
Branch collects data through various methods, including:
When the Client integrates Branch’s SDK’s, API’s, pixels, redirect links, JavaScript tags, cookies or similar data collection technologies into their Digital Properties and/or ads;
From the various advertising networks and third parties that are used by the Client in connection with the measurement and analysis of Client’s marketing campaigns and that have partnered with Branch;
When provided voluntarily by the Client as part of the Branch account registration process.
Clients are also required to inform us if they are using Branch’s Services to analyze information protected by HIPAA so that Branch can process such information in a protected environment. In the charts below, we summarize the information collected automatically by the Services.
Information Collected By Branch Links, Pixels, and Similar Technologies
Top
Branch collects the following information from URLs created by the Client (i.e., Branch Links) and pixels placed on Client websites. Branch Links may be embedded into QR Codes as configured by the Client. Some of this information is considered personal data under applicable law (in other words, information that itself may identify a unique individual or can be linked back to an individual) (“Personal Data”). Since Clients have sole control over their Digital Properties and configuration of the Services, Clients are contractually prohibited from configuring the Services to collect directly identifiable personal information , unless otherwise agreed by Branch. If a Client has configured the Services to collect directly identifiable personal information, then Branch may receive and process such data. This includes, for example, a Client using an End User’s email address as a Client issued Developer ID.
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for attribution and to understand general location
Cookie
Standard web cookies, used for device identification and attribution
Link Data
Metadata controlled by the Client, which may be used to interpret the data for reporting, or for analytics
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; used for device identification and attribution
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the webpage from which such ads were displayed, and webpages on Client’s website visited by a User.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their website (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
Information Collected by Branch SDKs
Top
SDKs are Software Development Kits that include code that allows Clients to use the Branch Services. The Branch Mobile App SDKs, Web SDKs, and Over-the-Top (OTT) SDKs collect the following information when Clients use these SDKs in their applications or websites, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
Advertising identifier (e.g., GAID, Android ID, IDFA, IDFV, RIDA)
Used for device identification and attribution
Branch Cookie ID
Used for device identification and attribution
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for device identification, attribution, and to understand general location
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Central Processing Unit (CPU) Type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
System build version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Internet connection type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Application version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device model
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Manufacturer / Brand
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen size (height, width)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen resolution
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile network status (Wi-Fi, etc.)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device locale (country and language)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Local IP address
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile platform
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Branch SDK version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Developer ID
(optional) Client-supplied unique identifier; metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Carrier ID
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Environment
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
UI Mode
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the application page from which such ads were displayed, pages on Client’s application visited by a User, downloads, opt-in status for certain tracking mechanisms, and installations of applications.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their application (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
In addition to the information identified above, the Branch Desktop SDKs collect the following identifiers when Clients use these SDKs in their desktop applications, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
MAC address
Used for device identification and attribution
Windows Advertising ID
Used for device identification and attribution
CPU ID
Used for device identification and attribution
Information Collected By Other Parties
Top
As part of Branch’s Services, Branch’s Clients may direct certain of their vendors or business partners (such as an ad network or vendor) that have partnered with Branch to provide certain Engagement Data to Branch on the Client’s behalf in connection with the measurement and analysis of the Client's marketing campaigns.
How Does Branch Use Information Collected by Our Services?
Top
Subject to Agreements with our Clients, data that Branch collects through the Services is processed to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Services we provide our Clients, including to support other Branch products and services, to perform anti- fraud protection analysis, develop new products and services, and market products or services; to support the products and services of our Clients; and as permitted or required by applicable law.
Where authorized by Agreements with our Clients, we may aggregate and/or de-identify the data we collect through the Services. After data has been aggregated and/or de-identified, Branch cannot use it to personally identify an individual. We may use de-identified and/or aggregated data for any purpose, including without limitation for research and marketing purposes, and may also disclose such data to any other parties, including business partners, Clients, and/or others.
Our Clients’ Use of Information
Top
Our Clients may use the information collected via the Services to improve their Users’ app experiences, customize their Digital Properties to Users, and to better understand their app marketing programs and how Users discover their apps. For example, a User may want to disclose information about a hotel that she found in a travel app to a friend. When that User sends her friend a Branch link to that hotel, after clicking the link the friend is brought directly to the content relating to that hotel within the app, rather than landing on the app’s homepage and having to search for the hotel. The travel app would also gain insights and analytics as to how the content is being disclosed from its app.
We require that our Clients utilize our Services responsibly and in accordance with our
Terms & Conditions
, Agreements, or other contracts with us. Branch is not responsible for the data practices of any of our Clients through the Services or otherwise. Each Client’s practices are subject to each Client’s individual privacy policy. Users should review the privacy policy of each Client to understand how that Client uses User information collected through the Services.
User Choices
Top
Branch recognizes a number of consumer choice mechanisms. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality may be degraded or no longer work as a result if you exercise certain of the opt-outs below.
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer read or set cookies (beyond the opt-out cookie itself). Cookie-based opt outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”). NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt-out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from interest-based advertising by participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
NAI OTT/CTV Opt-Out:
NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt-out of digital advertising data collection on various connected streaming devices to the extent that the device manufacturer will allow. That opt-out is available
here
.
Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt out of the Branch Services on a particular device by submitting a request
here
.
Device Identifiers:
To use your device’s privacy settings controls, please visit the privacy settings menu of your device to review and access the privacy controls made available on the device. Branch will only be able to collect information from the device as permitted by these settings.
Client App Opt-out Controls:
Branch‘s
SDK Privacy Controls
allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data. Clients can flag in the Branch SDK that a particular User’s data should not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Global Privacy Control:
Please note that we also respond to and abide by opt-out preference signals sent through the Global Privacy Control. Any opt out preferences you have exercised through these methods will only apply to the specific device/browser on which you made them. For more information on how to use the Global Privacy Control, see
www.globalprivacycontrol.org
.
Engagement Builder:
Branch's Engagement Builder feature may be used to help Clients conduct re-engagement and re-targeting campaigns. We require that Clients using Branch’s Engagement Builder feature for such purposes respect User opt-out preferences passed to them by Branch.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website
and for Marketing Purposes
What Information Does Branch Collect about Website Visitors and Potential Customers?
Top
Branch collects information from Website visitors (“you” or “Website Users”) located at
www.branch.io
( the “Website”), which includes the dashboard provided to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. The types of information we may collect and our privacy practices depend on the nature of the relationship you have with us and the requirements of applicable law. Below are the legal bases and some of the ways we collect information and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
What We Collect from Clients that Use the Website
Top
Branch collects Personal Data and non-personal data via the Website. For example, when Clients register to use our Services, we ask them to provide us with Personal Data, including first and last name and email address.
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for limited security login controls
Cookie (ours)
Standard web cookie used for dashboard session management
Cookie (other-party)
Other-party web tracking tools used for business intelligence
First, Last Name
Used for team user identification
Work Email
Used as the primary login identifier
Password
Account registration, secure our Services and prevent fraud
Account Holder Primary Role
Account registration, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; may be used for limited security login controls
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for general internal business analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for general internal business analytics
Github ID
(optional) Can be used as a login method
Billing Information
Payment account registration
Log Data
Provide the Services, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners, personalize our experience, secure our Services and prevent fraud, and defend our legal rights and comply with the law
Account holder feedback
Help us improve your experience on the account dashboard
Dashboard Information:
Information we collect from visitors who register for an account on our dashboard includes the following, some of which is considered Personal Data under applicable law:When a Client creates an account and uses the Services, Branch may collect certain log data, such as IP address from which a Client is connecting to the Services, information related to the device being used to connect to the Services (e.g., browser type and version, device type, OS version) and the features and functions of the Services used by the Client (“Log Data”).
We also require Clients to set up a user ID and unique password for account security purposes. Clients must not disclose their passwords to anyone. Clients also have the option of adding other team members to their account. This account information enables us to set up an account for Clients, to provide the Services, and to otherwise manage Client accounts. We may also use this information to notify Clients about updates to our Services and provide them with promotional emails. We offer a mechanism to opt out from promotional emails as described in the “Opt-Out from Promotional Emails” section below.
Account and Billing Information:
To the extent that we charge a fee for the Services, we may also collect limited billing, payment, and contract information from Clients through our payment and contract vendors.
Connection Information with Other Parties:
Some features of the dashboard Services allow you to disclose your information through your accounts to other companies such as Facebook and Google. If you choose to connect Branch to such services provided by other parties, we may collect information related to your use of those services provided by other parties, such as authentication tokens that allow us to connect to your accounts with those other parties. We will ask you for permission before you authorize our collection of this information. We may also collect information about how you are using the Services to interact with those connected services.
Information from Other Sources:
In addition to the information collected through our Website, we or our vendors may obtain and disclose additional information, such as job title or contact information, from other public and non-public sources such as business websites, social networking platforms, or databases maintained by other parties. We use this information to better enable Branch to identify and contact businesses that might be interested in engaging our Services, and to gain a better understanding of a potential Client’s business needs.
Communications with Branch:
Some Website Users may provide Personal Data to Branch by sending us an email or filling out an online form, downloading content that we make available on the Website, or registering for or attending our events, programs, trainings, or contests. Such information we may receive may include contact and professional details about you which you have chosen to share with us including name, email address, phone number, office or other mailing address, and professional data including organization you are affiliated with, your job title, and industry. We use this information to answer your question(s) and process requests, and may store that information for our record keeping, marketing, and advertising purposes.
Research/Survey Solicitations:
From time to time, we may perform research (online and offline) via surveys. We may engage vendors to conduct such surveys on our behalf. All survey responses are voluntary, and the information collected will be used for research and reporting purposes to help us better serve individuals by learning more about their needs and the quality of the products and services we provide. The survey responses may be utilized to determine the effectiveness of our Website, various types of communications, advertising campaigns and/or promotional activities.
Cookies, Pixels and Web Beacons:
We also collect other data via the Website from Website Users, including Website Users employed by or affiliated with Clients, through cookies and/or web beacons. Such information, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law, may include IP address, pages viewed, browser type, Internet browsing and usage habits, how you browse and navigate the Website, Internet Service Provider, domain name, the time/date of your visit to the Website, the referring URL, and your computer’s operating system. For example, we may collect on a real-time basis information on how you use and navigate the Website.
If your browser settings permit the use of cookies and web beacons when you visit and continue to use the Website, we will collect information through those tools. Cookies are small data files stored on your hard drive by a website and web beacons are electronic images that may be used on our Website or in our emails. Cookies help us improve your experience on the Website as well as our marketing activities. We use cookies to see which areas and features are popular and to count visits to our Website. For more information about cookies and web beacons, please visit
https://www.cookiepro.com/knowledgebase/knowledge_categories/cookies- 101/
. For more information about how to opt-out of cookies and web beacons after you have consented to their use, see the “Opt-out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons” section below.
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected?
Top
Branch processes the data described in the section above for the following purposes:
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Website;
to fulfill your and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services;
to send information about the Services including confirmations, invoices, payment processing, technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
to communicate about products and services offered by Branch and Branch's selected partners. We receive opt-in consent to send promotional and marketing messages to Website Users where required by applicable law. You can opt-out of receiving these messages at any time as described below in the section titled: “Opt-out from Promotional Emails”;
to conduct research;
to manage your information and account, to improve and administer our Website, to contact Website Users to answer questions or resolve problems, or to verify your identity;
to conduct research to help us to optimally deliver our existing Services or develop new products, processes and services;
for ad delivery and reporting purposes and to create data and analytics products and services;
to make the Website easier to use by reducing the need for Clients and Website Users to enter information;
for other purposes disclosed to you at the time you provide data to us;
with your consent; or
where Branch otherwise has a legitimate interest in collecting the data, such as direct marketing, individual or market research, product improvement, anti-fraud protection, protecting the safety of us, our Website Users, or other parties, or where required by law.
Opt-Out & Do Not Track - Your Choice Mechanisms
Top
In some cases, we rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you. In those cases, and where you have consented to Branch's processing of your Personal Data in connection with your use of the Website, you may withdraw that consent at any time by following the instructions below. Additionally, before we use Personal Data collected with your consent for any new purpose not originally authorized by you, we will provide information regarding the new purpose and ask for your consent for the new purpose. Where your consent for the processing of Personal Data is otherwise required by law or contract, we will comply with the law or contract. In other cases, we do not rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you (for example, if we have a different legal basis to process that data).
Opt-Out from Promotional Emails
Top
You can opt-out of receiving promotional emails from us by following the instructions in those emails, or by visiting our
Preference Center
. You can also opt-out of certain categories of emails using
this form
. If you opt-out using any of these tools, we may still send you non-promotional emails, such as certain updates about your account or updates to our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy and/or use of the Services.
Opt-Out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons
Top
We will only use cookies consistent with your cookie settings and permissions granted on our Website. If you permit us to use cookies/web beacons as discussed above (“What Information Does Branch Collect from our Website”), but would like to opt-out:
For dashboard users, visit
https://dashboard.branch.io/account-settings/user
, and toggle off “Cookie Consent”.
For all other users, click on “Cookie Consent” at the bottom right-hand corner of our homepage (
https://branch.io
/
), and click on the opt-out link.
Also, you can choose to set your browser to remove cookies and to reject cookies. To exercise the "Do Not Track" settings available on certain web browsers, please visit the privacy settings of your browser. Where Branch is able to see that such a selection has been made, we will not use information collected from that device to target advertising on that browser. Dashboard users must use the “Cookie Consent” feature to revoke permission to place cookies. Please note that "Do Not Track" is a different privacy mechanism than the Global Privacy Control browser choice referenced below.
Note that, even if you opt out, we may still collect and use non-personal data regarding your activities on our Website. This also does not opt you out of being served advertising altogether; you will continue to receive generic advertisements.
Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website
Top
The Website utilizes tracking tools from vendors, which may enable these vendors to analyze our Website traffic for analytics purposes. Some of these vendors may collect information from this Website for retargeting and interest-based advertising purposes. For more information about these forms of ad targeting and to understand your right to opt-out from these practices, please visit
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
. All of these tools are hosted by the parties who provide them, and your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policies of the parties providing them. These tools include, but are not limited to, those below.
Google
. We may use Google Analytics and Google Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting to collect information regarding visitor behavior and visitor demographics on our Website, and to develop website content. For more information about Google Analytics, please visit
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
. You can opt-out of Google’s collection and processing of data generated by your use of the Website by going to
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
Mixpanel
. We use a service provided by Mixpanel, Inc. (“Mixpanel”) to provide us with analytics data regarding Website Users’ interactions with our Website and Services. You may opt-out of Mixpanel’s automatic retention of data that is collected while using the Services by visiting
https://mixpanel.com/optout/
. To track opt-outs, Mixpanel uses a persistent opt-out cookie placed on your device. Please note that if you get a new computer, install a new browser, erase or otherwise alter the browser’s cookie file (including upgrading certain browsers), you may delete the Mixpanel opt-out cookie.
Facebook
. We may use certain tools offered by Facebook, Inc. (“Facebook”) that enable it to collect or receive information about actions Website Users take on our Website through use of cookies, web beacons and other storage technologies or in order to provide measurement services, targeted ads and other services. For more information regarding the collection and use of such information by Facebook, please see the Facebook Data Policy, available at:
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php
.
Drift
. We use certain tools offered by Drift to power our Website’s live-chat experience. If you provide information about yourself through that live-chat experience, then we may store that information for marketing purposes. Drift may also infer information about the company that you work for you based on your IP address.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website
When does Branch Disclose Information?
Top
In addition to the ways described in our
Terms & Conditions
, applicable Agreements, and this Privacy Policy, Branch may also disclose information to others under the following circumstances:
With vendors, consultants, global partners, and other parties who assist Branch to provide, support, and maintain the Services and the Website and need access to information we collect to do so;
With our Clients and their agents, as described in this Policy;
To other parties (such as advertising networks or vendors used by our Clients), as directed by our Clients;
To comply with laws or to respond to lawful requests and legal process including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements;
To investigate, prevent, or take action regarding suspected, or actual, prohibited activities, including but not limited to fraud and situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person;
To protect the rights and property of Branch, our agents, Clients, Users, Website Users, and others including to enforce our agreements, policies, and Terms & Conditions;
To Branch’s subsidiaries and affiliates as necessary to help us provide, support, and maintain the Services; and
In connection with or during negotiation of any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
Updating Your Information and Contact Preferences
Top
We provide Clients with a mechanism to access, review and update information via the dashboard. If you wish to review or update your information, please visit branch.io and login using the username and password you created. Next, please select “Account Settings”
which can be found in the lower left corner of the dashboard screen, then select the “User” tab near the top. If you would like to delete your account, please email
support@branch.io
.
We Secure the Information We Collect
Top
Securing the information provided by our Clients and collected through our Website is important to us. Branch has implemented industry-standard technical, administrative, and physical safeguards to help protect the information on our servers against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. You are responsible for maintaining the secrecy of your own passwords. If you have reason to believe that your passwords or Personal Data are no longer secure, please promptly notify us at
privacy@branch.io
.
Branch implements technical and organizational measures designed to protect against unauthorized access, accidental loss, destruction or damage of Client’s data. For more information on our security controls, please see
https://www.branch.io/security/
. If you have questions about the security of your personal information, or if you have reason to believe that the personal information that we hold about you is no longer secure, please contact us immediately as described in this Privacy Policy.
Our Data Retention Policy
Top
For our Services:
Branch retains the information collected by the Services for no more time than is needed to serve the legitimate business need for which it was collected. For example, Branch stores the information collected by our Services for the purposes of establishing matches between devices used by Users (see the “What Information Does Branch Collect from our Services?” section above) so long as our systems continue to encounter that User. After that User has been inactive for 30 days (or 90 days for specific attribution products), information collected from that User by our Services for the purposes of establishing matches between devices used by will be deleted unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Usage activity logs of Users, which are used for the purpose of providing reporting and analytics to the Client, are stored in an identifiable form for no more than 14 days (or up to 60 days as determined by the Client or for specific fields), after which these logs are removed or pseudonymized. Any and all pseudonymized usage activity logs are deleted after 12 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Aggregated reporting metrics disclosed to Clients are retained (in aggregate and anonymized form) for up to 24 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Branch may retain information collected by our Services beyond these periods for fraud prevention, analysis, or response, or to protect the safety of Branch, its Clients, Users or the public.
For the Website:
We retain the information collected by the Website for no more time than is needed to serve the legitimate business need for which it was collected. For example, we store Personal Data such as email address or billing details for so long as you continue to have a business relationship with Branch and for a reasonable time thereafter for record-keeping purposes. If applicable to you, you may ask us to delete that information as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below or pursuant to your right of erasure as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below.
Links to Other Websites
Top
The Website and/or Services may contain links to other websites and other websites may reference or link to our Website and/or Services. These other domains and websites are not controlled by Branch, and we do not endorse or make any representations about websites or social media platforms operated by other parties. We encourage you to read the privacy policies of each and every website and application that you interact with. We do not endorse, screen, or approve, and are not responsible for the privacy practices or content of such other websites or applications. Visiting these other websites or applications is at your own risk.
International Data Transfers
Top
All information collected via the Website and Services is stored on servers located in the United States. In the process of providing the Services, we may transfer information across borders from other countries or jurisdictions into the United States. Data protection laws in the United States may differ from your country, and the data Branch processes may be accessible to law enforcement and national security authorities under certain circumstances. By using the Services, each Client and Website User consents to the transfer and processing of information to the U.S. in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Data transfers from the European Union, United Kingdom, and Switzerland are transferred on the basis of legal mechanisms approved by the European Commission and other relevant authorities for cross-border data transfers, such as Standard Contractual Clauses or the Data Privacy Framework mechanism discussed in the “Data Privacy Framework For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States” section below.
Data Privacy Framework For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States
Top
Branch complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) (collectively, “Data Privacy Frameworks”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of Personal Data from European Union member countries (including European Economic Area member countries), the United Kingdom, and Switzerland transferred to the United States pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks. Branch has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Branch has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the policies in this Privacy Policy and data subject rights under the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the applicable Principles (“DPF Principles”) shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification page, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
Branch no longer relies on the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield to transfer data that originated in the EEA or the United Kingdom to the U.S.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Branch’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
Pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks we are obliged to inform EU, UK, and Swiss individuals whose data is being transferred into the United States that we may be required to release Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities including to meet national security and law enforcement requirements.
Branch remains liable for the onward transfer of EU, UK, and Swiss personal data to other parties pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks unless we can prove we were not a party to the actions giving rise to the damages.
We acknowledge the right of EU, UK, and Swiss individuals to access their Personal Data pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals wishing to exercise this right may do so by contacting
privacy@branch.io.
In compliance with the Data Privacy Frameworks, Branch commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information transferred to the United States pursuant to the DPF Principles. European Union, UK, and Swiss individuals with DPF inquiries or complaints should first contact Branch at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
1975 W El Camino Real     Ste. 102
Mountain View, CA 94040
or by email at
privacy@branch.io
Branch has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the DPF Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, Data Privacy Framework Services, operated by JAMS, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit
https://www.jamsadr.com/dpf-dispute-resolution
for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your DPF complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms. See
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/framework- article/ANNEX-I-introduction
.
Your Rights
Top
Under applicable law and depending on your jurisdiction, you may have the right to access, correct, erase and restrict the processing of your personal data. You may also have the right to object to Branch’s processing of your data or exercise other rights, all in accordance with applicable law.
You have the right to lodge complaints about our data processing activities by filing a complaint with our Data Protection Officer who can be reached by the “Contact Us” section below or with a supervisory authority.
California and Certain other U.S. States
Top
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) and applicable privacy laws of other U.S. States provide certain rights to natural persons who are residents of California or such other states. Our privacy notice for California and additional information for other states is available
here
.
Rights of Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
The European General Data Protection Regulation of 2018 (“GDPR”) and equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation (“UK Data Protection Law”) provides certain rights to residents of Europe. Information on how you can exercise rights under the GDPR and UK Data Protection Law are set forth
here
.
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”) provides certain rights to residents of Brazil. Information on how you can exercise rights under the LGPD are set forth
here
.
Our Policy Regarding Children
Top
Services:
The Branch Services are not directed to children. We require that Clients agree to not send to us data relating to any children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 18). If you are a Client and want to learn more about Branch
SDK Privacy Controls
that you can use in your compliance with the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA), GDPR, or any other applicable law, please contact
privacy@branch.io.
If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 18) in violation of applicable law, please contact us at
privacy@branch.io
, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any information that it may have been provided inappropriately as required by law.
Website:
The Branch Website is not directed to children. We do not knowingly collect through the Website Personal Data from anyone under the age of 18. If you are under 18, please do not attempt to register or send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, or email address. No one under 18 may provide any Personal Data to us. In the event that we learn that we have collected any such data from a child under 18 through our Website, we will take reasonable steps to delete that information as quickly as possible. If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 18, please contact us at
privacy@branch.io
,
so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any inappropriately obtained information as required by law.
Contact Us, Questions, Changes to This Privacy Policy
Top
We may change this Privacy Policy at any time at our sole discretion. We will post all changes to this Privacy Policy on this page and will indicate at the top of the page the modified Privacy Policy’s effective date. If you have any questions or suggestions regarding this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
1975 W El Camino Real
Ste. 102
Mountain View, CA 94040, USA
or by email at
info@branch.io
Compliance
Top
This Privacy Policy shall be implemented by Branch and all its operating divisions, subsidiaries and affiliates. Branch has put in place mechanisms to verify ongoing compliance with this Privacy Policy.
Effective December 17th 2024
to
December 31st 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Privacy Policy
The Branch Guiding Privacy Principles
Top
Branch is a deep linking and attribution analytics platform for app and website developers. We are proud of our commitment to providing our services in a privacy-first way. So we thought it would be helpful to lay out, in plain English, the Branch Guiding Privacy Principles that drive how we’ve chosen to design our services with privacy as a top priority. We further describe our privacy practices in the official
Privacy Policy
below this section, but we hope you’ll find this summary of our principles helpful.
We limit the data we collect. We practice data minimization, which means that we take steps to avoid collecting or storing information that we don’t need to provide our services. The personal data that we collect to provide our services is limited to data like advertising identifiers, IP address, and information derived from resettable cookies (the full list is below in our privacy policy). We do not collect or store information such as names, email addresses, physical addresses, or SSNs to provide our services. Nor do we want to. In fact, our
Terms & Conditions
prohibit our customers from providing Branch with any kind of sensitive end-user information.
We will only provide you with data about actual end-user activity on your apps or websites. Customers who subscribe to our linking and analytics platform can only access “earned” cookies or identifiers. This means that an end user must visit a customer’s site before our customer can see the cookie; and an end user must download a customer’s app in order for Branch to collect the end user’s advertising identifier for that customer. In short, the Branch services benefit customers who already have seen an end user across their platforms and want to understand the relationship between those web visits and app sessions.
We do not rent or sell customer end user data. No Branch customer can access another Branch customer’s end-user data. And we are not in the business of renting or selling any customer’s end-user data to anyone else. To enable customers to control their end-user personal data, they can request deletion
here
of that data at any time, whether in bulk or for a specific end user. These controls are available to customers worldwide, although we designed them to comply with the CCPA and GDPR requirements.
Beyond these principles stated above, Branch will continue to find ways to design our services to respect end user privacy. We’re committed to making sure our customers understand how we use data they entrust to us and how they can control it so that they can, in turn, be transparent with their end users.
Introduction
Top
Branch Metrics, Inc. ( "Branch", "us", "our" or "we") offers a linking and analytics platform enabling developers of applications (our "Clients")--whether those applications are websites or "apps," and across different types of devices ("Digital Properties")--to improve their end users’ ("Users") cross-application experiences, and to derive additional insights into how their Users download and utilize those applications. Branch recognizes and believes that data privacy is important to all Internet users, and therefore we design and operate our services in a privacy-first manner.
This Privacy Policy is divided into three parts:
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services: This section explains how Branch collects and uses information about Users in connection with our linking and analytics products and services (the "Branch Services" or the "Services").
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes: This section explains how we collect and use information about our website visitors through our website located at branch.io (the “Website”), which includes the dashboard we provide to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. So, if you are a Client using our Branch dashboard, this section applies to the data we collect from you. It also explains how we collect information about potential Clients from vendors and other sources to enhance our marketing efforts.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website: This section lays out the parts of the Branch Privacy Policy that apply to both the Services and to the Website.
Branch and its Clients have entered into an agreement that governs the provision of Services by Branch and their use by Clients ("Agreement(s)"). Such Agreements may contain obligations on the parties with respect to the handling of information processed in the Services. Nothing in this Privacy Policy derogates from such obligations.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services
What Information Does Branch Collect from Our Services?
Top
Below, we explain what information we collect on behalf of our Clients through the Services, and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
The Branch Services: Overview
Top
Branch provides a variety of Services intended to help Clients understand the use of their Digital Properties by their Users across a wide array of platforms, devices and applications. Branch helps Clients by connecting User interactions across siloed applications (email, SMS, web browsers, social platforms, native applications and others), so that Clients understand the multiple steps that a User took to ultimately complete a transaction with the Client. The Client can use this information to better inform marketing and product decisions as well as to provide improved user experiences by using their knowledge of continuity.
Branch has no direct relationship with Users. Branch’s Services are provided when Branch Clients install on their platforms “Branch Mechanisms” (including links, pixels, direct platform integrations, etc.) that capture User action on behalf of the Client. Using the information collected from these Branch Mechanisms, Branch uses a variety of attribution techniques to connect User actions across different channels and platforms. Some of these attribution techniques include a direct pass-through of identifiers from platform to platform, creating and storing identifiers unique to the Branch platform to connect User actions and identifiers together, and predictive modeling algorithms using real-time and historical data parameters observed from User interactions where there are no shared identifiers available, as well as using historical connections Branch has derived over time using our technology. In some cases, these connections are made without the use of cookies. These techniques help Clients match Users with devices they use, including matching the same User across multiple devices.
The key use cases of Branch’s Services are:
To support Clients in implementing deep linking, which uses Branch’s connection information in real time to improve the User experience. For example, if a User clicks on a link in an email or ad to a specific page in a Client’s app, Branch helps the User get to that page after they download the app.
To report individualized and aggregated analytics metrics about the performance of the Client’s product and marketing initiatives to the Client directly. For example, Branch can tell a Client how many Users that downloaded an app or that went to a specific page in an app came from clicking on a specific link and provide corresponding advertising or other identifiers.
To assist the Client by presenting real time, targeted messaging to their Users depending on past behavior observed across the Client’s tracked platforms with the purpose of driving more engagement to the Client. For example, Branch can use Branch Mechanisms to provide a tailored message like a coupon code or special offer in your website to users who have interacted with your app and/or website in the past.
Branch requires that each Client commit to disclose to Branch only information that it has lawfully obtained (including, where necessary, by obtaining consent from Users), and that it has the right to disclose to Branch. We prohibit Clients from providing us with data relating to children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 18).
Branch collects data through various methods, including:
When the Client integrates Branch’s SDK’s, API’s, pixels, redirect links, JavaScript tags, cookies or similar data collection technologies into their Digital Properties and/or ads;
From the various advertising networks and third parties that are used by the Client in connection with the measurement and analysis of Client’s marketing campaigns and that have partnered with Branch;
When provided voluntarily by the Client as part of the Branch account registration process.
Clients are also required to inform us if they are using Branch’s Services to analyze information protected by HIPAA so that Branch can process such information in a protected environment. In the charts below, we summarize the information collected automatically by the Services.
Information Collected By Branch Links, Pixels, and Similar Technologies
Top
Branch collects the following information from URLs created by the Client (i.e., Branch Links) and pixels placed on Client websites. Branch Links may be embedded into QR Codes as configured by the Client. Some of this information is considered personal data under applicable law (in other words, information that itself may identify a unique individual or can be linked back to an individual) (“Personal Data”). Since Clients have sole control over their Digital Properties and configuration of the Services, Clients are contractually prohibited from configuring the Services to collect directly identifiable personal information , unless otherwise agreed by Branch. If a Client has configured the Services to collect directly identifiable personal information, then Branch may receive and process such data. This includes, for example, a Client using an End User’s email address as a Client issued Developer ID.
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for attribution and to understand general location
Cookie
Standard web cookies, used for device identification and attribution
Link Data
Metadata controlled by the Client, which may be used to interpret the data for reporting, or for analytics
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; used for device identification and attribution
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the webpage from which such ads were displayed, and webpages on Client’s website visited by a User.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their website (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
Information Collected by Branch SDKs
Top
SDKs are Software Development Kits that include code that allows Clients to use the Branch Services. The Branch Mobile App SDKs, Web SDKs, and Over-the-Top (OTT) SDKs collect the following information when Clients use these SDKs in their applications or websites, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
Advertising identifier (e.g., GAID, Android ID, IDFA, IDFV, RIDA)
Used for device identification and attribution
Branch Cookie ID
Used for device identification and attribution
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for device identification, attribution, and to understand general location
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Central Processing Unit (CPU) Type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
System build version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Internet connection type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Application version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device model
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Manufacturer / Brand
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen size (height, width)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen resolution
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile network status (Wi-Fi, etc.)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device locale (country and language)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Local IP address
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile platform
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Branch SDK version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Developer ID
(optional) Client-supplied unique identifier; metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Carrier ID
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Environment
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
UI Mode
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the application page from which such ads were displayed, pages on Client’s application visited by a User, downloads, opt-in status for certain tracking mechanisms, and installations of applications.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their application (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
In addition to the information identified above, the Branch Desktop SDKs collect the following identifiers when Clients use these SDKs in their desktop applications, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
MAC address
Used for device identification and attribution
Windows Advertising ID
Used for device identification and attribution
CPU ID
Used for device identification and attribution
Information Collected By Other Parties
Top
As part of Branch’s Services, Branch’s Clients may direct certain of their vendors or business partners (such as an ad network or vendor) that have partnered with Branch to provide certain Engagement Data to Branch on the Client’s behalf in connection with the measurement and analysis of the Client's marketing campaigns.
How Does Branch Use Information Collected by Our Services?
Top
Subject to Agreements with our Clients, data that Branch collects through the Services is processed to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Services we provide our Clients, including to support other Branch products and services, to perform anti- fraud protection analysis, develop new products and services, and market products or services; to support the products and services of our Clients; and as permitted or required by applicable law.
Where authorized by Agreements with our Clients, we may aggregate and/or de-identify the data we collect through the Services. After data has been aggregated and/or de-identified, Branch cannot use it to personally identify an individual. We may use de-identified and/or aggregated data for any purpose, including without limitation for research and marketing purposes, and may also disclose such data to any other parties, including business partners, Clients, and/or others.
Our Clients’ Use of Information
Top
Our Clients may use the information collected via the Services to improve their Users’ app experiences, customize their Digital Properties to Users, and to better understand their app marketing programs and how Users discover their apps. For example, a User may want to disclose information about a hotel that she found in a travel app to a friend. When that User sends her friend a Branch link to that hotel, after clicking the link the friend is brought directly to the content relating to that hotel within the app, rather than landing on the app’s homepage and having to search for the hotel. The travel app would also gain insights and analytics as to how the content is being disclosed from its app.
We require that our Clients utilize our Services responsibly and in accordance with our
Terms & Conditions
, Agreements, or other contracts with us. Branch is not responsible for the data practices of any of our Clients through the Services or otherwise. Each Client’s practices are subject to each Client’s individual privacy policy. Users should review the privacy policy of each Client to understand how that Client uses User information collected through the Services.
User Choices
Top
Branch recognizes a number of consumer choice mechanisms. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality may be degraded or no longer work as a result if you exercise certain of the opt-outs below.
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer read or set cookies (beyond the opt-out cookie itself). Cookie-based opt outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”). NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt-out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from interest-based advertising by participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
NAI OTT/CTV Opt-Out:
NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt-out of digital advertising data collection on various connected streaming devices to the extent that the device manufacturer will allow. That opt-out is available
here
.
Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt out of the Branch Services on a particular device by submitting a request
here
.
Device Identifiers:
To use your device’s privacy settings controls, please visit the privacy settings menu of your device to review and access the privacy controls made available on the device. Branch will only be able to collect information from the device as permitted by these settings.
Client App Opt-out Controls:
Branch‘s
SDK Privacy Controls
allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data. Clients can flag in the Branch SDK that a particular User’s data should not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Global Privacy Control:
Please note that we also respond to and abide by opt-out preference signals sent through the Global Privacy Control. Any opt out preferences you have exercised through these methods will only apply to the specific device/browser on which you made them. For more information on how to use the Global Privacy Control, see
www.globalprivacycontrol.org
.
Engagement Builder:
Branch's Engagement Builder feature may be used to help Clients conduct re-engagement and re-targeting campaigns. We require that Clients using Branch’s Engagement Builder feature for such purposes respect User opt-out preferences passed to them by Branch.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website
and for Marketing Purposes
What Information Does Branch Collect about Website Visitors and Potential Customers?
Top
Branch collects information from Website visitors (“you” or “Website Users”) located at
www.branch.io
( the “Website”), which includes the dashboard provided to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. The types of information we may collect and our privacy practices depend on the nature of the relationship you have with us and the requirements of applicable law. Below are the legal bases and some of the ways we collect information and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
What We Collect from Clients that Use the Website
Top
Branch collects Personal Data and non-personal data via the Website. For example, when Clients register to use our Services, we ask them to provide us with Personal Data, including first and last name and email address.
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for limited security login controls
Cookie (ours)
Standard web cookie used for dashboard session management
Cookie (other-party)
Other-party web tracking tools used for business intelligence
First, Last Name
Used for team user identification
Work Email
Used as the primary login identifier
Password
Account registration, secure our Services and prevent fraud
Account Holder Primary Role
Account registration, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; may be used for limited security login controls
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for general internal business analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for general internal business analytics
Github ID
(optional) Can be used as a login method
Billing Information
Payment account registration
Log Data
Provide the Services, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners, personalize our experience, secure our Services and prevent fraud, and defend our legal rights and comply with the law
Account holder feedback
Help us improve your experience on the account dashboard
Dashboard Information:
Information we collect from visitors who register for an account on our dashboard includes the following, some of which is considered Personal Data under applicable law:When a Client creates an account and uses the Services, Branch may collect certain log data, such as IP address from which a Client is connecting to the Services, information related to the device being used to connect to the Services (e.g., browser type and version, device type, OS version) and the features and functions of the Services used by the Client (“Log Data”).
We also require Clients to set up a user ID and unique password for account security purposes. Clients must not disclose their passwords to anyone. Clients also have the option of adding other team members to their account. This account information enables us to set up an account for Clients, to provide the Services, and to otherwise manage Client accounts. We may also use this information to notify Clients about updates to our Services and provide them with promotional emails. We offer a mechanism to opt out from promotional emails as described in the “Opt-Out from Promotional Emails” section below.
Account and Billing Information:
To the extent that we charge a fee for the Services, we may also collect limited billing, payment, and contract information from Clients through our payment and contract vendors.
Connection Information with Other Parties:
Some features of the dashboard Services allow you to disclose your information through your accounts to other companies such as Facebook and Google. If you choose to connect Branch to such services provided by other parties, we may collect information related to your use of those services provided by other parties, such as authentication tokens that allow us to connect to your accounts with those other parties. We will ask you for permission before you authorize our collection of this information. We may also collect information about how you are using the Services to interact with those connected services.
Information from Other Sources:
In addition to the information collected through our Website, we or our vendors may obtain and disclose additional information, such as job title or contact information, from other public and non-public sources such as business websites, social networking platforms, or databases maintained by other parties. We use this information to better enable Branch to identify and contact businesses that might be interested in engaging our Services, and to gain a better understanding of a potential Client’s business needs.
Communications with Branch:
Some Website Users may provide Personal Data to Branch by sending us an email or filling out an online form, downloading content that we make available on the Website, or registering for or attending our events, programs, trainings, or contests. Such information we may receive may include contact and professional details about you which you have chosen to share with us including name, email address, phone number, office or other mailing address, and professional data including organization you are affiliated with, your job title, and industry. We use this information to answer your question(s) and process requests, and may store that information for our record keeping, marketing, and advertising purposes.
Research/Survey Solicitations:
From time to time, we may perform research (online and offline) via surveys. We may engage vendors to conduct such surveys on our behalf. All survey responses are voluntary, and the information collected will be used for research and reporting purposes to help us better serve individuals by learning more about their needs and the quality of the products and services we provide. The survey responses may be utilized to determine the effectiveness of our Website, various types of communications, advertising campaigns and/or promotional activities.
Cookies, Pixels and Web Beacons:
We also collect other data via the Website from Website Users, including Website Users employed by or affiliated with Clients, through cookies and/or web beacons. Such information, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law, may include IP address, pages viewed, browser type, Internet browsing and usage habits, how you browse and navigate the Website, Internet Service Provider, domain name, the time/date of your visit to the Website, the referring URL, and your computer’s operating system. For example, we may collect on a real-time basis information on how you use and navigate the Website.
If your browser settings permit the use of cookies and web beacons when you visit and continue to use the Website, we will collect information through those tools. Cookies are small data files stored on your hard drive by a website and web beacons are electronic images that may be used on our Website or in our emails. Cookies help us improve your experience on the Website as well as our marketing activities. We use cookies to see which areas and features are popular and to count visits to our Website. For more information about cookies and web beacons, please visit
https://www.cookiepro.com/knowledgebase/knowledge_categories/cookies- 101/
. For more information about how to opt-out of cookies and web beacons after you have consented to their use, see the “Opt-out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons” section below.
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected?
Top
Branch processes the data described in the section above for the following purposes:
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Website;
to fulfill your and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services;
to send information about the Services including confirmations, invoices, payment processing, technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
to communicate about products and services offered by Branch and Branch's selected partners. We receive opt-in consent to send promotional and marketing messages to Website Users where required by applicable law. You can opt-out of receiving these messages at any time as described below in the section titled: “Opt-out from Promotional Emails”;
to conduct research;
to manage your information and account, to improve and administer our Website, to contact Website Users to answer questions or resolve problems, or to verify your identity;
to conduct research to help us to optimally deliver our existing Services or develop new products, processes and services;
for ad delivery and reporting purposes and to create data and analytics products and services;
to make the Website easier to use by reducing the need for Clients and Website Users to enter information;
for other purposes disclosed to you at the time you provide data to us;
with your consent; or
where Branch otherwise has a legitimate interest in collecting the data, such as direct marketing, individual or market research, product improvement, anti-fraud protection, protecting the safety of us, our Website Users, or other parties, or where required by law.
Opt-Out & Do Not Track - Your Choice Mechanisms
Top
In some cases, we rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you. In those cases, and where you have consented to Branch's processing of your Personal Data in connection with your use of the Website, you may withdraw that consent at any time by following the instructions below. Additionally, before we use Personal Data collected with your consent for any new purpose not originally authorized by you, we will provide information regarding the new purpose and ask for your consent for the new purpose. Where your consent for the processing of Personal Data is otherwise required by law or contract, we will comply with the law or contract. In other cases, we do not rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you (for example, if we have a different legal basis to process that data).
Opt-Out from Promotional Emails
Top
You can opt-out of receiving promotional emails from us by following the instructions in those emails, or by visiting our
Preference Center
. You can also opt-out of certain categories of emails using
this form
. If you opt-out using any of these tools, we may still send you non-promotional emails, such as certain updates about your account or updates to our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy and/or use of the Services.
Opt-Out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons
Top
We will only use cookies consistent with your cookie settings and permissions granted on our Website. If you permit us to use cookies/web beacons as discussed above (“What Information Does Branch Collect from our Website”), but would like to opt-out:
For dashboard users, visit
https://dashboard.branch.io/account-settings/user
, and toggle off “Cookie Consent”.
For all other users, click on “Cookie Consent” at the bottom right-hand corner of our homepage (
https://branch.io
/
), and click on the opt-out link.
Also, you can choose to set your browser to remove cookies and to reject cookies. To exercise the "Do Not Track" settings available on certain web browsers, please visit the privacy settings of your browser. Where Branch is able to see that such a selection has been made, we will not use information collected from that device to target advertising on that browser. Dashboard users must use the “Cookie Consent” feature to revoke permission to place cookies. Please note that "Do Not Track" is a different privacy mechanism than the Global Privacy Control browser choice referenced below.
Note that, even if you opt out, we may still collect and use non-personal data regarding your activities on our Website. This also does not opt you out of being served advertising altogether; you will continue to receive generic advertisements.
Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website
Top
The Website utilizes tracking tools from vendors, which may enable these vendors to analyze our Website traffic for analytics purposes. Some of these vendors may collect information from this Website for retargeting and interest-based advertising purposes. For more information about these forms of ad targeting and to understand your right to opt-out from these practices, please visit
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
. All of these tools are hosted by the parties who provide them, and your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policies of the parties providing them. These tools include, but are not limited to, those below.
Google
. We may use Google Analytics and Google Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting to collect information regarding visitor behavior and visitor demographics on our Website, and to develop website content. For more information about Google Analytics, please visit
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
. You can opt-out of Google’s collection and processing of data generated by your use of the Website by going to
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
Mixpanel
. We use a service provided by Mixpanel, Inc. (“Mixpanel”) to provide us with analytics data regarding Website Users’ interactions with our Website and Services. You may opt-out of Mixpanel’s automatic retention of data that is collected while using the Services by visiting
https://mixpanel.com/optout/
. To track opt-outs, Mixpanel uses a persistent opt-out cookie placed on your device. Please note that if you get a new computer, install a new browser, erase or otherwise alter the browser’s cookie file (including upgrading certain browsers), you may delete the Mixpanel opt-out cookie.
Facebook
. We may use certain tools offered by Facebook, Inc. (“Facebook”) that enable it to collect or receive information about actions Website Users take on our Website through use of cookies, web beacons and other storage technologies or in order to provide measurement services, targeted ads and other services. For more information regarding the collection and use of such information by Facebook, please see the Facebook Data Policy, available at:
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php
.
Drift
. We use certain tools offered by Drift to power our Website’s live-chat experience. If you provide information about yourself through that live-chat experience, then we may store that information for marketing purposes. Drift may also infer information about the company that you work for you based on your IP address.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website
When does Branch Disclose Information?
Top
In addition to the ways described in our
Terms & Conditions
, applicable Agreements, and this Privacy Policy, Branch may also disclose information to others under the following circumstances:
With vendors, consultants, global partners, and other parties who assist Branch to provide, support, and maintain the Services and the Website and need access to information we collect to do so;
With our Clients and their agents, as described in this Policy;
To other parties (such as advertising networks or vendors used by our Clients), as directed by our Clients;
To comply with laws or to respond to lawful requests and legal process including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements;
To investigate, prevent, or take action regarding suspected, or actual, prohibited activities, including but not limited to fraud and situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person;
To protect the rights and property of Branch, our agents, Clients, Users, Website Users, and others including to enforce our agreements, policies, and Terms & Conditions;
To Branch’s subsidiaries and affiliates as necessary to help us provide, support, and maintain the Services; and
In connection with or during negotiation of any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
Updating Your Information and Contact Preferences
Top
We provide Clients with a mechanism to access, review and update information via the dashboard. If you wish to review or update your information, please visit branch.io and login using the username and password you created. Next, please select “Account Settings”
which can be found in the lower left corner of the dashboard screen, then select the “User” tab near the top. If you would like to delete your account, please email
support@branch.io
.
We Secure the Information We Collect
Top
Securing the information provided by our Clients and collected through our Website is important to us. Branch has implemented industry-standard technical, administrative, and physical safeguards to help protect the information on our servers against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. You are responsible for maintaining the secrecy of your own passwords. If you have reason to believe that your passwords or Personal Data are no longer secure, please promptly notify us at
privacy@branch.io
.
Branch implements technical and organizational measures designed to protect against unauthorized access, accidental loss, destruction or damage of Client’s data. For more information on our security controls, please see
https://www.branch.io/security/
. If you have questions about the security of your personal information, or if you have reason to believe that the personal information that we hold about you is no longer secure, please contact us immediately as described in this Privacy Policy.
Our Data Retention Policy
Top
For our Services:
Branch retains the information collected by the Services for no more time than is needed to serve the legitimate business need for which it was collected. For example, Branch stores the information collected by our Services for the purposes of establishing matches between devices used by Users (see the “What Information Does Branch Collect from our Services?” section above) so long as our systems continue to encounter that User. After that User has been inactive for 30 days (or 90 days for specific attribution products), information collected from that User by our Services for the purposes of establishing matches between devices used by will be deleted unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Usage activity logs of Users, which are used for the purpose of providing reporting and analytics to the Client, are stored in an identifiable form for no more than 14 days (or up to 60 days as determined by the Client or for specific fields), after which these logs are removed or pseudonymized. Any and all pseudonymized usage activity logs are deleted after 12 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Aggregated reporting metrics disclosed to Clients are retained (in aggregate and anonymized form) for up to 24 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Branch may retain information collected by our Services beyond these periods for fraud prevention, analysis, or response, or to protect the safety of Branch, its Clients, Users or the public.
For the Website:
We retain the information collected by the Website for no more time than is needed to serve the legitimate business need for which it was collected. For example, we store Personal Data such as email address or billing details for so long as you continue to have a business relationship with Branch and for a reasonable time thereafter for record-keeping purposes. If applicable to you, you may ask us to delete that information as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below or pursuant to your right of erasure as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below.
Links to Other Websites
Top
The Website and/or Services may contain links to other websites and other websites may reference or link to our Website and/or Services. These other domains and websites are not controlled by Branch, and we do not endorse or make any representations about websites or social media platforms operated by other parties. We encourage you to read the privacy policies of each and every website and application that you interact with. We do not endorse, screen, or approve, and are not responsible for the privacy practices or content of such other websites or applications. Visiting these other websites or applications is at your own risk.
International Data Transfers
Top
All information collected via the Website and Services is stored on servers located in the United States. In the process of providing the Services, we may transfer information across borders from other countries or jurisdictions into the United States. Data protection laws in the United States may differ from your country, and the data Branch processes may be accessible to law enforcement and national security authorities under certain circumstances. By using the Services, each Client and Website User consents to the transfer and processing of information to the U.S. in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Data transfers from the European Union, United Kingdom, and Switzerland are transferred on the basis of legal mechanisms approved by the European Commission and other relevant authorities for cross-border data transfers, such as Standard Contractual Clauses or the Data Privacy Framework mechanism discussed in the “Data Privacy Framework For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States” section below.
Data Privacy Framework For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States
Top
Branch complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) (collectively, “Data Privacy Frameworks”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of Personal Data from European Union member countries (including European Economic Area member countries), the United Kingdom, and Switzerland transferred to the United States pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks. Branch has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Branch has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the policies in this Privacy Policy and data subject rights under the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the applicable Principles (“DPF Principles”) shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification page, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
Branch no longer relies on the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield to transfer data that originated in the EEA or the United Kingdom to the U.S.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Branch’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
Pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks we are obliged to inform EU, UK, and Swiss individuals whose data is being transferred into the United States that we may be required to release Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities including to meet national security and law enforcement requirements.
Branch remains liable for the onward transfer of EU, UK, and Swiss personal data to other parties pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks unless we can prove we were not a party to the actions giving rise to the damages.
We acknowledge the right of EU, UK, and Swiss individuals to access their Personal Data pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals wishing to exercise this right may do so by contacting
privacy@branch.io.
In compliance with the Data Privacy Frameworks, Branch commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information transferred to the United States pursuant to the DPF Principles. European Union, UK, and Swiss individuals with DPF inquiries or complaints should first contact Branch at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
1975 W El Camino Real     Ste. 102
Mountain View, CA 94040
or by email at
privacy@branch.io
Branch has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the DPF Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, Data Privacy Framework Services, operated by JAMS, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit
https://www.jamsadr.com/dpf-dispute-resolution
for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your DPF complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms. See
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/framework- article/ANNEX-I-introduction
.
Data Subject Rights
Depending on your jurisdiction.
Top
California Consumer Privacy Act
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) provides certain rights to natural persons who are residents of California. Our CCPA privacy notice is available
here
.
Rights of Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
The European General Data Protection Regulation of 2018 (“GDPR”) and equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation (“UK Data Protection Law”) provides certain rights to residents of Europe. Information on how you can exercise rights under the GDPR and UK Data Protection Law are set forth
here
.
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”) provides certain rights to residents of Brazil. Information on how you can exercise rights under the LGPD are set forth
here
.
Our Policy Regarding Children
Top
Services:
The Branch Services are not directed to children. We require that Clients agree to not send to us data relating to any children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 18). If you are a Client and want to learn more about Branch
SDK Privacy Controls
that you can use in your compliance with the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA), GDPR, or any other applicable law, please contact
privacy@branch.io.
If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 18) in violation of applicable law, please contact us at
privacy@branch.io
, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any information that it may have been provided inappropriately as required by law.
Website:
The Branch Website is not directed to children. We do not knowingly collect through the Website Personal Data from anyone under the age of 18. If you are under 18, please do not attempt to register or send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, or email address. No one under 18 may provide any Personal Data to us. In the event that we learn that we have collected any such data from a child under 18 through our Website, we will take reasonable steps to delete that information as quickly as possible. If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 18, please contact us at
privacy@branch.io
,
so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any inappropriately obtained information as required by law.
Contact Us, Questions, Changes to This Privacy Policy
Top
We may change this Privacy Policy at any time at our sole discretion. We will post all changes to this Privacy Policy on this page and will indicate at the top of the page the modified Privacy Policy’s effective date. If you have any questions or suggestions regarding this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
1975 W El Camino Real
Ste. 102
Mountain View, CA 94040, USA
or by email at
info@branch.io
Compliance
Top
This Privacy Policy shall be implemented by Branch and all its operating divisions, subsidiaries and affiliates. Branch has put in place mechanisms to verify ongoing compliance with this Privacy Policy.
Effective October 1st 2024
to
December 17th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Privacy Policy
The Branch Guiding Privacy Principles
Top
Branch is a deep linking and attribution analytics platform for app and website developers. We are proud of our commitment to providing our services in a privacy-first way. So we thought it would be helpful to lay out, in plain English, the Branch Guiding Privacy Principles that drive how we’ve chosen to design our services with privacy as a top priority. We further describe our privacy practices in the official
Privacy Policy
below this section, but we hope you’ll find this summary of our principles helpful.
We limit the data we collect. We practice data minimization, which means that we take steps to avoid collecting or storing information that we don’t need to provide our services. The personal data that we collect to provide our services is limited to data like advertising identifiers, IP address, and information derived from resettable cookies (the full list is below in our privacy policy). We do not collect or store information such as names, email addresses, physical addresses, or SSNs to provide our services. Nor do we want to. In fact, our
Terms & Conditions
prohibit our customers from providing Branch with any kind of sensitive end-user information.
We will only provide you with data about actual end-user activity on your apps or websites. Customers who subscribe to our linking and analytics platform can only access “earned” cookies or identifiers. This means that an end user must visit a customer’s site before our customer can see the cookie; and an end user must download a customer’s app in order for Branch to collect the end user’s advertising identifier for that customer. In short, the Branch services benefit customers who already have seen an end user across their platforms and want to understand the relationship between those web visits and app sessions.
We do not rent or sell customer end user data. No Branch customer can access another Branch customer’s end-user data. And we are not in the business of renting or selling any customer’s end-user data to anyone else. To enable customers to control their end-user personal data, they can request deletion
here
of that data at any time, whether in bulk or for a specific end user. These controls are available to customers worldwide, although we designed them to comply with the CCPA and GDPR requirements.
Beyond these principles stated above, Branch will continue to find ways to design our services to respect end user privacy. We’re committed to making sure our customers understand how we use data they entrust to us and how they can control it so that they can, in turn, be transparent with their end users.
Introduction
Top
Branch Metrics, Inc. ( "Branch", "us", "our" or "we") offers a linking and analytics platform enabling developers of applications (our "Clients")--whether those applications are websites or "apps," and across different types of devices ("Digital Properties")--to improve their end users’ ("Users") cross-application experiences, and to derive additional insights into how their Users download and utilize those applications. Branch recognizes and believes that data privacy is important to all Internet users, and therefore we design and operate our services in a privacy-first manner.
This Privacy Policy is divided into three parts:
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services: This section explains how Branch collects and uses information about Users in connection with our linking and analytics products and services (the "Branch Services" or the "Services").
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes: This section explains how we collect and use information about our website visitors through our website located at branch.io (the “Website”), which includes the dashboard we provide to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. So, if you are a Client using our Branch dashboard, this section applies to the data we collect from you. It also explains how we collect information about potential Clients from vendors and other sources to enhance our marketing efforts.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website: This section lays out the parts of the Branch Privacy Policy that apply to both the Services and to the Website.
Branch and its Clients have entered into an agreement that governs the provision of Services by Branch and their use by Clients ("Agreement(s)"). Such Agreements may contain obligations on the parties with respect to the handling of information processed in the Services. Nothing in this Privacy Policy derogates from such obligations.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services
What Information Does Branch Collect from Our Services?
Top
Below, we explain what information we collect on behalf of our Clients through the Services, and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
The Branch Services: Overview
Top
Branch provides a variety of Services intended to help Clients understand the use of their Digital Properties by their Users across a wide array of platforms, devices and applications. Branch helps Clients by connecting User interactions across siloed applications (email, SMS, web browsers, social platforms, native applications and others), so that Clients understand the multiple steps that a User took to ultimately complete a transaction with the Client. The Client can use this information to better inform marketing and product decisions as well as to provide improved user experiences by using their knowledge of continuity.
Branch has no direct relationship with Users. Branch’s Services are provided when Branch Clients install on their platforms “Branch Mechanisms” (including links, pixels, direct platform integrations, etc.) that capture User action on behalf of the Client. Using the information collected from these Branch Mechanisms, Branch uses a variety of attribution techniques to connect User actions across different channels and platforms. Some of these attribution techniques include a direct pass-through of identifiers from platform to platform, creating and storing identifiers unique to the Branch platform to connect User actions and identifiers together, and predictive modeling algorithms using real-time and historical data parameters observed from User interactions where there are no shared identifiers available, as well as using historical connections Branch has derived over time using our technology. In some cases, these connections are made without the use of cookies. These techniques help Clients match Users with devices they use, including matching the same User across multiple devices.
The key use cases of Branch’s Services are:
To support Clients in implementing deep linking, which uses Branch’s connection information in real time to improve the User experience. For example, if a User clicks on a link in an email or ad to a specific page in a Client’s app, Branch helps the User get to that page after they download the app.
To report individualized and aggregated analytics metrics about the performance of the Client’s product and marketing initiatives to the Client directly. For example, Branch can tell a Client how many Users that downloaded an app or that went to a specific page in an app came from clicking on a specific link and provide corresponding advertising or other identifiers.
To assist the Client by presenting real time, targeted messaging to their Users depending on past behavior observed across the Client’s tracked platforms with the purpose of driving more engagement to the Client. For example, Branch can use Branch Mechanisms to provide a tailored message like a coupon code or special offer in your website to users who have interacted with your app and/or website in the past.
Branch requires that each Client commit to disclose to Branch only information that it has lawfully obtained (including, where necessary, by obtaining consent from Users), and that it has the right to disclose to Branch. We prohibit Clients from providing us with data relating to children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16).
Branch collects data through various methods, including:
When the Client integrates Branch’s SDK’s, API’s, pixels, redirect links, JavaScript tags, cookies or similar data collection technologies into their Digital Properties and/or ads;
From the various advertising networks and third parties that are used by the Client in connection with the measurement and analysis of Client’s marketing campaigns and that have partnered with Branch;
When provided voluntarily by the Client as part of the Branch account registration process.
Clients are also required to inform us if they are using Branch’s services to analyze information protected by HIPAA so that Branch can process such information in a protected environment.
In the charts below, we summarize the information collected automatically by the Services.
Information Collected By Branch Links, Pixels
,
and Similar Technologies
Top
Branch collects the following information from URLs created by the Client (i.e., Branch Links) and pixels placed on Client websites. Branch Links may be embedded into QR Codes as configured by the Client. Some of this information is considered personal data under applicable law (in other words, information that itself may identify a unique individual or can be linked back to an individual) (“Personal Data”). Since Clients have sole control over their Digital Properties and configuration of the Services, Clients are contractually prohibited from configuring the Services to collect directly identifiable personal information , unless otherwise agreed by Branch. If a Client has configured the Services to collect directly identifiable personal information, then Branch may receive and process such data. This includes, for example, a Client using an End User’s email address as a Client issued Developer ID.
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for attribution and to understand general location
Cookie
Standard web cookies, used for device identification and attribution
Link Data
Metadata controlled by the Client, which may be used to interpret the data for reporting, or for analytics
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; used for device identification and attribution
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the webpage from which such ads were displayed, and webpages on Client’s website visited by a User.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their website (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
Information Collected by Branch SDKs
Top
SDKs are Software Development Kits that include code that allows Clients to use the Branch Services. The Branch Mobile App SDKs, Web SDKs, and Over-the-Top (OTT) SDKs collect the following information when Clients use these SDKs in their applications or websites, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
Advertising identifier (e.g., GAID, Android ID, IDFA, IDFV, RIDA)
Used for device identification and attribution
Branch Cookie ID
Used for device identification and attribution
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for device identification, attribution, and to understand general location
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Central Processing Unit (CPU) Type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
System build version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Internet connection type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Application version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device model
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Manufacturer / Brand
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen size (height, width)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen resolution
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile network status (Wi-Fi, etc.)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device locale (country and language)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Local IP address
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile platform
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Branch SDK version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Developer ID
(optional) Client-supplied unique identifier; metadata feature Used for device identification and attribution
Carrier ID
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Environment
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
UI Mode
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the application page from which such ads were displayed, pages on Client’s application visited by a User, downloads, opt-in status for certain tracking mechanisms, and installations of applications.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their application (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
In addition to the information identified above, the Branch Desktop SDKs collect the following identifiers when Clients use these SDKs in their desktop applications, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
MAC address
Used for device identification and attribution
Windows Advertising ID
Used for device identification and attribution
CPU ID
Used for device identification and attribution
Information Collected By Other Parties
Top
As part of Branch’s Services, Branch’s Clients may direct certain of their vendors or business partners (such as an ad network or vendor) that have partnered with Branch to provide certain Engagement Data to Branch on the Client’s behalf in connection with the measurement and analysis of the Client's marketing campaigns.
How Does Branch Use Information Collected by Our Services?
Top
Subject to Agreements with our Clients, data that Branch collects through the Services is processed to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Services we provide our Clients, including to support other Branch products and services, to perform anti-fraud protection analysis, develop new products and services, and market products or services; to support the products and services of our Clients; and as permitted or required by applicable law.
Where authorized by Agreements with our Clients, we may aggregate and/or de-identify the data we collect through the Services. After data has been aggregated and/or de-identified, Branch cannot use it to personally identify an individual. We may use de-identified and/or aggregated data for any purpose, including without limitation for research and marketing purposes, and may also disclose such data to any other parties, including business partners, Clients, and/or others.
Our Clients’ Use of Information
Top
Our Clients may use the information collected via the Services to improve their Users’ app experiences, customize their Digital Properties to Users, and to better understand their app marketing programs and how Users discover their apps. For example, a User may want to disclose information about a hotel that she found in a travel app to a friend. When that User sends her friend a Branch link to that hotel, after clicking the link the friend is brought directly to the content relating to that hotel within the app, rather than landing on the app’s homepage and having to search for the hotel. The travel app would also gain insights and analytics as to how the content is being disclosed from its app.
We require that our Clients utilize our Services responsibly and in accordance with our
Terms & Conditions
, Agreements, or other contracts with us. Branch is not responsible for the data practices of any of our Clients through the Services or otherwise. Each Client’s practices are subject to each Client’s individual privacy policy. Users should review the privacy policy of each Client to understand how that Client uses User information collected through the Services.
User Choices
Top
Branch recognizes a number of consumer choice mechanisms. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality may be degraded or no longer work as a result if you exercise certain of the opt-outs below.
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer read or set cookies (beyond the opt-out cookie itself). Cookie-based opt outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”) and adheres to its Code of Conduct. NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from interest-based advertising by participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt out of the Branch Services on a particular device by submitting a request
here
.
Device Identifiers:
To use your device’s privacy settings controls, please visit the privacy settings menu of your device to review and access the privacy controls made available on the device. Branch will only be able to collect information from the device as permitted by these settings.
Client App Opt-out Controls:
Branch‘s
SDK Privacy Controls
allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data. Clients can flag in the Branch SDK that a particular User’s data should not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Engagement Builder:
Branch's Engagement Builder feature may be used to help Clients conduct re-engagement and re-targeting campaigns. We require that Clients using Branch’s Engagement Builder feature for such purposes respect User opt-out preferences passed to them by Branch.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes
What Information Does Branch Collect about Website Visitors and Potential Customers?
Top
Branch collects information from Website visitors (“you” or “Website Users”) located at www.branch.io ( the “Website”), which includes the dashboard provided to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. The types of information we may collect and our privacy practices depend on the nature of the relationship you have with us and the requirements of applicable law. Below are the legal bases and some of the ways we collect information and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
What We Collect from Clients that Use the Website
Top
Branch collects Personal Data and non-personal data via the Website. For example, when Clients register to use our Services, we ask them to provide us with Personal Data, including first and last name and email address.
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for limited security login controls
Cookie (ours)
Standard web cookie used for dashboard session management
Cookie (other-party)
Other-party web tracking tools used for business intelligence
First, Last Name
Used for team user identification
Work Email
Used as the primary login identifier
Password
Account registration, secure our Services and prevent fraud
Account Holder Primary Role
Account registration, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; may be used for limited security login controls
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for general internal business analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for general internal business analytics
Github ID
(optional) Can be used as a login method
Billing information
Payment account registration
Log Data
Provide the Services, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners, personalize our experience, secure our Services and prevent fraud, and defend our legal rights and comply with the law
Account holder feedback
Help us improve your experience on the account dashboard
Dashboard Information:
Information we collect from visitors who register for an account on our dashboard includes the following, some of which is considered Personal Data under applicable law:When a Client creates an account and uses the Services, Branch may collect certain log data, such as IP address from which a Client is connecting to the Services, information related to the device being used to connect to the Services (e.g., browser type and version, device type, OS version) and the features and functions of the Services used by the Client (“Log Data”).
We also require Clients to set up a user ID and unique password for account security purposes. Clients must not disclose their passwords to anyone. Clients also have the option of adding other team members to their account. This account information enables us to set up an account for Clients, to provide the Services, and to otherwise manage Client accounts. We may also use this information to notify Clients about updates to our Services and provide them with promotional emails. We offer a mechanism to opt out from promotional emails as described in the “Opt-Out from Promotional Emails” section below.
Account and Billing Information:
To the extent that we charge a fee for the Services, we may also collect limited billing, payment, and contract information from Clients through our payment and contract vendors.
Connection Information with Other Parties:
Some features of the dashboard Services allow you to disclose your information through your accounts to other companies such as Facebook and Google. If you choose to connect Branch to such services provided by other parties, we may collect information related to your use of those services provided by other parties, such as authentication tokens that allow us to connect to your accounts with those other parties. We will ask you for permission before you authorize our collection of this information. We may also collect information about how you are using the Services to interact with those connected services.
Information from Other Sources:
In addition to the information collected through our Website, we or our vendors may obtain and disclose additional information, such as job title or contact information, from other public and non-public sources such as business websites, social networking platforms, or databases maintained by other parties. We use this information to better enable Branch to identify and contact businesses that might be interested in engaging our Services, and to gain a better understanding of a potential Client’s business needs.
Communications with Branch:
Some Website Users may provide Personal Data to Branch by sending us an email or filling out an online form on the Website. We use this information to answer their question(s), and may store that information for our record keeping, marketing, and advertising purposes.
Research/Survey Solicitations:
From time to time, we may perform research (online and offline) via surveys. We may engage vendors to conduct such surveys on our behalf. All survey responses are voluntary, and the information collected will be used for research and reporting purposes to help us better serve individuals by learning more about their needs and the quality of the products and services we provide. The survey responses may be utilized to determine the effectiveness of our Website, various types of communications, advertising campaigns and/or promotional activities.
Cookies, Pixels and Web Beacons:
We also collect other data via the Website from Website Users, including Website Users employed by or affiliated with Clients, through cookies and/or web beacons. Such information, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law, may include IP address, pages viewed, browser type, Internet browsing and usage habits, how you browse and navigate the Website, Internet Service Provider, domain name, the time/date of your visit to the Website, the referring URL, and your computer’s operating system. For example, we may collect on a real-time basis information on how you use and navigate the Website.
If your browser settings permit the use of cookies and web beacons when you visit and continue to use the Website, we will collect information through those tools. Cookies are small data files stored on your hard drive by a website and web beacons are electronic images that may be used on our Website or in our emails. Cookies help us improve your experience on the Website as well as our marketing activities. We use cookies to see which areas and features are popular and to count visits to our Website. For more information about cookies and web beacons, please visit
https://www.cookiepro.com/knowledgebase/knowledge_categories/cookies-101/
. For more information about how to opt-out of cookies and web beacons after you have consented to their use, see the “Opt-out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons” section below.
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected?
Top
Branch processes the data described in the section above for the following purposes:
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Website;
to fulfill your and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services;
to send information about the Services including confirmations, invoices, payment processing, technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
to communicate about products and services offered by Branch and Branch's selected partners. We receive opt-in consent to send promotional and marketing messages to Website Users where required by applicable law. You can opt-out of receiving these messages at any time as described below in the section titled: “Opt-out from Promotional Emails”;
to conduct research;
to manage your information and account, to improve and administer our Website, to contact Website Users to answer questions or resolve problems, or to verify your identity;
to conduct research to help us to optimally deliver our existing Services or develop new products, processes and services;
for ad delivery and reporting purposes and to create data and analytics products and services;
to make the Website easier to use by reducing the need for Clients and Website Users to enter information;
for other purposes disclosed to you at the time you provide data to us;
with your consent; or
where Branch otherwise has a legitimate interest in collecting the data, such as direct marketing, individual or market research, product improvement, anti-fraud protection, protecting the safety of us, our Website Users, or other parties, or where required by law.
Opt-Out & Do Not Track - Your Choice Mechanisms
Top
In some cases, we rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you. In those cases, and where you have consented to Branch's processing of your Personal Data in connection with your use of the Website, you may withdraw that consent at any time by following the instructions below. Additionally, before we use Personal Data collected with your consent for any new purpose not originally authorized by you, we will provide information regarding the new purpose and ask for your consent for the new purpose. Where your consent for the processing of Personal Data is otherwise required by law or contract, we will comply with the law or contract. In other cases, we do not rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you (for example, if we have a different legal basis to process that data).
Opt Out from Promotional Emails
Top
You can opt-out of receiving promotional emails from us by following the instructions in those emails, or by filling out
this form
. You can also opt-out of certain categories of emails using
this form
. If you opt-out using any of these tools, we may still send you non-promotional emails, such as certain updates about your account or updates to our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy and/or use of the Services.
Opt Out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons
Top
We will only use cookies consistent with your cookie settings and permissions granted on our Website. If you permit us to use cookies/web beacons as discussed above (“What Information Does Branch Collect from our Website”), but would like to opt-out:
For dashboard users, visit
https://dashboard.branch.io/account-settings/user
, and toggle off “Cookie Consent”.
For all other users, click on “Cookie Consent” at the bottom right-hand corner of our homepage (
https://branch.io/
), and click on the opt-out link.
Also, you can choose to set your browser to remove cookies and to reject cookies. To exercise the "Do Not Track" settings available on certain web browsers, please visit the privacy settings of your browser. Where Branch is able to see that such a selection has been made, we will not use information collected from that device to target advertising on that browser. Dashboard users must use the “Cookie Consent” feature to revoke permission to place cookies. Please note that "Do Not Track" is a different privacy mechanism than the Global Privacy Control browser choice referenced below.
Note that, even if you opt out, we may still collect and use non-personal data regarding your activities on our Website. This also does not opt you out of being served advertising altogether; you will continue to receive generic advertisements.
Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website
Top
The Website utilizes tracking tools from vendors, which may enable these vendors to analyze our Website traffic for analytics purposes. Some of these vendors may collect information from this Website for retargeting and interest-based advertising purposes. For more information about these forms of ad targeting and to understand your right to opt-out from these practices, please visit
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
. All of these tools are hosted by the parties who provide them, and your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policies of the parties providing them. These tools include, but are not limited to, those below.
Google
. We may use Google Analytics and Google Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting to collect information regarding visitor behavior and visitor demographics on our Website, and to develop website content. For more information about Google Analytics, please visit
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
. You can opt-out of Google’s collection and processing of data generated by your use of the Website by going to
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
Mixpanel
. We use a service provided by Mixpanel, Inc. (“Mixpanel”) to provide us with analytics data regarding Website Users’ interactions with our Website and Services. You may opt-out of Mixpanel’s automatic retention of data that is collected while using the Services by visiting
https://mixpanel.com/optout/
. To track opt-outs, Mixpanel uses a persistent opt-out cookie placed on your device. Please note that if you get a new computer, install a new browser, erase or otherwise alter the browser’s cookie file (including upgrading certain browsers), you may delete the Mixpanel opt-out cookie.
Facebook
. We may use certain tools offered by Facebook, Inc. (“Facebook”) that enable it to collect or receive information about actions Website Users take on our Website through use of cookies, web beacons and other storage technologies or in order to provide measurement services, targeted ads and other services. For more information regarding the collection and use of such information by Facebook, please see the Facebook Data Policy, available at:
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php
.
Drift
. We use certain tools offered by Drift to power our Website’s live-chat experience. If you provide information about yourself through that live-chat experience, then we may store that information for marketing purposes. Drift may also infer information about the company that you work for you based on your IP address.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website
When does Branch Disclose Information?
Top
In addition to the ways described in our
Terms & Conditions
, applicable Agreements, and this Privacy Policy, Branch may also disclose information to others under the following circumstances:
With vendors, consultants, global partners, and other parties who assist Branch to provide, support, and maintain the Services and the Website and need access to information we collect to do so;
With our Clients and their agents, as described in this Policy;
To other parties (such as advertising networks or vendors used by our Clients), as directed by our Clients;
To comply with laws or to respond to lawful requests and legal process including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements;
To investigate, prevent, or take action regarding suspected, or actual, prohibited activities, including but not limited to fraud and situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person;
To protect the rights and property of Branch, our agents, Clients, Users, Website Users, and others including to enforce our agreements, policies, and Terms & Conditions;
To Branch’s subsidiaries and affiliates as necessary to help us provide, support, and maintain the Services; and
In connection with or during negotiation of any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
Updating Your Information and Contact Preferences
Top
We provide Clients with a mechanism to access, review and update information via the dashboard. If you wish to review or update your information, please visit branch.io and login using the username and password you created. Next, please select “Account Settings” which can be found in the lower left corner of the dashboard screen, then select the “User” tab near the top. If you would like to delete your account, please email
support@branch.io
.
We Secure the Information We Collect
Top
Securing the information provided by our Clients and collected through our Website is important to us. Branch has implemented industry-standard technical, administrative, and physical safeguards to help protect the information on our servers against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. You are responsible for maintaining the secrecy of your own passwords. If you have reason to believe that your passwords or Personal Data are no longer secure, please promptly notify us at
privacy@branch.io
.
Branch implements technical and organizational measures designed to protect against unauthorized access, accidental loss, destruction or damage of Client’s data. For more information on our security controls, please see
https://www.branch.io/security/
. If you have questions about the security of your personal information, or if you have reason to believe that the personal information that we hold about you is no longer secure, please contact us immediately as described in this Privacy Policy.
Our Data Retention Policy
Top
For our Services:
Branch retains the information collected by the Services for no more time than is needed to serve the legitimate business need for which it was collected. For example, Branch stores the information collected by our Services for the purposes of establishing matches between devices used by Users (see the “What Information Does Branch Collect from our Services?” section above) so long as our systems continue to encounter that User. After that User has been inactive for 30 days (or 90 days for specific attribution products), information collected from that User by our Services for the purposes of establishing matches between devices used by will be deleted unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Usage activity logs of Users, which are used for the purpose of providing reporting and analytics to the Client, are stored in an identifiable form for no more than 14 days (or up to 60 days as determined by the Client or for specific fields), after which these logs are removed or pseudonymized. Any and all pseudonymized usage activity logs are deleted after 12 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Aggregated reporting metrics disclosed to Clients are retained (in aggregate and anonymized form) for up to 24 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Branch may retain information collected by our Services beyond these periods for fraud prevention, analysis, or response, or to protect the safety of Branch, its Clients, Users or the public.
For the Website:
We retain the information collected by the Website for no more time than is needed to serve the legitimate business need for which it was collected. For example, we store Personal Data such as email address or billing details for so long as you continue to have a business relationship with Branch and for a reasonable time thereafter for record-keeping purposes. If applicable to you, you may ask us to delete that information as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below or pursuant to your right of erasure as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below.
Links to Other Websites
Top
The Website and/or Services may contain links to other websites and other websites may reference or link to our Website and/or Services. These other domains and websites are not controlled by Branch, and we do not endorse or make any representations about websites or social media platforms operated by other parties. We encourage you to read the privacy policies of each and every website and application that you interact with. We do not endorse, screen, or approve, and are not responsible for the privacy practices or content of such other websites or applications. Visiting these other websites or applications is at your own risk.
International Data Transfers
Top
All information collected via the Website and Services is stored on servers located in the United States. In the process of providing the Services, we may transfer information across borders from other countries or jurisdictions into the United States. Data protection laws in the United States may differ from your country, and the data Branch processes may be accessible to law enforcement and national security authorities under certain circumstances. By using the Services, each Client and Website User consents to the transfer and processing of information to the U.S. in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Data transfers from the European Union, United Kingdom, and Switzerland are transferred on the basis of legal mechanisms approved by the European Commission and other relevant authorities for cross-border data transfers, such as Standard Contractual Clauses or the Data Privacy Framework mechanism discussed in the “Data Privacy Framework For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States” section below.
Data Privacy Framework For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States
Top
Branch complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) (collectively, “Data Privacy Frameworks”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of Personal Data from European Union member countries (including European Economic Area member countries), the United Kingdom, and Switzerland transferred to the United States pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks. Branch has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Branch has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the policies in this Privacy Policy and data subject rights under the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the applicable Principles (“DPF Principles”) shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification page, please visit https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/.
Branch no longer relies on the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield to transfer data that originated in the EEA or the United Kingdom to the U.S.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Branch’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
Pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks we are obliged to inform EU, UK, and Swiss individuals whose data is being transferred into the United States that we may be required to release Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities including to meet national security and law enforcement requirements.
Branch remains liable for the onward transfer of EU, UK, and Swiss personal data to other parties pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks unless we can prove we were not a party to the actions giving rise to the damages.
We acknowledge the right of EU, UK, and Swiss individuals to access their Personal Data pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals wishing to exercise this right may do so by contacting privacy@branch.io.
In compliance with the Data Privacy Frameworks, Branch commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information transferred to the United States pursuant to the DPF Principles. European Union, UK, and Swiss individuals with DPF inquiries or complaints should first contact Branch at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
privacy@branch.io
Branch has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the DPF Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, Data Privacy Framework Services, operated by JAMS, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit https://www.jamsadr.com/dpf-dispute-resolution for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your DPF complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms. See https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/framework-article/ANNEX-I-introduction.
Data Subject Rights
Top
California Consumer Privacy Act
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) provides certain rights to natural persons who are residents of California. Our CCPA privacy notice is available
here
.
Rights of Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
The European General Data Protection Regulation of 2018 (“GDPR”) and equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation (“UK Data Protection Law”) provides certain rights to residents of Europe. Information on how you can exercise rights under the GDPR and UK Data Protection Law are set forth
here
.
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”) provides certain rights to residents of Brazil. Information on how you can exercise rights under the LGPD are set forth
here
.
Our Policy Regarding Children
Top
Services
: The Branch Services are not directed to children. We require that Clients agree to not send to us data relating to any children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16). If you are a Client and want to learn more about Branch
SDK Privacy Controls
that you can use in your compliance with the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA), GDPR, or any other applicable law, please contact privacy@branch.io.
If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16) in violation of applicable law, please contact us at
privacy@branch.io
, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any information that it may have been provided inappropriately as required by law.
Website
: The Branch Website is not directed to children. We do not knowingly collect through the Website Personal Data from anyone under the age of 16. If you are under 16, please do not attempt to register or send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, or email address. No one under 16 may provide any Personal Data to us. In the event that we learn that we have collected any such data from a child under 16 through our Website, we will take reasonable steps to delete that information as quickly as possible. If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 16, please contact us at privacy@branch.io, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any inappropriately obtained information as required by law.
Contact Us, Questions, Changes to This Privacy Policy
Top
We may change this Privacy Policy at any time in our sole discretion. We will post all changes to this Privacy Policy on this page and will indicate at the top of the page the modified Privacy Policy’s effective date. If you have any questions or suggestions regarding this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
info@branch.io
Compliance
Top
This Privacy Policy shall be implemented by Branch and all its operating divisions, subsidiaries and affiliates. Branch has put in place mechanisms to verify ongoing compliance with this Privacy Policy.
Effective September 16th 2024
to
October 1st 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Privacy Policy
The Branch Guiding Privacy Principles
Top
Branch is a deep linking and attribution analytics platform for app and website developers. We are proud of our commitment to providing our services in a privacy-first way. So we thought it would be helpful to lay out, in plain English, the Branch Guiding Privacy Principles that drive how we’ve chosen to design our services with privacy as a top priority. We further describe our privacy practices in the official
Privacy Policy
below this section, but we hope you’ll find this summary of our principles helpful.
We limit the data we collect. We practice data minimization, which means that we take steps to avoid collecting or storing information that we don’t need to provide our services. The personal data that we collect to provide our services is limited to data like advertising identifiers, IP address, and information derived from resettable cookies (the full list is below in our privacy policy). We do not collect or store information such as names, email addresses, physical addresses, or SSNs to provide our services. Nor do we want to. In fact, our
Terms & Conditions
prohibit our customers from providing Branch with any kind of sensitive end-user information.
We will only provide you with data about actual end-user activity on your apps or websites. Customers who subscribe to our linking and analytics platform can only access “earned” cookies or identifiers. This means that an end user must visit a customer’s site before our customer can see the cookie; and an end user must download a customer’s app in order for Branch to collect the end user’s advertising identifier for that customer. In short, the Branch services benefit customers who already have seen an end user across their platforms and want to understand the relationship between those web visits and app sessions.
We do not rent or sell customer end user data. No Branch customer can access another Branch customer’s end-user data. And we are not in the business of renting or selling any customer’s end-user data to anyone else. To enable customers to control their end-user personal data, they can request deletion
here
of that data at any time, whether in bulk or for a specific end user. These controls are available to customers worldwide, although we designed them to comply with the CCPA and GDPR requirements.
Beyond these principles stated above, Branch will continue to find ways to design our services to respect end user privacy. We’re committed to making sure our customers understand how we use data they entrust to us and how they can control it so that they can, in turn, be transparent with their end users.
Introduction
Top
Branch Metrics, Inc. ( "Branch", "us", "our" or "we") offers a linking and analytics platform enabling developers of applications (our "Clients")--whether those applications are websites or "apps," and across different types of devices ("Digital Properties")--to improve their end users’ ("Users") cross-application experiences, and to derive additional insights into how their Users download and utilize those applications. Branch recognizes and believes that data privacy is important to all Internet users, and therefore we design and operate our services in a privacy-first manner.
This Privacy Policy is divided into three parts:
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services: This section explains how Branch collects and uses information about Users in connection with our linking and analytics products and services (the "Branch Services" or the "Services").
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes: This section explains how we collect and use information about our website visitors through our website located at branch.io (the “Website”), which includes the dashboard we provide to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. So, if you are a Client using our Branch dashboard, this section applies to the data we collect from you. It also explains how we collect information about potential Clients from vendors and other sources to enhance our marketing efforts.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website: This section lays out the parts of the Branch Privacy Policy that apply to both the Services and to the Website.
Branch and its Clients have entered into an agreement that governs the provision of Services by Branch and their use by Clients ("Agreement(s)"). Such Agreements may contain obligations on the parties with respect to the handling of information processed in the Services. Nothing in this Privacy Policy derogates from such obligations.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services
What Information Does Branch Collect from Our Services?
Top
Below, we explain what information we collect on behalf of our Clients through the Services, and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
The Branch Services: Overview
Top
Branch provides a variety of Services intended to help Clients understand the use of their Digital Properties by their Users across a wide array of platforms, devices and applications. Branch helps Clients by connecting User interactions across siloed applications (email, SMS, web browsers, social platforms, native applications and others), so that Clients understand the multiple steps that a User took to ultimately complete a transaction with the Client. The Client can use this information to better inform marketing and product decisions as well as to provide improved user experiences by using their knowledge of continuity.
Branch has no direct relationship with Users. Branch’s Services are provided when Branch Clients install on their platforms “Branch Mechanisms” (including links, pixels, direct platform integrations, etc.) that capture User action on behalf of the Client. Using the information collected from these Branch Mechanisms, Branch uses a variety of attribution techniques to connect User actions across different channels and platforms. Some of these attribution techniques include a direct pass-through of identifiers from platform to platform, creating and storing identifiers unique to the Branch platform to connect User actions and identifiers together, and predictive modeling algorithms using real-time and historical data parameters observed from User interactions where there are no shared identifiers available, as well as using historical connections Branch has derived over time using our technology. In some cases, these connections are made without the use of cookies. These techniques help Clients match Users with devices they use, including matching the same User across multiple devices.
The key use cases of Branch’s Services are:
To support Clients in implementing deep linking, which uses Branch’s connection information in real time to improve the User experience. For example, if a User clicks on a link in an email or ad to a specific page in a Client’s app, Branch helps the User get to that page after they download the app.
To report individualized and aggregated analytics metrics about the performance of the Client’s product and marketing initiatives to the Client directly. For example, Branch can tell a Client how many Users that downloaded an app or that went to a specific page in an app came from clicking on a specific link and provide corresponding advertising or other identifiers.
To assist the Client by presenting real time, targeted messaging to their Users depending on past behavior observed across the Client’s tracked platforms with the purpose of driving more engagement to the Client. For example, Branch can use Branch Mechanisms to provide a tailored message like a coupon code or special offer in your website to users who have interacted with your app and/or website in the past.
Branch requires that each Client commit to disclose to Branch only information that it has lawfully obtained (including, where necessary, by obtaining consent from Users), and that it has the right to disclose to Branch. We prohibit Clients from providing us with data relating to children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16).
Branch collects data through various methods, including:
When the Client integrates Branch’s SDK’s, API’s, pixels, redirect links, JavaScript tags, cookies or similar data collection technologies into their Digital Properties and/or ads;
From the various advertising networks and third parties that are used by the Client in connection with the measurement and analysis of Client’s marketing campaigns and that have partnered with Branch;
When provided voluntarily by the Client as part of the Branch account registration process.
Clients are also required to inform us if they are using Branch’s services to analyze information protected by HIPAA so that Branch can process such information in a protected environment.
In the charts below, we summarize the information collected automatically by the Services.
Information Collected By Branch Links, Pixels
,
and Similar Technologies
Top
Branch collects the following information from URLs created by the Client (i.e., Branch Links) and pixels placed on Client websites. Branch Links may be embedded into QR Codes as configured by the Client. Some of this information is considered personal data under applicable law (in other words, information that itself may identify a unique individual or can be linked back to an individual) (“Personal Data”). Since Clients have sole control over their Digital Properties and configuration of the Services, Clients are contractually prohibited from configuring the Services to collect directly identifiable personal information , unless otherwise agreed by Branch. If a Client has configured the Services to collect directly identifiable personal information, then Branch may receive and process such data. This includes, for example, a Client using an End User’s email address as a Client issued Developer ID.
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for attribution and to understand general location
Cookie
Standard web cookies, used for device identification and attribution
Link Data
Metadata controlled by the Client, which may be used to interpret the data for reporting, or for analytics
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; used for device identification and attribution
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the webpage from which such ads were displayed, and webpages on Client’s website visited by a User.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their website (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
Information Collected by Branch SDKs
Top
SDKs are Software Development Kits that include code that allows Clients to use the Branch Services. The Branch Mobile App SDKs, Web SDKs, and Over-the-Top (OTT) SDKs collect the following information when Clients use these SDKs in their applications or websites, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
Advertising identifier (e.g., GAID, Android ID, IDFA, IDFV, RIDA)
Used for device identification and attribution
Branch Cookie ID
Used for device identification and attribution
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for device identification, attribution, and to understand general location
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Central Processing Unit (CPU) Type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
System build version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Internet connection type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Application version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device model
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Manufacturer / Brand
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen size (height, width)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen resolution
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile network status (Wi-Fi, etc.)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device locale (country and language)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Local IP address
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile platform
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Branch SDK version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Developer ID
(optional) Client-supplied unique identifier; metadata feature Used for device identification and attribution
Carrier ID
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Environment
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
UI Mode
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the application page from which such ads were displayed, pages on Client’s application visited by a User, downloads, opt-in status for certain tracking mechanisms, and installations of applications.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their application (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
In addition to the information identified above, the Branch Desktop SDKs collect the following identifiers when Clients use these SDKs in their desktop applications, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
MAC address
Used for device identification and attribution
Windows Advertising ID
Used for device identification and attribution
CPU ID
Used for device identification and attribution
Information Collected By Other Parties
Top
As part of Branch’s Services, Branch’s Clients may direct certain of their vendors or business partners (such as an ad network or vendor) that have partnered with Branch to provide certain Engagement Data to Branch on the Client’s behalf in connection with the measurement and analysis of the Client's marketing campaigns.
How Does Branch Use Information Collected by Our Services?
Top
Subject to Agreements with our Clients, data that Branch collects through the Services is processed to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Services we provide our Clients, including to support other Branch products and services, to perform anti-fraud protection analysis, develop new products and services, and market products or services; to support the products and services of our Clients; and as permitted or required by applicable law.
Where authorized by Agreements with our Clients, we may aggregate and/or de-identify the data we collect through the Services. After data has been aggregated and/or de-identified, Branch cannot use it to personally identify an individual. We may use de-identified and/or aggregated data for any purpose, including without limitation for research and marketing purposes, and may also disclose such data to any other parties, including business partners, Clients, and/or others.
Our Clients’ Use of Information
Top
Our Clients may use the information collected via the Services to improve their Users’ app experiences, customize their Digital Properties to Users, and to better understand their app marketing programs and how Users discover their apps. For example, a User may want to disclose information about a hotel that she found in a travel app to a friend. When that User sends her friend a Branch link to that hotel, after clicking the link the friend is brought directly to the content relating to that hotel within the app, rather than landing on the app’s homepage and having to search for the hotel. The travel app would also gain insights and analytics as to how the content is being disclosed from its app.
We require that our Clients utilize our Services responsibly and in accordance with our
Terms & Conditions
, Agreements, or other contracts with us. Branch is not responsible for the data practices of any of our Clients through the Services or otherwise. Each Client’s practices are subject to each Client’s individual privacy policy. Users should review the privacy policy of each Client to understand how that Client uses User information collected through the Services.
User Choices
Top
Branch recognizes a number of consumer choice mechanisms. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality may be degraded or no longer work as a result if you exercise certain of the opt-outs below.
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer read or set cookies (beyond the opt-out cookie itself). Cookie-based opt outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”) and adheres to its Code of Conduct. NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from interest-based advertising by participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt out of the Branch Services on a particular device by submitting a request
here
.
Device Identifiers:
To use your device’s privacy settings controls, please visit the privacy settings menu of your device to review and access the privacy controls made available on the device. Branch will only be able to collect information from the device as permitted by these settings.
Client App Opt-out Controls:
Branch‘s
SDK Privacy Controls
allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data. Clients can flag in the Branch SDK that a particular User’s data should not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Engagement Builder:
Branch's Engagement Builder feature may be used to help Clients conduct re-engagement and re-targeting campaigns. We require that Clients using Branch’s Engagement Builder feature for such purposes respect User opt-out preferences passed to them by Branch.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes
What Information Does Branch Collect about Website Visitors and Potential Customers?
Top
Branch collects information from Website visitors (“you” or “Website Users”) located at www.branch.io ( the “Website”), which includes the dashboard provided to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. The types of information we may collect and our privacy practices depend on the nature of the relationship you have with us and the requirements of applicable law. Below are the legal bases and some of the ways we collect information and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
What We Collect from Clients that Use the Website
Top
Branch collects Personal Data and non-personal data via the Website. For example, when Clients register to use our Services, we ask them to provide us with Personal Data, including first and last name and email address.
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for limited security login controls
Cookie (ours)
Standard web cookie used for dashboard session management
Cookie (other-party)
Other-party web tracking tools used for business intelligence
First, Last Name
Used for team user identification
Work Email
Used as the primary login identifier
Password
Account registration, secure our Services and prevent fraud
Account Holder Primary Role
Account registration, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; may be used for limited security login controls
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for general internal business analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for general internal business analytics
Github ID
(optional) Can be used as a login method
Billing information
Payment account registration
Log Data
Provide the Services, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners, personalize our experience, secure our Services and prevent fraud, and defend our legal rights and comply with the law
Account holder feedback
Help us improve your experience on the account dashboard
Dashboard Information:
Information we collect from visitors who register for an account on our dashboard includes the following, some of which is considered Personal Data under applicable law:When a Client creates an account and uses the Services, Branch may collect certain log data, such as IP address from which a Client is connecting to the Services, information related to the device being used to connect to the Services (e.g., browser type and version, device type, OS version) and the features and functions of the Services used by the Client (“Log Data”).
We also require Clients to set up a user ID and unique password for account security purposes. Clients must not disclose their passwords to anyone. Clients also have the option of adding other team members to their account. This account information enables us to set up an account for Clients, to provide the Services, and to otherwise manage Client accounts. We may also use this information to notify Clients about updates to our Services and provide them with promotional emails. We offer a mechanism to opt out from promotional emails as described in the “Opt-Out from Promotional Emails” section below.
Account and Billing Information:
To the extent that we charge a fee for the Services, we may also collect limited billing, payment, and contract information from Clients through our payment and contract vendors.
Connection Information with Other Parties:
Some features of the dashboard Services allow you to disclose your information through your accounts to other companies such as Facebook and Google. If you choose to connect Branch to such services provided by other parties, we may collect information related to your use of those services provided by other parties, such as authentication tokens that allow us to connect to your accounts with those other parties. We will ask you for permission before you authorize our collection of this information. We may also collect information about how you are using the Services to interact with those connected services.
Information from Other Sources:
In addition to the information collected through our Website, we or our vendors may obtain and disclose additional information, such as job title or contact information, from other public and non-public sources such as business websites, social networking platforms, or databases maintained by other parties. We use this information to better enable Branch to identify and contact businesses that might be interested in engaging our Services, and to gain a better understanding of a potential Client’s business needs.
Communications with Branch:
Some Website Users may provide Personal Data to Branch by sending us an email or filling out an online form on the Website. We use this information to answer their question(s), and may store that information for our record keeping, marketing, and advertising purposes.
Research/Survey Solicitations:
From time to time, we may perform research (online and offline) via surveys. We may engage vendors to conduct such surveys on our behalf. All survey responses are voluntary, and the information collected will be used for research and reporting purposes to help us better serve individuals by learning more about their needs and the quality of the products and services we provide. The survey responses may be utilized to determine the effectiveness of our Website, various types of communications, advertising campaigns and/or promotional activities.
Cookies, Pixels and Web Beacons:
We also collect other data via the Website from Website Users, including Website Users employed by or affiliated with Clients, through cookies and/or web beacons. Such information, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law, may include IP address, pages viewed, browser type, Internet browsing and usage habits, how you browse and navigate the Website, Internet Service Provider, domain name, the time/date of your visit to the Website, the referring URL, and your computer’s operating system. For example, we may collect on a real-time basis information on how you use and navigate the Website.
If your browser settings permit the use of cookies and web beacons when you visit and continue to use the Website, we will collect information through those tools. Cookies are small data files stored on your hard drive by a website and web beacons are electronic images that may be used on our Website or in our emails. Cookies help us improve your experience on the Website as well as our marketing activities. We use cookies to see which areas and features are popular and to count visits to our Website. For more information about cookies and web beacons, please visit
https://www.cookiepro.com/knowledgebase/knowledge_categories/cookies-101/
. For more information about how to opt-out of cookies and web beacons after you have consented to their use, see the “Opt-out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons” section below.
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected?
Top
Branch processes the data described in the section above for the following purposes:
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Website;
to fulfill your and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services;
to send information about the Services including confirmations, invoices, payment processing, technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
to communicate about products and services offered by Branch and Branch's selected partners. We receive opt-in consent to send promotional and marketing messages to Website Users where required by applicable law. You can opt-out of receiving these messages at any time as described below in the section titled: “Opt-out from Promotional Emails”;
to conduct research;
to manage your information and account, to improve and administer our Website, to contact Website Users to answer questions or resolve problems, or to verify your identity;
to conduct research to help us to optimally deliver our existing Services or develop new products, processes and services;
for ad delivery and reporting purposes and to create data and analytics products and services;
to make the Website easier to use by reducing the need for Clients and Website Users to enter information;
for other purposes disclosed to you at the time you provide data to us;
with your consent; or
where Branch otherwise has a legitimate interest in collecting the data, such as direct marketing, individual or market research, product improvement, anti-fraud protection, protecting the safety of us, our Website Users, or other parties, or where required by law.
Opt-Out & Do Not Track - Your Choice Mechanisms
Top
In some cases, we rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you. In those cases, and where you have consented to Branch's processing of your Personal Data in connection with your use of the Website, you may withdraw that consent at any time by following the instructions below. Additionally, before we use Personal Data collected with your consent for any new purpose not originally authorized by you, we will provide information regarding the new purpose and ask for your consent for the new purpose. Where your consent for the processing of Personal Data is otherwise required by law or contract, we will comply with the law or contract. In other cases, we do not rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you (for example, if we have a different legal basis to process that data).
Opt Out from Promotional Emails
Top
You can opt-out of receiving promotional emails from us by following the instructions in those emails, or by filling out
this form
. You can also opt-out of certain categories of emails using
this form
. If you opt-out using any of these tools, we may still send you non-promotional emails, such as certain updates about your account or updates to our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy and/or use of the Services.
Opt Out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons
Top
We will only use cookies consistent with your cookie settings and permissions granted on our Website. If you permit us to use cookies/web beacons as discussed above (“What Information Does Branch Collect from our Website”), but would like to opt-out:
For dashboard users, visit
https://dashboard.branch.io/account-settings/user
, and toggle off “Cookie Consent”.
For all other users, click on “Cookie Consent” at the bottom right-hand corner of our homepage (
https://branch.io/
), and click on the opt-out link.
Also, you can choose to set your browser to remove cookies and to reject cookies. To exercise the "Do Not Track" settings available on certain web browsers, please visit the privacy settings of your browser. Where Branch is able to see that such a selection has been made, we will not use information collected from that device to target advertising on that browser. Dashboard users must use the “Cookie Consent” feature to revoke permission to place cookies. Please note that "Do Not Track" is a different privacy mechanism than the Global Privacy Control browser choice referenced below.
Note that, even if you opt out, we may still collect and use non-personal data regarding your activities on our Website. This also does not opt you out of being served advertising altogether; you will continue to receive generic advertisements.
Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website
Top
The Website utilizes tracking tools from vendors, which may enable these vendors to analyze our Website traffic for analytics purposes. Some of these vendors may collect information from this Website for retargeting and interest-based advertising purposes. For more information about these forms of ad targeting and to understand your right to opt-out from these practices, please visit
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
. All of these tools are hosted by the parties who provide them, and your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policies of the parties providing them. These tools include, but are not limited to, those below.
Google
. We may use Google Analytics and Google Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting to collect information regarding visitor behavior and visitor demographics on our Website, and to develop website content. For more information about Google Analytics, please visit
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
. You can opt-out of Google’s collection and processing of data generated by your use of the Website by going to
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
Mixpanel
. We use a service provided by Mixpanel, Inc. (“Mixpanel”) to provide us with analytics data regarding Website Users’ interactions with our Website and Services. You may opt-out of Mixpanel’s automatic retention of data that is collected while using the Services by visiting
https://mixpanel.com/optout/
. To track opt-outs, Mixpanel uses a persistent opt-out cookie placed on your device. Please note that if you get a new computer, install a new browser, erase or otherwise alter the browser’s cookie file (including upgrading certain browsers), you may delete the Mixpanel opt-out cookie.
Facebook
. We may use certain tools offered by Facebook, Inc. (“Facebook”) that enable it to collect or receive information about actions Website Users take on our Website through use of cookies, web beacons and other storage technologies or in order to provide measurement services, targeted ads and other services. For more information regarding the collection and use of such information by Facebook, please see the Facebook Data Policy, available at:
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php
.
Drift
. We use certain tools offered by Drift to power our Website’s live-chat experience. If you provide information about yourself through that live-chat experience, then we may store that information for marketing purposes. Drift may also infer information about the company that you work for you based on your IP address.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website
When does Branch Disclose Information?
Top
In addition to the ways described in our
Terms & Conditions
, applicable Agreements, and this Privacy Policy, Branch may also disclose information to others under the following circumstances:
With vendors, consultants, global partners, and other parties who assist Branch to provide, support, and maintain the Services and the Website and need access to information we collect to do so;
With our Clients and their agents, as described in this Policy;
To other parties (such as advertising networks or vendors used by our Clients), as directed by our Clients;
To comply with laws or to respond to lawful requests and legal process including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements;
To investigate, prevent, or take action regarding suspected, or actual, prohibited activities, including but not limited to fraud and situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person;
To protect the rights and property of Branch, our agents, Clients, Users, Website Users, and others including to enforce our agreements, policies, and Terms & Conditions;
To Branch’s subsidiaries and affiliates as necessary to help us provide, support, and maintain the Services; and
In connection with or during negotiation of any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
Updating Your Information and Contact Preferences
Top
We provide Clients with a mechanism to access, review and update information via the dashboard. If you wish to review or update your information, please visit branch.io and login using the username and password you created. Next, please select “Account Settings” which can be found in the lower left corner of the dashboard screen, then select the “User” tab near the top. If you would like to delete your account, please email
support@branch.io
.
We Secure the Information We Collect
Top
Securing the information provided by our Clients and collected through our Website is important to us. Branch has implemented industry-standard technical, administrative, and physical safeguards to help protect the information on our servers against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. You are responsible for maintaining the secrecy of your own passwords. If you have reason to believe that your passwords or Personal Data are no longer secure, please promptly notify us at
privacy@branch.io
.
Branch implements technical and organizational measures designed to protect against unauthorized access, accidental loss, destruction or damage of Client’s data. For more information on our security controls, please see
https://www.branch.io/security/
. If you have questions about the security of your personal information, or if you have reason to believe that the personal information that we hold about you is no longer secure, please contact us immediately as described in this Privacy Policy.
Our Data Retention Policy
Top
For our Services:
Branch retains the information collected by the Services for no more time than is needed to serve the legitimate business need for which it was collected. For example, Branch stores the information collected by our Services for the purposes of establishing matches between devices used by Users (see the “What Information Does Branch Collect from our Services?” section above) so long as our systems continue to encounter that User. After that User has been inactive for 30 days (or 90 days for specific attribution products), information collected from that User by our Services for the purposes of establishing matches between devices used by will be deleted unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Usage activity logs of Users, which are used for the purpose of providing reporting and analytics to the Client, are stored in an identifiable form for no more than 14 days (or up to 60 days as determined by the Client or for specific fields), after which these logs are removed or pseudonymized. Any and all pseudonymized usage activity logs are deleted after 12 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Aggregated reporting metrics disclosed to Clients are retained (in aggregate and anonymized form) for up to 24 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Branch may retain information collected by our Services beyond these periods for fraud prevention, analysis, or response, or to protect the safety of Branch, its Clients, Users or the public.
For the Website:
We retain the information collected by the Website for no more time than is needed to serve the legitimate business need for which it was collected. For example, we store Personal Data such as email address or billing details for so long as you continue to have a business relationship with Branch and for a reasonable time thereafter for record-keeping purposes. If applicable to you, you may ask us to delete that information as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below or pursuant to your right of erasure as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below.
Links to Other Websites
Top
The Website and/or Services may contain links to other websites and other websites may reference or link to our Website and/or Services. These other domains and websites are not controlled by Branch, and we do not endorse or make any representations about websites or social media platforms operated by other parties. We encourage you to read the privacy policies of each and every website and application that you interact with. We do not endorse, screen, or approve, and are not responsible for the privacy practices or content of such other websites or applications. Visiting these other websites or applications is at your own risk.
International Data Transfers
Top
All information collected via the Website and Services is stored on servers located in the United States. In the process of providing the Services, we may transfer information across borders from other countries or jurisdictions into the United States. Data protection laws in the United States may differ from your country, and the data Branch processes may be accessible to law enforcement and national security authorities under certain circumstances. By using the Services, each Client and Website User consents to the transfer and processing of information to the U.S. in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Data transfers from the European Union, United Kingdom, and Switzerland are transferred on the basis of legal mechanisms approved by the European Commission and other relevant authorities for cross-border data transfers, such as Standard Contractual Clauses or the Data Privacy Framework mechanism discussed in the “Data Privacy Framework For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States” section below.
Data Privacy Framework For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States
Top
Branch complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) (collectively, “Data Privacy Frameworks”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of Personal Data from European Union member countries (including European Economic Area member countries), the United Kingdom, and Switzerland transferred to the United States pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks. Branch has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Branch has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the policies in this Privacy Policy and data subject rights under the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the applicable Principles (“DPF Principles”) shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification page, please visit https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/.
Branch no longer relies on the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield to transfer data that originated in the EEA or the United Kingdom to the U.S.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Branch’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
Pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks we are obliged to inform EU, UK, and Swiss individuals whose data is being transferred into the United States that we may be required to release Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities including to meet national security and law enforcement requirements.
Branch remains liable for the onward transfer of EU, UK, and Swiss personal data to other parties pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks unless we can prove we were not a party to the actions giving rise to the damages.
We acknowledge the right of EU, UK, and Swiss individuals to access their Personal Data pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals wishing to exercise this right may do so by contacting privacy@branch.io.
In compliance with the Data Privacy Frameworks, Branch commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information transferred to the United States pursuant to the DPF Principles. European Union, UK, and Swiss individuals with DPF inquiries or complaints should first contact Branch at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
privacy@branch.io
Branch has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the DPF Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, Data Privacy Framework Services, operated by JAMS, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit https://www.jamsadr.com/dpf-dispute-resolution for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your DPF complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms. See https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/G-Arbitration-Procedures-dpf?tabset-35584=2.
Data Subject Rights
Top
California Consumer Privacy Act
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) provides certain rights to natural persons who are residents of California. Our CCPA privacy notice is available
here
.
Rights of Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
The European General Data Protection Regulation of 2018 (“GDPR”) and equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation (“UK Data Protection Law”) provides certain rights to residents of Europe. Information on how you can exercise rights under the GDPR and UK Data Protection Law are set forth
here
.
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”) provides certain rights to residents of Brazil. Information on how you can exercise rights under the LGPD are set forth
here
.
Our Policy Regarding Children
Top
Services
: The Branch Services are not directed to children. We require that Clients agree to not send to us data relating to any children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16). If you are a Client and want to learn more about Branch
SDK Privacy Controls
that you can use in your compliance with the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA), GDPR, or any other applicable law, please contact privacy@branch.io.
If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16) in violation of applicable law, please contact us at
privacy@branch.io
, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any information that it may have been provided inappropriately as required by law.
Website
: The Branch Website is not directed to children. We do not knowingly collect through the Website Personal Data from anyone under the age of 16. If you are under 16, please do not attempt to register or send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, or email address. No one under 16 may provide any Personal Data to us. In the event that we learn that we have collected any such data from a child under 16 through our Website, we will take reasonable steps to delete that information as quickly as possible. If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 16, please contact us at privacy@branch.io, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any inappropriately obtained information as required by law.
Contact Us, Questions, Changes to This Privacy Policy
Top
We may change this Privacy Policy at any time in our sole discretion. We will post all changes to this Privacy Policy on this page and will indicate at the top of the page the modified Privacy Policy’s effective date. If you have any questions or suggestions regarding this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
info@branch.io
Compliance
Top
This Privacy Policy shall be implemented by Branch and all its operating divisions, subsidiaries and affiliates. Branch has put in place mechanisms to verify ongoing compliance with this Privacy Policy.
Effective August 14th 2024
to
September 16th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Privacy Policy
The Branch Guiding Privacy Principles
Top
Branch is a deep linking and attribution analytics platform for app and website developers. We are proud of our commitment to providing our services in a privacy-first way. So we thought it would be helpful to lay out, in plain English, the Branch Guiding Privacy Principles that drive how we’ve chosen to design our services with privacy as a top priority. We further describe our privacy practices in the official
Privacy Policy
below this section, but we hope you’ll find this summary of our principles helpful.
We limit the data we collect. We practice data minimization, which means that we take steps to avoid collecting or storing information that we don’t need to provide our services. The personal data that we collect to provide our services is limited to data like advertising identifiers, IP address, and information derived from resettable cookies (the full list is below in our privacy policy). We do not collect or store information such as names, email addresses, physical addresses, or SSNs to provide our services. Nor do we want to. In fact, our
Terms & Conditions
prohibit our customers from providing Branch with any kind of sensitive end-user information.
We will only provide you with data about actual end-user activity on your apps or websites. Customers who subscribe to our linking and analytics platform can only access “earned” cookies or identifiers. This means that an end user must visit a customer’s site before our customer can see the cookie; and an end user must download a customer’s app in order for Branch to collect the end user’s advertising identifier for that customer. In short, the Branch services benefit customers who already have seen an end user across their platforms and want to understand the relationship between those web visits and app sessions.
We do not rent or sell customer end user data. No Branch customer can access another Branch customer’s end-user data. And we are not in the business of renting or selling any customer’s end-user data to anyone else. To enable customers to control their end-user personal data, they can request deletion
here
of that data at any time, whether in bulk or for a specific end user. These controls are available to customers worldwide, although we designed them to comply with the CCPA and GDPR requirements.
Beyond these principles stated above, Branch will continue to find ways to design our services to respect end user privacy. We’re committed to making sure our customers understand how we use data they entrust to us and how they can control it so that they can, in turn, be transparent with their end users.
Introduction
Top
Branch Metrics, Inc. ( "Branch", "us", "our" or "we") offers a linking and analytics platform enabling developers of applications (our "Clients")--whether those applications are websites or "apps," and across different types of devices ("Digital Properties")--to improve their end users’ ("Users") cross-application experiences, and to derive additional insights into how their Users download and utilize those applications. Branch recognizes and believes that data privacy is important to all Internet users, and therefore we design and operate our services in a privacy-first manner.
This Privacy Policy is divided into three parts:
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services: This section explains how Branch collects and uses information about Users in connection with our linking and analytics products and services (the "Branch Services" or the "Services").
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes: This section explains how we collect and use information about our website visitors through our website located at branch.io (the “Website”), which includes the dashboard we provide to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. So, if you are a Client using our Branch dashboard, this section applies to the data we collect from you. It also explains how we collect information about potential Clients from vendors and other sources to enhance our marketing efforts.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website: This section lays out the parts of the Branch Privacy Policy that apply to both the Services and to the Website.
Branch and its Clients have entered into an agreement that governs the provision of Services by Branch and their use by Clients ("Agreement(s)"). Such Agreements may contain obligations on the parties with respect to the handling of information processed in the Services. Nothing in this Privacy Policy derogates from such obligations.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services
What Information Does Branch Collect from Our Services?
Top
Below, we explain what information we collect on behalf of our Clients through the Services, and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
The Branch Services: Overview
Top
Branch provides a variety of Services intended to help Clients understand the use of their Digital Properties by their Users across a wide array of platforms, devices and applications. Branch helps Clients by connecting User interactions across siloed applications (email, SMS, web browsers, social platforms, native applications and others), so that Clients understand the multiple steps that a User took to ultimately complete a transaction with the Client. The Client can use this information to better inform marketing and product decisions as well as to provide improved user experiences by using their knowledge of continuity.
Branch has no direct relationship with Users. Branch’s Services are provided when Branch Clients install on their platforms “Branch Mechanisms” (including links, pixels, direct platform integrations, etc.) that capture User action on behalf of the Client. Using the information collected from these Branch Mechanisms, Branch uses a variety of attribution techniques to connect User actions across different channels and platforms. Some of these attribution techniques include a direct pass-through of identifiers from platform to platform, creating and storing identifiers unique to the Branch platform to connect User actions and identifiers together, and predictive modeling algorithms using real-time and historical data parameters observed from User interactions where there are no shared identifiers available, as well as using historical connections Branch has derived over time using our technology. In some cases, these connections are made without the use of cookies. These techniques help Clients match Users with devices they use, including matching the same User across multiple devices.
The key use cases of Branch’s Services are:
To support Clients in implementing deep linking, which uses Branch’s connection information in real time to improve the User experience. For example, if a User clicks on a link in an email or ad to a specific page in a Client’s app, Branch helps the User get to that page after they download the app.
To report individualized and aggregated analytics metrics about the performance of the Client’s product and marketing initiatives to the Client directly. For example, Branch can tell a Client how many Users that downloaded an app or that went to a specific page in an app came from clicking on a specific link and provide corresponding advertising or other identifiers.
To assist the Client by presenting real time, targeted messaging to their Users depending on past behavior observed across the Client’s tracked platforms with the purpose of driving more engagement to the Client. For example, Branch can use Branch Mechanisms to provide a tailored message like a coupon code or special offer in your website to users who have interacted with your app and/or website in the past.
Branch requires that each Client commit to disclose to Branch only information that it has lawfully obtained (including, where necessary, by obtaining consent from Users), and that it has the right to disclose to Branch. We prohibit Clients from providing us with data relating to children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16).
Branch collects data through various methods, including:
When the Client integrates Branch’s SDK’s, API’s, pixels, redirect links, JavaScript tags, cookies or similar data collection technologies into their Digital Properties and/or ads;
From the various advertising networks and third parties that are used by the Client in connection with the measurement and analysis of Client’s marketing campaigns and that have partnered with Branch;
When provided voluntarily by the Client as part of the Branch account registration process.
Clients are also required to inform us if they are using Branch’s services to analyze information protected by HIPAA so that Branch can process such information in a protected environment.
In the charts below, we summarize the information collected automatically by the Services.
Information Collected By Branch Links, Pixels
,
and Similar Technologies
Top
Branch collects the following information from URLs created by the Client (i.e., Branch Links) and pixels placed on Client websites. Branch Links may be embedded into QR Codes as configured by the Client. Some of this information is considered personal data under applicable law (in other words, information that itself may identify a unique individual or can be linked back to an individual) (“Personal Data”). Since Clients have sole control over their Digital Properties and configuration of the Services, Clients are contractually prohibited from configuring the Services to collect directly identifiable personal information , unless otherwise agreed by Branch. If a Client has configured the Services to collect directly identifiable personal information, then Branch may receive and process such data. This includes, for example, a Client using an End User’s email address as a Client issued Developer ID.
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for attribution and to understand general location
Cookie
Standard web cookies, used for device identification and attribution
Link Data
Metadata controlled by the Client, which may be used to interpret the data for reporting, or for analytics
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; used for device identification and attribution
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the webpage from which such ads were displayed, and webpages on Client’s website visited by a User.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their website (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
Information Collected by Branch SDKs
Top
SDKs are Software Development Kits that include code that allows Clients to use the Branch Services. The Branch Mobile App SDKs, Web SDKs, and Over-the-Top (OTT) SDKs collect the following information when Clients use these SDKs in their applications or websites, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
Advertising identifier (e.g., GAID, Android ID, IDFA, IDFV, RIDA)
Used for device identification and attribution
Branch Cookie ID
Used for device identification and attribution
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for device identification, attribution, and to understand general location
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Central Processing Unit (CPU) Type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
System build version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Internet connection type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Application version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device model
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Manufacturer / Brand
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen size (height, width)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen resolution
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile network status (Wi-Fi, etc.)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device locale (country and language)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Local IP address
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile platform
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Branch SDK version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Developer ID
(optional) Client-supplied unique identifier; metadata feature Used for device identification and attribution
Carrier ID
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Environment
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
UI Mode
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the application page from which such ads were displayed, pages on Client’s application visited by a User, downloads, opt-in status for certain tracking mechanisms, and installations of applications.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their application (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
In addition to the information identified above, the Branch Desktop SDKs collect the following identifiers when Clients use these SDKs in their desktop applications, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
MAC address
Used for device identification and attribution
Windows Advertising ID
Used for device identification and attribution
CPU ID
Used for device identification and attribution
Information Collected By Other Parties
Top
As part of Branch’s Services, Branch’s Clients may direct certain of their vendors or business partners (such as an ad network or vendor) that have partnered with Branch to provide certain Engagement Data to Branch on the Client’s behalf in connection with the measurement and analysis of the Client's marketing campaigns.
How Does Branch Use Information Collected by Our Services?
Top
Subject to Agreements with our Clients, data that Branch collects through the Services is processed to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Services we provide our Clients, including to support other Branch products and services, to perform anti-fraud protection analysis, develop new products and services, and market products or services; to support the products and services of our Clients; and as permitted or required by applicable law.
Where authorized by Agreements with our Clients, we may aggregate and/or de-identify the data we collect through the Services. After data has been aggregated and/or de-identified, Branch cannot use it to personally identify an individual. We may use de-identified and/or aggregated data for any purpose, including without limitation for research and marketing purposes, and may also disclose such data to any other parties, including business partners, Clients, and/or others.
Our Clients’ Use of Information
Top
Our Clients may use the information collected via the Services to improve their Users’ app experiences, customize their Digital Properties to Users, and to better understand their app marketing programs and how Users discover their apps. For example, a User may want to disclose information about a hotel that she found in a travel app to a friend. When that User sends her friend a Branch link to that hotel, after clicking the link the friend is brought directly to the content relating to that hotel within the app, rather than landing on the app’s homepage and having to search for the hotel. The travel app would also gain insights and analytics as to how the content is being disclosed from its app.
We require that our Clients utilize our Services responsibly and in accordance with our
Terms & Conditions
, Agreements, or other contracts with us. Branch is not responsible for the data practices of any of our Clients through the Services or otherwise. Each Client’s practices are subject to each Client’s individual privacy policy. Users should review the privacy policy of each Client to understand how that Client uses User information collected through the Services.
User Choices
Top
Branch recognizes a number of consumer choice mechanisms. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality may be degraded or no longer work as a result if you exercise certain of the opt-outs below.
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer read or set cookies (beyond the opt-out cookie itself). Cookie-based opt outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”) and adheres to its Code of Conduct. NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from interest-based advertising by participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt out of the Branch Services on a particular device by submitting a request
here
.
Device Identifiers:
To use your device’s privacy settings controls, please visit the privacy settings menu of your device to review and access the privacy controls made available on the device. Branch will only be able to collect information from the device as permitted by these settings.
Client App Opt-out Controls:
Branch‘s
SDK Privacy Controls
allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data. Clients can flag in the Branch SDK that a particular User’s data should not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Engagement Builder:
Branch's Engagement Builder feature may be used to help Clients conduct re-engagement and re-targeting campaigns. We require that Clients using Branch’s Engagement Builder feature for such purposes respect User opt-out preferences passed to them by Branch.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes
What Information Does Branch Collect about Website Visitors and Potential Customers?
Top
Branch collects information from Website visitors (“you” or “Website Users”) located at www.branch.io ( the “Website”), which includes the dashboard provided to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. The types of information we may collect and our privacy practices depend on the nature of the relationship you have with us and the requirements of applicable law. Below are the legal bases and some of the ways we collect information and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
What We Collect from Clients that Use the Website
Top
Branch collects Personal Data and non-personal data via the Website. For example, when Clients register to use our Services, we ask them to provide us with Personal Data, including first and last name and email address.
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for limited security login controls
Cookie (ours)
Standard web cookie used for dashboard session management
Cookie (other-party)
Other-party web tracking tools used for business intelligence
First, Last Name
Used for team user identification
Work Email
Used as the primary login identifier
Password
Account registration, secure our Services and prevent fraud
Account Holder Primary Role
Account registration, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; may be used for limited security login controls
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for general internal business analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for general internal business analytics
Github ID
(optional) Can be used as a login method
Billing information
Payment account registration
Log Data
Provide the Services, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners, personalize our experience, secure our Services and prevent fraud, and defend our legal rights and comply with the law
Account holder feedback
Help us improve your experience on the account dashboard
Dashboard Information:
Information we collect from visitors who register for an account on our dashboard includes the following, some of which is considered Personal Data under applicable law:When a Client creates an account and uses the Services, Branch may collect certain log data, such as IP address from which a Client is connecting to the Services, information related to the device being used to connect to the Services (e.g., browser type and version, device type, OS version) and the features and functions of the Services used by the Client (“Log Data”).
We also require Clients to set up a user ID and unique password for account security purposes. Clients must not disclose their passwords to anyone. Clients also have the option of adding other team members to their account. This account information enables us to set up an account for Clients, to provide the Services, and to otherwise manage Client accounts. We may also use this information to notify Clients about updates to our Services and provide them with promotional emails. We offer a mechanism to opt out from promotional emails as described in the “Opt-Out from Promotional Emails” section below.
Account and Billing Information:
To the extent that we charge a fee for the Services, we may also collect limited billing, payment, and contract information from Clients through our payment and contract vendors.
Connection Information with Other Parties:
Some features of the dashboard Services allow you to disclose your information through your accounts to other companies such as Facebook and Google. If you choose to connect Branch to such services provided by other parties, we may collect information related to your use of those services provided by other parties, such as authentication tokens that allow us to connect to your accounts with those other parties. We will ask you for permission before you authorize our collection of this information. We may also collect information about how you are using the Services to interact with those connected services.
Information from Other Sources:
In addition to the information collected through our Website, we or our vendors may obtain and disclose additional information, such as job title or contact information, from other public and non-public sources such as business websites, social networking platforms, or databases maintained by other parties. We use this information to better enable Branch to identify and contact businesses that might be interested in engaging our Services, and to gain a better understanding of a potential Client’s business needs.
Communications with Branch:
Some Website Users may provide Personal Data to Branch by sending us an email or filling out an online form on the Website. We use this information to answer their question(s), and may store that information for our record keeping, marketing, and advertising purposes.
Research/Survey Solicitations:
From time to time, we may perform research (online and offline) via surveys. We may engage vendors to conduct such surveys on our behalf. All survey responses are voluntary, and the information collected will be used for research and reporting purposes to help us better serve individuals by learning more about their needs and the quality of the products and services we provide. The survey responses may be utilized to determine the effectiveness of our Website, various types of communications, advertising campaigns and/or promotional activities.
Cookies, Pixels and Web Beacons:
We also collect other data via the Website from Website Users, including Website Users employed by or affiliated with Clients, through cookies and/or web beacons. Such information, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law, may include IP address, pages viewed, browser type, Internet browsing and usage habits, how you browse and navigate the Website, Internet Service Provider, domain name, the time/date of your visit to the Website, the referring URL, and your computer’s operating system. For example, we may collect on a real-time basis information on how you use and navigate the Website.
If your browser settings permit the use of cookies and web beacons when you visit and continue to use the Website, we will collect information through those tools. Cookies are small data files stored on your hard drive by a website and web beacons are electronic images that may be used on our Website or in our emails. Cookies help us improve your experience on the Website as well as our marketing activities. We use cookies to see which areas and features are popular and to count visits to our Website. For more information about cookies and web beacons, please visit
https://www.cookiepro.com/knowledgebase/knowledge_categories/cookies-101/
. For more information about how to opt-out of cookies and web beacons after you have consented to their use, see the “Opt-out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons” section below.
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected?
Top
Branch processes the data described in the section above for the following purposes:
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Website;
to fulfill your and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services;
to send information about the Services including confirmations, invoices, payment processing, technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
to communicate about products and services offered by Branch and Branch's selected partners. We receive opt-in consent to send promotional and marketing messages to Website Users where required by applicable law. You can opt-out of receiving these messages at any time as described below in the section titled: “Opt-out from Promotional Emails”;
to conduct research;
to manage your information and account, to improve and administer our Website, to contact Website Users to answer questions or resolve problems, or to verify your identity;
to conduct research to help us to optimally deliver our existing Services or develop new products, processes and services;
for ad delivery and reporting purposes and to create data and analytics products and services;
to make the Website easier to use by reducing the need for Clients and Website Users to enter information;
for other purposes disclosed to you at the time you provide data to us;
with your consent; or
where Branch otherwise has a legitimate interest in collecting the data, such as direct marketing, individual or market research, product improvement, anti-fraud protection, protecting the safety of us, our Website Users, or other parties, or where required by law.
Opt-Out & Do Not Track - Your Choice Mechanisms
Top
In some cases, we rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you. In those cases, and where you have consented to Branch's processing of your Personal Data in connection with your use of the Website, you may withdraw that consent at any time by following the instructions below. Additionally, before we use Personal Data collected with your consent for any new purpose not originally authorized by you, we will provide information regarding the new purpose and ask for your consent for the new purpose. Where your consent for the processing of Personal Data is otherwise required by law or contract, we will comply with the law or contract. In other cases, we do not rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you (for example, if we have a different legal basis to process that data).
Opt Out from Promotional Emails
Top
You can opt-out of receiving promotional emails from us by following the instructions in those emails, or by filling out
this form
. You can also opt-out of certain categories of emails using
this form
. If you opt-out using any of these tools, we may still send you non-promotional emails, such as certain updates about your account or updates to our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy and/or use of the Services.
Opt Out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons
Top
We will only use cookies consistent with your cookie settings and permissions granted on our Website. If you permit us to use cookies/web beacons as discussed above (“What Information Does Branch Collect from our Website”), but would like to opt-out:
For dashboard users, visit
https://dashboard.branch.io/account-settings/user
, and toggle off “Cookie Consent”.
For all other users, click on “Cookie Consent” at the bottom right-hand corner of our homepage (
https://branch.io/
), and click on the opt-out link.
Also, you can choose to set your browser to remove cookies and to reject cookies. To exercise the "Do Not Track" settings available on certain web browsers, please visit the privacy settings of your browser. Where Branch is able to see that such a selection has been made, we will not use information collected from that device to target advertising on that browser. Dashboard users must use the “Cookie Consent” feature to revoke permission to place cookies. Please note that "Do Not Track" is a different privacy mechanism than the Global Privacy Control browser choice referenced below.
Note that, even if you opt out, we may still collect and use non-personal data regarding your activities on our Website. This also does not opt you out of being served advertising altogether; you will continue to receive generic advertisements.
Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website
Top
The Website utilizes tracking tools from vendors, which may enable these vendors to analyze our Website traffic for analytics purposes. Some of these vendors may collect information from this Website for retargeting and interest-based advertising purposes. For more information about these forms of ad targeting and to understand your right to opt-out from these practices, please visit
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
. All of these tools are hosted by the parties who provide them, and your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policies of the parties providing them. These tools include, but are not limited to, those below.
Google
. We may use Google Analytics and Google Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting to collect information regarding visitor behavior and visitor demographics on our Website, and to develop website content. For more information about Google Analytics, please visit
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
. You can opt-out of Google’s collection and processing of data generated by your use of the Website by going to
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
Mixpanel
. We use a service provided by Mixpanel, Inc. (“Mixpanel”) to provide us with analytics data regarding Website Users’ interactions with our Website and Services. You may opt-out of Mixpanel’s automatic retention of data that is collected while using the Services by visiting
https://mixpanel.com/optout/
. To track opt-outs, Mixpanel uses a persistent opt-out cookie placed on your device. Please note that if you get a new computer, install a new browser, erase or otherwise alter the browser’s cookie file (including upgrading certain browsers), you may delete the Mixpanel opt-out cookie.
Facebook
. We may use certain tools offered by Facebook, Inc. (“Facebook”) that enable it to collect or receive information about actions Website Users take on our Website through use of cookies, web beacons and other storage technologies or in order to provide measurement services, targeted ads and other services. For more information regarding the collection and use of such information by Facebook, please see the Facebook Data Policy, available at:
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php
.
Drift
. We use certain tools offered by Drift to power our Website’s live-chat experience. If you provide information about yourself through that live-chat experience, then we may store that information for marketing purposes. Drift may also infer information about the company that you work for you based on your IP address.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website
When does Branch Disclose Information?
Top
In addition to the ways described in our
Terms & Conditions
, applicable Agreements, and this Privacy Policy, Branch may also disclose information to others under the following circumstances:
With vendors, consultants, global partners, and other parties who assist Branch to provide, support, and maintain the Services and the Website and need access to information we collect to do so;
With our Clients and their agents, as described in this Policy;
To other parties (such as advertising networks or vendors used by our Clients), as directed by our Clients;
To comply with laws or to respond to lawful requests and legal process including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements;
To investigate, prevent, or take action regarding suspected, or actual, prohibited activities, including but not limited to fraud and situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person;
To protect the rights and property of Branch, our agents, Clients, Users, Website Users, and others including to enforce our agreements, policies, and Terms & Conditions;
To Branch’s subsidiaries and affiliates as necessary to help us provide, support, and maintain the Services; and
In connection with or during negotiation of any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
Updating Your Information and Contact Preferences
Top
We provide Clients with a mechanism to access, review and update information via the dashboard. If you wish to review or update your information, please visit branch.io and login using the username and password you created. Next, please select “Account Settings” which can be found in the lower left corner of the dashboard screen, then select the “User” tab near the top. If you would like to delete your account, please email
support@branch.io
.
We Secure the Information We Collect
Top
Securing the information provided by our Clients and collected through our Website is important to us. Branch has implemented industry-standard technical, administrative, and physical safeguards to help protect the information on our servers against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. You are responsible for maintaining the secrecy of your own passwords. If you have reason to believe that your passwords or Personal Data are no longer secure, please promptly notify us at
privacy@branch.io
.
Branch implements technical and organizational measures designed to protect against unauthorized access, accidental loss, destruction or damage of Client’s data. For more information on our security controls, please see
https://www.branch.io/security/
. If you have questions about the security of your personal information, or if you have reason to believe that the personal information that we hold about you is no longer secure, please contact us immediately as described in this Privacy Policy.
Our Data Retention Policy
Top
For our Services:
Branch retains the information collected by the Services for no more time than is needed to serve the legitimate business need for which it was collected. For example, Branch stores the information collected by our Services for the purposes of establishing matches between devices used by Users (see the “What Information Does Branch Collect from our Services?” section above) so long as our systems continue to encounter that User. After that User has been inactive for 30 days (or 90 days for specific attribution products), information collected from that User by our Services for the purposes of establishing matches between devices used by will be deleted unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Usage activity logs of Users, which are used for the purpose of providing reporting and analytics to the Client, are stored in an identifiable form for no more than 14 days (or up to 60 days as determined by the Client or for specific fields), after which these logs are removed or pseudonymized. Any and all pseudonymized usage activity logs are deleted after 12 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Aggregated reporting metrics disclosed to Clients are retained (in aggregate and anonymized form) for up to 24 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Branch may retain information collected by our Services beyond these periods for fraud prevention, analysis, or response, or to protect the safety of Branch, its Clients, Users or the public.
For the Website:
We retain the information collected by the Website for no more time than is needed to serve the legitimate business need for which it was collected. For example, we store Personal Data such as email address or billing details for so long as you continue to have a business relationship with Branch and for a reasonable time thereafter for record-keeping purposes. If applicable to you, you may ask us to delete that information as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below or pursuant to your right of erasure as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below.
Links to Other Websites
Top
The Website and/or Services may contain links to other websites and other websites may reference or link to our Website and/or Services. These other domains and websites are not controlled by Branch, and we do not endorse or make any representations about websites or social media platforms operated by other parties. We encourage you to read the privacy policies of each and every website and application that you interact with. We do not endorse, screen, or approve, and are not responsible for the privacy practices or content of such other websites or applications. Visiting these other websites or applications is at your own risk.
International Data Transfers
Top
All information collected via the Website and Services is stored on servers located in the United States. In the process of providing the Services, we may transfer information across borders from other countries or jurisdictions into the United States. Data protection laws in the United States may differ from your country, and the data Branch processes may be accessible to law enforcement and national security authorities under certain circumstances. By using the Services, each Client and Website User consents to the transfer and processing of information to the U.S. in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Data transfers from the European Union, United Kingdom, and Switzerland are transferred on the basis of legal mechanisms approved by the European Commission and other relevant authorities for cross-border data transfers, such as Standard Contractual Clauses or the Data Privacy Framework mechanism discussed in the “Data Privacy Framework For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States” section below.
Data Privacy Framework For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States
Top
Branch complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) (collectively, “Data Privacy Frameworks”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of Personal Data from European Union member countries (including European Economic Area member countries), the United Kingdom, and Switzerland transferred to the United States pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks. Branch has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Branch has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the policies in this Privacy Policy and data subject rights under the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the applicable Principles (“DPF Principles”) shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification page, please visit https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/.
Branch no longer relies on the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield to transfer data that originated in the EEA or the United Kingdom to the U.S.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Branch’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
Pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks we are obliged to inform EU, UK, and Swiss individuals whose data is being transferred into the United States that we may be required to release Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities including to meet national security and law enforcement requirements.
Branch remains liable for the onward transfer of EU, UK, and Swiss personal data to other parties pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks unless we can prove we were not a party to the actions giving rise to the damages.
We acknowledge the right of EU, UK, and Swiss individuals to access their Personal Data pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals wishing to exercise this right may do so by contacting privacy@branch.io.
In compliance with the Data Privacy Frameworks, Branch commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information transferred to the United States pursuant to the DPF Principles. European Union, UK, and Swiss individuals with DPF inquiries or complaints should first contact Branch at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
privacy@branch.io
Branch has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the DPF Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, Data Privacy Framework Services, operated by BBB National Programs, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit https://bbbprograms.org/programs/all-programs/dpf-consumers/ProcessForConsumers for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your DPF complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms. See https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/G-Arbitration-Procedures-dpf?tabset-35584=2.
Data Subject Rights
Top
California Consumer Privacy Act
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) provides certain rights to natural persons who are residents of California. Our CCPA privacy notice is available
here
.
Rights of Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
The European General Data Protection Regulation of 2018 (“GDPR”) and equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation (“UK Data Protection Law”) provides certain rights to residents of Europe. Information on how you can exercise rights under the GDPR and UK Data Protection Law are set forth
here
.
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”) provides certain rights to residents of Brazil. Information on how you can exercise rights under the LGPD are set forth
here
.
Our Policy Regarding Children
Top
Services
: The Branch Services are not directed to children. We require that Clients agree to not send to us data relating to any children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16). If you are a Client and want to learn more about Branch
SDK Privacy Controls
that you can use in your compliance with the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA), GDPR, or any other applicable law, please contact privacy@branch.io.
If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16) in violation of applicable law, please contact us at
privacy@branch.io
, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any information that it may have been provided inappropriately as required by law.
Website
: The Branch Website is not directed to children. We do not knowingly collect through the Website Personal Data from anyone under the age of 16. If you are under 16, please do not attempt to register or send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, or email address. No one under 16 may provide any Personal Data to us. In the event that we learn that we have collected any such data from a child under 16 through our Website, we will take reasonable steps to delete that information as quickly as possible. If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 16, please contact us at privacy@branch.io, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any inappropriately obtained information as required by law.
Contact Us, Questions, Changes to This Privacy Policy
Top
We may change this Privacy Policy at any time in our sole discretion. We will post all changes to this Privacy Policy on this page and will indicate at the top of the page the modified Privacy Policy’s effective date. If you have any questions or suggestions regarding this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
info@branch.io
Compliance
Top
This Privacy Policy shall be implemented by Branch and all its operating divisions, subsidiaries and affiliates. Branch has put in place mechanisms to verify ongoing compliance with this Privacy Policy.
Effective July 1st 2024
to
August 14th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Privacy Policy
The Branch Guiding Privacy Principles
Top
Branch is a deep linking and attribution analytics platform for app and website developers. We are proud of our commitment to providing our services in a privacy-first way. So we thought it would be helpful to lay out, in plain English, the Branch Guiding Privacy Principles that drive how we’ve chosen to design our services with privacy as a top priority. We further describe our privacy practices in the official
Privacy Policy
below this section, but we hope you’ll find this summary of our principles helpful.
We limit the data we collect. We practice data minimization, which means that we take steps to avoid collecting or storing information that we don’t need to provide our services. The personal data that we collect to provide our services is limited to data like advertising identifiers, IP address, and information derived from resettable cookies (the full list is below in our privacy policy). We do not collect or store information such as names, email addresses, physical addresses, or SSNs to provide our services. Nor do we want to. In fact, our
Terms & Conditions
prohibit our customers from providing Branch with any kind of sensitive end-user information.
We will only provide you with data about actual end-user activity on your apps or websites. Customers who subscribe to our linking and analytics platform can only access “earned” cookies or identifiers. This means that an end user must visit a customer’s site before our customer can see the cookie; and an end user must download a customer’s app in order for Branch to collect the end user’s advertising identifier for that customer. In short, the Branch services benefit customers who already have seen an end user across their platforms and want to understand the relationship between those web visits and app sessions.
We do not rent or sell customer end user data. No Branch customer can access another Branch customer’s end-user data. And we are not in the business of renting or selling any customer’s end-user data to anyone else. To enable customers to control their end-user personal data, they can request deletion
here
of that data at any time, whether in bulk or for a specific end user. These controls are available to customers worldwide, although we designed them to comply with the CCPA and GDPR requirements.
Beyond these principles stated above, Branch will continue to find ways to design our services to respect end user privacy. We’re committed to making sure our customers understand how we use data they entrust to us and how they can control it so that they can, in turn, be transparent with their end users.
Introduction
Top
Branch Metrics, Inc. ( "Branch", "us", "our" or "we") offers a linking and analytics platform enabling developers of applications (our "Clients")--whether those applications are websites or "apps," and across different types of devices ("Digital Properties")--to improve their end users’ ("Users") cross-application experiences, and to derive additional insights into how their Users download and utilize those applications. Branch recognizes and believes that data privacy is important to all Internet users, and therefore we design and operate our services in a privacy-first manner.
This Privacy Policy is divided into three parts:
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services: This section explains how Branch collects and uses information about Users in connection with our linking and analytics products and services (the "Branch Services" or the "Services").
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes: This section explains how we collect and use information about our website visitors through our website located at branch.io (the “Website”), which includes the dashboard we provide to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. So, if you are a Client using our Branch dashboard, this section applies to the data we collect from you. It also explains how we collect information about potential Clients from vendors and other sources to enhance our marketing efforts.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website: This section lays out the parts of the Branch Privacy Policy that apply to both the Services and to the Website.
Branch and its Clients have entered into an agreement that governs the provision of Services by Branch and their use by Clients ("Agreement(s)"). Such Agreements may contain obligations on the parties with respect to the handling of information processed in the Services. Nothing in this Privacy Policy derogates from such obligations.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services
What Information Does Branch Collect from Our Services?
Top
Below, we explain what information we collect on behalf of our Clients through the Services, and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
The Branch Services: Overview
Top
Branch provides a variety of Services intended to help Clients understand the use of their Digital Properties by their Users across a wide array of platforms, devices and applications. Branch helps Clients by connecting User interactions across siloed applications (email, SMS, web browsers, social platforms, native applications and others), so that Clients understand the multiple steps that a User took to ultimately complete a transaction with the Client. The Client can use this information to better inform marketing and product decisions as well as to provide improved user experiences by using their knowledge of continuity.
Branch has no direct relationship with Users. Branch’s Services are provided when Branch Clients install on their platforms “Branch Mechanisms” (including links, pixels, direct platform integrations, etc.) that capture User action on behalf of the Client. Using the information collected from these Branch Mechanisms, Branch uses a variety of attribution techniques to connect User actions across different channels and platforms. Some of these attribution techniques include a direct pass-through of identifiers from platform to platform, creating and storing identifiers unique to the Branch platform to connect User actions and identifiers together, and predictive modeling algorithms using real-time and historical data parameters observed from User interactions where there are no shared identifiers available, as well as using historical connections Branch has derived over time using our technology. In some cases, these connections are made without the use of cookies. These techniques help Clients match Users with devices they use, including matching the same User across multiple devices.
The key use cases of Branch’s Services are:
To support Clients in implementing deep linking, which uses Branch’s connection information in real time to improve the User experience. For example, if a User clicks on a link in an email or ad to a specific page in a Client’s app, Branch helps the User get to that page after they download the app.
To report individualized and aggregated analytics metrics about the performance of the Client’s product and marketing initiatives to the Client directly. For example, Branch can tell a Client how many Users that downloaded an app or that went to a specific page in an app came from clicking on a specific link and provide corresponding advertising or other identifiers.
To assist the Client by presenting real time, targeted messaging to their Users depending on past behavior observed across the Client’s tracked platforms with the purpose of driving more engagement to the Client. For example, Branch can use Branch Mechanisms to provide a tailored message like a coupon code or special offer in your website to users who have interacted with your app and/or website in the past.
Branch requires that each Client commit to disclose to Branch only information that it has lawfully obtained (including, where necessary, by obtaining consent from Users), and that it has the right to disclose to Branch. We prohibit Clients from providing us with data relating to children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16).
Branch collects data through various methods, including:
When the Client integrates Branch’s SDK’s, API’s, pixels, redirect links, JavaScript tags, cookies or similar data collection technologies into their Digital Properties and/or ads;
From the various advertising networks and third parties that are used by the Client in connection with the measurement and analysis of Client’s marketing campaigns and that have partnered with Branch;
When provided voluntarily by the Client as part of the Branch account registration process.
Clients are also required to inform us if they are using Branch’s services to analyze information protected by HIPAA so that Branch can process such information in a protected environment.
In the charts below, we summarize the information collected automatically by the Services.
Information Collected By Branch Links, Pixels
,
and Similar Technologies
Top
Branch collects the following information from URLs created by the Client (i.e., Branch Links) and pixels placed on Client websites. Branch Links may be embedded into QR Codes as configured by the Client. Some of this information is considered personal data under applicable law (in other words, information that itself may identify a unique individual or can be linked back to an individual) (“Personal Data”). Since Clients have sole control over their Digital Properties and configuration of the Services, Clients are contractually prohibited from configuring the Services to collect directly identifiable personal information , unless otherwise agreed by Branch. If a Client has configured the Services to collect directly identifiable personal information, then Branch may receive and process such data. This includes, for example, a Client using an End User’s email address as a Client issued Developer ID.
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for attribution and to understand general location
Cookie
Standard web cookies, used for device identification and attribution
Link Data
Metadata controlled by the Client, which may be used to interpret the data for reporting, or for analytics
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; used for device identification and attribution
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the webpage from which such ads were displayed, and webpages on Client’s website visited by a User.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their website (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
Information Collected by Branch SDKs
Top
SDKs are Software Development Kits that include code that allows Clients to use the Branch Services. The Branch Mobile App SDKs, Web SDKs, and Over-the-Top (OTT) SDKs collect the following information when Clients use these SDKs in their applications or websites, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
Advertising identifier (e.g., GAID, Android ID, IDFA, IDFV, RIDA)
Used for device identification and attribution
Branch Cookie ID
Used for device identification and attribution
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for device identification, attribution, and to understand general location
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Central Processing Unit (CPU) Type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
System build version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Internet connection type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Application version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device model
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Manufacturer / Brand
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen size (height, width)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen resolution
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile network status (Wi-Fi, etc.)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device locale (country and language)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Local IP address
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile platform
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Branch SDK version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Developer ID
(optional) Client-supplied unique identifier; metadata feature Used for device identification and attribution
Carrier ID
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Environment
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
UI Mode
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the application page from which such ads were displayed, pages on Client’s application visited by a User, downloads, opt-in status for certain tracking mechanisms, and installations of applications.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their application (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
In addition to the information identified above, the Branch Desktop SDKs collect the following identifiers when Clients use these SDKs in their desktop applications, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
MAC address
Used for device identification and attribution
Windows Advertising ID
Used for device identification and attribution
CPU ID
Used for device identification and attribution
Information Collected By Other Parties
Top
As part of Branch’s Services, Branch’s Clients may direct certain of their vendors or business partners (such as an ad network or vendor) that have partnered with Branch to provide certain Engagement Data to Branch on the Client’s behalf in connection with the measurement and analysis of the Client's marketing campaigns.
How Does Branch Use Information Collected by Our Services?
Top
Subject to Agreements with our Clients, data that Branch collects through the Services is processed to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Services we provide our Clients, including to support other Branch products and services, to perform anti-fraud protection analysis, develop new products and services, and market products or services; to support the products and services of our Clients; and as permitted or required by applicable law.
Where authorized by Agreements with our Clients, we may aggregate and/or de-identify the data we collect through the Services. After data has been aggregated and/or de-identified, Branch cannot use it to personally identify an individual. We may use de-identified and/or aggregated data for any purpose, including without limitation for research and marketing purposes, and may also disclose such data to any other parties, including business partners, Clients, and/or others.
Our Clients’ Use of Information
Top
Our Clients may use the information collected via the Services to improve their Users’ app experiences, customize their Digital Properties to Users, and to better understand their app marketing programs and how Users discover their apps. For example, a User may want to disclose information about a hotel that she found in a travel app to a friend. When that User sends her friend a Branch link to that hotel, after clicking the link the friend is brought directly to the content relating to that hotel within the app, rather than landing on the app’s homepage and having to search for the hotel. The travel app would also gain insights and analytics as to how the content is being disclosed from its app.
We require that our Clients utilize our Services responsibly and in accordance with our
Terms & Conditions
, Agreements, or other contracts with us. Branch is not responsible for the data practices of any of our Clients through the Services or otherwise. Each Client’s practices are subject to each Client’s individual privacy policy. Users should review the privacy policy of each Client to understand how that Client uses User information collected through the Services.
User Choices
Top
Branch recognizes a number of consumer choice mechanisms. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality may be degraded or no longer work as a result if you exercise certain of the opt-outs below.
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer read or set cookies (beyond the opt-out cookie itself). Cookie-based opt outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”) and adheres to its Code of Conduct. NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from interest-based advertising by participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt out of the Branch Services on a particular device by submitting a request
here
.
Device Identifiers:
To use your device’s privacy settings controls, please visit the privacy settings menu of your device to review and access the privacy controls made available on the device. Branch will only be able to collect information from the device as permitted by these settings.
Client App Opt-out Controls:
Branch‘s
SDK Privacy Controls
allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data. Clients can flag in the Branch SDK that a particular User’s data should not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Engagement Builder:
Branch's Engagement Builder feature may be used to help Clients conduct re-engagement and re-targeting campaigns. We require that Clients using Branch’s Engagement Builder feature for such purposes respect User opt-out preferences passed to them by Branch.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes
What Information Does Branch Collect about Website Visitors and Potential Customers?
Top
Branch collects information from Website visitors (“you” or “Website Users”) located at www.branch.io ( the “Website”), which includes the dashboard provided to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. The types of information we may collect and our privacy practices depend on the nature of the relationship you have with us and the requirements of applicable law. Below are the legal bases and some of the ways we collect information and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
What We Collect from Clients that Use the Website
Top
Branch collects Personal Data and non-personal data via the Website. For example, when Clients register to use our Services, we ask them to provide us with Personal Data, including first and last name and email address.
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for limited security login controls
Cookie (ours)
Standard web cookie used for dashboard session management
Cookie (other-party)
Other-party web tracking tools used for business intelligence
First, Last Name
Used for team user identification
Work Email
Used as the primary login identifier
Password
Account registration, secure our Services and prevent fraud
Account Holder Primary Role
Account registration, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; may be used for limited security login controls
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for general internal business analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for general internal business analytics
Github ID
(optional) Can be used as a login method
Billing information
Payment account registration
Log Data
Provide the Services, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners, personalize our experience, secure our Services and prevent fraud, and defend our legal rights and comply with the law
Account holder feedback
Help us improve your experience on the account dashboard
Dashboard Information:
Information we collect from visitors who register for an account on our dashboard includes the following, some of which is considered Personal Data under applicable law:When a Client creates an account and uses the Services, Branch may collect certain log data, such as IP address from which a Client is connecting to the Services, information related to the device being used to connect to the Services (e.g., browser type and version, device type, OS version) and the features and functions of the Services used by the Client (“Log Data”).
We also require Clients to set up a user ID and unique password for account security purposes. Clients must not disclose their passwords to anyone. Clients also have the option of adding other team members to their account. This account information enables us to set up an account for Clients, to provide the Services, and to otherwise manage Client accounts. We may also use this information to notify Clients about updates to our Services and provide them with promotional emails. We offer a mechanism to opt out from promotional emails as described in the “Opt-Out from Promotional Emails” section below.
Account and Billing Information:
To the extent that we charge a fee for the Services, we may also collect limited billing, payment, and contract information from Clients through our payment and contract vendors.
Connection Information with Other Parties:
Some features of the dashboard Services allow you to disclose your information through your accounts to other companies such as Facebook and Google. If you choose to connect Branch to such services provided by other parties, we may collect information related to your use of those services provided by other parties, such as authentication tokens that allow us to connect to your accounts with those other parties. We will ask you for permission before you authorize our collection of this information. We may also collect information about how you are using the Services to interact with those connected services.
Information from Other Sources:
In addition to the information collected through our Website, we or our vendors may obtain and disclose additional information, such as job title or contact information, from other public and non-public sources such as business websites, social networking platforms, or databases maintained by other parties. We use this information to better enable Branch to identify and contact businesses that might be interested in engaging our Services, and to gain a better understanding of a potential Client’s business needs.
Communications with Branch:
Some Website Users may provide Personal Data to Branch by sending us an email or filling out an online form on the Website. We use this information to answer their question(s), and may store that information for our record keeping, marketing, and advertising purposes.
Research/Survey Solicitations:
From time to time, we may perform research (online and offline) via surveys. We may engage vendors to conduct such surveys on our behalf. All survey responses are voluntary, and the information collected will be used for research and reporting purposes to help us better serve individuals by learning more about their needs and the quality of the products and services we provide. The survey responses may be utilized to determine the effectiveness of our Website, various types of communications, advertising campaigns and/or promotional activities.
Cookies, Pixels and Web Beacons:
We also collect other data via the Website from Website Users, including Website Users employed by or affiliated with Clients, through cookies and/or web beacons. Such information, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law, may include IP address, pages viewed, browser type, Internet browsing and usage habits, how you browse and navigate the Website, Internet Service Provider, domain name, the time/date of your visit to the Website, the referring URL, and your computer’s operating system. For example, we may collect on a real-time basis information on how you use and navigate the Website.
If your browser settings permit the use of cookies and web beacons when you visit and continue to use the Website, we will collect information through those tools. Cookies are small data files stored on your hard drive by a website and web beacons are electronic images that may be used on our Website or in our emails. Cookies help us improve your experience on the Website as well as our marketing activities. We use cookies to see which areas and features are popular and to count visits to our Website. For more information about cookies and web beacons, please visit
https://www.cookiepro.com/knowledgebase/knowledge_categories/cookies-101/
. For more information about how to opt-out of cookies and web beacons after you have consented to their use, see the “Opt-out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons” section below.
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected?
Top
Branch processes the data described in the section above for the following purposes:
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Website;
to fulfill your and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services;
to send information about the Services including confirmations, invoices, payment processing, technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
to communicate about products and services offered by Branch and Branch's selected partners. We receive opt-in consent to send promotional and marketing messages to Website Users where required by applicable law. You can opt-out of receiving these messages at any time as described below in the section titled: “Opt-out from Promotional Emails”;
to conduct research;
to manage your information and account, to improve and administer our Website, to contact Website Users to answer questions or resolve problems, or to verify your identity;
to conduct research to help us to optimally deliver our existing Services or develop new products, processes and services;
for ad delivery and reporting purposes and to create data and analytics products and services;
to make the Website easier to use by reducing the need for Clients and Website Users to enter information;
for other purposes disclosed to you at the time you provide data to us;
with your consent; or
where Branch otherwise has a legitimate interest in collecting the data, such as direct marketing, individual or market research, product improvement, anti-fraud protection, protecting the safety of us, our Website Users, or other parties, or where required by law.
Opt-Out & Do Not Track - Your Choice Mechanisms
Top
In some cases, we rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you. In those cases, and where you have consented to Branch's processing of your Personal Data in connection with your use of the Website, you may withdraw that consent at any time by following the instructions below. Additionally, before we use Personal Data collected with your consent for any new purpose not originally authorized by you, we will provide information regarding the new purpose and ask for your consent for the new purpose. Where your consent for the processing of Personal Data is otherwise required by law or contract, we will comply with the law or contract. In other cases, we do not rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you (for example, if we have a different legal basis to process that data).
Opt Out from Promotional Emails
Top
You can opt-out of receiving promotional emails from us by following the instructions in those emails, or by filling out
this form
. You can also opt-out of certain categories of emails using
this form
. If you opt-out using any of these tools, we may still send you non-promotional emails, such as certain updates about your account or updates to our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy and/or use of the Services.
Opt Out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons
Top
We will only use cookies consistent with your cookie settings and permissions granted on our Website. If you permit us to use cookies/web beacons as discussed above (“What Information Does Branch Collect from our Website”), but would like to opt-out:
For dashboard users, visit
https://dashboard.branch.io/account-settings/user
, and toggle off “Cookie Consent”.
For all other users, click on “Cookie Consent” at the bottom right-hand corner of our homepage (
https://branch.io/
), and click on the opt-out link.
Also, you can choose to set your browser to remove cookies and to reject cookies. To exercise the "Do Not Track" settings available on certain web browsers, please visit the privacy settings of your browser. Where Branch is able to see that such a selection has been made, we will not use information collected from that device to target advertising on that browser. Dashboard users must use the “Cookie Consent” feature to revoke permission to place cookies. Please note that "Do Not Track" is a different privacy mechanism than the Global Privacy Control browser choice referenced below.
Note that, even if you opt out, we may still collect and use non-personal data regarding your activities on our Website. This also does not opt you out of being served advertising altogether; you will continue to receive generic advertisements.
Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website
Top
The Website utilizes tracking tools from vendors, which may enable these vendors to analyze our Website traffic for analytics purposes. Some of these vendors may collect information from this Website for retargeting and interest-based advertising purposes. For more information about these forms of ad targeting and to understand your right to opt-out from these practices, please visit
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
. All of these tools are hosted by the parties who provide them, and your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policies of the parties providing them. These tools include, but are not limited to, those below.
Google
. We may use Google Analytics and Google Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting to collect information regarding visitor behavior and visitor demographics on our Website, and to develop website content. For more information about Google Analytics, please visit
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
. You can opt-out of Google’s collection and processing of data generated by your use of the Website by going to
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
Mixpanel
. We use a service provided by Mixpanel, Inc. (“Mixpanel”) to provide us with analytics data regarding Website Users’ interactions with our Website and Services. You may opt-out of Mixpanel’s automatic retention of data that is collected while using the Services by visiting
https://mixpanel.com/optout/
. To track opt-outs, Mixpanel uses a persistent opt-out cookie placed on your device. Please note that if you get a new computer, install a new browser, erase or otherwise alter the browser’s cookie file (including upgrading certain browsers), you may delete the Mixpanel opt-out cookie.
Facebook
. We may use certain tools offered by Facebook, Inc. (“Facebook”) that enable it to collect or receive information about actions Website Users take on our Website through use of cookies, web beacons and other storage technologies or in order to provide measurement services, targeted ads and other services. For more information regarding the collection and use of such information by Facebook, please see the Facebook Data Policy, available at:
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php
.
Drift
. We use certain tools offered by Drift to power our Website’s live-chat experience. If you provide information about yourself through that live-chat experience, then we may store that information for marketing purposes. Drift may also infer information about the company that you work for you based on your IP address.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website
When does Branch Disclose Information?
Top
In addition to the ways described in our
Terms & Conditions
, applicable Agreements, and this Privacy Policy, Branch may also disclose information to others under the following circumstances:
With vendors, consultants, global partners, and other parties who assist Branch to provide, support, and maintain the Services and the Website and need access to information we collect to do so;
With our Clients and their agents, as described in this Policy;
To other parties (such as advertising networks or vendors used by our Clients), as directed by our Clients;
To comply with laws or to respond to lawful requests and legal process including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements;
To investigate, prevent, or take action regarding suspected, or actual, prohibited activities, including but not limited to fraud and situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person;
To protect the rights and property of Branch, our agents, Clients, Users, Website Users, and others including to enforce our agreements, policies, and Terms & Conditions;
To Branch’s subsidiaries and affiliates as necessary to help us provide, support, and maintain the Services; and
In connection with or during negotiation of any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
Updating Your Information and Contact Preferences
Top
We provide Clients with a mechanism to access, review and update information via the dashboard. If you wish to review or update your information, please visit branch.io and login using the username and password you created. Next, please select “Account Settings” which can be found in the lower left corner of the dashboard screen, then select the “User” tab near the top. If you would like to delete your account, please email
support@branch.io
.
We Secure the Information We Collect
Top
Securing the information provided by our Clients and collected through our Website is important to us. Branch has implemented industry-standard technical, administrative, and physical safeguards to help protect the information on our servers against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. You are responsible for maintaining the secrecy of your own passwords. If you have reason to believe that your passwords or Personal Data are no longer secure, please promptly notify us at
privacy@branch.io
.
Branch implements technical and organizational measures designed to protect against unauthorized access, accidental loss, destruction or damage of Client’s data. For more information on our security controls, please see
https://www.branch.io/security/
. If you have questions about the security of your personal information, or if you have reason to believe that the personal information that we hold about you is no longer secure, please contact us immediately as described in this Privacy Policy.
Our Data Retention Policy
Top
For our Services:
Branch retains the information collected by the Services for no more time than is needed to serve the legitimate business need for which it was collected. For example, Branch stores the information collected by our Services for the purposes of establishing matches between devices used by Users (see the “What Information Does Branch Collect from our Services?” section above) so long as our systems continue to encounter that User. After that User has been inactive for 30 days (or 90 days for specific attribution products), information collected from that User by our Services for the purposes of establishing matches between devices used by will be deleted unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Usage activity logs of Users, which are used for the purpose of providing reporting and analytics to the Client, are stored in an identifiable form for no more than 7 days (or up to 60 days as determined by the Client or for specific fields), after which these logs are removed or pseudonymized. Any and all pseudonymized usage activity logs are deleted after 12 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Aggregated reporting metrics disclosed to Clients are retained (in aggregate and anonymized form) for up to 24 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Branch may retain information collected by our Services beyond these periods for fraud prevention, analysis, or response, or to protect the safety of Branch, its Clients, Users or the public.
For the Website:
We retain the information collected by the Website for no more time than is needed to serve the legitimate business need for which it was collected. For example, we store Personal Data such as email address or billing details for so long as you continue to have a business relationship with Branch and for a reasonable time thereafter for record-keeping purposes. If applicable to you, you may ask us to delete that information as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below or pursuant to your right of erasure as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below.
Links to Other Websites
Top
The Website and/or Services may contain links to other websites and other websites may reference or link to our Website and/or Services. These other domains and websites are not controlled by Branch, and we do not endorse or make any representations about websites or social media platforms operated by other parties. We encourage you to read the privacy policies of each and every website and application that you interact with. We do not endorse, screen, or approve, and are not responsible for the privacy practices or content of such other websites or applications. Visiting these other websites or applications is at your own risk.
International Data Transfers
Top
All information collected via the Website and Services is stored on servers located in the United States. In the process of providing the Services, we may transfer information across borders from other countries or jurisdictions into the United States. Data protection laws in the United States may differ from your country, and the data Branch processes may be accessible to law enforcement and national security authorities under certain circumstances. By using the Services, each Client and Website User consents to the transfer and processing of information to the U.S. in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Data transfers from the European Union, United Kingdom, and Switzerland are transferred on the basis of legal mechanisms approved by the European Commission and other relevant authorities for cross-border data transfers, such as Standard Contractual Clauses or the Data Privacy Framework mechanism discussed in the “Data Privacy Framework For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States” section below.
Data Privacy Framework For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States
Top
Branch complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) (collectively, “Data Privacy Frameworks”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of Personal Data from European Union member countries (including European Economic Area member countries), the United Kingdom, and Switzerland transferred to the United States pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks. Branch has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Branch has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the policies in this Privacy Policy and data subject rights under the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the applicable Principles (“DPF Principles”) shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification page, please visit https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/.
Branch no longer relies on the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield to transfer data that originated in the EEA or the United Kingdom to the U.S.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Branch’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
Pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks we are obliged to inform EU, UK, and Swiss individuals whose data is being transferred into the United States that we may be required to release Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities including to meet national security and law enforcement requirements.
Branch remains liable for the onward transfer of EU, UK, and Swiss personal data to other parties pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks unless we can prove we were not a party to the actions giving rise to the damages.
We acknowledge the right of EU, UK, and Swiss individuals to access their Personal Data pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals wishing to exercise this right may do so by contacting privacy@branch.io.
In compliance with the Data Privacy Frameworks, Branch commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information transferred to the United States pursuant to the DPF Principles. European Union, UK, and Swiss individuals with DPF inquiries or complaints should first contact Branch at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
privacy@branch.io
Branch has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the DPF Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, Data Privacy Framework Services, operated by BBB National Programs, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit https://bbbprograms.org/programs/all-programs/dpf-consumers/ProcessForConsumers for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your DPF complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms. See https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/G-Arbitration-Procedures-dpf?tabset-35584=2.
Data Subject Rights
Top
California Consumer Privacy Act
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) provides certain rights to natural persons who are residents of California. Our CCPA privacy notice is available
here
.
Rights of Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
The European General Data Protection Regulation of 2018 (“GDPR”) and equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation (“UK Data Protection Law”) provides certain rights to residents of Europe. Information on how you can exercise rights under the GDPR and UK Data Protection Law are set forth
here
.
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”) provides certain rights to residents of Brazil. Information on how you can exercise rights under the LGPD are set forth
here
.
Our Policy Regarding Children
Top
Services
: The Branch Services are not directed to children. We require that Clients agree to not send to us data relating to any children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16). If you are a Client and want to learn more about Branch
SDK Privacy Controls
that you can use in your compliance with the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA), GDPR, or any other applicable law, please contact privacy@branch.io.
If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16) in violation of applicable law, please contact us at
privacy@branch.io
, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any information that it may have been provided inappropriately as required by law.
Website
: The Branch Website is not directed to children. We do not knowingly collect through the Website Personal Data from anyone under the age of 16. If you are under 16, please do not attempt to register or send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, or email address. No one under 16 may provide any Personal Data to us. In the event that we learn that we have collected any such data from a child under 16 through our Website, we will take reasonable steps to delete that information as quickly as possible. If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 16, please contact us at privacy@branch.io, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any inappropriately obtained information as required by law.
Contact Us, Questions, Changes to This Privacy Policy
Top
We may change this Privacy Policy at any time in our sole discretion. We will post all changes to this Privacy Policy on this page and will indicate at the top of the page the modified Privacy Policy’s effective date. If you have any questions or suggestions regarding this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
info@branch.io
Compliance
Top
This Privacy Policy shall be implemented by Branch and all its operating divisions, subsidiaries and affiliates. Branch has put in place mechanisms to verify ongoing compliance with this Privacy Policy.
Effective December 28th 2023
to
July 1st 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Privacy Policy
The Branch Guiding Privacy Principles
Top
Branch is a deep linking and attribution analytics platform for app and website developers. We are proud of our commitment to providing our services in a privacy-first way. So we thought it would be helpful to lay out, in plain English, the Branch Guiding Privacy Principles that drive how we’ve chosen to design our services with privacy as a top priority. We further describe our privacy practices in the official
Privacy Policy
below this section, but we hope you’ll find this summary of our principles helpful.
We limit the data we collect. We practice data minimization, which means that we take steps to avoid collecting or storing information that we don’t need to provide our services. The personal data that we collect to provide our services is limited to data like advertising identifiers, IP address, and information derived from resettable cookies (the full list is below in our privacy policy). We do not collect or store information such as names, email addresses, physical addresses, or SSNs to provide our services. Nor do we want to. In fact, our
Terms & Conditions
prohibit our customers from providing Branch with any kind of sensitive end-user information.
We will only provide you with data about actual end-user activity on your apps or websites. Customers who subscribe to our linking and analytics platform can only access “earned” cookies or identifiers. This means that an end user must visit a customer’s site before our customer can see the cookie; and an end user must download a customer’s app in order for Branch to collect the end user’s advertising identifier for that customer. In short, the Branch services benefit customers who already have seen an end user across their platforms and want to understand the relationship between those web visits and app sessions.
We do not rent or sell customer end user data. No Branch customer can access another Branch customer’s end-user data. And we are not in the business of renting or selling any customer’s end-user data to anyone else. To enable customers to control their end-user personal data, they can request deletion
here
of that data at any time, whether in bulk or for a specific end user. These controls are available to customers worldwide, although we designed them to comply with the CCPA and GDPR requirements.
Beyond these principles stated above, Branch will continue to find ways to design our services to respect end user privacy. We’re committed to making sure our customers understand how we use data they entrust to us and how they can control it so that they can, in turn, be transparent with their end users.
Introduction
Top
Branch Metrics, Inc. ( "Branch", "us", "our" or "we") offers a linking and analytics platform enabling developers of applications (our "Clients")--whether those applications are websites or "apps," and across different types of devices ("Digital Properties")--to improve their end users’ ("Users") cross-application experiences, and to derive additional insights into how their Users download and utilize those applications. Branch recognizes and believes that data privacy is important to all Internet users, and therefore we design and operate our services in a privacy-first manner.
This Privacy Policy is divided into three parts:
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services: This section explains how Branch collects and uses information about Users in connection with our linking and analytics products and services (the "Branch Services" or the "Services").
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes: This section explains how we collect and use information about our website visitors through our website located at branch.io (the “Website”), which includes the dashboard we provide to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. So, if you are a Client using our Branch dashboard, this section applies to the data we collect from you. It also explains how we collect information about potential Clients from vendors and other sources to enhance our marketing efforts.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website: This section lays out the parts of the Branch Privacy Policy that apply to both the Services and to the Website.
Branch and its Clients have entered into an agreement that governs the provision of Services by Branch and their use by Clients ("Agreement(s)"). Such Agreements may contain obligations on the parties with respect to the handling of information processed in the Services. Nothing in this Privacy Policy derogates from such obligations.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services
What Information Does Branch Collect from Our Services?
Top
Below, we explain what information we collect on behalf of our Clients through the Services, and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
The Branch Services: Overview
Top
Branch provides a variety of Services intended to help Clients understand the use of their Digital Properties by their Users across a wide array of platforms, devices and applications. Branch helps Clients by connecting User interactions across siloed applications (email, SMS, web browsers, social platforms, native applications and others), so that Clients understand the multiple steps that a User took to ultimately complete a transaction with the Client. The Client can use this information to better inform marketing and product decisions as well as to provide improved user experiences by using their knowledge of continuity.
Branch has no direct relationship with Users. Branch’s Services are provided when Branch Clients install on their platforms “Branch Mechanisms” (including links, pixels, direct platform integrations, etc.) that capture User action on behalf of the Client. Using the information collected from these Branch Mechanisms, Branch uses a variety of attribution techniques to connect User actions across different channels and platforms. Some of these attribution techniques include a direct pass-through of identifiers from platform to platform, creating and storing identifiers unique to the Branch platform to connect User actions and identifiers together, and predictive modeling algorithms using real-time and historical data parameters observed from User interactions where there are no shared identifiers available, as well as using historical connections Branch has derived over time using our technology. In some cases, these connections are made without the use of cookies. These techniques help Clients match Users with devices they use, including matching the same User across multiple devices.
The key use cases of Branch’s Services are:
To support Clients in implementing deep linking,
which uses Branch’s connection information in real time to improve the User experience. For example, if a User clicks on a link in an email or ad to a specific page in a Client’s app, Branch helps the User get to that page after they download the app.
To report individualized and aggregated analytics metrics about the performance of the Client’s product and marketing initiatives to the Client directly. For example, Branch can tell a Client how many Users that downloaded an app or that went to a specific page in an app came from clicking on a specific link and provide corresponding advertising or other identifiers.
To assist the Client by presenting real time, targeted messaging to their Users depending on past behavior observed across the Client’s tracked platforms with the purpose of driving more engagement to the Client.  For example, Branch can use Branch Mechanisms to provide a tailored message like a coupon code or special offer in your website to users who have interacted with your app and/or website in the past.
Branch requires that each Client commit to disclose to Branch only information that it has lawfully obtained (including, where necessary, by obtaining consent from Users), and that it has the right to disclose to Branch. We strongly discourage Clients from disclosing sensitive User information with us, as such information is not necessary for the provision of the Services, and we prohibit them from providing us with data relating to children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16).
Branch collects data through various methods, including:
When the Client integrates Branch’s SDK’s, API’s, pixels, redirect links, JavaScript tags, cookies or similar data collection technologies into their Digital Properties and/or ads;
From the various advertising networks and third parties that are used by the Client in connection with the measurement and analysis of Client’s marketing campaigns and that have partnered with Branch;
When provided voluntarily by the Client as part of the Branch account registration process;
In the charts below, we summarize the information collected automatically by the Services.
Information Collected By Branch Links, Pixels
,
and Similar Technologies
Top
Branch collects the following information from URLs created by the Client (i.e., Branch Links) and pixels placed on Client websites. Branch Links may be embedded into QR Codes as configured by the Client. Some of this information is considered personal data under applicable law (in other words, information that itself may identify a unique individual or can be linked back to an individual) (“Personal Data”).
Since Clients have sole control over their Digital Properties and configuration of the Services, Clients are contractually prohibited from configuring the Services to collect directly identifiable personal information , unless otherwise agreed by Branch. If a Client has configured the Services to collect directly identifiable personal information, then Branch may receive and process such data. This includes, for example, a Client using an End User’s email address as a Client issued Developer ID.
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for attribution and to understand general location
Cookie
Standard web cookies, used for device identification and attribution
Link Data
Metadata controlled by the Client, which may be used to interpret the data for reporting, or for analytics
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; used for device identification and attribution
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the webpage from which such ads were displayed, and webpages on Client’s website visited by a User.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their website (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
Information Collected by Branch SDKs
Top
SDKs are Software Development Kits that include code that allows Clients to use the Branch Services. The Branch Mobile App SDKs, Web SDKs, and Over-the-Top (OTT) SDKs collect the following information when Clients use these SDKs in their applications or websites, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
Advertising identifier (e.g., GAID, Android ID, IDFA, IDFV, RIDA)
Used for device identification and attribution
Branch Cookie ID
Used for device identification and attribution
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for device identification, attribution, and to understand general location
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Central Processing Unit (CPU) Type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
System build version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Internet connection type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Application version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device model
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Manufacturer / Brand
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen size (height, width)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen resolution
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile network status (Wi-Fi, etc.)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device locale (country and language)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Local IP address
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile platform
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Branch SDK version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Developer ID
(optional) Client-supplied unique identifier; metadata feature Used for device identification and attribution
Carrier ID
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Environment
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
UI Mode
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the application page from which such ads were displayed, pages on Client’s application visited by a User, downloads, opt-in status for certain tracking mechanisms, and installations of applications.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their application (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
In addition to the information identified above, the Branch Desktop SDKs collect the following identifiers when Clients use these SDKs in their desktop applications, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
MAC address
Used for device identification and attribution
Windows Advertising ID
Used for device identification and attribution
CPU ID
Used for device identification and attribution
Information Collected By Other Parties
Top
As part of Branch’s Services, Branch’s Clients may direct certain of their vendors or business partners (such as an ad network or vendor) that have partnered with Branch to provide certain Engagement Data to Branch on the Client’s behalf in connection with the measurement and analysis of the Client's marketing campaigns.
How Does Branch Use Information Collected by Our Services?
Top
Data that Branch collects through the Services is processed to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Services we provide our Clients, including to support other Branch products and services, to perform anti-fraud protection analysis, develop new products and services, and market products or services; to support the products and services of our Clients; and as permitted or required by applicable law.
We may aggregate and/or de-identify the data we collect through the Services. After data has been aggregated and/or de-identified, Branch cannot use it to personally identify an individual. We may use de-identified and/or aggregated data for any purpose, including without limitation for research and marketing purposes, and may also disclose such data to any other parties, including business partners, Clients, and/or others.
Our Clients’ Use of Information
Top
Our Clients may use the information collected via the Services to improve their Users’ app experiences, customize their Digital Properties to Users, and to better understand their app marketing programs and how Users discover their apps. For example, a User may want to disclose information about a hotel that she found in a travel app to a friend. When that User sends her friend a Branch link to that hotel, after clicking the link the friend is brought directly to the content relating to that hotel within the app, rather than landing on the app’s homepage and having to search for the hotel. The travel app would also gain insights and analytics as to how the content is being disclosed from its app.
We require that our Clients utilize our Services responsibly and in accordance with our
Terms & Conditions
. Branch is not responsible for the data practices of any of our Clients through the Services or otherwise. Each Client’s practices are subject to each Client’s individual privacy policy. Users should review the privacy policy of each Client to understand how that Client uses User information collected through the Services.
User Choices
Top
Branch recognizes a number of consumer choice mechanisms. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality may be degraded or no longer work as a result if you exercise certain of the opt-outs below.
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer read or set cookies (beyond the opt-out cookie itself). Cookie-based opt outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”) and adheres to its Code of Conduct. NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from interest-based advertising by participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt out of the Branch Services on a particular device by submitting a request
here
.
Device Identifiers:
To use your device’s privacy settings controls, please visit the privacy settings menu of your device to review and access the privacy controls made available on the device. Branch will only be able to collect information from the device as permitted by these settings.
Client App Opt-out Controls:
Branch‘s
SDK Privacy Controls
allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data. Clients can flag in the Branch SDK that a particular User’s data should not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Engagement Builder:
Branch's Engagement Builder feature may be used to help Clients conduct re-engagement and re-targeting campaigns. We require that Clients using Branch’s Engagement Builder feature for such purposes respect User opt-out preferences passed to them by Branch.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes
What Information Does Branch Collect about Website Visitors and Potential Customers?
Top
Branch collects information from Website visitors (“you” or “Website Users”) located at www.branch.io ( the “Website”), which includes the dashboard provided to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. The types of information we may collect and our privacy practices depend on the nature of the relationship you have with us and the requirements of applicable law. Below are the legal bases and some of the ways we collect information and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
What We Collect from Clients that Use the Website
Top
Branch collects Personal Data and non-personal data via the Website. For example, when Clients register to use our Services, we ask them to provide us with Personal Data, including first and last name and email address.
Dashboard Information:
Information we collect from visitors who register for an account on our dashboard includes the following, some of which is considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for limited security login controls
Cookie (ours)
Standard web cookie used for dashboard session management
Cookie (other-party)
Other-party web tracking tools used for business intelligence
First, Last Name
Used for team user identification
Work Email
Used as the primary login identifier
Password
Account registration, secure our Services and prevent fraud
Account Holder Primary Role
Account registration, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; may be used for limited security login controls
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for general internal business analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for general internal business analytics
Github ID
(optional) Can be used as a login method
Billing information
Payment account registration
Log Data
Provide the Services, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners, personalize our experience, secure our Services and prevent fraud, and defend our legal rights and comply with the law
Account holder feedback
Help us improve your experience on the account dashboard
When a Client creates an account and uses the Services, Branch may collect certain log data, such as IP address from which a Client is connecting to the Services, information related to the device being used to connect to the Services (e.g., browser type and version, device type, OS version) and the features and functions of the Services used by the Client (“Log Data”).
We also require Clients to set up a user ID and unique password for account security purposes. Clients must not disclose their passwords to anyone. Clients also have the option of adding other team members to their account. This account information enables us to set up an account for Clients, to provide the Services, and to otherwise manage Client accounts. We may also use this information to notify Clients about updates to our Services and provide them with promotional emails. We offer a mechanism to opt out from promotional emails as described in the “Opt-Out from Promotional Emails” section below.
Account and Billing Information:
To the extent that we charge a fee for the Services, we may also collect limited billing, payment, and contract information from Clients through our payment and contract vendors.
Connection Information with Other Parties:
Some features of the dashboard Services allow you to disclose your information through your accounts to other companies such as Facebook and Google. If you choose to connect Branch to such services provided by other parties, we may collect information related to your use of those services provided by other parties, such as authentication tokens that allow us to connect to your accounts with those other parties. We will ask you for permission before you authorize our collection of this information. We may also collect information about how you are using the Services to interact with those connected services.
Information from Other Sources:
In addition to the information collected through our Website, we or our vendors may obtain and disclose additional information, such as job title or contact information, from other public and non-public sources such as business websites, social networking platforms, or databases maintained by other parties. We use this information to better enable Branch to identify and contact businesses that might be interested in engaging our Services, and to gain a better understanding of a potential Client’s business needs.
Communications with Branch:
Some Website Users may provide Personal Data to Branch by sending us an email or filling out an online form on the Website. We use this information to answer their question(s), and may store that information for our record keeping, marketing, and advertising purposes.
Research/Survey Solicitations:
From time to time, we may perform research (online and offline) via surveys. We may engage vendors to conduct such surveys on our behalf. All survey responses are voluntary, and the information collected will be used for research and reporting purposes to help us better serve individuals by learning more about their needs and the quality of the products and services we provide. The survey responses may be utilized to determine the effectiveness of our Website, various types of communications, advertising campaigns and/or promotional activities.
Cookies, Pixels and Web Beacons:
We also collect other data via the Website from Website Users, including Website Users employed by or affiliated with Clients, through cookies and/or web beacons. Such information, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law, may include IP address, pages viewed, browser type, Internet browsing and usage habits, how you browse and navigate the Website, Internet Service Provider, domain name, the time/date of your visit to the Website, the referring URL, and your computer’s operating system. For example, we may collect on a real-time basis information on how you use and navigate the Website.
If your browser settings permit the use of cookies and web beacons when you visit and continue to use the Website, we will collect information through those tools. Cookies are small data files stored on your hard drive by a website and web beacons are electronic images that may be used on our Website or in our emails. Cookies help us improve your experience on the Website as well as our marketing activities. We use cookies to see which areas and features are popular and to count visits to our Website. For more information about cookies and web beacons, please visit
https://www.cookiepro.com/knowledgebase/knowledge_categories/cookies-101/
. For more information about how to opt-out of cookies and web beacons after you have consented to their use, see the “Opt-out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons” section below.
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected?
Top
Branch processes the data described in the section above for the following purposes:
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Website;
to fulfill your and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services;
to send information about the Services including confirmations, invoices, payment processing, technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
to communicate about products and services offered by Branch and Branch's selected partners. We receive opt-in consent to send promotional and marketing messages to Website Users where required by applicable law. You can opt-out of receiving these messages at any time as described below in the section titled: “Opt-out from Promotional Emails”;
to conduct research;
to manage your information and account, to improve and administer our Website, to contact Website Users to answer questions or resolve problems, or to verify your identity;
to conduct research to help us to optimally deliver our existing Services or develop new products, processes and services;
for ad delivery and reporting purposes and to create data and analytics products and services;
to make the Website easier to use by reducing the need for Clients and Website Users to enter information;
for other purposes disclosed to you at the time you provide data to us;
with your consent; or
where Branch otherwise has a legitimate interest in collecting the data, such as direct marketing, individual or market research, product improvement, anti-fraud protection, protecting the safety of us, our Website Users, or other parties, or where required by law.
Opt-Out & Do Not Track - Your Choice Mechanisms
Top
In some cases, we rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you. In those cases, and where you have consented to Branch's processing of your Personal Data in connection with your use of the Website, you may withdraw that consent at any time by following the instructions below. Additionally, before we use Personal Data collected with your consent for any new purpose not originally authorized by you, we will provide information regarding the new purpose and ask for your consent for the new purpose. Where your consent for the processing of Personal Data is otherwise required by law or contract, we will comply with the law or contract. In other cases, we do not rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you (for example, if we have a different legal basis to process that data).
Opt Out from Promotional Emails
Top
You can opt-out of receiving promotional emails from us by following the instructions in those emails, or by filling out
this form
. You can also opt-out of certain categories of emails using
this form
. If you opt-out using any of these tools, we may still send you non-promotional emails, such as certain updates about your account or updates to our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy and/or use of the Services.
Opt Out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons
Top
We will only use cookies consistent with your cookie settings and permissions granted on our Website. If you permit us to use cookies/web beacons as discussed above (“What Information Does Branch Collect from our Website”), but would like to opt-out:
For dashboard users, visit
https://dashboard.branch.io/account-settings/user
, and toggle off “Cookie Consent”.
For all other users, click on “Cookie Consent” at the bottom right-hand corner of our homepage (
https://branch.io/
), and click on the opt-out link.
Also, you can choose to set your browser to remove cookies and to reject cookies. To exercise the "Do Not Track" settings available on certain web browsers, please visit the privacy settings of your browser. Where Branch is able to see that such a selection has been made, we will not use information collected from that device to target advertising on that browser. Dashboard users must use the “Cookie Consent” feature to revoke permission to place cookies. Please note that "Do Not Track" is a different privacy mechanism than the Global Privacy Control browser choice referenced below.
Note that, even if you opt out, we may still collect and use non-personal data regarding your activities on our Website. This also does not opt you out of being served advertising altogether; you will continue to receive generic advertisements.
Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website
Top
The Website utilizes tracking tools from vendors, which may enable these vendors to analyze our Website traffic for analytics purposes. Some of these vendors may collect information from this Website for retargeting and interest-based advertising purposes. For more information about these forms of ad targeting and to understand your right to opt-out from these practices, please visit
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
. All of these tools are hosted by the parties who provide them, and your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policies of the parties providing them. These tools include, but are not limited to, those below.
Google.
We may use Google Analytics and Google Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting to collect information regarding visitor behavior and visitor demographics on our Website, and to develop website content. For more information about Google Analytics, please visit
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
. You can opt-out of Google’s collection and processing of data generated by your use of the Website by going to
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
Mixpanel.
We use a service provided by Mixpanel, Inc. (“Mixpanel”) to provide us with analytics data regarding Website Users’ interactions with our Website and Services. You may opt-out of Mixpanel’s automatic retention of data that is collected while using the Services by visiting
https://mixpanel.com/optout/
. To track opt-outs, Mixpanel uses a persistent opt-out cookie placed on your device. Please note that if you get a new computer, install a new browser, erase or otherwise alter the browser’s cookie file (including upgrading certain browsers), you may delete the Mixpanel opt-out cookie.
Facebook.
We may use certain tools offered by Facebook, Inc. (“Facebook”) that enable it to collect or receive information about actions Website Users take on our Website through use of cookies, web beacons and other storage technologies or in order to provide measurement services, targeted ads and other services. For more information regarding the collection and use of such information by Facebook, please see the Facebook Data Policy, available at:
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php
.
Drift.
We use certain tools offered by Drift to power our Website’s live-chat experience. If you provide information about yourself through that live-chat experience, then we may store that information for marketing purposes. Drift may also infer information about the company that you work for you based on your IP address.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website
When does Branch Disclose Information?
Top
In addition to the ways described in our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy, Branch may also disclose information to others under the following circumstances:
With vendors, consultants, global partners, and other parties who assist Branch to provide, support, and maintain the Services and the Website and need access to information we collect to do so;
With our Clients and their agents, as described in this Policy;
To other parties (such as advertising networks or vendors used by our Clients), as directed by our Clients;
To comply with laws or to respond to lawful requests and legal process including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements;
To investigate, prevent, or take action regarding suspected, or actual, prohibited activities, including but not limited to fraud and situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person;
To protect the rights and property of Branch, our agents, Clients, Users, Website Users, and others including to enforce our agreements, policies, and Terms & Conditions;
To Branch’s subsidiaries and affiliates as necessary to help us provide, support, and maintain the Services; and
In connection with or during negotiation of any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
Updating Your Information and Contact Preferences
Top
We provide Clients with a mechanism to access, review and update information via the dashboard. If you wish to review or update your information, please visit branch.io and login using the username and password you created. Next, please select “Account Settings” which can be found in the lower left corner of the dashboard screen, then select the “User” tab near the top. If you would like to delete your account, please email
support@branch.io
.
We Secure the Information We Collect
Top
Securing the information provided by our Clients and collected through our Website is important to us. Branch has implemented industry-standard technical, administrative, and physical safeguards to help protect the information on our servers against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. You are responsible for maintaining the secrecy of your own passwords. If you have reason to believe that your passwords or Personal Data are no longer secure, please promptly notify us at
privacy@branch.io
.
Branch implements technical and organizational measures designed to protect against unauthorized access, accidental loss, destruction or damage of Client’s data. For more information on our security controls, please see
https://www.branch.io/security/
.  If you have questions about the security of your personal information, or if you have reason to believe that the personal information that we hold about you is no longer secure, please contact us immediately as described in this Privacy Policy.
Our Data Retention Policy
Top
For our Services:
Branch
retains the information collected by the Services for no more time than is needed to serve the legitimate business need for which it was collected. For example, Branch stores the information collected by our Services for the purposes of establishing matches between devices used by Users (see the “What Information Does Branch Collect from our Services?” section above) so long as our systems continue to encounter that User. After that User has been inactive for 30 days (or 90 days for specific attribution products), information collected from that User by our Services for the purposes of establishing matches between devices used by will be deleted unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Usage activity logs of Users, which are used for the purpose of providing reporting and analytics to the Client, are stored in an identifiable form for no more than 7 days (or up to 60 days as determined by the Client or for specific fields), after which these logs are removed or pseudonymized. Any and all pseudonymized usage activity logs are deleted after 12 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Aggregated reporting metrics disclosed to Clients are retained (in aggregate and anonymized form) for up to 24 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Branch may retain information collected by our Services beyond these periods for fraud prevention, analysis, or response, or to protect the safety of Branch, its Clients, Users or the public.
For the Website:
We retain the information collected by the Website for no more time than is needed to serve the legitimate business need for which it was collected. For example, we store Personal Data such as email address or billing details for so long as you continue to have a business relationship with Branch and for a reasonable time thereafter for record-keeping purposes. If applicable to you, you may ask us to delete that information as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below or pursuant to your right of erasure as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below.
Links to Other Websites
Top
The Website and/or Services may contain links to other websites and other websites may reference or link to our Website and/or Services. These other domains and websites are not controlled by Branch, and we do not endorse or make any representations about websites or social media platforms operated by other parties. We encourage you to read the privacy policies of each and every website and application that you interact with. We do not endorse, screen, or approve, and are not responsible for the privacy practices or content of such other websites or applications. Visiting these other websites or applications is at your own risk.
International Data Transfers
Top
All information collected via the Website and Services is stored on servers located in the United States. In the process of providing the Services, we may transfer information across borders from other countries or jurisdictions into the United States. Data protection laws in the United States may differ from your country, and the data Branch processes may be accessible to law enforcement and national security authorities under certain circumstances. By using the Services, each Client and Website User consents to the transfer and processing of information to the U.S. in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Data transfers from the European Union, United Kingdom, and Switzerland are transferred on the basis of legal mechanisms approved by the European Commission and other relevant authorities for cross-border data transfers, such as Standard Contractual Clauses or the Data Privacy Framework mechanism discussed in the “Data Privacy Framework For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States” section below.
Data Privacy Framework For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States
Top
Branch complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) (collectively, “Data Privacy Frameworks”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of Personal Data from European Union member countries (including European Economic Area member countries), the United Kingdom, and Switzerland transferred to the United States pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks. Branch has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Branch has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the policies in this Privacy Policy and data subject rights under the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the applicable Principles (“DPF Principles”) shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification page, please visit https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/.
Branch no longer relies on the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield to transfer data that originated in the EEA or the United Kingdom to the U.S.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Branch’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
Pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks we are obliged to inform EU, UK, and Swiss individuals whose data is being transferred into the United States that we may be required to release Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities including to meet national security and law enforcement requirements.
Branch remains liable for the onward transfer of EU, UK, and Swiss personal data to other parties pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks unless we can prove we were not a party to the actions giving rise to the damages.
We acknowledge the right of EU, UK, and Swiss individuals to access their Personal Data pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals wishing to exercise this right may do so by contacting privacy@branch.io.
In compliance with the Data Privacy Frameworks, Branch commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information transferred to the United States pursuant to the DPF Principles. European Union, UK, and Swiss individuals with DPF inquiries or complaints should first contact Branch at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
privacy@branch.io
Branch has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the DPF Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, Data Privacy Framework Services, operated by BBB National Programs, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit https://bbbprograms.org/programs/all-programs/dpf-consumers/ProcessForConsumers for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your DPF complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms. See https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/G-Arbitration-Procedures-dpf?tabset-35584=2.
Data Subject Rights
Top
California Consumer Privacy Act
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) provides certain rights to natural persons who are residents of California. Our CCPA privacy notice is available
here
.
Rights of Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
The European General Data Protection Regulation of 2018 (“GDPR”) and equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation (“UK Data Protection Law”) provides certain rights to residents of Europe. Information on how you can exercise rights under the GDPR and UK Data Protection Law are set forth
here
.
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”) provides certain rights to residents of Brazil. Information on how you can exercise rights under the LGPD are set forth
here
.
Our Policy Regarding Children
Top
Services: The Branch Services are not directed to children. We require that Clients agree to not send to us data relating to any children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16). If you are a Client and want to learn more about Branch
SDK Privacy Controls
that you can use in your compliance with the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA), GDPR, or any other applicable law, please contact privacy@branch.io.
If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16) in violation of applicable law, please contact us at
privacy@branch.io
, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any information that it may have been provided inappropriately as required by law.
Website: The Branch Website is not directed to children. We do not knowingly collect through the Website Personal Data from anyone under the age of 16. If you are under 16, please do not attempt to register or send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, or email address. No one under 16 may provide any Personal Data to us. In the event that we learn that we have collected any such data from a child under 16 through our Website, we will take reasonable steps to delete that information as quickly as possible. If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 16, please contact us at privacy@branch.io, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any inappropriately obtained information as required by law.
Contact Us, Questions, Changes to This Privacy Policy
Top
We may change this Privacy Policy at any time in our sole discretion. We will post all changes to this Privacy Policy on this page and will indicate at the top of the page the modified Privacy Policy’s effective date. If you have any questions or suggestions regarding this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
info@branch.io
Compliance
Top
This Privacy Policy shall be implemented by Branch and all its operating divisions, subsidiaries and affiliates. Branch has put in place mechanisms to verify ongoing compliance with this Privacy Policy.
Effective October 12th 2023
to
December 28th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Privacy Policy
Effective October 6, 2023
The Branch Guiding Privacy Principles
Top
We are a linking and analytics platform for app and website developers. And we are proud of our commitment to providing our services in a privacy-first way. So we thought it would be helpful to lay out, in plain English, the Branch Guiding Privacy Principles that drive how we’ve chosen to design our services with privacy as a top priority. We further describe our privacy practices in the official
Privacy Policy
below this section, but we hope you’ll find this summary of our principles helpful.
We limit the data we collect. We practice data minimization, which means that we take steps to avoid collecting or storing information that we don’t need to provide our services. The personal data that we collect to provide our services is limited to data like advertising identifiers, IP address, and information derived from resettable cookies (the full list is below in our privacy policy). We do not collect or store information such as names, email addresses, physical addresses, or SSNs to provide our services. Nor do we want to. In fact, our
Terms & Conditions
prohibit our customers from providing Branch with any kind of sensitive end-user information.
We will only provide you with data about actual end-user activity on your apps or websites. Customers who subscribe to our linking and analytics platform can only access “earned” cookies or identifiers. This means that an end user must visit a customer’s site before our customer can see the cookie; and an end user must download a customer’s app in order for Branch to collect the end user’s advertising identifier for that customer. In short, the Branch services benefit customers who already have seen an end user across their platforms and want to understand the relationship between those web visits and app sessions.
We do not rent or sell customer end user data. No Branch customer can access another Branch customer’s end-user data. And we are not in the business of renting or selling any customer’s end-user data to anyone else. To enable customers to control their end-user personal data, they can request deletion
here
of that data at any time, whether in bulk or for a specific end user. These controls are available to customers worldwide, although we designed them to comply with the CCPA and GDPR requirements.
Beyond these principles stated above, Branch will continue to find ways to design our services to respect end user privacy. We’re committed to making sure our customers understand how we use data they entrust to us and how they can control it so that they can, in turn, be transparent with their end users.
Introduction
Top
Branch Metrics, Inc. ( "Branch", "us", "our" or "we") offers a linking and analytics platform enabling developers of applications (our "Clients")--whether those applications are websites or "apps," and across different types of devices--to improve their end users’ ("Users") cross-application experiences, and to derive additional insights into how their Users download and utilize those applications. Branch recognizes and believes that data privacy is important to all Internet users, and therefore we design and operate our services in a privacy-first manner.
This Privacy Policy is divided into three parts:
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services: This section explains how Branch collects and uses information about Users in connection with our linking and analytics products and services (the "Branch Services" or the "Services").
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes: This section explains how we collect and use information about our website visitors through our website located at branch.io (the “Website”), which includes the dashboard we provide to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. So, if you are a Client using our Branch dashboard, this section applies to the data we collect from you. It also explains how we collect information about potential Clients from vendors and other sources to enhance our marketing efforts.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website: This section lays out the parts of the Branch Privacy Policy that apply to both the Services and to the Website.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services
What Information Does Branch Collect from Our Services?
Top
Below, we explain what information we collect on behalf of our Clients through the Services, and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
The Branch Services: Overview
Top
Branch provides a variety of Services intended to help Clients understand the use of their digital properties by their Users across a wide array of platforms, devices and applications. Branch helps Clients by connecting User interactions across siloed applications (email, SMS, web browsers, social platforms, native applications and others), so that Clients understand the multiple steps that a User took to ultimately complete a transaction with the Client. The Client can use this information to better inform marketing and product decisions as well as to provide improved user experiences by using their knowledge of continuity.
Branch has no direct relationship with Users. Branch’s Services are provided when Branch Clients install on their platforms “Branch Mechanisms” (including links, pixels, direct platform integrations, etc.) that capture User action on behalf of the Client. Using the information collected from these Branch Mechanisms, Branch uses a variety of attribution techniques to connect User actions across different channels and platforms. Some of these attribution techniques include a direct pass-through of identifiers from platform to platform, creating and storing identifiers unique to the Branch platform to connect User actions and identifiers together, and predictive modeling algorithms using real-time and historical data parameters observed from User interactions where there are no shared identifiers available, as well as using historical connections Branch has derived over time using our technology. In some cases, these connections are made without the use of cookies. These techniques help Clients match Users with devices they use, including matching the same User across multiple devices.
The key use cases of Branch’s Services are:
To support Clients in implementing deep linking, which uses Branch’s connection information in real time to improve the User experience.
For example, if a User clicks on a link in an email or ad to a specific page in a Client’s app, Branch helps the User get to that page after they download the app.
To report individualized and aggregated analytics metrics about the performance of the Client’s product and marketing initiatives to the Client directly.
For example, Branch can tell a Client how many Users that downloaded an app or that went to a specific page in an app came from clicking on a specific link, and provide corresponding advertising or other identifiers.
To assist the Client by presenting real time, targeted messaging to their Users depending on past behavior observed across the Client’s tracked platforms with the purpose of driving more engagement to the Client.
For example, Branch can use Branch Mechanisms to provide a tailored message like a coupon code or special offer in your website to users who have interacted with your app and/or website in the past.
Branch requires that each Client commit to disclose to Branch only information that it has lawfully obtained (including, where necessary, by obtaining consent from Users), and that it has the right to disclose to Branch. We strongly discourage Clients from disclosing sensitive User information with us, as such information is not necessary for the provision of the Services, and we prohibit them from providing us with data relating to children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16).
In the charts below, we summarize the information collected automatically by the Services.
Information Collected By Branch Links and Pixels
Top
Branch collects the following information from URLs created by the Client (i.e., Branch Links) and pixels placed on Client websites. Branch Links may be embedded into QR Codes as configured by the Client. Some of this information is considered personal data under applicable law (in other words, information that itself may identify a unique individual or can be linked back to an individual) (“Personal Data”).
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for attribution and to understand general location
Cookie
Standard web cookies, used for device identification and attribution
Link Data
Metadata controlled by the Client, which may be used to interpret the data for reporting, or for analytics
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; used for device identification and attribution
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the webpage from which such ads were displayed, and webpages on Client’s website visited by a User.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their website (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
Information Collected by Branch SDKs
Top
SDKs are Software Development Kits that include code that allows Clients to use the Branch Services. The Branch Mobile App SDKs, Web SDKs, and Over-the-Top (OTT) SDKs collect the following information when Clients use these SDKs in their applications or websites, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
Advertising identifier (e.g., GAID, Android ID, IDFA, IDFV, RIDA)
Used for device identification and attribution
Branch Cookie ID
Used for device identification and attribution
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for device identification, attribution, and to understand general location
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Central Processing Unit (CPU) Type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
System build version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Internet connection type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Application version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device model
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Manufacturer / Brand
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen size (height, width)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen resolution
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile network status (Wi-Fi, etc.)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device locale (country and language)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Local IP address
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile platform
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Branch SDK version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Developer ID
(optional) Client-supplied unique identifier; metadata feature Used for device identification and attribution
Carrier ID
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Environment
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
UI Mode
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the application page from which such ads were displayed, pages on Client’s application visited by a User, downloads, opt-in status for certain tracking mechanisms, and installations of applications.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their application (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
In addition to the information identified above, the Branch Desktop SDKs collect the following identifiers when Clients use these SDKs in their desktop applications, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
MAC address
Used for device identification and attribution
Windows Advertising ID
Used for device identification and attribution
CPU ID
Used for device identification and attribution
Information Collected By Other Parties
Top
As part of Branch’s Services, Branch’s Clients may direct certain of their vendors or business partners (such as an ad network or vendor) to provide certain Engagement Data to Branch on the Client’s behalf.
How Does Branch Use Information Collected by Our Services?
Top
Data Branch collects through the Services is processed:
to better understand how and from where Users come to download certain apps, what types of apps are popular, or to recognize browsers and devices that are likely to be operated by the same User.
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Branch Services we provide our Clients, including to support other Branch products and services, develop new products and services, and market products or services; to support the products and services of our Clients; and as permitted or required by applicable law.
to fulfill Clients’ and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services including processing data at the Client’s direction and transferring User data to them. Branch does not control how Clients use information Branch discloses to Clients, and Users should read Clients’ Privacy Policies to understand how they use information they receive from Branch.
to aggregate data across various sources, including data from various Clients or other parties.
to create reports based on aggregated information, which is information that cannot reasonably be linked back to any individual person or Client and disclose these reports to the public.
for anti-fraud protection and analysis relating to the Services to ensure more accurate attribution measurement, general fraud prevention, or where otherwise required by law.
We may aggregate and/or de-identify the data we collect through the Services. After data has been aggregated and/or de-identified, Branch cannot use it to personally identify an individual. We may use de-identified and/or aggregated data for any purpose, including without limitation for research and marketing purposes, and may also disclose such data to any other parties, including business partners, Clients, and/or others.
Our Clients’ Use of Information
Top
Our Clients may use the information collected via the Services to improve their Users’ app experiences, customize their apps to Users, and to better understand their app marketing programs and how Users discover their apps. For example, a User may want to disclose information about a hotel that she found in a travel app to a friend. When that User sends her friend a Branch link to that hotel, after clicking the link the friend is brought directly to the content relating to that hotel within the app, rather than landing on the app’s homepage and having to search for the hotel. The travel app would also gain insights and analytics as to how the content is being disclosed from its app.
We require that our Clients utilize our Services responsibly and in accordance with our
Terms & Conditions
. Branch is not responsible for the data practices of any of our Clients through the Services or otherwise. Each Client’s practices are subject to each Client’s individual privacy policy. Users should review the privacy policy of each Client to understand how that Client uses User information collected through the Services.
User Choices
Top
Branch recognizes a number of consumer choice mechanisms. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality may be degraded or no longer work as a result if you exercise certain of the opt-outs below.
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer read or set cookies (beyond the opt-out cookie itself). Cookie-based opt outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”) and adheres to its Code of Conduct. NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from interest-based advertising by participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt out of the Branch Services on a particular device by submitting a request
here
.
Device Identifiers:
To use your device’s privacy settings controls, please visit the privacy settings menu of your device to review and access the privacy controls made available on the device. Branch will only be able to collect information from the device as permitted by these settings.
Client App Opt-out Controls:
Branch‘s
SDK Privacy Controls
allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data. Clients can flag in the Branch SDK that a particular User’s data should not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Engagement Builder:
Branch's Engagement Builder feature may be used to help Clients conduct re-engagement and re-targeting campaigns. We require that Clients using Branch’s Engagement Builder feature for such purposes respect User opt-out preferences passed to them by Branch.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes
What Information Does Branch Collect about Website Visitors and Potential Customers?
Top
Branch collects information from Website visitors (“you” or “Website Users”) located at www.branch.io ( the “Website”), which includes the dashboard provided to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. The types of information we may collect and our privacy practices depend on the nature of the relationship you have with us and the requirements of applicable law. Below are the legal bases and some of the ways we collect information and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
What We Collect from Clients that Use the Website
Top
Branch collects Personal Data and non-personal data via the Website. For example, when Clients register to use our Services, we ask them to provide us with Personal Data, including first and last name and email address.
Dashboard Information:
Information we collect from visitors who register for an account on our dashboard includes the following, some of which is considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for limited security login controls
Cookie (ours)
Standard web cookie used for dashboard session management
Cookie (other-party)
Other-party web tracking tools used for business intelligence
First, Last Name
Used for team user identification
Work Email
Used as the primary login identifier
Password
Account registration, secure our Services and prevent fraud
Account Holder Primary Role
Account registration, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; may be used for limited security login controls
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for general internal business analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for general internal business analytics
Github ID
(optional) Can be used as a login method
Billing information
Payment account registration
Log Data
Provide the Services, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners, personalize our experience, secure our Services and prevent fraud, and defend our legal rights and comply with the law
Account holder feedback
Help us improve your experience on the account dashboard
When a Client creates an account and uses the Services, Branch may collect certain log data, such as IP address from which a Client is connecting to the Services, information related to the device being used to connect to the Services (e.g., browser type and version, device type, OS version) and the features and functions of the Services used by the Client (“Log Data”).
We also require Clients to set up a user ID and unique password for account security purposes. Clients must not disclose their passwords to anyone. Clients also have the option of adding other team members to their account. This account information enables us to set up an account for Clients, to provide the Services, and to otherwise manage Client accounts. We may also use this information to notify Clients about updates to our Services and provide them with promotional emails. We offer a mechanism to opt out from promotional emails as described in the “Opt-Out from Promotional Emails” section below.
Account and Billing Information:
To the extent that we charge a fee for the Services, we may also collect limited billing, payment, and contract information from Clients through our payment and contract vendors.
Connection Information with Other Parties:
Some features of the dashboard Services allow you to disclose your information through your accounts to other companies such as Facebook and Google. If you choose to connect Branch to such services provided by other parties, we may collect information related to your use of those services provided by other parties, such as authentication tokens that allow us to connect to your accounts with those other parties. We will ask you for permission before you authorize our collection of this information. We may also collect information about how you are using the Services to interact with those connected services.
Information from Other Sources:
In addition to the information collected through our Website, we or our vendors may obtain and disclose additional information, such as job title or contact information, from other public and non-public sources such as business websites, social networking platforms, or databases maintained by other parties. We use this information to better enable Branch to identify and contact businesses that might be interested in engaging our Services, and to gain a better understanding of a potential Client’s business needs.
Communications with Branch:
Some Website Users may provide Personal Data to Branch by sending us an email or filling out an online form on the Website. We use this information to answer their question(s), and may store that information for our record keeping, marketing, and advertising purposes.
Research/Survey Solicitations:
From time to time, we may perform research (online and offline) via surveys. We may engage vendors to conduct such surveys on our behalf. All survey responses are voluntary, and the information collected will be used for research and reporting purposes to help us better serve individuals by learning more about their needs and the quality of the products and services we provide. The survey responses may be utilized to determine the effectiveness of our Website, various types of communications, advertising campaigns and/or promotional activities.
Cookies, Pixels and Web Beacons:
We also collect other data via the Website from Website Users, including Website Users employed by or affiliated with Clients, through cookies and/or web beacons. Such information, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law, may include IP address, pages viewed, browser type, Internet browsing and usage habits, how you browse and navigate the Website, Internet Service Provider, domain name, the time/date of your visit to the Website, the referring URL, and your computer’s operating system. For example, we may collect on a real-time basis information on how you use and navigate the Website.
If you permit the use of cookies and web beacons when you visit and continue to use the Website, we will collect information through those tools. Cookies are small data files stored on your hard drive by a website and web beacons are electronic images that may be used on our Website or in our emails. Cookies help us improve your experience on the Website as well as our marketing activities. We use cookies to see which areas and features are popular and to count visits to our Website. For more information about cookies and web beacons, please visit
https://www.cookiepro.com/knowledgebase/knowledge_categories/cookies-101/
. For more information about how to opt-out of cookies and web beacons after you have consented to their use, see the “Opt-out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons” section below.
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected?
Top
Branch processes the data described in the section above for the following purposes:
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Website;
to fulfill your and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services;
to send information about the Services including confirmations, invoices, payment processing, technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
to communicate about products and services offered by Branch and Branch's selected partners. We receive opt-in consent to send promotional and marketing messages to Website Users where required by applicable law. You can opt-out of receiving these messages at any time as described below in the section titled: “Opt-out from Promotional Emails”;
to conduct research;
to manage your information and account, to improve and administer our Website, to contact Website Users to answer questions or resolve problems, or to verify your identity;
to conduct research to help us to optimally deliver our existing Services or develop new products, processes and services;
for ad delivery and reporting purposes and to create data and analytics products and services;
to make the Website easier to use by reducing the need for Clients and Website Users to enter information;
for other purposes disclosed to you at the time you provide data to us;
with your consent; or
where Branch otherwise has a legitimate interest in collecting the data, such as direct marketing, individual or market research, product improvement, anti-fraud protection, protecting the safety of us, our Website Users, or other parties, or where required by law.
Opt-Out & Do Not Track - Your Choice Mechanisms
Top
In some cases, we rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you. In those cases, and where you have consented to Branch's processing of your Personal Data in connection with your use of the Website, you may withdraw that consent at any time by following the instructions below. Additionally, before we use Personal Data collected with your consent for any new purpose not originally authorized by you, we will provide information regarding the new purpose and ask for your consent for the new purpose. Where your consent for the processing of Personal Data is otherwise required by law or contract, we will comply with the law or contract. In other cases, we do not rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you (for example, if we have a different legal basis to process that data).
Opt Out from Promotional Emails
Top
You can opt-out of receiving promotional emails from us by following the instructions in those emails, or by filling out
this form
. You can also opt-out of certain categories of emails using
this form
. If you opt-out using any of these tools, we may still send you non-promotional emails, such as certain updates about your account or updates to our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy and/or use of the Services.
Opt Out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons
Top
We will only use cookies consistent with your cookie settings and permissions granted on our Website. If you permit us to use cookies/web beacons as discussed above (“What Information Does Branch Collect from our Website”), but would like to opt-out:
For dashboard users, visit
https://dashboard.branch.io/account-settings/user
, and toggle off “Cookie Consent”.
For all other users, click on “Cookie Consent” at the bottom right-hand corner of our homepage (
https://branch.io/
), and click on the opt-out link.
Also, you can choose to set your browser to remove cookies and to reject cookies. To exercise the "Do Not Track" settings available on certain web browsers, please visit the privacy settings of your browser. Where Branch is able to see that such a selection has been made, we will not use information collected from that device to target advertising on that browser. Dashboard users must use the “Cookie Consent” feature to revoke permission to place cookies. Please note that "Do Not Track" is a different privacy mechanism than the Global Privacy Control browser choice referenced below.
Note that, even if you opt out, we may still collect and use non-personal data regarding your activities on our Website. This also does not opt you out of being served advertising altogether; you will continue to receive generic advertisements.
Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website
Top
The Website utilizes tracking tools from vendors, which may enable these vendors to analyze our Website traffic for analytics purposes. Some of these vendors may collect information from this Website for retargeting and interest-based advertising purposes. For more information about these forms of ad targeting and to understand your right to opt-out from these practices, please visit
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
. All of these tools are hosted by the parties who provide them, and your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policies of the parties providing them. These tools include, but are not limited to, those below.
Google.
We may use Google Analytics and Google Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting to collect information regarding visitor behavior and visitor demographics on our Website, and to develop website content. For more information about Google Analytics, please visit
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
. You can opt-out of Google’s collection and processing of data generated by your use of the Website by going to
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
Mixpanel.
We use a service provided by Mixpanel, Inc. (“Mixpanel”) to provide us with analytics data regarding Website Users’ interactions with our Website and Services. You may opt-out of Mixpanel’s automatic retention of data that is collected while using the Services by visiting
https://mixpanel.com/optout/
. To track opt-outs, Mixpanel uses a persistent opt-out cookie placed on your device. Please note that if you get a new computer, install a new browser, erase or otherwise alter the browser’s cookie file (including upgrading certain browsers), you may delete the Mixpanel opt-out cookie.
Facebook.
We may use certain tools offered by Facebook, Inc. (“Facebook”) that enable it to collect or receive information about actions Website Users take on our Website through use of cookies, web beacons and other storage technologies or in order to provide measurement services, targeted ads and other services. For more information regarding the collection and use of such information by Facebook, please see the Facebook Data Policy, available at:
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php
.
Drift.
We use certain tools offered by Drift to power our Website’s live-chat experience. If you provide information about yourself through that live-chat experience, then we may store that information for marketing purposes. Drift may also infer information about the company that you work for you based on your IP address.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website
When does Branch Disclose Information?
Top
In addition to the ways described in our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy, Branch may also disclose information to others under the following circumstances:
With vendors, consultants and other parties who work for us and need access to information we collect to do that work.
With our Clients and their agents, as described in this Policy.
To other parties (such as advertising networks or vendors used by our Clients), as directed by our Clients.
To comply with laws or to respond to lawful requests and legal process including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements, and in order to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding suspected, or actual, prohibited activities, including but not limited to fraud and situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person.
To protect the rights and property of Branch, our agents, Clients, Users, Website Users, and others including to enforce our agreements, policies, and Terms & Conditions.
To Branch’s subsidiaries and affiliates as necessary to help us provide, support, and maintain the Services.
In connection with or during negotiation of any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
Updating Your Information and Contact Preferences
Top
We provide Clients with a mechanism to access, review and update information via the dashboard. If you wish to review or update your information, please visit branch.io and login using the username and password you created. Next, please select “Account Settings” which can be found in the lower left corner of the dashboard screen, then select the “User” tab near the top. If you would like to delete your account, please email
support@branch.io
.
We Secure the Information We Collect
Top
Securing the information provided by our Clients and collected through our Website is important to us. Branch has implemented industry-standard technical, administrative, and physical safeguards to help protect the information on our servers against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. You are responsible for maintaining the secrecy of your own passwords. If you have reason to believe that your passwords or Personal Data are no longer secure, please promptly notify us at
privacy@branch.io
.
Our Data Retention Policy
Top
For our Services:
Branch stores the information collected by our Services (see the “What Information Does Branch Collect from our Services?” section above) so long as our systems continue to encounter that User. After that User has been inactive for 30 days (or 90 days for specific attribution products), identifiers collected from that User will be deleted unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Usage activity logs, which are used for the purpose of reporting and analytics, are stored in an identifiable form for no more than 7 days (or up to 60 days as determined by the Client or for specific fields), after which these logs are removed or pseudonymized. Any and all pseudonymized logs are deleted after 12 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Aggregated reporting metrics disclosed to Clients are retained (in aggregate and anonymized form) for up to 24 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Branch may retain information collected by our Services beyond these periods for fraud prevention, analysis, or response, or to protect the safety of Branch, its Clients, Users or the public.
For the Website:
We store Personal Data such as email address or billing details for so long as you continue to have a business relationship with Branch and for a reasonable time thereafter for record-keeping purposes. If applicable to you, you may ask us to delete that information as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below or pursuant to your right of erasure as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below.
Links to Other Websites
Top
The Website and/or Services may contain links to other websites and other websites may reference or link to our Website and/or Services. These other domains and websites are not controlled by Branch, and we do not endorse or make any representations about websites or social media platforms operated by other parties. We encourage you to read the privacy policies of each and every website and application that you interact with. We do not endorse, screen, or approve, and are not responsible for the privacy practices or content of such other websites or applications. Visiting these other websites or applications is at your own risk.
International Data Transfers
Top
All information collected via the Website and Services is stored on servers located in the United States. In the process of providing the Services, we may transfer information across borders from other countries or jurisdictions into the United States. Data protection laws in the United States may differ from your country, and the data Branch processes may be accessible to law enforcement and national security authorities under certain circumstances. By using the Services, each Client and Website User consents to the transfer and processing of information to the U.S. in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Data transfers from the European Union, United Kingdom, and Switzerland are transferred on the basis of legal mechanisms approved by the European Commission and other relevant authorities for cross-border data transfers, such as Standard Contractual Clauses or the Data Privacy Framework mechanism discussed in the “Data Privacy Framework For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States” section below.
Data Privacy Framework For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States
Top
Branch complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) (collectively, “Data Privacy Frameworks”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of Personal Data from European Union member countries (including European Economic Area member countries), the United Kingdom, and Switzerland transferred to the United States pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks. Branch has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Branch has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the policies in this Privacy Policy and data subject rights under the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the applicable Principles (“DPF Principles”) shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification page, please visit https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/.
Branch no longer relies on the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield to transfer data that originated in the EEA or the United Kingdom to the U.S.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Branch’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
Pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks we are obliged to inform EU, UK, and Swiss individuals whose data is being transferred into the United States that we may be required to release Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities including to meet national security and law enforcement requirements.
Branch remains liable for the onward transfer of EU, UK, and Swiss personal data to other parties pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks unless we can prove we were not a party to the actions giving rise to the damages.
We acknowledge the right of EU, UK, and Swiss individuals to access their Personal Data pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals wishing to exercise this right may do so by contacting privacy@branch.io.
In compliance with the Data Privacy Frameworks, Branch commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information transferred to the United States pursuant to the DPF Principles. European Union, UK, and Swiss individuals with DPF inquiries or complaints should first contact Branch at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
privacy@branch.io
Branch has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the DPF Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, Data Privacy Framework Services, operated by BBB National Programs, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit https://bbbprograms.org/programs/all-programs/dpf-consumers/ProcessForConsumers for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your DPF complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms. See https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/G-Arbitration-Procedures-dpf?tabset-35584=2.
Data Subject Rights
Top
California Consumer Privacy Act
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) provides certain rights to natural persons who are residents of California. Our CCPA privacy notice is available
here
.
Rights of Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
The European General Data Protection Regulation of 2018 (“GDPR”) and equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation (“UK Data Protection Law”) provides certain rights to residents of Europe. Information on how you can exercise rights under the GDPR and UK Data Protection Law are set forth
here
.
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”) provides certain rights to residents of Brazil. Information on how you can exercise rights under the LGPD are set forth
here
.
Our Policy Regarding Children
Top
Services: The Branch Services are not directed to children. We require that Clients agree to not send to us data relating to any children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16). If you are a Client and want to learn more about Branch
SDK Privacy Controls
that you can use in your compliance with the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA), GDPR, or any other applicable law, please contact privacy@branch.io.
If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16) in violation of applicable law, please contact us at
privacy@branch.io
, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any information that it may have been provided inappropriately as required by law.
Website: The Branch Website is not directed to children. We do not knowingly collect through the Website Personal Data from anyone under the age of 16. If you are under 16, please do not attempt to register or send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, or email address. No one under 16 may provide any Personal Data to us. In the event that we learn that we have collected any such data from a child under 16 through our Website, we will take reasonable steps to delete that information as quickly as possible. If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 16, please contact us at privacy@branch.io, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any inappropriately obtained information as required by law.
Contact Us, Questions, Changes to This Privacy Policy
Top
We may change this Privacy Policy at any time in our sole discretion. We will post all changes to this Privacy Policy on this page and will indicate at the top of the page the modified Privacy Policy’s effective date. If you have any questions or suggestions regarding this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
info@branch.io
Compliance
Top
This Privacy Policy shall be implemented by Branch and all its operating divisions, subsidiaries and affiliates. Branch has put in place mechanisms to verify ongoing compliance with this Privacy Policy.
Effective October 7th 2023
to
October 12th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Privacy Policy
Effective October 6, 2023
The Branch Guiding Privacy Principles
Top
We are a linking and analytics platform for app and website developers. And we are proud of our commitment to providing our services in a privacy-first way. So we thought it would be helpful to lay out, in plain English, the Branch Guiding Privacy Principles that drive how we’ve chosen to design our services with privacy as a top priority. We further describe our privacy practices in the official
Privacy Policy
below this section, but we hope you’ll find this summary of our principles helpful.
We limit the data we collect. We practice data minimization, which means that we take steps to avoid collecting or storing information that we don’t need to provide our services. The personal data that we collect to provide our services is limited to data like advertising identifiers, IP address, and information derived from resettable cookies (the full list is below in our privacy policy). We do not collect or store information such as names, email addresses, physical addresses, or SSNs to provide our services. Nor do we want to. In fact, our
Terms & Conditions
prohibit our customers from providing Branch with any kind of sensitive end-user information.
We will only provide you with data about actual end-user activity on your apps or websites. Customers who subscribe to our linking and analytics platform can only access “earned” cookies or identifiers. This means that an end user must visit a customer’s site before our customer can see the cookie; and an end user must download a customer’s app in order for Branch to collect the end user’s advertising identifier for that customer. In short, the Branch services benefit customers who already have seen an end user across their platforms and want to understand the relationship between those web visits and app sessions.
We do not rent or sell customer end user data. No Branch customer can access another Branch customer’s end-user data. And we are not in the business of renting or selling any customer’s end-user data to anyone else. To enable customers to control their end-user personal data, they can request deletion
here
of that data at any time, whether in bulk or for a specific end user. These controls are available to customers worldwide, although we designed them to comply with the CCPA and GDPR requirements.
Beyond these principles stated above, Branch will continue to find ways to design our services to respect end user privacy. We’re committed to making sure our customers understand how we use data they entrust to us and how they can control it so that they can, in turn, be transparent with their end users.
Introduction
Top
Branch Metrics, Inc. ( "Branch", "us", "our" or "we") offers a linking and analytics platform enabling developers of applications (our "Clients")--whether those applications are websites or "apps," and across different types of devices--to improve their end users’ ("Users") cross-application experiences, and to derive additional insights into how their Users download and utilize those applications. Branch recognizes and believes that data privacy is important to all Internet users, and therefore we design and operate our services in a privacy-first manner.
This Privacy Policy is divided into three parts:
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services: This section explains how Branch collects and uses information about Users in connection with our linking and analytics products and services (the "Branch Services" or the "Services").
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes: This section explains how we collect and use information about our website visitors through our website located at branch.io (the “Website”), which includes the dashboard we provide to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. So, if you are a Client using our Branch dashboard, this section applies to the data we collect from you. It also explains how we collect information about potential Clients from vendors and other sources to enhance our marketing efforts.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website: This section lays out the parts of the Branch Privacy Policy that apply to both the Services and to the Website.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services
What Information Does Branch Collect from Our Services?
Top
Below, we explain what information we collect on behalf of our Clients through the Services, and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
The Branch Services: Overview
Top
Branch provides a variety of Services intended to help Clients understand the use of their digital properties by their Users across a wide array of platforms, devices and applications. Branch helps Clients by connecting User interactions across siloed applications (email, SMS, web browsers, social platforms, native applications and others), so that Clients understand the multiple steps that a User took to ultimately complete a transaction with the Client. The Client can use this information to better inform marketing and product decisions as well as to provide improved user experiences by using their knowledge of continuity.
Branch has no direct relationship with Users. Branch’s Services are provided when Branch Clients install on their platforms “Branch Mechanisms” (including links, pixels, direct platform integrations, etc.) that capture User action on behalf of the Client. Using the information collected from these Branch Mechanisms, Branch uses a variety of attribution techniques to connect User actions across different channels and platforms. Some of these attribution techniques include a direct pass-through of identifiers from platform to platform, creating and storing identifiers unique to the Branch platform to connect User actions and identifiers together, and predictive modeling algorithms using real-time and historical data parameters observed from User interactions where there are no shared identifiers available, as well as using historical connections Branch has derived over time using our technology. In some cases, these connections are made without the use of cookies. These techniques help Clients match Users with devices they use, including matching the same User across multiple devices.
The key use cases of Branch’s Services are:
To support Clients in implementing deep linking, which uses Branch’s connection information in real time to improve the User experience.
For example, if a User clicks on a link in an email or ad to a specific page in a Client’s app, Branch helps the User get to that page after they download the app.
To report individualized and aggregated analytics metrics about the performance of the Client’s product and marketing initiatives to the Client directly.
For example, Branch can tell a Client how many Users that downloaded an app or that went to a specific page in an app came from clicking on a specific link, and provide corresponding advertising or other identifiers.
To assist the Client by presenting real time, targeted messaging to their Users depending on past behavior observed across the Client’s tracked platforms with the purpose of driving more engagement to the Client.
For example, Branch can use Branch Mechanisms to provide a tailored message like a coupon code or special offer in your website to users who have interacted with your app and/or website in the past.
Branch requires that each Client commit to disclose to Branch only information that it has lawfully obtained (including, where necessary, by obtaining consent from Users), and that it has the right to disclose to Branch. We strongly discourage Clients from disclosing sensitive User information with us, as such information is not necessary for the provision of the Services, and we prohibit them from providing us with data relating to children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16).
In the charts below, we summarize the information collected automatically by the Services.
Information Collected By Branch Links and Pixels
Top
Branch collects the following information from URLs created by the Client (i.e., Branch Links) and pixels placed on Client websites. Branch Links may be embedded into QR Codes as configured by the Client. Some of this information is considered personal data under applicable law (in other words, information that itself may identify a unique individual or can be linked back to an individual) (“Personal Data”).
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for attribution and to understand general location
Cookie
Standard web cookies, used for device identification and attribution
Link Data
Metadata controlled by the Client, which may be used to interpret the data for reporting, or for analytics
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; used for device identification and attribution
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the webpage from which such ads were displayed, and webpages on Client’s website visited by a User.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their website (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
Information Collected by Branch SDKs
Top
SDKs are Software Development Kits that include code that allows Clients to use the Branch Services. The Branch Mobile App SDKs, Web SDKs, and Over-the-Top (OTT) SDKs collect the following information when Clients use these SDKs in their applications or websites, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
Advertising identifier (e.g., GAID, Android ID, IDFA, IDFV, RIDA)
Used for device identification and attribution
Branch Cookie ID
Used for device identification and attribution
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for device identification, attribution, and to understand general location
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Central Processing Unit (CPU) Type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
System build version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Internet connection type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Application version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device model
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Manufacturer / Brand
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen size (height, width)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen resolution
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile network status (Wi-Fi, etc.)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device locale (country and language)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Local IP address
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile platform
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Branch SDK version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Developer ID
(optional) Client-supplied unique identifier; metadata feature Used for device identification and attribution
Carrier ID
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Environment
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
UI Mode
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the application page from which such ads were displayed, pages on Client’s application visited by a User, downloads, opt-in status for certain tracking mechanisms, and installations of applications.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their application (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
In addition to the information identified above, the Branch Desktop SDKs collect the following identifiers when Clients use these SDKs in their desktop applications, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
MAC address
Used for device identification and attribution
Windows Advertising ID
Used for device identification and attribution
CPU ID
Used for device identification and attribution
Information Collected By Other Parties
Top
As part of Branch’s Services, Branch’s Clients may direct certain of their vendors or business partners (such as an ad network or vendor) to provide certain Engagement Data to Branch on the Client’s behalf.
How Does Branch Use Information Collected by Our Services?
Top
Data Branch collects through the Services is processed:
to better understand how and from where Users come to download certain apps, what types of apps are popular, or to recognize browsers and devices that are likely to be operated by the same User.
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Branch Services we provide our Clients, including to support other Branch products and services, develop new products and services, and market products or services; to support the products and services of our Clients; and as permitted or required by applicable law.
to fulfill Clients’ and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services including processing data at the Client’s direction and transferring User data to them. Branch does not control how Clients use information Branch discloses to Clients, and Users should read Clients’ Privacy Policies to understand how they use information they receive from Branch.
to aggregate data across various sources, including data from various Clients or other parties.
to create reports based on aggregated information, which is information that cannot reasonably be linked back to any individual person or Client and disclose these reports to the public.
for anti-fraud protection and analysis relating to the Services to ensure more accurate attribution measurement, general fraud prevention, or where otherwise required by law.
We may aggregate and/or de-identify the data we collect through the Services. After data has been aggregated and/or de-identified, Branch cannot use it to personally identify an individual. We may use de-identified and/or aggregated data for any purpose, including without limitation for research and marketing purposes, and may also disclose such data to any other parties, including business partners, Clients, and/or others.
Our Clients’ Use of Information
Top
Our Clients may use the information collected via the Services to improve their Users’ app experiences, customize their apps to Users, and to better understand their app marketing programs and how Users discover their apps. For example, a User may want to disclose information about a hotel that she found in a travel app to a friend. When that User sends her friend a Branch link to that hotel, after clicking the link the friend is brought directly to the content relating to that hotel within the app, rather than landing on the app’s homepage and having to search for the hotel. The travel app would also gain insights and analytics as to how the content is being disclosed from its app.
We require that our Clients utilize our Services responsibly and in accordance with our
Terms & Conditions
. Branch is not responsible for the data practices of any of our Clients through the Services or otherwise. Each Client’s practices are subject to each Client’s individual privacy policy. Users should review the privacy policy of each Client to understand how that Client uses User information collected through the Services.
User Choices
Top
Branch recognizes a number of consumer choice mechanisms. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality may be degraded or no longer work as a result if you exercise certain of the opt-outs below.
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer read or set cookies (beyond the opt-out cookie itself). Cookie-based opt outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”) and adheres to its Code of Conduct. NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from interest-based advertising by participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt out of the Branch Services on a particular device by submitting a request
here
.
Device Identifiers:
To use your device’s privacy settings controls, please visit the privacy settings menu of your device to review and access the privacy controls made available on the device. Branch will only be able to collect information from the device as permitted by these settings.
Client App Opt-out Controls:
Branch‘s
SDK Privacy Controls
allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data. Clients can flag in the Branch SDK that a particular User’s data should not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Engagement Builder:
Branch's Engagement Builder feature may be used to help Clients conduct re-engagement and re-targeting campaigns. We require that Clients using Branch’s Engagement Builder feature for such purposes respect User opt-out preferences passed to them by Branch.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes
What Information Does Branch Collect about Website Visitors and Potential Customers?
Top
Branch collects information from Website visitors (“you” or “Website Users”) located at www.branch.io ( the “Website”), which includes the dashboard provided to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. The types of information we may collect and our privacy practices depend on the nature of the relationship you have with us and the requirements of applicable law. Below are the legal bases and some of the ways we collect information and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
What We Collect from Clients that Use the Website
Top
Branch collects Personal Data and non-personal data via the Website. For example, when Clients register to use our Services, we ask them to provide us with Personal Data, including first and last name and email address.
Dashboard Information:
Information we collect from visitors who register for an account on our dashboard includes the following, some of which is considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for limited security login controls
Cookie (ours)
Standard web cookie used for dashboard session management
Cookie (other-party)
Other-party web tracking tools used for business intelligence
First, Last Name
Used for team user identification
Work Email
Used as the primary login identifier
Password
Account registration, secure our Services and prevent fraud
Account Holder Primary Role
Account registration, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; may be used for limited security login controls
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for general internal business analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for general internal business analytics
Github ID
(optional) Can be used as a login method
Billing information
Payment account registration
Log Data
Provide the Services, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners, personalize our experience, secure our Services and prevent fraud, and defend our legal rights and comply with the law
Account holder feedback
Help us improve your experience on the account dashboard
When a Client creates an account and uses the Services, Branch may collect certain log data, such as IP address from which a Client is connecting to the Services, information related to the device being used to connect to the Services (e.g., browser type and version, device type, OS version) and the features and functions of the Services used by the Client (“Log Data”).
We also require Clients to set up a user ID and unique password for account security purposes. Clients must not disclose their passwords to anyone. Clients also have the option of adding other team members to their account. This account information enables us to set up an account for Clients, to provide the Services, and to otherwise manage Client accounts. We may also use this information to notify Clients about updates to our Services and provide them with promotional emails. We offer a mechanism to opt out from promotional emails as described in the “Opt-Out from Promotional Emails” section below.
Account and Billing Information:
To the extent that we charge a fee for the Services, we may also collect limited billing, payment, and contract information from Clients through our payment and contract vendors.
Connection Information with Other Parties:
Some features of the dashboard Services allow you to disclose your information through your accounts to other companies such as Facebook and Google. If you choose to connect Branch to such services provided by other parties, we may collect information related to your use of those services provided by other parties, such as authentication tokens that allow us to connect to your accounts with those other parties. We will ask you for permission before you authorize our collection of this information. We may also collect information about how you are using the Services to interact with those connected services.
Information from Other Sources:
In addition to the information collected through our Website, we or our vendors may obtain and disclose additional information, such as job title or contact information, from other public and non-public sources such as business websites, social networking platforms, or databases maintained by other parties. We use this information to better enable Branch to identify and contact businesses that might be interested in engaging our Services, and to gain a better understanding of a potential Client’s business needs.
Communications with Branch:
Some Website Users may provide Personal Data to Branch by sending us an email or filling out an online form on the Website. We use this information to answer their question(s), and may store that information for our record keeping, marketing, and advertising purposes.
Research/Survey Solicitations:
From time to time, we may perform research (online and offline) via surveys. We may engage vendors to conduct such surveys on our behalf. All survey responses are voluntary, and the information collected will be used for research and reporting purposes to help us better serve individuals by learning more about their needs and the quality of the products and services we provide. The survey responses may be utilized to determine the effectiveness of our Website, various types of communications, advertising campaigns and/or promotional activities.
Cookies, Pixels and Web Beacons:
We also collect other data via the Website from Website Users, including Website Users employed by or affiliated with Clients, through cookies and/or web beacons. Such information, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law, may include IP address, pages viewed, browser type, Internet browsing and usage habits, how you browse and navigate the Website, Internet Service Provider, domain name, the time/date of your visit to the Website, the referring URL, and your computer’s operating system. For example, we may collect on a real-time basis information on how you use and navigate the Website.
If you permit the use of cookies and web beacons when you visit and continue to use the Website, we will collect information through those tools. Cookies are small data files stored on your hard drive by a website and web beacons are electronic images that may be used on our Website or in our emails. Cookies help us improve your experience on the Website as well as our marketing activities. We use cookies to see which areas and features are popular and to count visits to our Website. For more information about cookies and web beacons, please visit
https://www.cookiepro.com/knowledgebase/knowledge_categories/cookies-101/
. For more information about how to opt-out of cookies and web beacons after you have consented to their use, see the “Opt-out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons” section below.
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected?
Top
Branch processes the data described in the section above for the following purposes:
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Website;
to fulfill your and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services;
to send information about the Services including confirmations, invoices, payment processing, technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
to communicate about products and services offered by Branch and Branch's selected partners. We receive opt-in consent to send promotional and marketing messages to Website Users where required by applicable law. You can opt-out of receiving these messages at any time as described below in the section titled: “Opt-out from Promotional Emails”;
to conduct research;
to manage your information and account, to improve and administer our Website, to contact Website Users to answer questions or resolve problems, or to verify your identity;
to conduct research to help us to optimally deliver our existing Services or develop new products, processes and services;
for ad delivery and reporting purposes and to create data and analytics products and services;
to make the Website easier to use by reducing the need for Clients and Website Users to enter information;
for other purposes disclosed to you at the time you provide data to us;
with your consent; or
where Branch otherwise has a legitimate interest in collecting the data, such as direct marketing, individual or market research, product improvement, anti-fraud protection, protecting the safety of us, our Website Users, or other parties, or where required by law.
Opt-Out & Do Not Track - Your Choice Mechanisms
Top
In some cases, we rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you. In those cases, and where you have consented to Branch's processing of your Personal Data in connection with your use of the Website, you may withdraw that consent at any time by following the instructions below. Additionally, before we use Personal Data collected with your consent for any new purpose not originally authorized by you, we will provide information regarding the new purpose and ask for your consent for the new purpose. Where your consent for the processing of Personal Data is otherwise required by law or contract, we will comply with the law or contract. In other cases, we do not rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you (for example, if we have a different legal basis to process that data).
Opt Out from Promotional Emails
Top
You can opt-out of receiving promotional emails from us by following the instructions in those emails, or by filling out
this form
. You can also opt-out of certain categories of emails using
this form
. If you opt-out using any of these tools, we may still send you non-promotional emails, such as certain updates about your account or updates to our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy and/or use of the Services.
Opt Out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons
Top
We will only use cookies consistent with your cookie settings and permissions granted on our Website. If you permit us to use cookies/web beacons as discussed above (“What Information Does Branch Collect from our Website”), but would like to opt-out:
For dashboard users, visit
https://dashboard.branch.io/account-settings/user
, and toggle off “Cookie Consent”.
For all other users, click on “Cookie Consent” at the bottom right-hand corner of our homepage (
https://branch.io/
), and click on the opt-out link.
Also, you can choose to set your browser to remove cookies and to reject cookies. To exercise the "Do Not Track" settings available on certain web browsers, please visit the privacy settings of your browser. Where Branch is able to see that such a selection has been made, we will not use information collected from that device to target advertising on that browser. Dashboard users must use the “Cookie Consent” feature to revoke permission to place cookies. Please note that "Do Not Track" is a different privacy mechanism than the Global Privacy Control browser choice referenced below.
Note that, even if you opt out, we may still collect and use non-personal data regarding your activities on our Website. This also does not opt you out of being served advertising altogether; you will continue to receive generic advertisements.
Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website
Top
The Website utilizes tracking tools from vendors, which may enable these vendors to analyze our Website traffic for analytics purposes. Some of these vendors may collect information from this Website for retargeting and interest-based advertising purposes. For more information about these forms of ad targeting and to understand your right to opt-out from these practices, please visit
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
. All of these tools are hosted by the parties who provide them, and your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policies of the parties providing them. These tools include, but are not limited to, those below.
Google.
We may use Google Analytics and Google Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting to collect information regarding visitor behavior and visitor demographics on our Website, and to develop website content. For more information about Google Analytics, please visit
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
. You can opt-out of Google’s collection and processing of data generated by your use of the Website by going to
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
Mixpanel.
We use a service provided by Mixpanel, Inc. (“Mixpanel”) to provide us with analytics data regarding Website Users’ interactions with our Website and Services. You may opt-out of Mixpanel’s automatic retention of data that is collected while using the Services by visiting
https://mixpanel.com/optout/
. To track opt-outs, Mixpanel uses a persistent opt-out cookie placed on your device. Please note that if you get a new computer, install a new browser, erase or otherwise alter the browser’s cookie file (including upgrading certain browsers), you may delete the Mixpanel opt-out cookie.
Facebook.
We may use certain tools offered by Facebook, Inc. (“Facebook”) that enable it to collect or receive information about actions Website Users take on our Website through use of cookies, web beacons and other storage technologies or in order to provide measurement services, targeted ads and other services. For more information regarding the collection and use of such information by Facebook, please see the Facebook Data Policy, available at:
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php
.
Drift.
We use certain tools offered by Drift to power our Website’s live-chat experience. If you provide information about yourself through that live-chat experience, then we may store that information for marketing purposes. Drift may also infer information about the company that you work for you based on your IP address.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website
When does Branch Disclose Information?
Top
In addition to the ways described in our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy, Branch may also disclose information to others under the following circumstances:
With vendors, consultants and other parties who work for us and need access to information we collect to do that work.
With our Clients and their agents, as described in this Policy.
To other parties (such as advertising networks or vendors used by our Clients), as directed by our Clients.
To comply with laws or to respond to lawful requests and legal process including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements, and in order to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding suspected, or actual, prohibited activities, including but not limited to fraud and situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person.
To protect the rights and property of Branch, our agents, Clients, Users, Website Users, and others including to enforce our agreements, policies, and Terms & Conditions.
To Branch’s subsidiaries and affiliates as necessary to help us provide, support, and maintain the Services.
In connection with or during negotiation of any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
Updating Your Information and Contact Preferences
Top
We provide Clients with a mechanism to access, review and update information via the dashboard. If you wish to review or update your information, please visit branch.io and login using the username and password you created. Next, please select “Account Settings” which can be found in the lower left corner of the dashboard screen, then select the “User” tab near the top. If you would like to delete your account, please email
support@branch.io
.
We Secure the Information We Collect
Top
Securing the information provided by our Clients and collected through our Website is important to us. Branch has implemented industry-standard technical, administrative, and physical safeguards to help protect the information on our servers against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. You are responsible for maintaining the secrecy of your own passwords. If you have reason to believe that your passwords or Personal Data are no longer secure, please promptly notify us at
privacy@branch.io
.
Our Data Retention Policy
Top
For our Services:
Branch stores the information collected by our Services (see the “What Information Does Branch Collect from our Services?” section above) so long as our systems continue to encounter that User. After that User has been inactive for 30 days (or 90 days for specific attribution products), identifiers collected from that User will be deleted unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Usage activity logs, which are used for the purpose of reporting and analytics, are stored in an identifiable form for no more than 7 days (or up to 60 days as determined by the Client or for specific fields), after which these logs are removed or pseudonymized. Any and all pseudonymized logs are deleted after 12 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Aggregated reporting metrics disclosed to Clients are retained (in aggregate and anonymized form) for up to 24 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Branch may retain information collected by our Services beyond these periods for fraud prevention, analysis, or response, or to protect the safety of Branch, its Clients, Users or the public.
For the Website:
We store Personal Data such as email address or billing details for so long as you continue to have a business relationship with Branch and for a reasonable time thereafter for record-keeping purposes. If applicable to you, you may ask us to delete that information as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below or pursuant to your right of erasure as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below.
Links to Other Websites
Top
The Website and/or Services may contain links to other websites and other websites may reference or link to our Website and/or Services. These other domains and websites are not controlled by Branch, and we do not endorse or make any representations about websites or social media platforms operated by other parties. We encourage you to read the privacy policies of each and every website and application that you interact with. We do not endorse, screen, or approve, and are not responsible for the privacy practices or content of such other websites or applications. Visiting these other websites or applications is at your own risk.
International Data Transfers
Top
All information collected via the Website and Services is stored on servers located in the United States. In the process of providing the Services, we may transfer information across borders from other countries or jurisdictions into the United States. Data protection laws in the United States may differ from your country, and the data Branch processes may be accessible to law enforcement and national security authorities under certain circumstances. By using the Services, each Client and Website User consents to the transfer and processing of information to the U.S. in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Data transfers from the European Union, United Kingdom, and Switzerland are transferred on the basis of legal mechanisms approved by the European Commission and other relevant authorities for cross-border data transfers, such as Standard Contractual Clauses or the Data Privacy Framework mechanism discussed in the “Privacy Shield For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States” section below.
Data Privacy Framework For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States
Top
Branch complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) (collectively, “Data Privacy Frameworks”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of Personal Data from European Union member countries (including European Economic Area member countries), the United Kingdom, and Switzerland transferred to the United States pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks. Branch has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Branch has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the policies in this Privacy Policy and data subject rights under the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the applicable Principles (“DPF Principles”) shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification page, please visit https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/.
Branch no longer relies on the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield to transfer data that originated in the EEA or the United Kingdom to the U.S.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Branch’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
Pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks we are obliged to inform EU, UK, and Swiss individuals whose data is being transferred into the United States that we may be required to release Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities including to meet national security and law enforcement requirements.
Branch remains liable for the onward transfer of EU, UK, and Swiss personal data to other parties pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks unless we can prove we were not a party to the actions giving rise to the damages.
We acknowledge the right of EU, UK, and Swiss individuals to access their Personal Data pursuant to the Data Privacy Frameworks. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals wishing to exercise this right may do so by contacting privacy@branch.io.
In compliance with the Data Privacy Frameworks, Branch commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information transferred to the United States pursuant to the DPF Principles. European Union, UK, and Swiss individuals with DPF inquiries or complaints should first contact Branch at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
privacy@branch.io
Branch has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the DPF Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, Data Privacy Framework Services, operated by BBB National Programs, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit https://bbbprograms.org/programs/all-programs/dpf-consumers/ProcessForConsumers for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your DPF complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms. See https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/G-Arbitration-Procedures-dpf?tabset-35584=2.
Data Subject Rights
Top
California Consumer Privacy Act
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) provides certain rights to natural persons who are residents of California. Our CCPA privacy notice is available
here
.
Rights of Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
The European General Data Protection Regulation of 2018 (“GDPR”) and equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation (“UK Data Protection Law”) provides certain rights to residents of Europe. Information on how you can exercise rights under the GDPR and UK Data Protection Law are set forth
here
.
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”) provides certain rights to residents of Brazil. Information on how you can exercise rights under the LGPD are set forth
here
.
Our Policy Regarding Children
Top
Services: The Branch Services are not directed to children. We require that Clients agree to not send to us data relating to any children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16). If you are a Client and want to learn more about Branch
SDK Privacy Controls
that you can use in your compliance with the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA), GDPR, or any other applicable law, please contact privacy@branch.io.
If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16) in violation of applicable law, please contact us at
privacy@branch.io
, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any information that it may have been provided inappropriately as required by law.
Website: The Branch Website is not directed to children. We do not knowingly collect through the Website Personal Data from anyone under the age of 16. If you are under 16, please do not attempt to register or send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, or email address. No one under 16 may provide any Personal Data to us. In the event that we learn that we have collected any such data from a child under 16 through our Website, we will take reasonable steps to delete that information as quickly as possible. If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 16, please contact us at privacy@branch.io, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any inappropriately obtained information as required by law.
Contact Us, Questions, Changes to This Privacy Policy
Top
We may change this Privacy Policy at any time in our sole discretion. We will post all changes to this Privacy Policy on this page and will indicate at the top of the page the modified Privacy Policy’s effective date. If you have any questions or suggestions regarding this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
info@branch.io
Compliance
Top
This Privacy Policy shall be implemented by Branch and all its operating divisions, subsidiaries and affiliates. Branch has put in place mechanisms to verify ongoing compliance with this Privacy Policy.
Effective May 8th 2023
to
October 7th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Privacy Policy
The Branch Guiding Privacy Principles
Top
We are a linking and analytics platform for app and website developers. And we are proud of our commitment to providing our services in a privacy-first way. So we thought it would be helpful to lay out, in plain English, the Branch Guiding Privacy Principles that drive how we’ve chosen to design our services with privacy as a top priority. We further describe our privacy practices in the official
Privacy Policy
below this section, but we hope you’ll find this summary of our principles helpful.
We limit the data we collect.
We practice data minimization, which means that we take steps to avoid collecting or storing information that we don’t need to provide our services. The personal data that we collect to provide our services is limited to data like advertising identifiers, IP address, and information derived from resettable cookies (the full list is below in our privacy policy). We do not collect or store information such as names, email addresses, physical addresses, or SSNs to provide our services. Nor do we want to. In fact, our
Terms & Conditions
prohibit our customers from providing Branch with any kind of sensitive end-user information.
We will only provide you with data about actual end-user activity on your apps or websites.
Customers who subscribe to our linking and analytics platform can only access “earned” cookies or identifiers. This means that an end user must visit a customer’s site before our customer can see the cookie; and an end user must download a customer’s app in order for Branch to collect the end user’s advertising identifier for that customer. In short, the Branch services benefit customers who already have seen an end user across their platforms and want to understand the relationship between those web visits and app sessions.
We do not rent or sell customer end user data.
No Branch customer can access another Branch customer’s end-user data. And we are not in the business of renting or selling any customer’s end-user data to anyone else. To enable customers to control their end-user personal data, they can request deletion
here
of that data at any time, whether in bulk or for a specific end user. These controls are available to customers worldwide, although we designed them to comply with the CCPA and GDPR requirements.
Beyond these principles stated above, Branch will continue to find ways to design our services to respect end user privacy. We’re committed to making sure our customers understand how we use data they entrust to us and how they can control it so that they can, in turn, be transparent with their end users.
Introduction
Top
Branch Metrics, Inc. ( "
Branch
", "
us
", "
our
" or "
we
") offers a linking and analytics platform enabling developers of applications (our "
Clients
")--whether those applications are websites or "apps," and across different types of devices--to improve their end users’ ("
Users
") cross-application experiences, and to derive additional insights into how their Users download and utilize those applications. Branch recognizes and believes that data privacy is important to all Internet users, and therefore we design and operate our services in a privacy-first manner.
This Privacy Policy is divided into three parts:
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services:
This section explains how Branch collects and uses information about Users in connection with our linking and analytics products and services (the "
Branch Services
" or the "
Services
").
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes:
This section explains how we collect and use information about our website visitors through our website located at branch.io (the “
Website
”), which includes the dashboard we provide to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. So, if you are a Client using our Branch dashboard, this section applies to the data we collect from you. It also explains how we collect information about potential Clients from vendors and other sources to enhance our marketing efforts.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website:
This section lays out the parts of the Branch Privacy Policy that apply to both the Services and to the Website.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services
What Information Does Branch Collect from Our Services?
Top
Below, we explain what information we collect on behalf of our Clients through the Services, and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
The Branch Services: Overview
Top
Branch provides a variety of Services intended to help Clients understand the use of their digital properties by their Users across a wide array of platforms, devices and applications. Branch helps Clients by connecting User interactions across siloed applications (email, SMS, web browsers, social platforms, native applications and others), so that Clients understand the multiple steps that a User took to ultimately complete a transaction with the Client. The Client can use this information to better inform marketing and product decisions as well as to provide improved user experiences by using their knowledge of continuity.
Branch has no direct relationship with Users. Branch’s Services are provided when Branch Clients install on their platforms “Branch Mechanisms” (including links, pixels, direct platform integrations, etc.) that capture User action on behalf of the Client. Using the information collected from these Branch Mechanisms, Branch uses a variety of attribution techniques to connect User actions across different channels and platforms. Some of these attribution techniques include a direct pass-through of identifiers from platform to platform, creating and storing identifiers unique to the Branch platform to connect User actions and identifiers together, and predictive modeling algorithms using real-time and historical data parameters observed from User interactions where there are no shared identifiers available, as well as using historical connections Branch has derived over time using our technology. In some cases, these connections are made without the use of cookies. These techniques help Clients match Users with devices they use, including matching the same User across multiple devices.
The key use cases of Branch’s Services are:
To support Clients in implementing deep linking, which uses Branch’s connection information in real time to improve the User experience.
For example, if a User clicks on a link in an email or ad to a specific page in a Client’s app, Branch helps the User get to that page after they download the app.
To report individualized and aggregated analytics metrics about the performance of the Client’s product and marketing initiatives to the Client directly.
For example, Branch can tell a Client how many Users that downloaded an app or that went to a specific page in an app came from clicking on a specific link, and provide corresponding advertising or other identifiers.
To assist the Client by presenting real time, targeted messaging to their Users depending on past behavior observed across the Client’s tracked platforms with the purpose of driving more engagement to the Client.
For example, Branch can use Branch Mechanisms to provide a tailored message like a coupon code or special offer in your website to users who have interacted with your app and/or website in the past.
Branch requires that each Client commit to disclose to Branch only information that it has lawfully obtained (including, where necessary, by obtaining consent from Users), and that it has the right to disclose to Branch. We strongly discourage Clients from disclosing sensitive User information with us, as such information is not necessary for the provision of the Services, and we prohibit them from providing us with data relating to children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16).
In the charts below, we summarize the information collected automatically by the Services.
Information Collected By Branch Links and Pixels
Top
Branch collects the following information from URLs created by the Client (i.e., Branch Links) and pixels placed on Client websites. Branch Links may be embedded into QR Codes as configured by the Client. Some of this information is considered personal data under applicable law (in other words, information that itself may identify a unique individual or can be linked back to an individual) (“
Personal Data
”).
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for attribution and to understand general location
Cookie
Standard web cookies, used for device identification and attribution
Link Data
Metadata controlled by the Client, which may be used to interpret the data for reporting, or for analytics
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; used for device identification and attribution
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the webpage from which such ads were displayed, and webpages on Client’s website visited by a User.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their website (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
Information Collected by Branch SDKs
Top
SDKs are Software Development Kits that include code that allows Clients to use the Branch Services. The Branch Mobile App SDKs, Web SDKs, and Over-the-Top (OTT) SDKs collect the following information when Clients use these SDKs in their applications or websites, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
Advertising identifier (e.g., GAID, Android ID, IDFA, IDFV, RIDA)
Used for device identification and attribution
Branch Cookie ID
Used for device identification and attribution
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for device identification, attribution, and to understand general location
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Central Processing Unit (CPU) Type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
System build version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Internet connection type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Application version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device model
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Manufacturer / Brand
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen size (height, width)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen resolution
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile network status (Wi-Fi, etc.)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device locale (country and language)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Local IP address
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile platform
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Branch SDK version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Developer ID
(optional) Client-supplied unique identifier; metadata feature Used for device identification and attribution
Carrier ID
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Environment
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
UI Mode
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the application page from which such ads were displayed, pages on Client’s application visited by a User, downloads, opt-in status for certain tracking mechanisms, and installations of applications.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their application (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
In addition to the information identified above, the Branch Desktop SDKs collect the following identifiers when Clients use these SDKs in their desktop applications, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
MAC address
Used for device identification and attribution
Windows Advertising ID
Used for device identification and attribution
CPU ID
Used for device identification and attribution
Information Collected By Other Parties
Top
As part of Branch’s Services, Branch’s Clients may direct certain of their vendors or business partners (such as an ad network or vendor) to provide certain Engagement Data to Branch on the Client’s behalf.
How Does Branch Use Information Collected by Our Services?
Top
Data Branch collects through the Services is processed:
to better understand how and from where Users come to download certain apps, what types of apps are popular, or to recognize browsers and devices that are likely to be operated by the same User.
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Branch Services we provide our Clients, including to support other Branch products and services, develop new products and services, and market products or services; to support the products and services of our Clients; and as permitted or required by applicable law.
to fulfill Clients’ and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services including processing data at the Client’s direction and transferring User data to them. Branch does not control how Clients use information Branch discloses to Clients, and Users should read Clients’ Privacy Policies to understand how they use information they receive from Branch.
to aggregate data across various sources, including data from various Clients or other parties.
to create reports based on aggregated information, which is information that cannot reasonably be linked back to any individual person or Client and disclose these reports to the public.
for anti-fraud protection and analysis relating to the Services to ensure more accurate attribution measurement, general fraud prevention, or where otherwise required by law.
We may aggregate and/or de-identify the data we collect through the Services. After data has been aggregated and/or de-identified, Branch cannot use it to personally identify an individual. We may use de-identified and/or aggregated data for any purpose, including without limitation for research and marketing purposes, and may also disclose such data to any other parties, including business partners, Clients, and/or others.
Our Clients’ Use of Information
Top
Our Clients may use the information collected via the Services to improve their Users’ app experiences, customize their apps to Users, and to better understand their app marketing programs and how Users discover their apps. For example, a User may want to disclose information about a hotel that she found in a travel app to a friend. When that User sends her friend a Branch link to that hotel, after clicking the link the friend is brought directly to the content relating to that hotel within the app, rather than landing on the app’s homepage and having to search for the hotel. The travel app would also gain insights and analytics as to how the content is being disclosed from its app.
We require that our Clients utilize our Services responsibly and in accordance with our
Terms & Conditions
. Branch is not responsible for the data practices of any of our Clients through the Services or otherwise. Each Client’s practices are subject to each Client’s individual privacy policy. Users should review the privacy policy of each Client to understand how that Client uses User information collected through the Services.
User Choices
Top
Branch recognizes a number of consumer choice mechanisms. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality may be degraded or no longer work as a result if you exercise certain of the opt-outs below.
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer read or set cookies (beyond the opt-out cookie itself). Cookie-based opt outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”) and adheres to its Code of Conduct. NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from interest-based advertising by participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt out of the Branch Services on a particular device by submitting a request
here
.
Device Identifiers:
To use your device’s privacy settings controls, please visit the privacy settings menu of your device to review and access the privacy controls made available on the device. Branch will only be able to collect information from the device as permitted by these settings.
Client App Opt-out Controls:
Branch‘s
SDK Privacy Controls
allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data. Clients can flag in the Branch SDK that a particular User’s data should not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Engagement Builder:
Branch's Engagement Builder feature may be used to help Clients conduct re-engagement and re-targeting campaigns. We require that Clients using Branch’s Engagement Builder feature for such purposes respect User opt-out preferences passed to them by Branch.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes
What Information Does Branch Collect about Website Visitors and Potential Customers?
Top
Branch collects information from Website visitors (“you” or “Website Users”) located at www.branch.io ( the “Website”), which includes the dashboard provided to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. The types of information we may collect and our privacy practices depend on the nature of the relationship you have with us and the requirements of applicable law. Below are the legal bases and some of the ways we collect information and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
What We Collect from Clients that Use the Website
Top
Branch collects Personal Data and non-personal data via the Website. For example, when Clients register to use our Services, we ask them to provide us with Personal Data, including first and last name and email address.
Dashboard Information:
Information we collect from visitors who register for an account on our dashboard includes the following, some of which is considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for limited security login controls
Cookie (ours)
Standard web cookie used for dashboard session management
Cookie (other-party)
Other-party web tracking tools used for business intelligence
First, Last Name
Used for team user identification
Work Email
Used as the primary login identifier
Password
Account registration, secure our Services and prevent fraud
Account Holder Primary Role
Account registration, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; may be used for limited security login controls
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for general internal business analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for general internal business analytics
Github ID
(optional) Can be used as a login method
Billing information
Payment account registration
Log Data
Provide the Services, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners, personalize our experience, secure our Services and prevent fraud, and defend our legal rights and comply with the law
Account holder feedback
Help us improve your experience on the account dashboard
When a Client creates an account and uses the Services, Branch may collect certain log data, such as IP address from which a Client is connecting to the Services, information related to the device being used to connect to the Services (e.g., browser type and version, device type, OS version) and the features and functions of the Services used by the Client (“Log Data”).
We also require Clients to set up a user ID and unique password for account security purposes. Clients must not disclose their passwords to anyone. Clients also have the option of adding other team members to their account. This account information enables us to set up an account for Clients, to provide the Services, and to otherwise manage Client accounts. We may also use this information to notify Clients about updates to our Services and provide them with promotional emails. We offer a mechanism to opt out from promotional emails as described in the “Opt-Out from Promotional Emails” section below.
Account and Billing Information:
To the extent that we charge a fee for the Services, we may also collect limited billing, payment, and contract information from Clients through our payment and contract vendors.
Connection Information with Other Parties:
Some features of the dashboard Services allow you to disclose your information through your accounts to other companies such as Facebook and Google. If you choose to connect Branch to such services provided by other parties, we may collect information related to your use of those services provided by other parties, such as authentication tokens that allow us to connect to your accounts with those other parties. We will ask you for permission before you authorize our collection of this information. We may also collect information about how you are using the Services to interact with those connected services.
Information from Other Sources:
In addition to the information collected through our Website, we or our vendors may obtain and disclose additional information, such as job title or contact information, from other public and non-public sources such as business websites, social networking platforms, or databases maintained by other parties. We use this information to better enable Branch to identify and contact businesses that might be interested in engaging our Services, and to gain a better understanding of a potential Client’s business needs.
Communications with Branch:
Some Website Users may provide Personal Data to Branch by sending us an email or filling out an online form on the Website. We use this information to answer their question(s), and may store that information for our record keeping, marketing, and advertising purposes.
Research/Survey Solicitations:
From time to time, we may perform research (online and offline) via surveys. We may engage vendors to conduct such surveys on our behalf. All survey responses are voluntary, and the information collected will be used for research and reporting purposes to help us better serve individuals by learning more about their needs and the quality of the products and services we provide. The survey responses may be utilized to determine the effectiveness of our Website, various types of communications, advertising campaigns and/or promotional activities.
Cookies, Pixels and Web Beacons:
We also collect other data via the Website from Website Users, including Website Users employed by or affiliated with Clients, through cookies and/or web beacons. Such information, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law, may include IP address, pages viewed, browser type, Internet browsing and usage habits, how you browse and navigate the Website, Internet Service Provider, domain name, the time/date of your visit to the Website, the referring URL, and your computer’s operating system. For example, we may collect on a real-time basis information on how you use and navigate the Website.
If you permit the use of cookies and web beacons when you visit and continue to use the Website, we will collect information through those tools. Cookies are small data files stored on your hard drive by a website and web beacons are electronic images that may be used on our Website or in our emails. Cookies help us improve your experience on the Website as well as our marketing activities. We use cookies to see which areas and features are popular and to count visits to our Website. For more information about cookies and web beacons, please visit
https://www.cookiepro.com/knowledgebase/knowledge_categories/cookies-101/
. For more information about how to opt-out of cookies and web beacons after you have consented to their use, see the “Opt-out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons” section below.
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected?
Top
Branch processes the data described in the section above for the following purposes:
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Website;
to fulfill your and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services;
to send information about the Services including confirmations, invoices, payment processing, technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
to communicate about products and services offered by Branch and Branch's selected partners. We receive opt-in consent to send promotional and marketing messages to Website Users where required by applicable law. You can opt-out of receiving these messages at any time as described below in the section titled: “Opt-out from Promotional Emails”;
to conduct research;
to manage your information and account, to improve and administer our Website, to contact Website Users to answer questions or resolve problems, or to verify your identity;
to conduct research to help us to optimally deliver our existing Services or develop new products, processes and services;
for ad delivery and reporting purposes and to create data and analytics products and services;
to make the Website easier to use by reducing the need for Clients and Website Users to enter information;
for other purposes disclosed to you at the time you provide data to us;
with your consent; or
where Branch otherwise has a legitimate interest in collecting the data, such as direct marketing, individual or market research, product improvement, anti-fraud protection, protecting the safety of us, our Website Users, or other parties, or where required by law.
Opt-Out & Do Not Track - Your Choice Mechanisms
Top
In some cases, we rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you. In those cases, and where you have consented to Branch's processing of your Personal Data in connection with your use of the Website, you may withdraw that consent at any time by following the instructions below. Additionally, before we use Personal Data collected with your consent for any new purpose not originally authorized by you, we will provide information regarding the new purpose and ask for your consent for the new purpose. Where your consent for the processing of Personal Data is otherwise required by law or contract, we will comply with the law or contract. In other cases, we do not rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you (for example, if we have a different legal basis to process that data).
Opt Out from Promotional Emails
Top
You can opt-out of receiving promotional emails from us by following the instructions in those emails, or by filling out
this form
. You can also opt-out of certain categories of emails using
this form
. If you opt-out using any of these tools, we may still send you non-promotional emails, such as certain updates about your account or updates to our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy and/or use of the Services.
Opt Out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons
Top
We will only use cookies consistent with your cookie settings and permissions granted on our Website. If you permit us to use cookies/web beacons as discussed above (“What Information Does Branch Collect from our Website”), but would like to opt-out:
For dashboard users, visit
https://dashboard.branch.io/account-settings/user
, and toggle off “Cookie Consent”.
For all other users, click on “Cookie Consent” at the bottom right-hand corner of our homepage (
https://branch.io/
), and click on the opt-out link.
Also, you can choose to set your browser to remove cookies and to reject cookies. To exercise the "Do Not Track" settings available on certain web browsers, please visit the privacy settings of your browser. Where Branch is able to see that such a selection has been made, we will not use information collected from that device to target advertising on that browser. Dashboard users must use the “Cookie Consent” feature to revoke permission to place cookies. Please note that "Do Not Track" is a different privacy mechanism than the Global Privacy Control browser choice referenced below.
Note that, even if you opt out, we may still collect and use non-personal data regarding your activities on our Website. This also does not opt you out of being served advertising altogether; you will continue to receive generic advertisements.
Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website
Top
The Website utilizes tracking tools from vendors, which may enable these vendors to analyze our Website traffic for analytics purposes. Some of these vendors may collect information from this Website for retargeting and interest-based advertising purposes. For more information about these forms of ad targeting and to understand your right to opt-out from these practices, please visit
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
. All of these tools are hosted by the parties who provide them, and your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policies of the parties providing them. These tools include, but are not limited to, those below.
Google
. We may use Google Analytics and Google Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting to collect information regarding visitor behavior and visitor demographics on our Website, and to develop website content. For more information about Google Analytics, please visit
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
. You can opt-out of Google’s collection and processing of data generated by your use of the Website by going to
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
Mixpanel
. We use a service provided by Mixpanel, Inc. (“Mixpanel”) to provide us with analytics data regarding Website Users’ interactions with our Website and Services. You may opt-out of Mixpanel’s automatic retention of data that is collected while using the Services by visiting
https://mixpanel.com/optout/
. To track opt-outs, Mixpanel uses a persistent opt-out cookie placed on your device. Please note that if you get a new computer, install a new browser, erase or otherwise alter the browser’s cookie file (including upgrading certain browsers), you may delete the Mixpanel opt-out cookie.
Facebook.
We may use certain tools offered by Facebook, Inc. (“Facebook”) that enable it to collect or receive information about actions Website Users take on our Website through use of cookies, web beacons and other storage technologies or in order to provide measurement services, targeted ads and other services. For more information regarding the collection and use of such information by Facebook, please see the Facebook Data Policy, available at:
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php
.
Drift
. We use certain tools offered by Drift to power our Website’s live-chat experience. If you provide information about yourself through that live-chat experience, then we may store that information for marketing purposes. Drift may also infer information about the company that you work for you based on your IP address.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website
When does Branch Disclose Information?
Top
In addition to the ways described in our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy, Branch may also disclose information to others under the following circumstances:
With vendors, consultants and other parties who work for us and need access to information we collect to do that work.
With our Clients and their agents, as described in this Policy.
To other parties (such as advertising networks or vendors used by our Clients), as directed by our Clients.
To comply with laws or to respond to lawful requests and legal process including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements, and in order to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding suspected, or actual, prohibited activities, including but not limited to fraud and situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person.
To protect the rights and property of Branch, our agents, Clients, Users, Website Users, and others including to enforce our agreements, policies, and Terms & Conditions.
To Branch’s subsidiaries and affiliates as necessary to help us provide, support, and maintain the Services.
In connection with or during negotiation of any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
Updating Your Information and Contact Preferences
Top
We provide Clients with a mechanism to access, review and update information via the dashboard. If you wish to review or update your information, please visit branch.io and login using the username and password you created. Next, please select “Account Settings” which can be found in the lower left corner of the dashboard screen, then select the “User” tab near the top. If you would like to delete your account, please email
support@branch.io
.
We Secure the Information We Collect
Top
Securing the information provided by our Clients and collected through our Website is important to us. Branch has implemented industry-standard technical, administrative, and physical safeguards to help protect the information on our servers against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. You are responsible for maintaining the secrecy of your own passwords. If you have reason to believe that your passwords or Personal Data are no longer secure, please promptly notify us at
privacy@branch.io
.
Our Data Retention Policy
Top
For our Services:
Branch stores the information collected by our Services (see the “What Information Does Branch Collect from our Services?” section above) so long as our systems continue to encounter that User. After that User has been inactive for 30 days (or 90 days for specific attribution products), identifiers collected from that User will be deleted unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Usage activity logs, which are used for the purpose of reporting and analytics, are stored in an identifiable form for no more than 7 days (or up to 60 days as determined by the Client or for specific fields), after which these logs are removed or pseudonymized. Any and all pseudonymized logs are deleted after 12 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Aggregated reporting metrics disclosed to Clients are retained (in aggregate and anonymized form) for up to 24 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Branch may retain information collected by our Services beyond these periods for fraud prevention, analysis, or response, or to protect the safety of Branch, its Clients, Users or the public.
For the Website:
We store Personal Data such as email address or billing details for so long as you continue to have a business relationship with Branch and for a reasonable time thereafter for record-keeping purposes. If applicable to you, you may ask us to delete that information as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below or pursuant to your right of erasure as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below.
Links to Other Websites
Top
The Website and/or Services may contain links to other websites and other websites may reference or link to our Website and/or Services. These other domains and websites are not controlled by Branch, and we do not endorse or make any representations about websites or social media platforms operated by other parties. We encourage you to read the privacy policies of each and every website and application that you interact with. We do not endorse, screen, or approve, and are not responsible for the privacy practices or content of such other websites or applications. Visiting these other websites or applications is at your own risk.
International Data Transfers
Top
All information collected via the Website and Services is stored on servers located in the United States. In the process of providing the Services, we may transfer information across borders from other countries or jurisdictions into the United States. Data protection laws in the United States may differ from your country, and the data Branch processes may be accessible to law enforcement and national security authorities under certain circumstances. By using the Services, each Client and Website User consents to the transfer and processing of information to the U.S. in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Data transfers from the European Union, United Kingdom, and Switzerland are transferred on the basis of legal mechanisms approved by the European Commission and other relevant authorities for cross-border data transfers, such as Standard Contractual Clauses or the Privacy Shield mechanism discussed in the “Privacy Shield For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States” section below.
Privacy Shield For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States
Top
Branch complies with the E.U.-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework and the Swiss-US Privacy Shield Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of Personal Data from European Union member countries (including European Economic Area member countries), the United Kingdom, and Switzerland transferred to the United States pursuant to Privacy Shield. Branch recognizes that the Court of Justice of the European Union ruled in July 2020 that a certification under the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework no longer can serve as the basis by which entities subject to the GDPR export personal data to jurisdictions outside the European Economic Area, and that the Swiss Data Protection Authority similarly held the Swiss-US Privacy Shield inadequate. Branch will continue to honor its obligation to comply with the Privacy Shield Principles with respect to data that was transferred pursuant to the EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework. If there is any conflict between the policies in this Privacy Policy and data subject rights under the Privacy Shield Principles, the Privacy Shield Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Privacy Shield program, and to view our certification page, please visit
https://www.privacyshield.gov
.
Branch no longer relies on the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield to transfer data that originated in the EEA or the United Kingdom to the U.S.
Branch is subject to the investigatory and enforcement authority of the US Federal Trade Commission.
Pursuant to the Privacy Shield Frameworks we are obliged to inform EU, UK, and Swiss individuals whose data is being transferred into the United States that we may be required to release Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities including to meet national security and law enforcement requirements.
Branch remains liable for the onward transfer of EU, UK, and Swiss personal data to other parties pursuant to the Privacy Shield unless we can prove we were not a party to the actions giving rise to the damages.
We acknowledge the right of EU, UK, and Swiss individuals to access their Personal Data pursuant to the Privacy Shield. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals wishing to exercise this right may do so by contacting privacy@branch.io.
In compliance with the Privacy Shield Principles, Branch commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information transferred to the United States pursuant to Privacy Shield. European Union, UK, and Swiss individuals with Privacy Shield inquiries or complaints should first contact Branch at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
privacy@branch.io
Branch has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the Privacy Shield Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, the BBB EU PRIVACY SHIELD, operated by BBB National Programs. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit
http://www.bbb.org/EU-privacy-shield/for-eu-consumers
for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your Privacy Shield complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms. See Privacy Shield Annex 1 at
https://www.privacyshield.gov/article?id=ANNEX-I-introduction
.
Data Subject Rights
Top
California Consumer Privacy Act
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) provides certain rights to natural persons who are residents of California. Our CCPA privacy notice is available
here
.
Rights of Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
The European General Data Protection Regulation of 2018 (“GDPR”) and equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation (“UK Data Protection Law”) provides certain rights to residents of Europe. Information on how you can exercise rights under the GDPR and UK Data Protection Law are set forth
here
.
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”) provides certain rights to residents of Brazil. Information on how you can exercise rights under the LGPD are set forth
here
.
Our Policy Regarding Children
Top
Services:
The Branch Services are not directed to children. We require that Clients agree to not send to us data relating to any children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16). If you are a Client and want to learn more about Branch
SDK Privacy Controls
that you can use in your compliance with the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA), GDPR, or any other applicable law, please contact privacy@branch.io.
If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16) in violation of applicable law, please contact us at privacy@branch.io, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any information that it may have been provided inappropriately as required by law.
Website:
The Branch Website is not directed to children. We do not knowingly collect through the Website Personal Data from anyone under the age of 16. If you are under 16, please do not attempt to register or send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, or email address. No one under 16 may provide any Personal Data to us. In the event that we learn that we have collected any such data from a child under 16 through our Website, we will take reasonable steps to delete that information as quickly as possible. If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 16, please contact us at privacy@branch.io, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any inappropriately obtained information as required by law.
Contact Us, Questions, Changes to This Privacy Policy
Top
We may change this Privacy Policy at any time in our sole discretion. We will post all changes to this Privacy Policy on this page and will indicate at the top of the page the modified Privacy Policy’s effective date. If you have any questions or suggestions regarding this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
info@branch.io
Compliance
Top
This Privacy Policy shall be implemented by Branch and all its operating divisions, subsidiaries and affiliates. Branch has put in place mechanisms to verify ongoing compliance with this Privacy Policy.
Effective April 7th 2023
to
May 8th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Privacy Policy
The Branch Guiding Privacy Principles
Top
We are a linking and analytics platform for app and website developers. And we are proud of our commitment to providing our services in a privacy-first way. So we thought it would be helpful to lay out, in plain English, the Branch Guiding Privacy Principles that drive how we’ve chosen to design our services with privacy as a top priority. We further describe our privacy practices in the official
Privacy Policy
below this section, but we hope you’ll find this summary of our principles helpful.
We limit the data we collect.
We practice data minimization, which means that we take steps to avoid collecting or storing information that we don’t need to provide our services. The personal data that we collect to provide our services is limited to data like advertising identifiers, IP address, and information derived from resettable cookies (the full list is below in our privacy policy). We do not collect or store information such as names, email addresses, physical addresses, or SSNs to provide our services. Nor do we want to. In fact, our
Terms & Conditions
prohibit our customers from providing Branch with any kind of sensitive end-user information.
We will only provide you with data about actual end-user activity on your apps or websites.
Customers who subscribe to our linking and analytics platform can only access “earned” cookies or identifiers. This means that an end user must visit a customer’s site before our customer can see the cookie; and an end user must download a customer’s app in order for Branch to collect the end user’s advertising identifier for that customer. In short, the Branch services benefit customers who already have seen an end user across their platforms and want to understand the relationship between those web visits and app sessions.
We do not rent or sell customer end user data.
No Branch customer can access another Branch customer’s end-user data. And we are not in the business of renting or selling any customer’s end-user data to anyone else. To enable customers to control their end-user personal data, they can request deletion
here
of that data at any time, whether in bulk or for a specific end user. These controls are available to customers worldwide, although we designed them to comply with the CCPA and GDPR requirements.
Beyond these principles stated above, Branch will continue to find ways to design our services to respect end user privacy. We’re committed to making sure our customers understand how we use data they entrust to us and how they can control it so that they can, in turn, be transparent with their end users.
Introduction
Top
Branch Metrics, Inc. ( "
Branch
", "
us
", "
our
" or "
we
") offers a linking and analytics platform enabling developers of applications (our "
Clients
")--whether those applications are websites or "apps," and across different types of devices--to improve their end users’ ("
Users
") cross-application experiences, and to derive additional insights into how their Users download and utilize those applications. Branch recognizes and believes that data privacy is important to all Internet users, and therefore we design and operate our services in a privacy-first manner.
This Privacy Policy is divided into three parts:
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services:
This section explains how Branch collects and uses information about Users in connection with our linking and analytics products and services (the "
Branch Services
" or the "
Services
").
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes:
This section explains how we collect and use information about our website visitors through our website located at branch.io (the “
Website
”), which includes the dashboard we provide to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. So, if you are a Client using our Branch dashboard, this section applies to the data we collect from you. It also explains how we collect information about potential Clients from vendors and other sources to enhance our marketing efforts.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website:
This section lays out the parts of the Branch Privacy Policy that apply to both the Services and to the Website.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services
What Information Does Branch Collect from Our Services?
Top
Below, we explain what information we collect on behalf of our Clients through the Services, and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
The Branch Services: Overview
Top
Branch provides a variety of Services intended to help Clients understand the use of their digital properties by their Users across a wide array of platforms, devices and applications. Branch helps Clients by connecting User interactions across siloed applications (email, SMS, web browsers, social platforms, native applications and others), so that Clients understand the multiple steps that a User took to ultimately complete a transaction with the Client. The Client can use this information to better inform marketing and product decisions as well as to provide improved user experiences by using their knowledge of continuity.
Branch has no direct relationship with Users. Branch’s Services are provided when Branch Clients install on their platforms “Branch Mechanisms” (including links, pixels, direct platform integrations, etc.) that capture User action on behalf of the Client. Using the information collected from these Branch Mechanisms, Branch uses a variety of attribution techniques to connect User actions across different channels and platforms. Some of these attribution techniques include a direct pass-through of identifiers from platform to platform, creating and storing identifiers unique to the Branch platform to connect User actions and identifiers together, and predictive modeling algorithms using real-time and historical data parameters observed from User interactions where there are no shared identifiers available, as well as using historical connections Branch has derived over time using our technology. In some cases, these connections are made without the use of cookies. These techniques help Clients match Users with devices they use, including matching the same User across multiple devices.
The key use cases of Branch’s Services are:
To support Clients in implementing deep linking, which uses Branch’s connection information in real time to improve the User experience.
For example, if a User clicks on a link in an email or ad to a specific page in a Client’s app, Branch helps the User get to that page after they download the app.
To report individualized and aggregated analytics metrics about the performance of the Client’s product and marketing initiatives to the Client directly.
For example, Branch can tell a Client how many Users that downloaded an app or that went to a specific page in an app came from clicking on a specific link, and provide corresponding advertising or other identifiers.
To assist the Client by presenting real time, targeted messaging to their Users depending on past behavior observed across the Client’s tracked platforms with the purpose of driving more engagement to the Client.
For example, Branch can use Branch Mechanisms to provide a tailored message like a coupon code or special offer in your website to users who have interacted with your app and/or website in the past.
Branch requires that each Client commit to disclose to Branch only information that it has lawfully obtained (including, where necessary, by obtaining consent from Users), and that it has the right to disclose to Branch. We strongly discourage Clients from disclosing sensitive User information with us, as such information is not necessary for the provision of the Services, and we prohibit them from providing us with data relating to children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16).
In the charts below, we summarize the information collected automatically by the Services.
Information Collected By Branch Links and Pixels
Top
Branch collects the following information from URLs created by the Client (i.e., Branch Links) and pixels placed on Client websites. Branch Links may be embedded into QR Codes as configured by the Client. Some of this information is considered personal data under applicable law (in other words, information that itself may identify a unique individual or can be linked back to an individual) (“
Personal Data
”).
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for attribution and to understand general location
Cookie
Standard web cookies, used for device identification and attribution
Link Data
Metadata controlled by the Client, which may be used to interpret the data for reporting, or for analytics
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; used for device identification and attribution
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the webpage from which such ads were displayed, and webpages on Client’s website visited by a User.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their website (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
Information Collected by Branch SDKs
Top
SDKs are Software Development Kits that include code that allows Clients to use the Branch Services. The Branch Mobile App SDKs, Web SDKs, and Over-the-Top (OTT) SDKs collect the following information when Clients use these SDKs in their applications or websites, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
Advertising identifier (e.g., GAID, Android ID, IDFA, IDFV, RIDA)
Used for device identification and attribution
Branch Cookie ID
Used for device identification and attribution
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for device identification, attribution, and to understand general location
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Central Processing Unit (CPU) Type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
System build version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Internet connection type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Application version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device model
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Manufacturer / Brand
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen size (height, width)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen resolution
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile network status (Wi-Fi, etc.)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device locale (country and language)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Local IP address
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile platform
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Branch SDK version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Developer ID
(optional) Client-supplied unique identifier; metadata feature Used for device identification and attribution
Carrier ID
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Environment
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
UI Mode
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the application page from which such ads were displayed, pages on Client’s application visited by a User, downloads, opt-in status for certain tracking mechanisms, and installations of applications.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their application (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
In addition to the information identified above, the Branch Desktop SDKs collect the following identifiers when Clients use these SDKs in their desktop applications, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
MAC address
Used for device identification and attribution
Windows Advertising ID
Used for device identification and attribution
CPU ID
Used for device identification and attribution
Information Collected By Other Parties
Top
As part of Branch’s Services, Branch’s Clients may direct certain of their vendors or business partners (such as an ad network or vendor) to provide certain Engagement Data to Branch on the Client’s behalf.
How Does Branch Use Information Collected by Our Services?
Top
Data Branch collects through the Services is processed:
to better understand how and from where Users come to download certain apps, what types of apps are popular, or to recognize browsers and devices that are likely to be operated by the same User.
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Branch Services we provide our Clients, including to support other Branch products and services, develop new products and services, and market products or services; to support the products and services of our Clients; and as permitted or required by applicable law.
to fulfill Clients’ and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services including processing data at the Client’s direction and transferring User data to them. Branch does not control how Clients use information Branch discloses to Clients, and Users should read Clients’ Privacy Policies to understand how they use information they receive from Branch.
to aggregate data across various sources, including data from various Clients or other parties.
to create reports based on aggregated information, which is information that cannot reasonably be linked back to any individual person or Client and disclose these reports to the public.
for anti-fraud protection and analysis relating to the Services to ensure more accurate attribution measurement, general fraud prevention, or where otherwise required by law.
We may aggregate and/or de-identify the data we collect through the Services. After data has been aggregated and/or de-identified, Branch cannot use it to personally identify an individual. We may use de-identified and/or aggregated data for any purpose, including without limitation for research and marketing purposes, and may also disclose such data to any other parties, including business partners, Clients, and/or others.
Our Clients’ Use of Information
Top
Our Clients may use the information collected via the Services to improve their Users’ app experiences, customize their apps to Users, and to better understand their app marketing programs and how Users discover their apps. For example, a User may want to disclose information about a hotel that she found in a travel app to a friend. When that User sends her friend a Branch link to that hotel, after clicking the link the friend is brought directly to the content relating to that hotel within the app, rather than landing on the app’s homepage and having to search for the hotel. The travel app would also gain insights and analytics as to how the content is being disclosed from its app.
We require that our Clients utilize our Services responsibly and in accordance with our
Terms & Conditions
. Branch is not responsible for the data practices of any of our Clients through the Services or otherwise. Each Client’s practices are subject to each Client’s individual privacy policy. Users should review the privacy policy of each Client to understand how that Client uses User information collected through the Services.
User Choices
Top
Branch recognizes a number of consumer choice mechanisms. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality may be degraded or no longer work as a result if you exercise certain of the opt-outs below.
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer read or set cookies (beyond the opt-out cookie itself). Cookie-based opt outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”) and adheres to its Code of Conduct. NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from interest-based advertising by participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt out of the Branch Services on a particular device by submitting a request
here
.
Device Identifiers:
To use your device’s privacy settings controls, please visit the privacy settings menu of your device to review and access the privacy controls made available on the device. Branch will only be able to collect information from the device as permitted by these settings.
Client App Opt-out Controls:
Branch‘s
SDK Privacy Controls
allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data. Clients can flag in the Branch SDK that a particular User’s data should not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Engagement Builder:
Branch's Engagement Builder feature may be used to help Clients conduct re-engagement and re-targeting campaigns. We require that Clients using Branch’s Engagement Builder feature for such purposes respect User opt-out preferences passed to them by Branch.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes
What Information Does Branch Collect about Website Visitors and Potential Customers?
Top
Branch collects information from Website visitors (“you” or “Website Users”) located at www.branch.io ( the “Website”), which includes the dashboard provided to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. The types of information we may collect and our privacy practices depend on the nature of the relationship you have with us and the requirements of applicable law. Below are the legal bases and some of the ways we collect information and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
What We Collect from Clients that Use the Website
Top
Branch collects Personal Data and non-personal data via the Website. For example, when Clients register to use our Services, we ask them to provide us with Personal Data, including first and last name and email address.
Dashboard Information:
Information we collect from visitors who register for an account on our dashboard includes the following, some of which is considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for limited security login controls
Cookie (ours)
Standard web cookie used for dashboard session management
Cookie (other-party)
Other-party web tracking tools used for business intelligence
First, Last Name
Used for team user identification
Work Email
Used as the primary login identifier
Password
Account registration, secure our Services and prevent fraud
Account Holder Primary Role
Account registration, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; may be used for limited security login controls
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for general internal business analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for general internal business analytics
Github ID
(optional) Can be used as a login method
Billing information
Payment account registration
Log Data
Provide the Services, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners, personalize our experience, secure our Services and prevent fraud, and defend our legal rights and comply with the law
Account holder feedback
Help us improve your experience on the account dashboard
When a Client creates an account and uses the Services, Branch may collect certain log data, such as IP address from which a Client is connecting to the Services, information related to the device being used to connect to the Services (e.g., browser type and version, device type, OS version) and the features and functions of the Services used by the Client (“Log Data”).
We also require Clients to set up a user ID and unique password for account security purposes. Clients must not disclose their passwords to anyone. Clients also have the option of adding other team members to their account. This account information enables us to set up an account for Clients, to provide the Services, and to otherwise manage Client accounts. We may also use this information to notify Clients about updates to our Services and provide them with promotional emails. We offer a mechanism to opt out from promotional emails as described in the “Opt-Out from Promotional Emails” section below.
Account and Billing Information:
To the extent that we charge a fee for the Services, we may also collect limited billing, payment, and contract information from Clients through our payment and contract vendors.
Connection Information with Other Parties:
Some features of the dashboard Services allow you to disclose your information through your accounts to other companies such as Facebook and Google. If you choose to connect Branch to such services provided by other parties, we may collect information related to your use of those services provided by other parties, such as authentication tokens that allow us to connect to your accounts with those other parties. We will ask you for permission before you authorize our collection of this information. We may also collect information about how you are using the Services to interact with those connected services.
Information from Other Sources:
In addition to the information collected through our Website, we or our vendors may obtain and disclose additional information, such as job title or contact information, from other public and non-public sources such as business websites, social networking platforms, or databases maintained by other parties. We use this information to better enable Branch to identify and contact businesses that might be interested in engaging our Services, and to gain a better understanding of a potential Client’s business needs.
Communications with Branch:
Some Website Users may provide Personal Data to Branch by sending us an email or filling out an online form on the Website. We use this information to answer their question(s), and may store that information for our record keeping, marketing, and advertising purposes.
Research/Survey Solicitations:
From time to time, we may perform research (online and offline) via surveys. We may engage vendors to conduct such surveys on our behalf. All survey responses are voluntary, and the information collected will be used for research and reporting purposes to help us better serve individuals by learning more about their needs and the quality of the products and services we provide. The survey responses may be utilized to determine the effectiveness of our Website, various types of communications, advertising campaigns and/or promotional activities.
Cookies, Pixels and Web Beacons:
We also collect other data via the Website from Website Users, including Website Users employed by or affiliated with Clients, through cookies and/or web beacons. Such information, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law, may include IP address, pages viewed, browser type, Internet browsing and usage habits, how you browse and navigate the Website, Internet Service Provider, domain name, the time/date of your visit to the Website, the referring URL, and your computer’s operating system. For example, we may collect on a real-time basis information on how you use and navigate the Website.
If you permit the use of cookies and web beacons when you visit and continue to use the Website, we will collect information through those tools. Cookies are small data files stored on your hard drive by a website and web beacons are electronic images that may be used on our Website or in our emails. Cookies help us improve your experience on the Website as well as our marketing activities. We use cookies to see which areas and features are popular and to count visits to our Website. For more information about cookies and web beacons, please visit
http://www.allaboutcookies.org/
. For more information about how to opt-out of cookies and web beacons after you have consented to their use, see the “Opt-out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons” section below.
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected?
Top
Branch processes the data described in the section above for the following purposes:
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Website;
to fulfill your and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services;
to send information about the Services including confirmations, invoices, payment processing, technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
to communicate about products and services offered by Branch and Branch's selected partners. We receive opt-in consent to send promotional and marketing messages to Website Users where required by applicable law. You can opt-out of receiving these messages at any time as described below in the section titled: “Opt-out from Promotional Emails”;
to conduct research;
to manage your information and account, to improve and administer our Website, to contact Website Users to answer questions or resolve problems, or to verify your identity;
to conduct research to help us to optimally deliver our existing Services or develop new products, processes and services;
for ad delivery and reporting purposes and to create data and analytics products and services;
to make the Website easier to use by reducing the need for Clients and Website Users to enter information;
for other purposes disclosed to you at the time you provide data to us;
with your consent; or
where Branch otherwise has a legitimate interest in collecting the data, such as direct marketing, individual or market research, product improvement, anti-fraud protection, protecting the safety of us, our Website Users, or other parties, or where required by law.
Opt-Out & Do Not Track - Your Choice Mechanisms
Top
In some cases, we rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you. In those cases, and where you have consented to Branch's processing of your Personal Data in connection with your use of the Website, you may withdraw that consent at any time by following the instructions below. Additionally, before we use Personal Data collected with your consent for any new purpose not originally authorized by you, we will provide information regarding the new purpose and ask for your consent for the new purpose. Where your consent for the processing of Personal Data is otherwise required by law or contract, we will comply with the law or contract. In other cases, we do not rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you (for example, if we have a different legal basis to process that data).
Opt Out from Promotional Emails
Top
You can opt-out of receiving promotional emails from us by following the instructions in those emails, or by filling out
this form
. You can also opt-out of certain categories of emails using
this form
. If you opt-out using any of these tools, we may still send you non-promotional emails, such as certain updates about your account or updates to our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy and/or use of the Services.
Opt Out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons
Top
We will only use cookies consistent with your cookie settings and permissions granted on our Website. If you permit us to use cookies/web beacons as discussed above (“What Information Does Branch Collect from our Website”), but would like to opt-out:
For dashboard users, visit
https://dashboard.branch.io/account-settings/user
, and toggle off “Cookie Consent”.
For all other users, click on “Cookie Consent” at the bottom right-hand corner of our homepage (
https://branch.io/
), and click on the opt-out link.
Also, you can choose to set your browser to remove cookies and to reject cookies. To exercise the "Do Not Track" settings available on certain web browsers, please visit the privacy settings of your browser. Where Branch is able to see that such a selection has been made, we will not use information collected from that device to target advertising on that browser. Dashboard users must use the “Cookie Consent” feature to revoke permission to place cookies. Please note that "Do Not Track" is a different privacy mechanism than the Global Privacy Control browser choice referenced below.
Note that, even if you opt out, we may still collect and use non-personal data regarding your activities on our Website. This also does not opt you out of being served advertising altogether; you will continue to receive generic advertisements.
Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website
Top
The Website utilizes tracking tools from vendors, which may enable these vendors to analyze our Website traffic for analytics purposes. Some of these vendors may collect information from this Website for retargeting and interest-based advertising purposes. For more information about these forms of ad targeting and to understand your right to opt-out from these practices, please visit
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
. All of these tools are hosted by the parties who provide them, and your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policies of the parties providing them. These tools include, but are not limited to, those below.
Google
. We may use Google Analytics and Google Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting to collect information regarding visitor behavior and visitor demographics on our Website, and to develop website content. For more information about Google Analytics, please visit
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
. You can opt-out of Google’s collection and processing of data generated by your use of the Website by going to
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
Mixpanel
. We use a service provided by Mixpanel, Inc. (“Mixpanel”) to provide us with analytics data regarding Website Users’ interactions with our Website and Services. You may opt-out of Mixpanel’s automatic retention of data that is collected while using the Services by visiting
https://mixpanel.com/optout/
. To track opt-outs, Mixpanel uses a persistent opt-out cookie placed on your device. Please note that if you get a new computer, install a new browser, erase or otherwise alter the browser’s cookie file (including upgrading certain browsers), you may delete the Mixpanel opt-out cookie.
Facebook.
We may use certain tools offered by Facebook, Inc. (“Facebook”) that enable it to collect or receive information about actions Website Users take on our Website through use of cookies, web beacons and other storage technologies or in order to provide measurement services, targeted ads and other services. For more information regarding the collection and use of such information by Facebook, please see the Facebook Data Policy, available at:
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php
.
Drift
. We use certain tools offered by Drift to power our Website’s live-chat experience. If you provide information about yourself through that live-chat experience, then we may store that information for marketing purposes. Drift may also infer information about the company that you work for you based on your IP address.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website
When does Branch Disclose Information?
Top
In addition to the ways described in our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy, Branch may also disclose information to others under the following circumstances:
With vendors, consultants and other parties who work for us and need access to information we collect to do that work.
With our Clients and their agents, as described in this Policy.
To other parties (such as advertising networks or vendors used by our Clients), as directed by our Clients.
To comply with laws or to respond to lawful requests and legal process including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements, and in order to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding suspected, or actual, prohibited activities, including but not limited to fraud and situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person.
To protect the rights and property of Branch, our agents, Clients, Users, Website Users, and others including to enforce our agreements, policies, and Terms & Conditions.
To Branch’s subsidiaries and affiliates as necessary to help us provide, support, and maintain the Services.
In connection with or during negotiation of any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
Updating Your Information and Contact Preferences
Top
We provide Clients with a mechanism to access, review and update information via the dashboard. If you wish to review or update your information, please visit branch.io and login using the username and password you created. Next, please select “Account Settings” which can be found in the lower left corner of the dashboard screen, then select the “User” tab near the top. If you would like to delete your account, please email
support@branch.io
.
We Secure the Information We Collect
Top
Securing the information provided by our Clients and collected through our Website is important to us. Branch has implemented industry-standard technical, administrative, and physical safeguards to help protect the information on our servers against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. You are responsible for maintaining the secrecy of your own passwords. If you have reason to believe that your passwords or Personal Data are no longer secure, please promptly notify us at
privacy@branch.io
.
Our Data Retention Policy
Top
For our Services:
Branch stores the information collected by our Services (see the “What Information Does Branch Collect from our Services?” section above) so long as our systems continue to encounter that User. After that User has been inactive for 30 days (or 90 days for specific attribution products), identifiers collected from that User will be deleted unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Usage activity logs, which are used for the purpose of reporting and analytics, are stored in an identifiable form for no more than 7 days (or up to 60 days as determined by the Client or for specific fields), after which these logs are removed or pseudonymized. Any and all pseudonymized logs are deleted after 12 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Aggregated reporting metrics disclosed to Clients are retained (in aggregate and anonymized form) for up to 24 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Branch may retain information collected by our Services beyond these periods for fraud prevention, analysis, or response, or to protect the safety of Branch, its Clients, Users or the public.
For the Website:
We store Personal Data such as email address or billing details for so long as you continue to have a business relationship with Branch and for a reasonable time thereafter for record-keeping purposes. If applicable to you, you may ask us to delete that information as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below or pursuant to your right of erasure as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below.
Links to Other Websites
Top
The Website and/or Services may contain links to other websites and other websites may reference or link to our Website and/or Services. These other domains and websites are not controlled by Branch, and we do not endorse or make any representations about websites or social media platforms operated by other parties. We encourage you to read the privacy policies of each and every website and application that you interact with. We do not endorse, screen, or approve, and are not responsible for the privacy practices or content of such other websites or applications. Visiting these other websites or applications is at your own risk.
International Data Transfers
Top
All information collected via the Website and Services is stored on servers located in the United States. In the process of providing the Services, we may transfer information across borders from other countries or jurisdictions into the United States. Data protection laws in the United States may differ from your country, and the data Branch processes may be accessible to law enforcement and national security authorities under certain circumstances. By using the Services, each Client and Website User consents to the transfer and processing of information to the U.S. in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Data transfers from the European Union, United Kingdom, and Switzerland are transferred on the basis of legal mechanisms approved by the European Commission and other relevant authorities for cross-border data transfers, such as Standard Contractual Clauses or the Privacy Shield mechanism discussed in the “Privacy Shield For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States” section below.
Privacy Shield For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States
Top
Branch complies with the E.U.-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework and the Swiss-US Privacy Shield Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of Personal Data from European Union member countries (including European Economic Area member countries), the United Kingdom, and Switzerland transferred to the United States pursuant to Privacy Shield. Branch recognizes that the Court of Justice of the European Union ruled in July 2020 that a certification under the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework no longer can serve as the basis by which entities subject to the GDPR export personal data to jurisdictions outside the European Economic Area, and that the Swiss Data Protection Authority similarly held the Swiss-US Privacy Shield inadequate. Branch will continue to honor its obligation to comply with the Privacy Shield Principles with respect to data that was transferred pursuant to the EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework. If there is any conflict between the policies in this Privacy Policy and data subject rights under the Privacy Shield Principles, the Privacy Shield Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Privacy Shield program, and to view our certification page, please visit
https://www.privacyshield.gov
.
Branch no longer relies on the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield to transfer data that originated in the EEA or the United Kingdom to the U.S.
Branch is subject to the investigatory and enforcement authority of the US Federal Trade Commission.
Pursuant to the Privacy Shield Frameworks we are obliged to inform EU, UK, and Swiss individuals whose data is being transferred into the United States that we may be required to release Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities including to meet national security and law enforcement requirements.
Branch remains liable for the onward transfer of EU, UK, and Swiss personal data to other parties pursuant to the Privacy Shield unless we can prove we were not a party to the actions giving rise to the damages.
We acknowledge the right of EU, UK, and Swiss individuals to access their Personal Data pursuant to the Privacy Shield. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals wishing to exercise this right may do so by contacting privacy@branch.io.
In compliance with the Privacy Shield Principles, Branch commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information transferred to the United States pursuant to Privacy Shield. European Union, UK, and Swiss individuals with Privacy Shield inquiries or complaints should first contact Branch at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
privacy@branch.io
Branch has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the Privacy Shield Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, the BBB EU PRIVACY SHIELD, operated by BBB National Programs. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit
http://www.bbb.org/EU-privacy-shield/for-eu-consumers
for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your Privacy Shield complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms. See Privacy Shield Annex 1 at
https://www.privacyshield.gov/article?id=ANNEX-I-introduction
.
Data Subject Rights
Top
California Consumer Privacy Act
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) provides certain rights to natural persons who are residents of California. Our CCPA privacy notice is available
here
.
Rights of Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
The European General Data Protection Regulation of 2018 (“GDPR”) and equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation (“UK Data Protection Law”) provides certain rights to residents of Europe. Information on how you can exercise rights under the GDPR and UK Data Protection Law are set forth
here
.
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”) provides certain rights to residents of Brazil. Information on how you can exercise rights under the LGPD are set forth
here
.
Our Policy Regarding Children
Top
Services:
The Branch Services are not directed to children. We require that Clients agree to not send to us data relating to any children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16). If you are a Client and want to learn more about Branch
SDK Privacy Controls
that you can use in your compliance with the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA), GDPR, or any other applicable law, please contact privacy@branch.io.
If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16) in violation of applicable law, please contact us at privacy@branch.io, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any information that it may have been provided inappropriately as required by law.
Website:
The Branch Website is not directed to children. We do not knowingly collect through the Website Personal Data from anyone under the age of 16. If you are under 16, please do not attempt to register or send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, or email address. No one under 16 may provide any Personal Data to us. In the event that we learn that we have collected any such data from a child under 16 through our Website, we will take reasonable steps to delete that information as quickly as possible. If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 16, please contact us at privacy@branch.io, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any inappropriately obtained information as required by law.
Contact Us, Questions, Changes to This Privacy Policy
Top
We may change this Privacy Policy at any time in our sole discretion. We will post all changes to this Privacy Policy on this page and will indicate at the top of the page the modified Privacy Policy’s effective date. If you have any questions or suggestions regarding this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
info@branch.io
Compliance
Top
This Privacy Policy shall be implemented by Branch and all its operating divisions, subsidiaries and affiliates. Branch has put in place mechanisms to verify ongoing compliance with this Privacy Policy.
Effective February 24th 2023
to
April 7th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Privacy Policy
The Branch Guiding Privacy Principles
Top
We are a linking and analytics platform for app and website developers. And we are proud of our commitment to providing our services in a privacy-first way. So we thought it would be helpful to lay out, in plain English, the Branch Guiding Privacy Principles that drive how we’ve chosen to design our services with privacy as a top priority. We further describe our privacy practices in the official
Privacy Policy
below this section, but we hope you’ll find this summary of our principles helpful.
We limit the data we collect.
We practice data minimization, which means that we take steps to avoid collecting or storing information that we don’t need to provide our services. The personal data that we collect to provide our services is limited to data like advertising identifiers, IP address, and information derived from resettable cookies (the full list is below in our privacy policy). We do not collect or store information such as names, email addresses, physical addresses, or SSNs to provide our services. Nor do we want to. In fact, our
Terms & Conditions
prohibit our customers from providing Branch with any kind of sensitive end-user information.
We will only provide you with data about actual end-user activity on your apps or websites.
Customers who subscribe to our linking and analytics platform can only access “earned” cookies or identifiers. This means that an end user must visit a customer’s site before our customer can see the cookie; and an end user must download a customer’s app in order for Branch to collect the end user’s advertising identifier for that customer. In short, the Branch services benefit customers who already have seen an end user across their platforms and want to understand the relationship between those web visits and app sessions.
We do not rent or sell customer end user data.
No Branch customer can access another Branch customer’s end-user data. And we are not in the business of renting or selling any customer’s end-user data to anyone else. To enable customers to control their end-user personal data, they can request deletion
here
of that data at any time, whether in bulk or for a specific end user. These controls are available to customers worldwide, although we designed them to comply with the CCPA and GDPR requirements.
Beyond these principles stated above, Branch will continue to find ways to design our services to respect end user privacy. We’re committed to making sure our customers understand how we use data they entrust to us and how they can control it so that they can, in turn, be transparent with their end users.
Introduction
Top
Branch Metrics, Inc. ( "
Branch
", "
us
", "
our
" or "
we
") offers a linking and analytics platform enabling developers of applications (our "
Clients
")--whether those applications are websites or "apps," and across different types of devices--to improve their end users’ ("
Users
") cross-application experiences, and to derive additional insights into how their Users download and utilize those applications. Branch recognizes and believes that data privacy is important to all Internet users, and therefore we design and operate our services in a privacy-first manner.
This Privacy Policy is divided into three parts:
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services:
This section explains how Branch collects and uses information about Users in connection with our linking and analytics products and services (the "
Branch Services
" or the "
Services
").
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes:
This section explains how we collect and use information about our website visitors through our website located at branch.io (the “
Website
”), which includes the dashboard we provide to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. So, if you are a Client using our Branch dashboard, this section applies to the data we collect from you. It also explains how we collect information about potential Clients from vendors and other sources to enhance our marketing efforts.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website:
This section lays out the parts of the Branch Privacy Policy that apply to both the Services and to the Website.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services
What Information Does Branch Collect from Our Services?
Top
Below, we explain what information we collect on behalf of our Clients through the Services, and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
The Branch Services: Overview
Top
Branch provides a variety of Services intended to help Clients understand the use of their digital properties by their Users across a wide array of platforms, devices and applications. Branch helps Clients by connecting User interactions across siloed applications (email, SMS, web browsers, social platforms, native applications and others), so that Clients understand the multiple steps that a User took to ultimately complete a transaction with the Client. The Client can use this information to better inform marketing and product decisions as well as to provide improved user experiences by using their knowledge of continuity.
Branch has no direct relationship with Users. Branch’s Services are provided when Branch Clients install on their platforms “Branch Mechanisms” (including links, pixels, direct platform integrations, etc.) that capture User action on behalf of the Client. Using the information collected from these Branch Mechanisms, Branch uses a variety of attribution techniques to connect User actions across different channels and platforms. Some of these attribution techniques include a direct pass-through of identifiers from platform to platform, creating and storing identifiers unique to the Branch platform to connect User actions and identifiers together, and predictive modeling algorithms using real-time and historical data parameters observed from User interactions where there are no shared identifiers available, as well as using historical connections Branch has derived over time using our technology. In some cases, these connections are made without the use of cookies. These techniques help Clients match Users with devices they use, including matching the same User across multiple devices.
The key use cases of Branch’s Services are:
To support Clients in implementing deep linking, which uses Branch’s connection information in real time to improve the User experience.
For example, if a User clicks on a link in an email or ad to a specific page in a Client’s app, Branch helps the User get to that page after they download the app.
To report individualized and aggregated analytics metrics about the performance of the Client’s product and marketing initiatives to the Client directly.
For example, Branch can tell a Client how many Users that downloaded an app or that went to a specific page in an app came from clicking on a specific link, and provide corresponding advertising or other identifiers.
To assist the Client by presenting real time, targeted messaging to their Users depending on past behavior observed across the Client’s tracked platforms with the purpose of driving more engagement to the Client.
For example, Branch can use Branch Mechanisms to provide a tailored message like a coupon code or special offer in your website to users who have interacted with your app and/or website in the past.
Branch requires that each Client commit to disclose to Branch only information that it has lawfully obtained (including, where necessary, by obtaining consent from Users), and that it has the right to disclose to Branch. We strongly discourage Clients from disclosing sensitive User information with us, as such information is not necessary for the provision of the Services, and we prohibit them from providing us with data relating to children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16).
In the charts below, we summarize the information collected automatically by the Services.
Information Collected By Branch Links and Pixels
Top
Branch collects the following information from URLs created by the Client (i.e., Branch Links) and pixels placed on Client websites. Branch Links may be embedded into QR Codes as configured by the Client. Some of this information is considered personal data under applicable law (in other words, information that itself may identify a unique individual or can be linked back to an individual) (“
Personal Data
”).
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for attribution and to understand general location
Cookie
Standard web cookies, used for device identification and attribution
Link Data
Metadata controlled by the Client, which may be used to interpret the data for reporting, or for analytics
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; used for device identification and attribution
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the webpage from which such ads were displayed, and webpages on Client’s website visited by a User.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their website (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
Information Collected by Branch SDKs
Top
SDKs are Software Development Kits that include code that allows Clients to use the Branch Services. The Branch Mobile App SDKs, Web SDKs, and Over-the-Top (OTT) SDKs collect the following information when Clients use these SDKs in their applications or websites, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
Advertising identifier (e.g., GAID, Android ID, IDFA, IDFV, RIDA)
Used for device identification and attribution
Branch Cookie ID
Used for device identification and attribution
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for device identification, attribution, and to understand general location
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Central Processing Unit (CPU) Type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
System build version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Internet connection type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Application version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device model
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Manufacturer / Brand
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen size (height, width)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen resolution
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile network status (Wi-Fi, etc.)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device locale (country and language)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Local IP address
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile platform
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Branch SDK version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Developer ID
(optional) Client-supplied unique identifier; metadata feature Used for device identification and attribution
Carrier ID
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Environment
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
UI Mode
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the application page from which such ads were displayed, pages on Client’s application visited by a User, downloads, opt-in status for certain tracking mechanisms, and installations of applications.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their application (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
In addition to the information identified above, the Branch Desktop SDKs collect the following identifiers when Clients use these SDKs in their desktop applications, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
MAC address
Used for device identification and attribution
Windows Advertising ID
Used for device identification and attribution
CPU ID
Used for device identification and attribution
Information Collected By Other Parties
Top
As part of Branch’s Services, Branch’s Clients may direct certain of their vendors or business partners (such as an ad network or vendor) to provide certain Engagement Data to Branch on the Client’s behalf.
How Does Branch Use Information Collected by Our Services?
Top
Data Branch collects through the Services is processed:
to better understand how and from where Users come to download certain apps, what types of apps are popular, or to recognize browsers and devices that are likely to be operated by the same User.
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Branch Services we provide our Clients, including to support other Branch products and services, develop new products and services, and market products or services; to support the products and services of our Clients; and as permitted or required by applicable law.
to fulfill Clients’ and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services including processing data at the Client’s direction and transferring User data to them. Branch does not control how Clients use information Branch discloses to Clients, and Users should read Clients’ Privacy Policies to understand how they use information they receive from Branch.
to aggregate data across various sources, including data from various Clients or other parties.
to create reports based on aggregated information, which is information that cannot reasonably be linked back to any individual person or Client and disclose these reports to the public.
for anti-fraud protection and analysis relating to the Services to ensure more accurate attribution measurement, general fraud prevention, or where otherwise required by law.
We may aggregate and/or de-identify the data we collect through the Services. After data has been aggregated and/or de-identified, Branch cannot use it to personally identify an individual. We may use de-identified and/or aggregated data for any purpose, including without limitation for research and marketing purposes, and may also disclose such data to any other parties, including business partners, Clients, and/or others.
Our Clients’ Use of Information
Top
Our Clients may use the information collected via the Services to improve their Users’ app experiences, customize their apps to Users, and to better understand their app marketing programs and how Users discover their apps. For example, a User may want to disclose information about a hotel that she found in a travel app to a friend. When that User sends her friend a Branch link to that hotel, after clicking the link the friend is brought directly to the content relating to that hotel within the app, rather than landing on the app’s homepage and having to search for the hotel. The travel app would also gain insights and analytics as to how the content is being disclosed from its app.
We require that our Clients utilize our Services responsibly and in accordance with our
Terms & Conditions
. Branch is not responsible for the data practices of any of our Clients through the Services or otherwise. Each Client’s practices are subject to each Client’s individual privacy policy. Users should review the privacy policy of each Client to understand how that Client uses User information collected through the Services.
User Choices
Top
Branch recognizes a number of consumer choice mechanisms. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality may be degraded or no longer work as a result if you exercise certain of the opt-outs below.
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer read or set cookies (beyond the opt-out cookie itself). Cookie-based opt outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”) and adheres to its Code of Conduct. NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from interest-based advertising by participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt out of the Branch Services on a particular device by submitting a request
here
.
Device Identifiers:
To use your device’s privacy settings controls, please visit the privacy settings menu of your device to review and access the privacy controls made available on the device. Branch will only be able to collect information from the device as permitted by these settings.
Client App Opt-out Controls:
Branch‘s
SDK Privacy Controls
allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data. Clients can flag in the Branch SDK that a particular User’s data should not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Engagement Builder:
Branch's Engagement Builder feature may be used to help Clients conduct re-engagement and re-targeting campaigns. We require that Clients using Branch’s Engagement Builder feature for such purposes respect User opt-out preferences passed to them by Branch.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes
What Information Does Branch Collect about Website Visitors and Potential Customers?
Top
Branch collects information from Website visitors (“you” or “Website Users”) located at www.branch.io ( the “Website”), which includes the dashboard provided to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. The types of information we may collect and our privacy practices depend on the nature of the relationship you have with us and the requirements of applicable law. Below are the legal bases and some of the ways we collect information and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
What We Collect from Clients that Use the Website
Top
Branch collects Personal Data and non-personal data via the Website. For example, when Clients register to use our Services, we ask them to provide us with Personal Data, including first and last name and email address.
Dashboard Information:
Information we collect from visitors who register for an account on our dashboard includes the following, some of which is considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for limited security login controls
Cookie (ours)
Standard web cookie used for dashboard session management
Cookie (other-party)
Other-party web tracking tools used for business intelligence
First, Last Name
Used for team user identification
Work Email
Used as the primary login identifier
Password
Account registration, secure our Services and prevent fraud
Account Holder Primary Role
Account registration, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; may be used for limited security login controls
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for general internal business analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for general internal business analytics
Github ID
(optional) Can be used as a login method
Billing information
Payment account registration
Log Data
Provide the Services, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners, personalize our experience, secure our Services and prevent fraud, and defend our legal rights and comply with the law
Account holder feedback
Help us improve your experience on the account dashboard
When a Client creates an account and uses the Services, Branch may collect certain log data, such as IP address from which a Client is connecting to the Services, information related to the device being used to connect to the Services (e.g., browser type and version, device type, OS version) and the features and functions of the Services used by the Client (“Log Data”).
We also require Clients to set up a user ID and unique password for account security purposes. Clients must not disclose their passwords to anyone. Clients also have the option of adding other team members to their account. This account information enables us to set up an account for Clients, to provide the Services, and to otherwise manage Client accounts. We may also use this information to notify Clients about updates to our Services and provide them with promotional emails. We offer a mechanism to opt out from promotional emails as described in the “Opt-Out from Promotional Emails” section below.
Account and Billing Information:
To the extent that we charge a fee for the Services, we may also collect limited billing, payment, and contract information from Clients through our payment and contract vendors.
Connection Information with Other Parties:
Some features of the dashboard Services allow you to disclose your information through your accounts to other companies such as Facebook and Google. If you choose to connect Branch to such services provided by other parties, we may collect information related to your use of those services provided by other parties, such as authentication tokens that allow us to connect to your accounts with those other parties. We will ask you for permission before you authorize our collection of this information. We may also collect information about how you are using the Services to interact with those connected services.
Information from Other Sources:
In addition to the information collected through our Website, we or our vendors may obtain and disclose additional information, such as job title or contact information, from other public and non-public sources such as business websites, social networking platforms, or databases maintained by other parties. We use this information to better enable Branch to identify and contact businesses that might be interested in engaging our Services, and to gain a better understanding of a potential Client’s business needs.
Communications with Branch:
Some Website Users may provide Personal Data to Branch by sending us an email or filling out an online form on the Website. We use this information to answer their question(s), and may store that information for our record keeping, marketing, and advertising purposes.
Research/Survey Solicitations:
From time to time, we may perform research (online and offline) via surveys. We may engage vendors to conduct such surveys on our behalf. All survey responses are voluntary, and the information collected will be used for research and reporting purposes to help us better serve individuals by learning more about their needs and the quality of the products and services we provide. The survey responses may be utilized to determine the effectiveness of our Website, various types of communications, advertising campaigns and/or promotional activities.
Cookies, Pixels and Web Beacons:
We also collect other data via the Website from Website Users, including Website Users employed by or affiliated with Clients, through cookies and/or web beacons. Such information, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law, may include IP address, pages viewed, browser type, Internet browsing and usage habits, how you browse and navigate the Website, Internet Service Provider, domain name, the time/date of your visit to the Website, the referring URL, and your computer’s operating system. For example, we may collect on a real-time basis information on how you use and navigate the Website.
If you permit the use of cookies and web beacons when you visit and continue to use the Website, we will collect information through those tools. Cookies are small data files stored on your hard drive by a website and web beacons are electronic images that may be used on our Website or in our emails. Cookies help us improve your experience on the Website as well as our marketing activities. We use cookies to see which areas and features are popular and to count visits to our Website. For more information about cookies and web beacons, please visit
http://www.allaboutcookies.org/
. For more information about how to opt-out of cookies and web beacons after you have consented to their use, see the “Opt-out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons” section below.
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected?
Top
Branch processes the data described in the section above for the following purposes:
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Website;
to fulfill your and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services;
to send information about the Services including confirmations, invoices, payment processing, technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
to communicate about products and services offered by Branch and Branch's selected partners. We receive opt-in consent to send promotional and marketing messages to Website Users where required by applicable law. You can opt-out of receiving these messages at any time as described below in the section titled: “Opt-out from Promotional Emails”;
to conduct research;
to manage your information and account, to improve and administer our Website, to contact Website Users to answer questions or resolve problems, or to verify your identity;
to conduct research to help us to optimally deliver our existing Services or develop new products, processes and services;
for ad delivery and reporting purposes and to create data and analytics products and services;
to make the Website easier to use by reducing the need for Clients and Website Users to enter information;
for other purposes disclosed to you at the time you provide data to us;
with your consent; or
where Branch otherwise has a legitimate interest in collecting the data, such as direct marketing, individual or market research, product improvement, anti-fraud protection, protecting the safety of us, our Website Users, or other parties, or where required by law.
Opt-Out & Do Not Track - Your Choice Mechanisms
Top
In some cases, we rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you. In those cases, and where you have consented to Branch's processing of your Personal Data in connection with your use of the Website, you may withdraw that consent at any time by following the instructions below. Additionally, before we use Personal Data collected with your consent for any new purpose not originally authorized by you, we will provide information regarding the new purpose and ask for your consent for the new purpose. Where your consent for the processing of Personal Data is otherwise required by law or contract, we will comply with the law or contract. In other cases, we do not rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you (for example, if we have a different legal basis to process that data).
Opt Out from Promotional Emails
Top
You can opt-out of receiving promotional emails from us by following the instructions in those emails, or by filling out
this form
. You can also opt-out of certain categories of emails using
this form
. If you opt-out using any of these tools, we may still send you non-promotional emails, such as certain updates about your account or updates to our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy and/or use of the Services.
Opt Out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons
Top
We will only use cookies consistent with your cookie settings and permissions granted on our Website. If you permit us to use cookies/web beacons as discussed above (“What Information Does Branch Collect from our Website”), but would like to opt-out:
For dashboard users, visit
https://dashboard.branch.io/account-settings/user
, and toggle off “Cookie Consent”.
For all other users, click on “Cookie Consent” at the bottom right-hand corner of our homepage (
https://branch.io/
), and click on the opt-out link.
Also, you can choose to set your browser to remove cookies and to reject cookies. To exercise the "Do Not Track" settings available on certain web browsers, please visit the privacy settings of your browser. Where Branch is able to see that such a selection has been made, we will not use information collected from that device to target advertising on that browser. Dashboard users must use the “Cookie Consent” feature to revoke permission to place cookies. Please note that "Do Not Track" is a different privacy mechanism than the Global Privacy Control browser choice referenced below.
Note that, even if you opt out, we may still collect and use non-personal data regarding your activities on our Website. This also does not opt you out of being served advertising altogether; you will continue to receive generic advertisements.
Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website
Top
The Website utilizes tracking tools from vendors, which may enable these vendors to analyze our Website traffic for analytics purposes. Some of these vendors may collect information from this Website for retargeting and interest-based advertising purposes. For more information about these forms of ad targeting and to understand your right to opt-out from these practices, please visit
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
. All of these tools are hosted by the parties who provide them, and your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policies of the parties providing them. These tools include, but are not limited to, those below.
Google
. We may use Google Analytics and Google Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting to collect information regarding visitor behavior and visitor demographics on our Website, and to develop website content. For more information about Google Analytics, please visit
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
. You can opt-out of Google’s collection and processing of data generated by your use of the Website by going to
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
Mixpanel
. We use a service provided by Mixpanel, Inc. (“Mixpanel”) to provide us with analytics data regarding Website Users’ interactions with our Website and Services. You may opt-out of Mixpanel’s automatic retention of data that is collected while using the Services by visiting
https://mixpanel.com/optout/
. To track opt-outs, Mixpanel uses a persistent opt-out cookie placed on your device. Please note that if you get a new computer, install a new browser, erase or otherwise alter the browser’s cookie file (including upgrading certain browsers), you may delete the Mixpanel opt-out cookie.
Facebook.
We may use certain tools offered by Facebook, Inc. (“Facebook”) that enable it to collect or receive information about actions Website Users take on our Website through use of cookies, web beacons and other storage technologies or in order to provide measurement services, targeted ads and other services. For more information regarding the collection and use of such information by Facebook, please see the Facebook Data Policy, available at:
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php
.
Drift
. We use certain tools offered by Drift to power our Website’s live-chat experience. If you provide information about yourself through that live-chat experience, then we may store that information for marketing purposes. Drift may also infer information about the company that you work for you based on your IP address.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website
When does Branch Disclose Information?
Top
In addition to the ways described in our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy, Branch may also disclose information to others under the following circumstances:
With vendors, consultants and other parties who work for us and need access to information we collect to do that work.
With our Clients and their agents, as described in this Policy.
To other parties (such as advertising networks or vendors used by our Clients), as directed by our Clients.
To comply with laws or to respond to lawful requests and legal process including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements, and in order to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding suspected, or actual, prohibited activities, including but not limited to fraud and situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person.
To protect the rights and property of Branch, our agents, Clients, Users, Website Users, and others including to enforce our agreements, policies, and Terms & Conditions.
To Branch’s subsidiaries and affiliates as necessary to help us provide, support, and maintain the Services.
In connection with or during negotiation of any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
Updating Your Information and Contact Preferences
Top
We provide Clients with a mechanism to access, review and update information via the dashboard. If you wish to review or update your information, please visit branch.io and login using the username and password you created. Next, please select “Account Settings” which can be found in the lower left corner of the dashboard screen, then select the “User” tab near the top. If you would like to delete your account, please email
support@branch.io
.
We Secure the Information We Collect
Top
Securing the information provided by our Clients and collected through our Website is important to us. Branch has implemented industry-standard technical, administrative, and physical safeguards to help protect the information on our servers against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. You are responsible for maintaining the secrecy of your own passwords. If you have reason to believe that your passwords or Personal Data are no longer secure, please promptly notify us at
privacy@branch.io
.
Our Data Retention Policy
Top
For our Services:
Branch stores the information collected by our Services (see the “What Information Does Branch Collect from our Services?” section above) so long as our systems continue to encounter that User. After that User has been inactive for 30 days (or 90 days for specific attribution products), identifiers collected from that User will be deleted unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Usage activity logs, which are used for the purpose of reporting and analytics, are stored in an identifiable form for no more than 7 days (or up to 60 days as determined by the Client or for specific fields), after which these logs are removed or pseudonymized. Any and all pseudonymized logs are deleted after 12 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Aggregated reporting metrics disclosed to Clients are retained (in aggregate and anonymized form) for up to 24 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Branch may retain information collected by our Services beyond these periods for fraud prevention, analysis, or response, or to protect the safety of Branch, its Clients, Users or the public.
For the Website:
We store Personal Data such as email address or billing details for so long as you continue to have a business relationship with Branch and for a reasonable time thereafter for record-keeping purposes. If applicable to you, you may ask us to delete that information as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below or pursuant to your right of erasure as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below.
Links to Other Websites
Top
The Website and/or Services may contain links to other websites and other websites may reference or link to our Website and/or Services. These other domains and websites are not controlled by Branch, and we do not endorse or make any representations about websites or social media platforms operated by other parties. We encourage you to read the privacy policies of each and every website and application that you interact with. We do not endorse, screen, or approve, and are not responsible for the privacy practices or content of such other websites or applications. Visiting these other websites or applications is at your own risk.
International Data Transfers
Top
All information collected via the Website and Services is stored on servers located in the United States. In the process of providing the Services, we may transfer information across borders from other countries or jurisdictions into the United States. Data protection laws in the United States may differ from your country, and the data Branch processes may be accessible to law enforcement and national security authorities under certain circumstances. By using the Services, each Client and Website User consents to the transfer and processing of information to the U.S. in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Data transfers from the European Union, United Kingdom, and Switzerland are transferred on the basis of legal mechanisms approved by the European Commission and other relevant authorities for cross-border data transfers, such as Standard Contractual Clauses or the Privacy Shield mechanism discussed in the “Privacy Shield For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States” section below.
Privacy Shield For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States
Top
Branch complies with the E.U.-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework and the Swiss-US Privacy Shield Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of Personal Data from European Union member countries (including European Economic Area member countries), the United Kingdom, and Switzerland transferred to the United States pursuant to Privacy Shield. Branch recognizes that the Court of Justice of the European Union ruled in July 2020 that a certification under the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework no longer can serve as the basis by which entities subject to the GDPR export personal data to jurisdictions outside the European Economic Area, and that the Swiss Data Protection Authority similarly held the Swiss-US Privacy Shield inadequate. Branch will continue to honor its obligation to comply with the Privacy Shield Principles with respect to data that was transferred pursuant to the EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework. If there is any conflict between the policies in this Privacy Policy and data subject rights under the Privacy Shield Principles, the Privacy Shield Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Privacy Shield program, and to view our certification page, please visit
https://www.privacyshield.gov
.
Branch no longer relies on the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield to transfer data that originated in the EEA or the United Kingdom to the U.S.
Branch is subject to the investigatory and enforcement authority of the US Federal Trade Commission.
Pursuant to the Privacy Shield Frameworks we are obliged to inform EU, UK, and Swiss individuals whose data is being transferred into the United States that we may be required to release Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities including to meet national security and law enforcement requirements.
Branch remains liable for the onward transfer of EU, UK, and Swiss personal data to other parties pursuant to the Privacy Shield unless we can prove we were not a party to the actions giving rise to the damages.
We acknowledge the right of EU, UK, and Swiss individuals to access their Personal Data pursuant to the Privacy Shield. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals wishing to exercise this right may do so by contacting privacy@branch.io.
In compliance with the Privacy Shield Principles, Branch commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information transferred to the United States pursuant to Privacy Shield. European Union, UK, and Swiss individuals with Privacy Shield inquiries or complaints should first contact Branch at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
privacy@branch.io
Branch has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the Privacy Shield Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, the BBB EU PRIVACY SHIELD, operated by BBB National Programs. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit
http://www.bbb.org/EU-privacy-shield/for-eu-consumers
for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your Privacy Shield complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms. See Privacy Shield Annex 1 at
https://www.privacyshield.gov/article?id=ANNEX-I-introduction
.
Data Subject Rights
Top
California Consumer Privacy Act
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) provides certain rights to natural persons who are residents of California. Our CCPA privacy notice is available
here
.
Rights of Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
The European General Data Protection Regulation of 2018 (“GDPR”) and equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation (“UK Data Protection Law”) provides certain rights to residents of Europe. Information on how you can exercise rights under the GDPR and UK Data Protection Law are set forth
here
.
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”) provides certain rights to residents of Brazil. Information on how you can exercise rights under the LGPD are set forth
here
.
Our Policy Regarding Children
Top
Services:
The Branch Services are not directed to children. We require that Clients agree to not send to us data relating to any children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16). If you are a Client and want to learn more about Branch
SDK Privacy Controls
that you can use in your compliance with the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA), GDPR, or any other applicable law, please contact privacy@branch.io.
If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16) in violation of applicable law, please contact us at privacy@branch.io, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any information that it may have been provided inappropriately as required by law.
Website:
The Branch Website is not directed to children. We do not knowingly collect through the Website Personal Data from anyone under the age of 16. If you are under 16, please do not attempt to register or send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, or email address. No one under 16 may provide any Personal Data to us. In the event that we learn that we have collected any such data from a child under 16 through our Website, we will take reasonable steps to delete that information as quickly as possible. If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 16, please contact us at privacy@branch.io, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any inappropriately obtained information as required by law.
Contact Us, Questions, Changes to This Privacy Policy
Top
We may change this Privacy Policy at any time in our sole discretion. We will post all changes to this Privacy Policy on this page and will indicate at the top of the page the modified Privacy Policy’s effective date. If you have any questions or suggestions regarding this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
info@branch.io
Compliance
Top
This Privacy Policy shall be implemented by Branch and all its operating divisions, subsidiaries and affiliates. Branch has put in place mechanisms to verify ongoing compliance with this Privacy Policy.
Effective January 1st 2023
to
February 24th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Privacy Policy
The Branch Guiding Privacy Principles
Top
We are a linking and analytics platform for app and website developers. And we are proud of our commitment to providing our services in a privacy-first way. So we thought it would be helpful to lay out, in plain English, the Branch Guiding Privacy Principles that drive how we’ve chosen to design our services with privacy as a top priority. We further describe our privacy practices in the official
Privacy Policy
below this section, but we hope you’ll find this    summary of our principles helpful.
We limit the data we collect.
We practice data minimization, which means that we take steps to avoid collecting or storing information that we don’t need to provide our services. The personal data that we collect to provide our services is limited to data like advertising identifiers, IP address, and information derived from resettable cookies (the full list is below in our privacy policy). We do not collect or store information such as names, email addresses, physical addresses, or SSNs to provide our services. Nor do we want to. In fact, our
Terms & Conditions
prohibit our customers from providing Branch with any kind of sensitive end-user information.
We will only provide you with data about actual end-user activity on your apps or            websites.
Customers who subscribe to our linking and analytics platform can only access “earned” cookies or identifiers. This means that an end user must visit a customer’s site before our customer can see the cookie; and an end user must download a customer’s app in order for Branch to collect the end user’s advertising identifier for that customer. In short, the Branch services benefit customers who already have seen an end user across their platforms and want to understand the relationship between those web visits and app sessions.
We do not rent or sell customer end user data.
No Branch customer can access another Branch        customer’s end-user data. And we are not in the business of renting or selling any customer’s        end-user data to anyone else. To enable customers to control their end-user personal data, they can        request deletion
here
of that data at any time, whether in bulk or for a specific end        user. These controls are available to customers worldwide, although we designed them to comply with the CCPA and GDPR requirements.
Beyond these principles stated    above, Branch will continue to find ways to design our services to respect end user privacy. We’re committed    to making sure our customers understand how we use data they entrust to us and how they can control it so    that they can, in turn, be transparent with their end users.
Introduction
Top
Branch Metrics, Inc. (
"Branch"
,
"us"
,
"our"
or
"we"
) offers a linking and analytics platform enabling developers of applications (our "
Clients
")--whether those applications are websites or "apps," and across different types of    devices--to improve their end users’ ("
Users
") cross-application experiences, and to    derive additional insights into how their Users download and utilize those applications. Branch recognizes    and believes that data privacy is important to all Internet users, and therefore we design and operate our    services in a privacy-first manner.
This Privacy Policy is divided into three parts:
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services:
This section explains how Branch collects and uses information about Users in connection with our linking and analytics products and services (the "
Branch Services
" or the "
Services
").
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes:
This        section explains how we collect and use information about our website visitors through our website        located at branch.io (the “
Website
”), which includes the dashboard we provide to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. So, if you are a Client using our Branch dashboard, this section applies to the data we collect from you. It also explains how we collect information about potential Clients from vendors and other sources to enhance our marketing efforts.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website:
This section lays out the        parts of the Branch Privacy Policy that apply to both the Services and to the Website.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services
What Information Does Branch Collect from Our Services?
Top
Below, we explain what information    we collect on behalf of our Clients through the Services, and how we use it. We process information in a way    that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
The Branch Services: Overview
Top
Branch provides a variety of    Services intended to help Clients understand the use of their digital properties by their Users across a    wide array of platforms, devices and applications. Branch helps Clients by connecting User interactions    across siloed applications (email, SMS, web browsers, social platforms, native applications and others), so    that Clients understand the multiple steps that a User took to ultimately complete a transaction with the    Client. The Client can use this information to better inform marketing and product decisions as well as to    provide improved user experiences by using their knowledge of continuity.
Branch has no direct relationship with Users. Branch’s Services are    provided when Branch Clients install on their platforms “Branch Mechanisms” (including links,    pixels, direct platform integrations, etc.) that capture User action on behalf of the Client. Using    the information collected from these Branch Mechanisms, Branch uses a variety of attribution    techniques to connect User actions across different channels and platforms. Some of these    attribution techniques include a direct pass-through of identifiers from platform to platform,    creating and storing identifiers unique to the Branch platform to connect User actions and    identifiers together, and predictive modeling algorithms using real-time and historical data    parameters observed from User interactions where there are no shared identifiers available, as well    as using historical connections Branch has derived over time using our technology. In some cases,    these connections are made without the use of cookies. These techniques help Clients match Users    with devices they use, including matching the same User across multiple devices.
The key use cases of Branch’s Services are:
To support Clients in implementing deep linking, which uses Branch’s        connection information in real time to improve the User experience.
For example, if a User clicks on a link in an email or ad to a                specific page in a Client’s app, Branch helps the User get to that page after they download                the app.
To report individualized and aggregated analytics        metrics about the performance of the Client’s product and marketing initiatives to the Client        directly.
For example, Branch can tell a Client how many Users that                downloaded an app or that went to a specific page in an app came from clicking on a specific                link, and provide corresponding advertising or other identifiers.
To assist the Client by presenting real time, targeted messaging to their Users depending on past behavior observed across the Client’s tracked platforms with the purpose of driving more engagement to the Client.
For example, Branch can use Branch Mechanisms to provide a                tailored message like a coupon code or special offer in your website to users who have                interacted with your app and/or website in the past.
Branch requires that each Client commit to disclose to Branch only information that it has lawfully obtained (including, where necessary, by obtaining consent from Users), and that it has the right to disclose to Branch. We strongly discourage Clients from disclosing sensitive User information with us, as such information is not necessary for the provision of the Services, and we prohibit them from providing us with data relating to children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16).
In the charts below, we summarize the information collected automatically by the Services.
Information Collected By Branch Links and Pixels
Top
Branch collects the following    information from URLs created by the Client (i.e., Branch Links) and pixels placed on Client websites.    Branch Links may be embedded into QR Codes as configured by the Client. Some of this information is    considered personal data under applicable law (in other words, information that itself may identify a unique    individual or can be linked back to an individual) (“
Personal Data
”).
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web                        HTTP request; used for attribution and to understand general location
Cookie
Standard web                        cookies, used for device identification and attribution
Link Data
Metadata                        controlled by the Client, which may be used to interpret the data for reporting, or for                        analytics
User                        Agent
Standard web                        browser user agent metadata; used for device identification and attribution
Referer
Standard web                        browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Request
Standard web                        HTTP request
Phone                        Number
(Optional) used                        only to facilitate the “Text me the app” feature if used
Engagement                        Data
Information                        relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client                        ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is                        attributed, type of ads and the webpage from which such ads were displayed, and webpages                        on Client’s website visited by a User.
Other                        interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their                        website (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
Information Collected by Branch SDKs
Top
SDKs are Software    Development Kits that include code that allows Clients to use the Branch Services. The Branch Mobile App    SDKs, Web SDKs, and Over-the-Top (OTT) SDKs collect the following information when Clients use these    SDKs in their applications or websites, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable    law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
Advertising                        identifier (e.g., GAID, Android ID, IDFA, IDFV, RIDA)
Used for device                        identification and attribution
Branch Cookie                        ID
Used for device                        identification and attribution
IP                        Address
Standard web                        HTTP request; used for device identification, attribution, and to understand general                        location
Referer
Standard web                        browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Central                        Processing Unit (CPU) Type
Metadata feature                        used for device identification and attribution
System build                        version
Metadata feature                        used for device identification and attribution
Internet                        connection type
Metadata feature                        used for device identification and attribution
Application                        version
Metadata feature                        used for device identification and attribution
Device                        model
Metadata feature                        used for device identification and attribution
Manufacturer
Metadata feature                        used for device identification and attribution
Operating                        system
Metadata feature                        used for device identification and attribution
Operating system                        version
Metadata feature                        used for device identification and attribution
Screen size                        (height, width)
Metadata feature                        used for device identification and attribution
Screen                        resolution
Metadata feature                        used for device identification and attribution
Mobile network                        status (Wi-Fi, etc.)
Metadata feature                        used for device identification and attribution
Device locale                        (country and language)
Metadata feature                        used for device identification and attribution
Local IP                        address
Metadata feature                        used for device identification and attribution
Mobile                        platform
Metadata feature                        used for device identification and attribution
Branch SDK                        version
Metadata feature                        used for device identification and attribution
Developer                        ID
(optional)                        Client-supplied unique identifier; metadata feature Used for device identification and                        attribution
Carrier                        ID
Metadata feature                        used for device identification and attribution
Engagement                        Data
Information                        relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client                        ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is                        attributed, type of ads and the application page from which such ads were displayed,                        pages on Client’s application visited by a User, downloads, opt-in status for certain                        tracking mechanisms, and installations of applications.
Other                        interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their                        application (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
In addition to the information    identified above, the Branch Desktop SDKs collect the following identifiers when Clients use these SDKs in    their desktop applications, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
MAC                        address
Used for device                        identification and attribution
Windows                        Advertising ID
Used for device                        identification and attribution
CPU ID
Used for device                        identification and attribution
Information Collected By Other Parties
Top
As part of Branch’s Services,    Branch’s Clients may direct certain of their vendors or business partners (such as an ad network or vendor)    to provide certain Engagement Data to Branch on the Client’s behalf.
How Does Branch Use Information Collected by Our Services?
Top
Data Branch collects through the Services is processed:
to better understand how and from where Users come to download certain apps, what types of apps are popular, or to recognize browsers and devices that are likely to be operated by the same User.
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Branch Services        we provide our Clients, including to support other Branch products and services, develop new        products and services, and market products or services; to support the products and services of our        Clients; and as permitted or required by applicable law.
to fulfill Clients’ and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services including processing data at the Client’s direction and transferring User data to them. Branch does not control how Clients use information Branch discloses to Clients, and Users should read Clients’ Privacy Policies to understand how they use information they receive from Branch.
to aggregate data across various sources, including data from various Clients or other parties.
to create reports based on aggregated information, which is information that cannot reasonably be linked back to any individual person or Client and disclose these reports to the public.
for anti-fraud protection and analysis relating to the Services to ensure        more accurate attribution measurement, general fraud prevention, or where otherwise required by        law.
We may aggregate and/or de-identify the data we collect through the Services. After data has been aggregated and/or de-identified, Branch cannot use it to personally identify an individual. We may use de-identified and/or aggregated data for any purpose, including without limitation for research and marketing purposes, and may also disclose such data to any other parties, including business partners, Clients, and/or others.
Our Clients’ Use of Information
Top
Our Clients may use the information collected via the Services to improve their Users’ app experiences, customize their apps to Users, and to better understand their app marketing programs and how Users discover their apps. For example, a User may want to disclose information about a hotel that she found in a travel app to a friend. When that User sends her friend a Branch link to that hotel, after clicking the link the friend is brought directly to the content relating to that hotel within the app, rather than landing on the app’s homepage and having to search for the hotel. The travel app would also gain insights and analytics as to how the content is being disclosed from its app.
We require that our Clients utilize our Services responsibly and in accordance with our
Terms & Conditions
. Branch is not responsible for the    data practices of any of our Clients through the Services or otherwise. Each Client’s practices are subject    to each Client’s individual privacy policy. Users should review the privacy policy of each Client to    understand how that Client uses User information collected through the Services.
User Choices
Top
Branch recognizes a number of    consumer choice mechanisms. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality may be degraded or no    longer work as a result if you exercise certain of the opt-outs below.
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by    clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where    Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer read or set cookies (beyond    the opt-out cookie itself). Cookie-based opt outs must be performed on each device and browser that    you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt    out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”) and adheres to its Code of Conduct. NAI provides you with    the opportunity to opt out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from interest-based advertising by    participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt out of the Branch Services on    a particular device by submitting a request
here
.
Device Identifiers:
To use your device’s privacy settings controls, please visit the    privacy settings menu of your device to review and access the privacy controls made available on the    device. Branch will only be able to collect information from the device as permitted by these    settings.
Client App Opt-out Controls:
Branch‘s
SDK Privacy Controls
allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data.    Clients can flag in the Branch SDK that a particular User’s data should not be processed by Branch,    in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Engagement Builder:
Branch's Engagement Builder feature    may be used to help Clients conduct re-engagement and re-targeting campaigns. We require that Clients using    Branch’s Engagement Builder feature for such purposes respect User opt-out preferences passed to them by    Branch.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes
What Information Does Branch Collect about Website Visitors and Potential Customers?
Top
Branch collects information from Website visitors (
“you”
or
“Website        Users”
) located at www.branch.io (
the “Website”
), which includes the dashboard    provided to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. The types of information we may collect and our    privacy    practices depend on the nature of the relationship you have with us and the requirements of applicable    law. Below are the legal bases and some of the ways we collect information and how we use it. We process    information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described    below.
What We Collect from Clients that Use the Website
Top
Branch collects Personal Data and    non-personal data via the Website. For example, when Clients register to use our Services, we ask them to    provide us with Personal Data, including first and last name and email address.
Dashboard Information:
Information we collect from    visitors who register for an account on our dashboard includes the following, some of which is considered    Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP                        Address
Standard web                        HTTP request; may be used for limited security login controls
Cookie                        (ours)
Standard web                        cookie used for dashboard session management
Cookie                        (third-party)
Third-party web                        tracking tools used for business intelligence
First, Last                        Name
Used for team                        user identification
Work                        Email
Used as the                        primary login identifier
Password
Account                        registration, secure our Services and prevent fraud
Account Holder                        Primary Role
Account                        registration, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s                        selected partners
User                        Agent
Standard web                        browser user agent metadata; may be used for limited security login controls
Referer
Standard web                        browser HTTP referer; may be used for general internal business analytics
Request
Standard web                        HTTP request; may be used for general internal business analytics
Github ID
(optional) Can                        be used as a login method
Billing                        information
Payment account                        registration
Log Data
Provide the                        Services, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s                        selected partners, personalize our experience, secure our Services and prevent fraud,                        and defend our legal rights and comply with the law
Account holder                        feedback
Help us improve                        your experience on the account dashboard
When a Client creates an account and uses the Services, Branch may collect certain log data, such as IP address from which a Client is connecting to the Services, information related to the device being used to connect to the Services (e.g., browser type and version, device type, OS version) and the features and functions of the Services used by the Client (“Log Data”).
We also require Clients to set up a user ID and unique password for account security purposes. Clients must not disclose their passwords to anyone. Clients also have the option of adding other team members to their account. This account information enables us to set up an account for Clients, to provide the Services, and to otherwise manage Client accounts. We may also use this information to notify Clients about updates to our Services and provide them with promotional emails. We offer a mechanism to opt out from promotional emails as described in the “Opt-Out from Promotional Emails” section below.
Account and Billing Information:
To the extent that we charge a fee for the Services, we may also collect limited billing, payment, and contract information from Clients through our payment and contract vendors.
Connection Information with Other Parties:
Some features of the dashboard Services allow you to disclose your information through your accounts to other companies such as Facebook and Google. If you choose to connect Branch to such services provided by other parties, we may collect information related to your use of those services provided by other parties, such as authentication tokens that allow us to connect to your accounts with those other parties. We will ask you for permission before you authorize our collection of this information. We may also collect information about how you are using the Services to interact with those connected services.
Information from Other Sources:
In addition to the information collected through our Website, we or our vendors may obtain and disclose additional information, such as job title or contact information, from other public and non-public sources such as business websites, social networking platforms, or databases maintained by other parties. We use this information to better enable Branch to identify and contact businesses that might be interested in engaging our Services, and to gain a better understanding of a potential Client’s business needs.
Communications with Branch:
Some Website Users may provide Personal Data to Branch    by sending us an email or filling out an online form on the Website. We use this information to    answer their question(s), and may store that information for our record keeping, marketing, and    advertising purposes.
Research/Survey Solicitations:
From time to time, we may perform research (online and offline) via surveys. We may engage vendors to conduct such surveys on our behalf. All survey responses are voluntary, and the information collected will be used for research and reporting purposes to help us better serve individuals by learning more about their needs and the quality of the products and services we provide. The survey responses may be utilized to determine the effectiveness of our Website, various types of communications, advertising campaigns and/or promotional activities.
Cookies, Pixels and Web Beacons:
We also collect other data via the Website from    Website Users, including Website Users employed by or affiliated with Clients, through cookies and/or    web beacons. Such information, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law, may    include IP address, pages viewed, browser type, Internet browsing and usage habits, how you browse and    navigate the Website, Internet Service Provider, domain name, the time/date of your visit to the    Website, the referring URL, and your computer’s operating system. For example, we may collect on a    real-time basis information on how you use and navigate the Website.
If you permit the use of cookies and web beacons when you visit and    continue to use the Website, we will collect information through those tools. Cookies are small data    files stored on your hard drive by a website and web beacons are electronic images that may be used on    our Website or in our emails. Cookies help us improve your experience on the Website as well as our    marketing activities. We use cookies to see which areas and features are popular and to count visits to    our Website. For more information about cookies and web beacons, please visit
http://www.allaboutcookies.org/
. For more information about how to opt-out of cookies and web beacons    after you have consented to their use, see the “Opt-out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons” section    below.
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected?
Top
Branch processes the data described in the section above for the following purposes:
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Website;
to fulfill your and prospective Clients’ requests for the        Services;
to send information about the Services including confirmations, invoices,        payment processing, technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative        messages;
to communicate about products and services offered by Branch and Branch's        selected partners. We receive opt-in consent to send promotional and marketing messages to Website        Users where required by applicable law. You can opt-out of receiving these messages at any time as        described below in the section titled: “Opt-out from Promotional Emails”;
to conduct research;
to manage your information and account, to improve and administer our        Website, to contact Website Users to answer questions or resolve problems, or to verify your        identity;
to conduct research to help us to optimally deliver our existing Services        or develop new products, processes and services;
for ad delivery and reporting purposes and to create data and analytics        products and services;
to make the Website easier to use by reducing the need for Clients and        Website Users to enter information;
for other purposes disclosed to you at the time you provide data to        us;
with your consent; or
where Branch otherwise has a legitimate interest in collecting the data, such as direct marketing, individual or market research, product improvement, anti-fraud protection, protecting the safety of us, our Website Users, or other parties, or where required by law.
Opt-Out & Do Not Track - Your Choice Mechanisms
Top
In some cases, we rely on your    consent to process Personal Data about you. In those cases, and where you have consented to Branch's    processing of your Personal Data in connection with your use of the Website, you may withdraw that consent    at any time by following the instructions below. Additionally, before we use Personal Data collected with    your consent for any new purpose not originally authorized by you, we will provide information regarding the    new purpose and ask for your consent for the new purpose. Where your consent for the processing of Personal    Data is otherwise required by law or contract, we will comply with the law or contract. In other cases, we    do not rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you (for example, if we have a different legal    basis to process that data).
Opt Out from Promotional Emails
Top
You can opt-out of receiving promotional emails from us by following the instructions in those emails, or    by filling out
this form
. You can also opt-out of certain categories of emails using
this form
. If you opt-out using any of these tools, we may still send you    non-promotional emails, such as certain updates about your account or updates to our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy and/or use of the Services.
Opt Out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons
Top
We will only use cookies consistent    with your cookie settings and permissions granted on our Website. If you permit us to use cookies/web    beacons as discussed above (“What Information Does Branch Collect from our Website”), but would like to    opt-out:
For dashboard users, visit
https://dashboard.branch.io/account-settings/user
,        and toggle off “Cookie Consent”.
For all other users, click on “Cookie Consent” at the bottom right-hand        corner of our homepage (
https://branch.io/
), and click on the opt-out link.
Also, you can choose to set your browser to remove cookies and to reject cookies. To exercise the "Do Not Track" settings available on certain web browsers, please visit the privacy settings of your browser. Where Branch is able to see that such a selection has been made, we will not use information collected from that device to target advertising on that browser. Dashboard users must use the “Cookie Consent” feature to revoke permission to place cookies. Please note that "Do Not Track" is a different privacy mechanism than the Global Privacy Control browser choice referenced below.
Note that, even if you opt out, we    may still collect and use non-personal data regarding your activities on our Website. This also does not opt    you out of being served advertising altogether; you will continue to receive generic advertisements.
Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website
Top
The Website utilizes tracking tools from vendors, which may enable these vendors to analyze our Website traffic for analytics purposes. Some of these vendors may collect information from this Website for retargeting and interest-based advertising purposes. For more information about these forms of ad targeting and to understand your right to opt-out from these practices, please visit
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
. All of these tools are hosted by the parties who provide them, and your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policies of the parties providing them. These tools include, but are not limited to, those below.
Google
. We may use Google Analytics and Google Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting to collect information regarding visitor behavior and visitor demographics on our Website, and to develop website content. For more information about Google Analytics, please visit
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
. You can opt-out of Google’s collection and processing of data generated by your use of the Website by going to
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
Mixpanel
. We use a service provided by Mixpanel, Inc. (“Mixpanel”) to    provide us with analytics data regarding Website Users’ interactions with our Website and Services.    You may opt-out of Mixpanel’s automatic retention of data that is collected while using the Services    by visiting
https://mixpanel.com/optout/
. To track opt-outs, Mixpanel uses a persistent opt-out cookie    placed on your device. Please note that if you get a new computer, install a new browser, erase or    otherwise alter the browser’s cookie file (including upgrading certain browsers), you may delete the    Mixpanel opt-out cookie.
Facebook
. We may use certain tools offered by Facebook, Inc. (“Facebook”)    that enable it to collect or receive information about actions Website Users take on our Website    through use of cookies, web beacons and other storage technologies or in order to provide    measurement services, targeted ads and other services. For more information regarding the collection    and use of such information by Facebook, please see the Facebook Data Policy, available at:
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php
.
Drift
. We use certain tools offered by    Drift to power our Website’s live-chat experience. If you provide information about yourself through that    live-chat experience, then we may store that information for marketing purposes. Drift may also infer    information about the company that you work for you based on your IP address.
Policies Applicable to Both        Our Services & Our Website
When does Branch Disclose Information?
Top
In addition to the ways described in    our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy, Branch may also disclose information to others under the following circumstances:
With vendors, consultants and other parties who work for us and need access to information we collect to do that work.
With our Clients and their agents, as described in this Policy.
To other parties (such as advertising networks or vendors used by our Clients), as directed by our Clients.
To comply with laws or to respond to lawful requests and legal process including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements, and in order to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding suspected, or actual, prohibited activities, including but not limited to fraud and situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person.
To protect the rights and property of Branch, our agents, Clients, Users, Website Users, and others including to enforce our agreements, policies, and Terms & Conditions.
To Branch’s subsidiaries and affiliates as necessary to help us provide, support, and maintain the Services.
In connection with or during negotiation of any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
Updating Your Information and Contact Preferences
Top
We provide Clients with a mechanism    to access, review and update information via the dashboard. If you wish to review or update your    information, please visit branch.io and login using the username and password you created. Next, please    select “Account Settings” which can be found in the lower left corner of the dashboard screen, then select    the “User” tab near the top. If you would like to delete your account, please email
support@branch.io
.
We Secure the Information We Collect
Top
Securing the information provided by    our Clients and collected through our Website is important to us. Branch has implemented industry-standard    technical, administrative, and physical safeguards to help protect the information on our servers against    unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. You are responsible for maintaining the secrecy    of your own passwords. If you have reason to believe that your passwords or Personal Data are no longer    secure, please promptly notify us at
privacy@branch.io
.
Our Data Retention Policy
Top
For our Services:
Branch stores the information collected by our Services (see the    “What Information Does Branch Collect from our Services?” section above) so long as our systems    continue to encounter that User. After that User has been inactive for 30 days (or 90 days for    specific attribution products), identifiers collected from that User will be deleted unless    otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Usage activity logs, which are used for the purpose of reporting and    analytics, are stored in an identifiable form for no more than 7 days (or up to 60 days as    determined by the Client or for specific fields), after which these logs are removed or    pseudonymized. Any and all pseudonymized logs are deleted after 12 months, unless otherwise required    by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Aggregated reporting metrics disclosed to Clients are retained (in aggregate and anonymized form) for up to 24 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Branch may retain information collected by our Services beyond these periods for fraud prevention, analysis, or response, or to protect the safety of Branch, its Clients, Users or the public.
For the Website:
We store Personal Data such as email address or billing details for so    long as you continue to have a business relationship with Branch and for a reasonable time thereafter for    record-keeping purposes. If applicable to you, you may ask us to delete that information as described in the    “Data Subject Rights” section below or pursuant to your right of erasure as described in the “Data Subject    Rights” section below.
Links to Other Websites
Top
The Website and/or Services may contain links to other websites and other websites may reference or link to our Website and/or Services. These other domains and websites are not controlled by Branch, and we do not endorse or make any representations about websites or social media platforms operated by other parties. We encourage you to read the privacy policies of each and every website and application that you interact with. We do not endorse, screen, or approve, and are not responsible for the privacy practices or content of such other websites or applications. Visiting these other websites or applications is at your own risk.
International Data Transfers
Top
All information collected via the Website and Services is stored on servers located in the United States. In the process of providing the Services, we may transfer information across borders from other countries or jurisdictions into the United States. Data protection laws in the United States may differ from your country, and the data Branch processes may be accessible to law enforcement and national security authorities under certain circumstances. By using the Services, each Client and Website User consents to the transfer and processing of information to the U.S. in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Data transfers from the European Union, United Kingdom, and Switzerland are transferred on the basis of legal mechanisms approved by the European Commission and other relevant authorities for cross-border data transfers, such as Standard Contractual Clauses or the Privacy Shield mechanism discussed in the “Privacy Shield For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States” section below.
Privacy Shield For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States
Top
Branch complies with the E.U.-U.S.    Privacy Shield Framework and the Swiss-US Privacy Shield Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of    Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of Personal Data from European Union member countries    (including European Economic Area member countries), the United Kingdom, and Switzerland transferred to the    United States pursuant to Privacy Shield. Branch recognizes that the Court of Justice of the European Union    ruled in July 2020 that a certification under the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework no longer can serve as    the basis by which entities subject to the GDPR export personal data to jurisdictions outside the European    Economic Area, and that the Swiss Data Protection Authority similarly held the Swiss-US Privacy Shield    inadequate. Branch will continue to honor its obligation to comply with the Privacy Shield Principles with    respect to data that was transferred pursuant to the EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework. If    there is any conflict between the policies in this Privacy Policy and data subject rights under the Privacy    Shield Principles, the Privacy Shield Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Privacy Shield    program, and to view our certification page, please visit
https://www.privacyshield.gov
.
Branch no longer relies on the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield to transfer    data that originated in the EEA or the United Kingdom to the U.S.
Branch is subject to the investigatory and enforcement authority of    the US Federal Trade Commission.
Pursuant to the Privacy Shield Frameworks we are obliged to inform    EU, UK, and Swiss individuals whose data is being transferred into the United States that we may be    required to release Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities including to    meet national security and law enforcement requirements.
Branch remains liable for the onward transfer of EU, UK, and Swiss personal data to other parties pursuant to the Privacy Shield unless we can prove we were not a party to the actions giving rise to the damages.
We acknowledge the right of EU, UK, and Swiss individuals to access    their Personal Data pursuant to the Privacy Shield. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals wishing to    exercise this right may do so by contacting
privacy@branch.io
.
In compliance with the Privacy Shield Principles, Branch commits to    resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information    transferred to the United States pursuant to Privacy Shield. European Union, UK, and Swiss    individuals with Privacy Shield inquiries or complaints should first contact Branch at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at privacy@branch.io
Branch has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints    under the Privacy Shield Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, the BBB EU    PRIVACY SHIELD, operated by BBB National Programs. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of    your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit
http://www.bbb.org/EU-privacy-shield/for-eu-consumers
for more information and to file a complaint. This service is    provided free of charge to you.
If your Privacy Shield complaint cannot be resolved through the above    channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved    by other redress mechanisms. See Privacy Shield Annex 1 at
https://www.privacyshield.gov/article?id=ANNEX-I-introduction
.
Data Subject Rights
Top
California Consumer Privacy Act
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) provides certain rights to natural persons who are    residents of California. Our CCPA privacy notice is available
here
.
Rights of Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
The European General Data Protection Regulation of 2018 (“GDPR”) and    equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United    Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation (“
UK Data Protection Law
”) provides    certain rights to residents of Europe. Information on how you can exercise rights under the GDPR and    UK Data Protection Law are set forth
here
.
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados    (“LGPD”) provides certain rights to residents of Brazil. Information on how you can exercise rights under    the LGPD are set forth
here
.
Our Policy Regarding Children
Top
Services:
The Branch Services are not directed to children. We require that    Clients agree to not send to us data relating to any children under 13 (or, in certain    jurisdictions, under 16). If you are a Client and want to learn more about Branch
SDK        Privacy Controls
that you can use in your compliance with the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy    Protection Act (COPPA), GDPR, or any other applicable law, please contact
privacy@branch.io
.
If you believe that we might have any information from or about a    child under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16) in violation of applicable law, please    contact us at privacy@branch.io, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any information    that it may have been provided inappropriately as required by law.
Website:
The Branch Website is not directed to children. We do not knowingly collect through the Website Personal Data from anyone under the age of 16. If you are under 16, please do not attempt to register or send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, or email address. No one under 16 may provide any Personal Data to us. In the event that we learn that we have collected any such data from a child under 16 through our Website, we will take reasonable steps to delete that information as quickly as possible. If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 16, please contact us at
privacy@branch.io
, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any inappropriately obtained information as required by law.
Contact Us, Questions, Changes to This Privacy Policy
Top
We may change this Privacy Policy at    any time in our sole discretion. We will post all changes to this Privacy Policy on this page and    will    indicate at the top of the page the modified Privacy Policy’s effective date. If you have any    questions or    suggestions regarding this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
info@branch.io
Compliance
Top
This Privacy Policy shall be implemented by Branch and all its operating divisions, subsidiaries and affiliates. Branch has put in place mechanisms to verify ongoing compliance with this Privacy Policy.
Effective December 29th 2022
to
January 1st 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Privacy Policy
The Branch Guiding Privacy Principles
Top
We are a linking and analytics platform for app and website developers. And we are proud of our commitment to providing our services in a privacy-first way. So we thought it would be helpful to lay out, in plain English, the Branch Guiding Privacy Principles that drive how we’ve chosen to design our services with privacy as a top priority. We further describe our privacy practices in the official
Privacy Policy
below this section, but we hope you’ll find this summary of our principles helpful.
We limit the data we collect.
We practice data minimization, which means that we take steps to avoid collecting or storing information that we don’t need to provide our services. The personal data that we collect to provide our services is limited to data like advertising identifiers, IP address, and information derived from resettable cookies (the full list is below in our privacy policy). We do not collect or store information such as names, email addresses, physical addresses, or SSNs to provide our services. Nor do we want to. In fact, our
Terms & Conditions
prohibit our customers from providing Branch with any kind of sensitive end-user information.
We will only provide you with data about actual end-user activity on your apps or websites.
Customers who subscribe to our linking and analytics platform can only access “earned” cookies or identifiers. This means that an end user must visit a customer’s site before our customer can see the cookie; and an end user must download a customer’s app in order for Branch to collect the end user’s advertising identifier for that customer. In short, the Branch services benefit customers who already have seen an end user across their platforms and want to understand the relationship between those web visits and app sessions.
We do not rent or sell customer end user data.
No Branch customer can access another Branch customer’s end-user data. And we are not in the business of renting or selling any customer’s end-user data to anyone else. To enable customers to control their end-user personal data, they can request deletion
here
of that data at any time, whether in bulk or for a specific end user. These controls are available to customers worldwide, although we designed them to comply with the CCPA and GDPR requirements.
Beyond these principles stated above, Branch will continue to find ways to design our services to respect end user privacy. We’re committed to making sure our customers understand how we use data they entrust to us and how they can control it so that they can, in turn, be transparent with their end users.
Introduction
Top
Branch Metrics, Inc. (
"Branch"
,
"us"
,
"our"
or
"we"
) offers a linking and analytics platform enabling developers of applications (our "
Clients
")--whether those applications are websites or "apps," and across different types of devices--to improve their end users’ ("
Users
") cross-application experiences, and to derive additional insights into how their Users download and utilize those applications. Branch recognizes and believes that data privacy is important to all Internet users, and therefore we design and operate our services in a privacy-first manner.
This Privacy Policy is divided into three parts:
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services:
This section explains how Branch collects and uses information about Users in connection with our linking and analytics products and services (the "
Branch Services
" or the "
Services
").
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes:
This section explains how we collect and use information about our website visitors through our website located at branch.io (the “
Website
”), which includes the dashboard we provide to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. So, if you are a Client using our Branch dashboard, this section applies to the data we collect from you. It also explains how we collect information about potential Clients from vendors and other sources to enhance our marketing efforts.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website:
This section lays out the parts of the Branch Privacy Policy that apply to both the Services and to the Website.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services
What Information Does Branch Collect from Our Services?
Top
Below, we explain what information we collect on behalf of our Clients through the Services, and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
The Branch Services: Overview
Branch provides a variety of Services intended to help Clients understand the use of their digital properties by their Users across a wide array of platforms, devices and applications. Branch helps Clients by connecting User interactions across siloed applications (email, SMS, web browsers, social platforms, native applications and others), so that Clients understand the multiple steps that a User took to ultimately complete a transaction with the Client. The Client can use this information to better inform marketing and product decisions as well as to provide improved user experiences by using their knowledge of continuity.
Branch has no direct relationship with Users. Branch’s Services are provided when Branch Clients install on their platforms “Branch Mechanisms” (including links, pixels, direct platform integrations, etc.) that capture User action on behalf of the Client. Using the information collected from these Branch Mechanisms, Branch uses a variety of attribution techniques to connect User actions across different channels and platforms. Some of these attribution techniques include a direct pass-through of identifiers from platform to platform, creating and storing identifiers unique to the Branch platform to connect User actions and identifiers together, and predictive modeling algorithms using real-time and historical data parameters observed from User interactions where there are no shared identifiers available, as well as using historical connections Branch has derived over time using our technology. In some cases, these connections are made without the use of cookies. These techniques help Clients match Users with devices they use, including matching the same User across multiple devices.
The key use cases of Branch’s Services are:
To support Clients in implementing deep linking, which uses Branch’s connection information in real time to improve the User experience.
For example, if a User clicks on a link in an email or ad to a specific page in a Client’s app, Branch helps the User get to that page after they download the app.
To report individualized and aggregated analytics metrics about the performance of the Client’s product and marketing initiatives to the Client directly.
For example, Branch can tell a Client how many Users that downloaded an app or that went to a specific page in an app came from clicking on a specific link, and provide corresponding advertising or other identifiers.
To assist the Client by presenting real time, targeted messaging to their Users depending on past behavior observed across the Client’s tracked platforms with the purpose of driving more engagement to the Client.
For example, Branch can use Branch Mechanisms to provide a tailored message like a coupon code or special offer in your website to users who have interacted with your app and/or website in the past.
Branch requires that each Client commit to disclose to Branch only information that it has lawfully obtained (including, where necessary, by obtaining consent from Users), and that it has the right to disclose to Branch. We strongly discourage Clients from disclosing sensitive User information with us, as such information is not necessary for the provision of the Services, and we prohibit them from providing us with data relating to children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16).
In the charts below, we summarize the information collected automatically by the Services.
Information Collected By Branch Links and Pixels
Branch collects the following information from URLs created by the Client (i.e., Branch Links) and pixels placed on Client websites. Branch Links may be embedded into QR Codes as configured by the Client. Some of this information is considered personal data under applicable law (in other words, information that itself may identify a unique individual or can be linked back to an individual) (“
Personal Data
”).
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for attribution and to understand general location
Cookie
Standard web cookies, used for device identification and attribution
Link Data
Metadata controlled by the Client, which may be used to interpret the data for reporting, or for analytics
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; used for device identification and attribution
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the webpage from which such ads were displayed, and webpages on Client’s website visited by a User.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their website (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
Information Collected by Branch SDKs
SDKs are Software Development Kits that include code that allows Clients to use the Branch Services. The Branch Mobile App SDKs, Web SDKs, and Over-the-Top (OTT) SDKs collect the following information when Clients use these SDKs in their applications or websites, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
Advertising identifier (e.g., GAID, Android ID, IDFA, IDFV, RIDA)
Used for device identification and attribution
Branch Cookie ID
Used for device identification and attribution
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for device identification, attribution, and to understand general location
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Central Processing Unit (CPU) Type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
System build version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Internet connection type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Application version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device model
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Manufacturer
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen size (height, width)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen resolution
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile network status (Wi-Fi, etc.)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device locale (country and language)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Local IP address
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile platform
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Branch SDK version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Developer ID
(optional) Client-supplied unique identifier; metadata feature Used for device identification and attribution
Carrier ID
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the application page from which such ads were displayed, pages on Client’s application visited by a User, downloads, opt-in status for certain tracking mechanisms, and installations of applications.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their application (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
In addition to the information identified above, the Branch Desktop SDKs collect the following identifiers when Clients use these SDKs in their desktop applications, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
MAC address
Used for device identification and attribution
Windows Advertising ID
Used for device identification and attribution
CPU ID
Used for device identification and attribution
Information Collected By Other Parties
As part of Branch’s Services, Branch’s Clients may direct certain of their vendors or business partners (such as an ad network or vendor) to provide certain Engagement Data to Branch on the Client’s behalf.
How Does Branch Use Information Collected by Our Services?
Top
Data Branch collects through the Services is processed:
to better understand how and from where Users come to download certain apps, what types of apps are popular, or to recognize browsers and devices that are likely to be operated by the same User.
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Branch Services we provide our Clients, including to support other Branch products and services, develop new products and services, and market products or services; to support the products and services of our Clients; and as permitted or required by applicable law.
to fulfill Clients’ and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services including processing data at the Client’s direction and transferring User data to them. Branch does not control how Clients use information Branch discloses to Clients, and Users should read Clients’ Privacy Policies to understand how they use information they receive from Branch.
to aggregate data across various sources, including data from various Clients or other parties.
to create reports based on aggregated information, which is information that cannot reasonably be linked back to any individual person or Client and disclose these reports to the public.
for anti-fraud protection and analysis relating to the Services to ensure more accurate attribution measurement, general fraud prevention, or where otherwise required by law.
We may aggregate and/or de-identify the data we collect through the Services. After data has been aggregated and/or de-identified, Branch cannot use it to personally identify an individual. We may use de-identified and/or aggregated data for any purpose, including without limitation for research and marketing purposes, and may also disclose such data to any other parties, including business partners, Clients, and/or others.
Our Clients’ Use of Information
Top
Our Clients may use the information collected via the Services to improve their Users’ app experiences, customize their apps to Users, and to better understand their app marketing programs and how Users discover their apps. For example, a User may want to disclose information about a hotel that she found in a travel app to a friend. When that User sends her friend a Branch link to that hotel, after clicking the link the friend is brought directly to the content relating to that hotel within the app, rather than landing on the app’s homepage and having to search for the hotel. The travel app would also gain insights and analytics as to how the content is being disclosed from its app.
We require that our Clients utilize our Services responsibly and in accordance with our
Terms & Conditions
. Branch is not responsible for the data practices of any of our Clients through the Services or otherwise. Each Client’s practices are subject to each Client’s individual privacy policy. Users should review the privacy policy of each Client to understand how that Client uses User information collected through the Services.
User Choices
Top
Branch recognizes a number of consumer choice mechanisms. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality may be degraded or no longer work as a result if you exercise certain of the opt-outs below.
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer read or set cookies (beyond the opt-out cookie itself). Cookie-based opt outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”) and adheres to its Code of Conduct. NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from interest-based advertising by participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt out of the Branch Services on a particular device by submitting a request
here
.
Device Identifiers:
To use your device’s privacy settings controls, please visit the privacy settings menu of your device to review and access the privacy controls made available on the device. Branch will only be able to collect information from the device as permitted by these settings.
Client App Opt-out Controls:
Branch‘s
SDK Privacy Controls
allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data. Clients can flag in the Branch SDK that a particular User’s data should not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Engagement Builder:
Branch's Engagement Builder feature may be used to help Clients conduct re-engagement and re-targeting campaigns. We require that Clients using Branch’s Engagement Builder feature for such purposes respect User opt-out preferences passed to them by Branch.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes
What Information Does Branch Collect about Website Visitors and Potential Customers?
Top
Branch collects information from Website visitors (
“you”
or
“Website Users”
) located at www.branch.io (
the “Website”
), which includes the dashboard provided to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. The types of information we may collect and our privacy practices depend on the nature of the relationship you have with us and the requirements of applicable law. Below are the legal bases and some of the ways we collect information and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
What We Collect from Clients that Use the Website
Branch collects Personal Data and non-personal data via the Website. For example, when Clients register to use our Services, we ask them to provide us with Personal Data, including first and last name and email address.
Dashboard Information:
Information we collect from visitors who register for an account on our dashboard includes the following, some of which is considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for limited security login controls
Cookie (ours)
Standard web cookie used for dashboard session management
Cookie (other-party)
Other-party web tracking tools used for business intelligence
First, Last Name
Used for team user identification
Work Email
Used as the primary login identifier
Password
Account registration, secure our Services and prevent fraud
Account Holder Primary Role
Account registration, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; may be used for limited security login controls
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for general internal business analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for general internal business analytics
Github ID
(optional) Can be used as a login method
Billing information
Payment account registration
Log Data
Provide the Services, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners, personalize our experience, secure our Services and prevent fraud, and defend our legal rights and comply with the law
Account holder feedback
Help us improve your experience on the account dashboard
When a Client creates an account and uses the Services, Branch may collect certain log data, such as IP address from which a Client is connecting to the Services, information related to the device being used to connect to the Services (e.g., browser type and version, device type, OS version) and the features and functions of the Services used by the Client (“Log Data”).
We also require Clients to set up a user ID and unique password for account security purposes. Clients must not disclose their passwords to anyone. Clients also have the option of adding other team members to their account. This account information enables us to set up an account for Clients, to provide the Services, and to otherwise manage Client accounts. We may also use this information to notify Clients about updates to our Services and provide them with promotional emails. We offer a mechanism to opt out from promotional emails as described in the “Opt-Out from Promotional Emails” section below.
Account and Billing Information:
To the extent that we charge a fee for the Services, we may also collect limited billing, payment, and contract information from Clients through our payment and contract vendors.
Connection Information with Other Parties:
Some features of the dashboard Services allow you to disclose your information through your accounts to other companies such as Facebook and Google. If you choose to connect Branch to such services provided by other parties, we may collect information related to your use of those services provided by other parties, such as authentication tokens that allow us to connect to your accounts with those other parties. We will ask you for permission before you authorize our collection of this information. We may also collect information about how you are using the Services to interact with those connected services.
Information from Other Sources:
In addition to the information collected through our Website, we or our vendors may obtain and disclose additional information, such as job title or contact information, from other public and non-public sources such as business websites, social networking platforms, or databases maintained by other parties. We use this information to better enable Branch to identify and contact businesses that might be interested in engaging our Services, and to gain a better understanding of a potential Client’s business needs.
Communications with Branch:
Some Website Users may provide Personal Data to Branch by sending us an email or filling out an online form on the Website. We use this information to answer their question(s), and may store that information for our record keeping, marketing, and advertising purposes.
Research/Survey Solicitations:
From time to time, we may perform research (online and offline) via surveys. We may engage vendors to conduct such surveys on our behalf. All survey responses are voluntary, and the information collected will be used for research and reporting purposes to help us better serve individuals by learning more about their needs and the quality of the products and services we provide. The survey responses may be utilized to determine the effectiveness of our Website, various types of communications, advertising campaigns and/or promotional activities.
Cookies, Pixels and Web Beacons:
We also collect other data via the Website from Website Users, including Website Users employed by or affiliated with Clients, through cookies and/or web beacons. Such information, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law, may include IP address, pages viewed, browser type, Internet browsing and usage habits, how you browse and navigate the Website, Internet Service Provider, domain name, the time/date of your visit to the Website, the referring URL, and your computer’s operating system. For example, we may collect on a real-time basis information on how you use and navigate the Website.
If you permit the use of cookies and web beacons when you visit and continue to use the Website, we will collect information through those tools. Cookies are small data files stored on your hard drive by a website and web beacons are electronic images that may be used on our Website or in our emails. Cookies help us improve your experience on the Website as well as our marketing activities. We use cookies to see which areas and features are popular and to count visits to our Website. For more information about cookies and web beacons, please visit
http://www.allaboutcookies.org/
. For more information about how to opt-out of cookies and web beacons after you have consented to their use, see the “Opt-out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons” section below.
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected?
Top
Branch processes the data described in the section above for the following purposes:
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Website;
to fulfill your and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services;
to send information about the Services including confirmations, invoices, payment processing, technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
to communicate about products and services offered by Branch and Branch's selected partners. We receive opt-in consent to send promotional and marketing messages to Website Users where required by applicable law. You can opt-out of receiving these messages at any time as described below in the section titled: “Opt-out from Promotional Emails”;
to conduct research;
to manage your information and account, to improve and administer our Website, to contact Website Users to answer questions or resolve problems, or to verify your identity;
to conduct research to help us to optimally deliver our existing Services or develop new products, processes and services;
for ad delivery and reporting purposes and to create data and analytics products and services;
to make the Website easier to use by reducing the need for Clients and Website Users to enter information;
for other purposes disclosed to you at the time you provide data to us;
with your consent; or
where Branch otherwise has a legitimate interest in collecting the data, such as direct marketing, individual or market research, product improvement, anti-fraud protection, protecting the safety of us, our Website Users, or other parties, or where required by law.
Opt-Out & Do Not Track - Your Choice Mechanisms
Top
In some cases, we rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you. In those cases, and where you have consented to Branch's processing of your Personal Data in connection with your use of the Website, you may withdraw that consent at any time by following the instructions below. Additionally, before we use Personal Data collected with your consent for any new purpose not originally authorized by you, we will provide information regarding the new purpose and ask for your consent for the new purpose. Where your consent for the processing of Personal Data is otherwise required by law or contract, we will comply with the law or contract. In other cases, we do not rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you (for example, if we have a different legal basis to process that data).
Opt Out from Promotional Emails
You can opt-out of receiving promotional emails from us by following the instructions in those emails, or by filling out
this form
. You can also opt-out of certain categories of emails using
this form
. If you opt-out using any of these tools, we may still send you non-promotional emails, such as certain updates about your account or updates to our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy and/or use of the Services.
Opt Out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons
We will only use cookies consistent with your cookie settings and permissions granted on our Website. If you permit us to use cookies/web beacons as discussed above (“What Information Does Branch Collect from our Website”), but would like to opt-out:
For dashboard users, visit
https://dashboard.branch.io/account-settings/user
, and toggle off “Cookie Consent”.
For all other users, click on “Cookie Consent” at the bottom right-hand corner of our homepage (
https://branch.io/
), and click on the opt-out link.
Also, you can choose to set your browser to remove cookies and to reject cookies. To exercise the "Do Not Track" settings available on certain web browsers, please visit the privacy settings of your browser. Where Branch is able to see that such a selection has been made, we will not use information collected from that device to target advertising on that browser. Dashboard users must use the “Cookie Consent” feature to revoke permission to place cookies. Please note that "Do Not Track" is a different privacy mechanism than the Global Privacy Control browser choice referenced below.
Note that, even if you opt out, we may still collect and use non-personal data regarding your activities on our Website. This also does not opt you out of being served advertising altogether; you will continue to receive generic advertisements.
Vendor Tools/Analytics on the Website
Top
The Website utilizes tracking tools from vendors, which may enable these vendors to analyze our Website traffic for analytics purposes. Some of these vendors may collect information from this Website for retargeting and interest-based advertising purposes. For more information about these forms of ad targeting and to understand your right to opt-out from these practices, please visit
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
. All of these tools are hosted by the parties who provide them, and your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policies of the parties providing them. These tools include, but are not limited to, those below.
Google
. We may use Google Analytics and Google Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting to collect information regarding visitor behavior and visitor demographics on our Website, and to develop website content. For more information about Google Analytics, please visit
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
. You can opt-out of Google’s collection and processing of data generated by your use of the Website by going to
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
Mixpanel
. We use a service provided by Mixpanel, Inc. (“Mixpanel”) to provide us with analytics data regarding Website Users’ interactions with our Website and Services. You may opt-out of Mixpanel’s automatic retention of data that is collected while using the Services by visiting
https://mixpanel.com/optout/
. To track opt-outs, Mixpanel uses a persistent opt-out cookie placed on your device. Please note that if you get a new computer, install a new browser, erase or otherwise alter the browser’s cookie file (including upgrading certain browsers), you may delete the Mixpanel opt-out cookie.
Facebook
. We may use certain tools offered by Facebook, Inc. (“Facebook”) that enable it to collect or receive information about actions Website Users take on our Website through use of cookies, web beacons and other storage technologies or in order to provide measurement services, targeted ads and other services. For more information regarding the collection and use of such information by Facebook, please see the Facebook Data Policy, available at:
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php
.
Drift
. We use certain tools offered by Drift to power our Website’s live-chat experience. If you provide information about yourself through that live-chat experience, then we may store that information for marketing purposes. Drift may also infer information about the company that you work for you based on your IP address.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website
When does Branch Disclose Information?
Top
In addition to the ways described in our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy, Branch may also disclose information to others under the following circumstances:
With vendors, consultants and other parties who work for us and need access to information we collect to do that work.
With our Clients and their agents, as described in this Policy.
To other parties (such as advertising networks or vendors used by our Clients), as directed by our Clients.
To comply with laws or to respond to lawful requests and legal process including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements, and in order to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding suspected, or actual, prohibited activities, including but not limited to fraud and situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person.
To protect the rights and property of Branch, our agents, Clients, Users, Website Users, and others including to enforce our agreements, policies, and Terms & Conditions.
To Branch’s subsidiaries and affiliates as necessary to help us provide, support, and maintain the Services.
In connection with or during negotiation of any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
Updating Your Information and Contact Preferences
Top
We provide Clients with a mechanism to access, review and update information via the dashboard. If you wish to review or update your information, please visit branch.io and login using the username and password you created. Next, please select “Account Settings” which can be found in the lower left corner of the dashboard screen, then select the “User” tab near the top. If you would like to delete your account, please email
support@branch.io
.
We Secure the Information We Collect
Top
Securing the information provided by our Clients and collected through our Website is important to us. Branch has implemented industry-standard technical, administrative, and physical safeguards to help protect the information on our servers against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. You are responsible for maintaining the secrecy of your own passwords. If you have reason to believe that your passwords or Personal Data are no longer secure, please promptly notify us at
privacy@branch.io
.
Our Data Retention Policy
Top
For our Services:
Branch stores the information collected by our Services (see the “What Information Does Branch Collect from our Services?” section above) so long as our systems continue to encounter that User. After that User has been inactive for 30 days (or 90 days for specific attribution products), identifiers collected from that User will be deleted unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Usage activity logs, which are used for the purpose of reporting and analytics, are stored in an identifiable form for no more than 7 days (or up to 60 days as determined by the Client or for specific fields), after which these logs are removed or pseudonymized. Any and all pseudonymized logs are deleted after 12 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Aggregated reporting metrics disclosed to Clients are retained (in aggregate and anonymized form) for up to 24 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Branch may retain information collected by our Services beyond these periods for fraud prevention, analysis, or response, or to protect the safety of Branch, its Clients, Users or the public.
For the Website:
We store Personal Data such as email address or billing details for so long as you continue to have a business relationship with Branch and for a reasonable time thereafter for record-keeping purposes. If applicable to you, you may ask us to delete that information as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below or pursuant to your right of erasure as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below.
Links to Other Websites
Top
The Website and/or Services may contain links to other websites and other websites may reference or link to our Website and/or Services. These other domains and websites are not controlled by Branch, and we do not endorse or make any representations about websites or social media platforms operated by other parties. We encourage you to read the privacy policies of each and every website and application that you interact with. We do not endorse, screen, or approve, and are not responsible for the privacy practices or content of such other websites or applications. Visiting these other websites or applications is at your own risk.
International Data Transfers
Top
All information collected via the Website and Services is stored on servers located in the United States. In the process of providing the Services, we may transfer information across borders from other countries or jurisdictions into the United States. Data protection laws in the United States may differ from your country, and the data Branch processes may be accessible to law enforcement and national security authorities under certain circumstances. By using the Services, each Client and Website User consents to the transfer and processing of information to the U.S. in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Data transfers from the European Union, United Kingdom, and Switzerland are transferred on the basis of legal mechanisms approved by the European Commission and other relevant authorities for cross-border data transfers, such as Standard Contractual Clauses or the Privacy Shield mechanism discussed in the “Privacy Shield For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States” section below.
Privacy Shield For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States
Top
Branch complies with the E.U.-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework and the Swiss-US Privacy Shield Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of Personal Data from European Union member countries (including European Economic Area member countries), the United Kingdom, and Switzerland transferred to the United States pursuant to Privacy Shield. Branch recognizes that the Court of Justice of the European Union ruled in July 2020 that a certification under the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework no longer can serve as the basis by which entities subject to the GDPR export personal data to jurisdictions outside the European Economic Area, and that the Swiss Data Protection Authority similarly held the Swiss-US Privacy Shield inadequate. Branch will continue to honor its obligation to comply with the Privacy Shield Principles with respect to data that was transferred pursuant to the EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework. If there is any conflict between the policies in this Privacy Policy and data subject rights under the Privacy Shield Principles, the Privacy Shield Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Privacy Shield program, and to view our certification page, please visit
https://www.privacyshield.gov
.
Branch no longer relies on the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield to transfer data that originated in the EEA or the United Kingdom to the U.S.
Branch is subject to the investigatory and enforcement authority of the US Federal Trade Commission.
Pursuant to the Privacy Shield Frameworks we are obliged to inform EU, UK, and Swiss individuals whose data is being transferred into the United States that we may be required to release Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities including to meet national security and law enforcement requirements.
Branch remains liable for the onward transfer of EU, UK, and Swiss personal data to other parties pursuant to the Privacy Shield unless we can prove we were not a party to the actions giving rise to the damages.
We acknowledge the right of EU, UK, and Swiss individuals to access their Personal Data pursuant to the Privacy Shield. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals wishing to exercise this right may do so by contacting
privacy@branch.io
.
In compliance with the Privacy Shield Principles, Branch commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information transferred to the United States pursuant to Privacy Shield. European Union, UK, and Swiss individuals with Privacy Shield inquiries or complaints should first contact Branch at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
privacy@branch.io
Branch has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the Privacy Shield Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, the BBB EU PRIVACY SHIELD, operated by BBB National Programs. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit
http://www.bbb.org/EU-privacy-shield/for-eu-consumers
for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your Privacy Shield complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms.  See Privacy Shield Annex 1 at
https://www.privacyshield.gov/article?id=ANNEX-I-introduction
.
Data Subject Rights
Top
California Consumer Privacy Act
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) provides certain rights to natural persons who are residents of California. Our CCPA privacy notice is available
here
.
Rights of Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
The European General Data Protection Regulation of 2018 (“GDPR”) and equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation (“
UK Data Protection Law
”) provides certain rights to residents of Europe. Information on how you can exercise rights under the GDPR and UK Data Protection Law are set forth
here
.
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”) provides certain rights to residents of Brazil. Information on how you can exercise rights under the LGPD are set forth
here
.
Our Policy Regarding Children
Top
Services:
The Branch Services are not directed to children. We require that Clients agree to not send to us data relating to any children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16). If you are a Client and want to learn more about Branch
SDK Privacy Controls
that you can use in your compliance with the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA), GDPR, or any other applicable law, please contact
privacy@branch.io
.
If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16) in violation of applicable law, please contact us at privacy@branch.io, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any information that it may have been provided inappropriately as required by law.
Website:
The Branch Website is not directed to children. We do not knowingly collect through the Website Personal Data from anyone under the age of 16. If you are under 16, please do not attempt to register or send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, or email address. No one under 16 may provide any Personal Data to us. In the event that we learn that we have collected any such data from a child under 16 through our Website, we will take reasonable steps to delete that information as quickly as possible. If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 16, please contact us at
privacy@branch.io
, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any inappropriately obtained information as required by law.
Contact Us, Questions, Changes to This Privacy Policy
Top
We may change this Privacy Policy at any time in our sole discretion. We will post all changes to this Privacy Policy on this page and will indicate at the top of the page the modified Privacy Policy’s effective date. If you have any questions or suggestions regarding this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at
info@branch.io
Compliance
Top
This Privacy Policy shall be implemented by Branch and all its operating divisions, subsidiaries and affiliates. Branch has put in place mechanisms to verify ongoing compliance with this Privacy Policy.
Effective October 11th 2022
to
December 29th 2022
Download
Table of Contents
Privacy Policy
Last updated February 3, 2022
The Branch Guiding Privacy Principles
Top
We are a linking and analytics platform for app and website developers. And we are proud of our commitment to providing our services in a privacy-first way. So we thought it would be helpful to lay out, in plain English, the Branch Guiding Privacy Principles that drive how we’ve chosen to design our services with privacy as a top priority. You’ll find our official
Privacy Policy
below this section, but we hope you’ll find this summary of our principles helpful.
We limit the data we collect.
We practice data minimization, which means that we take steps to avoid collecting or storing information that we don’t need to provide our services. The personal data that we collect is limited to data like advertising identifiers, IP address, and information derived from resettable cookies (the full list is below in our privacy policy). We do not collect or store information such as names, email addresses, physical addresses, or SSNs. Nor do we want to. In fact, our
Terms & Conditions
prohibit our customers from sharing with Branch any kind of sensitive end-user information.
We will only provide you with data about actual end-user activity on your apps or websites.
Our customers can only access “earned” cookies or identifiers. This means that an end user must visit a customer’s site before our customer can see the cookie; and an end user must download a customer’s app in order for Branch to collect the end user’s advertising identifier for that customer. In short, the Branch services benefit customers who already have seen an end user across their platforms and want to understand the relationship between those web visits and app sessions.
We do not rent or sell personal data.
No Branch customer can access another Branch customer’s end-user data. And we are not in the business of renting or selling any customer’s end-user data to anyone else. To enable customers to control their end-user personal data, they can request deletion
here
of that data at any time, whether in bulk or for a specific end user. These controls are available to customers worldwide, although we designed them to comply with GDPR requirements as well.
Beyond these principles stated above, Branch will continue to find ways to design our services to respect end user privacy. We’re committed to making sure our customers understand how we use data they entrust to us and how they can control it so that they can, in turn, be transparent with their end users.
Introduction
Top
Branch Metrics, Inc. (
"Branch"
,
"us"
,
"our"
or
"we"
) offers a linking and analytics platform enabling developers of applications (our "
Clients
")--whether those applications are websites or "apps," and across different types of devices--to improve their end users’ ("
Users
") cross-application experiences, and to derive additional insights into how their Users download and utilize those applications. Branch recognizes and believes that data privacy is important to all Internet users, and therefore we design and operate our services in a privacy-first manner.
This Privacy Policy is divided into three parts:
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services:
This section explains how Branch collects and uses information about Users in connection with our products and services (the "
Branch Services
" or the "
Services
").
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes:
This section explains how we collect and use information about our website visitors through our website located at branch.io (the “Website”), which includes the dashboard we provide to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. So, if you are a Client using our Branch dashboard, this section applies to the data we collect from you. It also explains how we collect information about potential Clients from service providers and other sources to enhance our marketing efforts.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website:
This section lays out the parts of the Branch Privacy Policy that apply to both the Services and to the Website.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services
What Information Does Branch Collect from Our Services?
Top
Below, we explain what information we collect on behalf of our Clients through the Services, and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
The Branch Services: Overview
Top
Branch provides a variety of Services intended to help Clients understand the use of their digital properties by their Users across a wide array of platforms, devices and applications. Branch helps Clients by connecting User interactions across siloed applications (email, SMS, web browsers, social platforms, native applications and others), so that Clients understand the multiple steps that a User took to ultimately complete a transaction with the Client. The Client can use this information to better inform marketing and product decisions as well as to provide improved user experiences by using their knowledge of continuity.
Branch has no direct relationship with Users. Branch’s Services are provided when Branch Clients install on their platforms “Branch Mechanisms” (including links, pixels, direct platform integrations, etc.) that capture User action on behalf of the Client. Using the information collected from these Branch Mechanisms, Branch uses a variety of attribution techniques to connect User actions across different channels and platforms. Some of these attribution techniques include a direct pass-through of identifiers from platform to platform, creating and storing identifiers unique to the Branch platform to connect User actions and identifiers together, and predictive modeling algorithms using real-time and historical data parameters observed from User interactions where there are no shared identifiers available, as well as using historical connections Branch has derived over time using our technology. In some cases, these connections are made without the use of cookies. These techniques help Clients match Users with devices they use, including matching the same User across multiple devices.
The key use cases of Branch’s Services are:
To support Clients in implementing deep linking, which uses Branch’s connection information in real time to improve the User experience.
For example, if a User clicks on a link in an email or ad to a specific page in a Client’s app, Branch helps the User get to that page after they download the app.
To report individualized and aggregated analytics metrics about the performance of the Client’s product and marketing initiatives to the Client directly.
For example, Branch can tell a Client how many Users that downloaded an app or that went to a specific page in an app came from clicking on a specific link, and provide corresponding advertising or other identifiers.
To assist the Client by presenting real time, targeted messaging to their Users depending on past behavior observed across the tracked platforms with the purpose of driving more engagement to the Client.
For example, Branch can use Branch Mechanisms to provide a tailored message like a coupon code or special offer in your website to users who have interacted with your app and/or website in the past.
Branch requires that each Client commit to share with Branch only information that it has lawfully obtained (including, where necessary, by obtaining consent from Users), and that it has the right to share with Branch. We strongly discourage Clients from sharing sensitive User information with us, as such information is not necessary for the provision of the Services, and we prohibit them from providing us with data relating to children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16).
In the charts below, we summarize the information collected automatically by the Services.
Information Collected By Branch Links and Pixels
Top
Branch collects the following information from URLs created by the Client (i.e., Branch Links) and pixels placed on Client websites. Branch Links may be embedded into QR Codes as configured by the Client. Some of this information is considered personal data under applicable law (in other words, information that itself may identify a unique individual or can be linked back to an individual) (“
Personal Data
”).
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for attribution and to understand general location
Cookie
Standard web cookies, used for device identification and attribution
Link Data
Metadata controlled by the Client, which may be used to interpret the data for reporting, or for analytics
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; used for device identification and attribution
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request
Phone Number
(Optional) used only to facilitate the “Text me the app” feature if used
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the webpage from which such ads were displayed, and webpages on Client’s website visited by a User.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their website (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
SDKs are Software Development Kits that include code that allows Clients to use the Branch Services. The Branch Mobile App SDKs, Web SDKs, and Over-the-Top (OTT) SDKs collect the following information when Clients use these SDKs in their applications or websites, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Information Collected by Branch SDKs
Top
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
Advertising identifier (e.g., GAID, Android ID, IDFA, IDFV, RIDA)
Used for device identification and attribution
Branch Cookie ID
Used for device identification and attribution
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for device identification, attribution, and to understand general location
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Central Processing Unit (CPU) Type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
System build version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Internet connection type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Application version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device model
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Manufacturer
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen size (height, width)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen resolution
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile network status (Wi-Fi, etc.)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device locale (country and language)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Local IP address
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile platform
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Branch SDK version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Developer ID
(optional) Client-supplied unique identifier; metadata feature Used for device identification and attribution
Carrier ID
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the application page from which such ads were displayed, pages on Client’s application visited by a User, downloads, opt-in status for certain tracking mechanisms, and installations of applications.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their application (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
In addition to the information identified above, the Branch Desktop SDKs collect the following identifiers when Clients use these SDKs in their desktop applications, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
MAC address
Used for device identification and attribution
Windows Advertising ID
Used for device identification and attribution
CPU ID
Used for device identification and attribution
Information Collected By Third Parties
Top
As part of Branch’s Services, Branch’s Clients may direct certain of their vendors or business partners (such as an ad network or vendor) to provide certain Engagement Data to Branch on the Client’s behalf.
How Does Branch Use Information Collected by Our Services?
Top
Data Branch collects through the Services is processed:
to better understand how and from where Users come to download certain apps, what types of apps are popular, or to infer that certain browsers and devices are operated by the same User based upon connections Branch has derived across non-affiliated apps and websites.
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Branch Services we provide our Clients, including to support other Branch products and services, develop new products and services, and market products or services; to support the products and services of our Clients; and as permitted or required by applicable law.
to fulfill Clients’ and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services including processing data at the Client’s direction and transferring User data to them. Branch does not control how Clients use information Branch shares with Clients and Users should read Clients’ Privacy Policies to understand how they use information they receive from Branch.
to aggregate data across various sources, including data from various Clients or third parties.
to create reports based on aggregated information, which is information that cannot reasonably be linked back to any individual person or Client and share these reports with the public.
for anti-fraud protection and analysis relating to the Services to ensure more accurate attribution measurement, general fraud prevention, or where otherwise required by law.
We may aggregate and/or de-identify the data we collect through the Services. After data has been aggregated and/or de-identified, Branch cannot use it to personally identify an individual. We may use de-identified and/or aggregated data for any purpose, including without limitation for research and marketing purposes, and may also share such data with any third parties, including business partners, Clients, and/or others.
Our Clients’ Use of Information
Top
Our Clients may use the information collected via the Services to improve their Users’ app experiences, customize their apps to Users, and to better understand their app marketing programs and how Users discover their apps. For example, a User may want to share information about a hotel that she found in a travel app with a friend. When that User sends her friend a Branch link to that hotel, after clicking the link the friend is brought directly to the content relating to that hotel within the app, rather than landing on the app’s homepage and having to search for the hotel. The travel app would also gain insights and analytics as to how the content is being shared from its app.
We require that our Clients utilize our Services responsibly and in accordance with our
Terms & Conditions
. Branch is not responsible for the data practices of any of our Clients through the Services or otherwise. Each Client’s practices are subject to each Client’s individual privacy policy. Users should review the privacy policy of each Client to understand how that Client uses User information collected through the Services.
User Choices
Top
Branch recognizes a number of consumer choice mechanisms. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality may be degraded or no longer work as a result if you exercise certain of the opt-outs below.
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer read or set cookies (beyond the opt-out cookie itself). Cookie-based opt outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”) and adheres to its Code of Conduct. NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from interest-based advertising by participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt out of the Branch Services on a particular device by submitting a request
here
.
Device Identifiers:
To use your device’s privacy settings controls, please visit the privacy settings menu of your device to review and access the privacy controls made available on the device. Branch will only be able to collect information from the device as permitted by these settings.
Client App Opt-out Controls:
Branch‘s
SDK Privacy Controls
allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data. Clients can flag in the Branch SDK that a particular User’s data should not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Engagement Builder:
Branch's Engagement Builder feature may be used to help Clients conduct re-engagement and re-targeting campaigns. We require that Clients using Branch’s Engagement Builder feature for such purposes respect User opt-out preferences passed to them by Branch.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes
What Information Does Branch Collect about Website Visitors and Potential Customers?
Top
Branch collects information from Website visitors (
“you”
or
“Website Users”
) located at www.branch.io (
the “Website”
), which includes the dashboard provided to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. The types of information we may collect and our privacy practices depend on the nature of the relationship you have with us and the requirements of applicable law. Below are the legal bases and some of the ways we collect information and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
What We Collect from Clients that Use the Website
Top
Branch collects Personal Data and non-personal data via the Website. For example, when Clients register to use our Services, we ask them to provide us with Personal Data, including first and last name and email address.
Dashboard Information:
Information we collect from visitors who register for an account on our dashboard includes the following, some of which is considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for limited security login controls
Cookie (ours)
Standard web cookie used for dashboard session management
Cookie (third-party)
Third-party web tracking tools used for business intelligence
First, Last Name
Used for team user identification
Work Email
Used as the primary login identifier
Password
Account registration, secure our Services and prevent fraud
Account Holder Primary Role
Account registration, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; may be used for limited security login controls
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for general internal business analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for general internal business analytics
Github ID
(optional) Can be used as a login method
Billing information
Payment account registration
Log Data
Provide the Services, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners, personalize our experience, secure our Services and prevent fraud, and defend our legal rights and comply with the law
Account holder feedback
Help us improve your experience on the account dashboard
We also require Clients to set up a user ID and unique password for account security purposes. Clients must not share their passwords with anyone. Clients also have the option of adding other team members to their account. This account information enables us to set up an account for Clients, to provide the Services, and to otherwise manage Client accounts. We may also use this information to notify Clients about updates to our Services and provide them with promotional emails. We offer a mechanism to opt out from promotional emails as described in the “Opt-Out from Promotional Emails” section below.
When a Client creates an account and uses the Services, Branch may collect certain log data, such as IP address from which a Client is connecting to the Services, information related to the device being used to connect to the Services (e.g., browser type and version, device type, OS version) and the features and functions of the Services used by the Client (“Log Data”).
Account and Billing Information:
To the extent that we charge a fee for the Services, we may also collect limited billing, payment, and contract information from Clients through our third-party payment and contract processors.
Third-Party Connection Information:
Some features of the dashboard Services allow you to share your information through your accounts with other companies such as Facebook and Google. If you choose to connect Branch to such third-party services, we may collect information related to your use of those third-party services, such as authentication tokens that allow us to connect to your third-party service accounts. We will ask you for permission before you authorize our collection of this information. We may also collect information about how you are using the Services to interact with those connected third-party services.
Information from Other Sources:
In addition to the information collected through our Website, we or our third-party service providers may obtain additional information, such as job title or contact information, from other public and non-public sources such as business websites, social networking platforms, or third-party databases. We use this information to better enable Branch to identify and contact businesses that might be interested in engaging our Services, and to gain a better understanding of a potential Client’s business needs.
Communications with Branch:
Some Website Users may provide Personal Data to Branch by sending us an email or filling out an online form on the Website. We use this information to answer their question(s), and may store that information for our record keeping, marketing, and advertising purposes.
Research/Survey Solicitations:
From time to time, we may perform research (online and offline) via surveys. We may engage third-party service providers to conduct such surveys on our behalf. All survey responses are voluntary, and the information collected will be used for research and reporting purposes to help us better serve individuals by learning more about their needs and the quality of the products and services we provide. The survey responses may be utilized to determine the effectiveness of our Website, various types of communications, advertising campaigns and/or promotional activities.
Cookies, Pixels and Web Beacons:
We also collect other data via the Website from Website Users, including Website Users employed by or affiliated with Clients, through cookies and/or web beacons. Such information, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law, may include IP address, pages viewed, browser type, Internet browsing and usage habits, how you browse and navigate the Website, Internet Service Provider, domain name, the time/date of your visit to the Website, the referring URL, and your computer’s operating system. For example, we may collect on a real-time basis information on how you use and navigate the Website. This may include mouse movements and how you scroll through the Website, but we do not collect keystroke data.
If you permit the use of cookies and web beacons when you visit and continue to use the Website, we will collect information through those tools. Cookies are small data files stored on your hard drive by a website and web beacons are electronic images that may be used on our Website or in our emails. Cookies help us improve your experience on the Website as well as our marketing activities. We use cookies to see which areas and features are popular and to count visits to our Website. For more information about cookies and web beacons, please visit
http://www.allaboutcookies.org/
. For more information about how to opt-out of cookies and web beacons after you have consented to their use, see the “Opt-out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons” section below.
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected?
Top
Branch processes the data described in the section above for the following purposes:
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Website;
to fulfill your and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services;
to send information about the Services including confirmations, invoices, payment processing, technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
to communicate about products and services offered by Branch and Branch's selected partners. We receive opt-in consent to send promotional and marketing messages to Website Users where required by applicable law. You can opt-out of receiving these messages at any time as described below in the section titled: “Opt-out from Promotional Emails”;
to conduct research;
to manage your information and account, to improve and administer our Website, to contact Website Users to answer questions or resolve problems, or to verify your identity;
to conduct research to help us to optimally deliver our existing Services or develop new products, processes and services;
for ad delivery and reporting purposes and to create data and analytics products and services;
to make the Website easier to use by reducing the need for Clients and Website Users to enter information;
for other purposes disclosed to you at the time you provide data to us;
with your consent; or
where Branch otherwise has a legitimate interest in collecting the data, such as direct marketing, individual or market research, product improvement, anti-fraud protection, protecting the safety of us, our Website Users, or third parties, or where required by law.
Opt-Out & Do Not Track - Your Choice Mechanisms
Top
In some cases, we rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you. In those cases, and where you have consented to Branch's processing of your Personal Data in connection with your use of the Website, you may withdraw that consent at any time by following the instructions below. Additionally, before we use Personal Data collected with your consent for any new purpose not originally authorized by you, we will provide information regarding the new purpose and ask for your consent for the new purpose. Where your consent for the processing of Personal Data is otherwise required by law or contract, we will comply with the law or contract. In other cases, we do not rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you (for example, if we have a different legal basis to process that data).
Opt Out from Promotional Emails
Top
You can opt-out of receiving promotional emails from us by following the instructions in those emails, or by filling out
this form
. You can also opt-out of certain categories of emails using
this form
. If you opt-out using any of these tools, we may still send you non-promotional emails, such as certain updates about your account or updates to our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy and/or use of the Services.
Opt Out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons
Top
We will only use cookies consistent with your cookie settings and permissions granted on our Website. If you permit us to use cookies/web beacons as discussed above (“What Information Does Branch Collect from our Website”), but would like to opt-out:
For dashboard users, visit
https://dashboard.branch.io/account-settings/user
, and toggle off “Cookie Consent”.
For all other users, click on “Cookie Consent” at the bottom right-hand corner of our homepage (
https://branch.io/
), and click on the opt-out link.
Also, you can choose to set your browser to remove cookies and to reject cookies. To exercise the Do Not Track settings available on certain web browsers, please visit the privacy settings of your browser. Where Branch is able to see that such a selection has been made, we will not use information collected from that device to target advertising on that browser. Dashboard users must use the “Cookie Consent” feature to revoke permission to place cookies.
Note that, even if you opt out, we may still collect and use non-personal data regarding your activities on our Website. This also does not opt you out of being served advertising altogether; you will continue to receive generic advertisements.
Third-Party Tools/Analytics on the Website
Top
The Website utilizes third-party tracking tools from third-party service providers, which may enable these third parties to analyze our Website traffic for analytics purposes. Some of these third-party service providers may collect information from this Website for retargeting and interest-based advertising purposes. For more information about these forms of ad targeting and to understand your right to opt-out from these practices, please visit
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
. All of these tools are hosted by the third parties who provide them, and your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policies of the third parties providing them. These tools include, but are not limited to, those below.
Google
. We may use Google Analytics and Google Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting to collect information regarding visitor behavior and visitor demographics on our Website, and to develop website content. For more information about Google Analytics, please visit
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
. You can opt-out of Google’s collection and processing of data generated by your use of the Website by going to
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
Mixpanel
. We use a service provided by Mixpanel, Inc. (“Mixpanel”) to provide us with analytics data regarding Website Users’ interactions with our Website and Services. You may opt-out of Mixpanel’s automatic retention of data that is collected while using the Services by visiting
https://mixpanel.com/optout/
. To track opt-outs, Mixpanel uses a persistent opt-out cookie placed on your device. Please note that if you get a new computer, install a new browser, erase or otherwise alter the browser’s cookie file (including upgrading certain browsers), you may delete the Mixpanel opt-out cookie.
Facebook
. We may use certain tools offered by Facebook, Inc. (“Facebook”) that enable it to collect or receive information about actions Website Users take on our Website through use of cookies, web beacons and other storage technologies or in order to provide measurement services, targeted ads and other services. For more information regarding the collection and use of such information by Facebook, please see the Facebook Data Policy, available at:
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php
.
Drift
. We use certain tools offered by Drift to power our Website’s live-chat experience. If you provide information about yourself through that live-chat experience, then we may store that information for marketing purposes. Drift may also infer information about the company that you work for you based on your IP address.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website
How does Branch Share Information?
Top
In addition to the ways described in our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy, Branch may also share information with others under the following circumstances:
With third-party vendors, consultants and other service providers who work for us and need access to information we collect to do that work.
With our Clients and their agents, as described in this Policy.
To third parties (such as advertising networks or vendors used by our Clients), as directed by our Clients.
To comply with laws or to respond to lawful requests and legal process including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements, and in order to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding suspected, or actual, prohibited activities, including but not limited to fraud and situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person.
To protect the rights and property of Branch, our agents, Clients, Users, Website Users, and others including to enforce our agreements, policies, and Terms & Conditions.
To Branch’s subsidiaries and affiliates as necessary to help us provide, support, and maintain the Services.
In connection with or during negotiation of any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
Updating Your Information and Contact Preferences; California Shine the Light Law
Top
We provide Clients with a mechanism to access, review and update information via the dashboard. If you wish to review or update your information, please visit branch.io and login using the username and password you created. Next, please select “Account Settings” which can be found in the lower left corner of the dashboard screen, then select the “User” tab near the top. If you would like to delete your account, please email support@branch.io.
Under California law, California residents who have an established business relationship with us may choose to opt-out of the disclosure of Personal Data about them to third parties for such third parties’ direct marketing purposes. Our policy is not to disclose Personal Data collected through our Website to a third party for direct marketing purposes without your approval. If you choose to opt-out at any time after granting approval, email privacy@branch.io.
California residents who have provided us with Personal Data can also request and obtain from us once a year, free of charge, a list of the third parties to whom we have disclosed their Personal Data (if any) for such third parties’ direct marketing purposes in the prior calendar year, as well as the type of Personal Data disclosed to those parties. If you are a California resident and would like such a list, please email privacy@branch.io.
We Secure the Information We Collect
Top
Securing the information provided by our Clients and collected through our Website is important to us. Branch has implemented industry-standard technical, administrative, and physical safeguards to help protect the information on our servers against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. You are responsible for maintaining the secrecy of your own passwords. If you have reason to believe that your passwords or Personal Data are no longer secure, please promptly notify us at privacy@branch.io.
Our Data Retention Policy
Top
For our Services:
Branch stores the information collected by our Services (see the “What Information Does Branch Collect from our Services?” section above) so long as our systems continue to encounter that User. After that User has been inactive for 30 days (or 90 days for specific attribution products), identifiers collected from that User will be deleted unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Usage activity logs, which are used for the purpose of reporting and analytics, are stored in an identifiable form for no more than 7 days (or up to 60 days as determined by the Client or for specific fields), after which these logs are removed or pseudonymized. Any and all pseudonymized logs are deleted after 12 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Aggregated reporting metrics shared with Clients are retained (in aggregate and anonymized form) for up to 24 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Branch may retain information collected by our Services beyond these periods for fraud prevention, analysis, or response, or to protect the safety of Branch, its Clients, Users or the public.
For the Website:
We store Personal Data such as email address or billing details for so long as you continue to have a business relationship with Branch and for a reasonable time thereafter for record-keeping purposes. If applicable to you, you may ask us to delete that information as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below or pursuant to your right of erasure as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below.
Links to Other Websites
Top
The Website and/or Services may contain links to other websites and other websites may reference or link to our Website and/or Services. These other domains and websites are not controlled by Branch, and we do not endorse or make any representations about third-party websites or social media platforms. We encourage you to read the privacy policies of each and every website and application that you interact with. We do not endorse, screen, or approve, and are not responsible for the privacy practices or content of such other websites or applications. Visiting these other websites or applications is at your own risk.
International Data Transfers
Top
All information collected via the Website and Services is stored on servers located in the United States. In the process of providing the Services, we may transfer information across borders from other countries or jurisdictions into the United States. By using the Services, each Client and Website User consents to the transfer and processing of information to the U.S. in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Data transfers from the European Union, United Kingdom, and Switzerland are transferred on the basis of legal mechanisms approved by the European Commission and other relevant authorities for cross-border data transfers, such as Standard Contractual Clauses or the Privacy Shield mechanism discussed in the “Privacy Shield For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States” section below.
Privacy Shield For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States
Top
Branch complies with the E.U.-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework and the Swiss-US Privacy Shield Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of Personal Data from European Union member countries (including European Economic Area member countries), the United Kingdom, and Switzerland transferred to the United States pursuant to Privacy Shield. Branch recognizes that the Court of Justice of the European Union ruled in July 2020 that a certification under the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework no longer can serve as the basis by which entities subject to the GDPR export personal data to jurisdictions outside the European Economic Area, and that the Swiss Data Protection Authority similarly held the Swiss-US Privacy Shield inadequate. Branch will continue to honor its obligation to comply with the Privacy Shield Principles with respect to data that was transferred pursuant to the EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework. If there is any conflict between the policies in this Privacy Policy and data subject rights under the Privacy Shield Principles, the Privacy Shield Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Privacy Shield program, and to view our certification page, please visit visit
https://www.privacyshield.gov
.
Branch no longer relies on the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield to transfer data that originated in the EEA or the United Kingdom to the U.S.
Branch is subject to the investigatory and enforcement authority of the US Federal Trade Commission.
Pursuant to the Privacy Shield Frameworks we are obliged to inform EU, UK, and Swiss individuals whose data is being transferred into the United States that we may be required to release Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities including to meet national security and law enforcement requirements.
Branch remains liable for the onward transfer of EU, UK, and Swiss personal data to agent third parties pursuant to the Privacy Shield unless we can prove we were not a party to the actions giving rise to the damages.
We acknowledge the right of EU, UK, and Swiss individuals to access their Personal Data pursuant to the Privacy Shield. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals wishing to exercise this right may do so by contacting privacy@branch.io.
In compliance with the Privacy Shield Principles, Branch commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information transferred to the United States pursuant to Privacy Shield. European Union, UK, and Swiss individuals with Privacy Shield inquiries or complaints should first contact Branch at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at privacy@branch.io
Branch has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the Privacy Shield Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, the BBB EU PRIVACY SHIELD, operated by BBB National Programs. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit
http://www.bbb.org/EU-privacy-shield/for-eu-consumers
for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your Privacy Shield complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms. See Privacy Shield Annex 1 at
https://www.privacyshield.gov/article?id=ANNEX-I-introduction
.
Data Subject Rights
Top
California Consumer Privacy Act
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) provides certain rights to natural persons who are residents of California. Our CCPA privacy notice is available
here
.
Rights of Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
The European General Data Protection Regulation of 2018 (“GDPR”) and equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation (“
UK Data Protection Law
”) provides certain rights to residents of Europe. Information on how you can exercise rights under the GDPR and UK Data Protection Law are set forth
here
.
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”) provides certain rights to residents of Brazil. Information on how you can exercise rights under the LGPD are set forth
here
.
Our Policy Regarding Children
Top
Services:
The Branch Services are not directed to children. We require that Clients agree to not send to us data relating to any children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16). If you are a Client and want to learn more about Branch
SDK Privacy Controls
that you can use in your compliance with the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA), GDPR, or any other applicable law, please contact privacy@branch.io.
If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16) in violation of applicable law, please contact us at privacy@branch.io, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any information that it may have been provided inappropriately.
Website:
The Branch Website is not directed to children. We do not knowingly collect through the Website Personal Data from anyone under the age of 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16). If you are under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16), please do not attempt to register or send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, or email address. No one under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16) may provide any Personal Data to us. In the event that we learn that we have collected any such data from a child under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16) through our Website, we will take reasonable steps to delete that information as quickly as possible. If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16), please contact us at privacy@branch.io, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any inappropriately obtained information.
Contact Us, Questions, Changes to This Privacy Policy
Top
We may change this Privacy Policy at any time in our sole discretion. We will post all changes to this Privacy Policy on this page and will indicate at the top of the page the modified Privacy Policy’s effective date. If you have any questions or suggestions regarding this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at info@branch.io
Compliance
Top
This Privacy Policy shall be implemented by Branch and all its operating divisions, subsidiaries and affiliates. Branch has put in place mechanisms to verify ongoing compliance with Privacy Shield Principles and this Privacy Policy.
Effective June 1st 2022
to
October 11th 2022
Download
Table of Contents
Privacy Policy
Last updated February 3, 2022
The Branch Guiding Privacy Principles
We are a linking and analytics platform for app and website developers. And we are proud of our commitment to providing our services in a privacy-first way. So we thought it would be helpful to lay out, in plain English, the Branch Guiding Privacy Principles that drive how we’ve chosen to design our services with privacy as a top priority. You’ll find our official
Privacy Policy
below this section, but we hope you’ll find this summary of our principles helpful.
We limit the data we collect.
We practice data minimization, which means that we take steps to avoid collecting or storing information that we don’t need to provide our services. The personal data that we collect is limited to data like advertising identifiers, IP address, and information derived from resettable cookies (the full list is below in our privacy policy). We do not collect or store information such as names, email addresses, physical addresses, or SSNs. Nor do we want to. In fact, our
Terms & Conditions
prohibit our customers from sharing with Branch any kind of sensitive end-user information.
We will only provide you with data about actual end-user activity on your apps or websites.
Our customers can only access “earned” cookies or identifiers. This means that an end user must visit a customer’s site before our customer can see the cookie; and an end user must download a customer’s app in order for Branch to collect the end user’s advertising identifier for that customer. In short, the Branch services benefit customers who already have seen an end user across their platforms and want to understand the relationship between those web visits and app sessions.
We do not rent or sell personal data.
No Branch customer can access another Branch customer’s end-user data. And we are not in the business of renting or selling any customer’s end-user data to anyone else. To enable customers to control their end-user personal data, they can request deletion
here
of that data at any time, whether in bulk or for a specific end user. These controls are available to customers worldwide, although we designed them to comply with GDPR requirements as well.
Beyond these principles stated above, Branch will continue to find ways to design our services to respect end user privacy. We’re committed to making sure our customers understand how we use data they entrust to us and how they can control it so that they can, in turn, be transparent with their end users.
Introduction
Branch Metrics, Inc. (
"Branch"
,
"us"
,
"our"
or
"we"
) offers a linking and analytics platform enabling developers of applications (our "
Clients
")--whether those applications are websites or "apps," and across different types of devices--to improve their end users’ ("
Users
") cross-application experiences, and to derive additional insights into how their Users download and utilize those applications. Branch recognizes and believes that data privacy is important to all Internet users, and therefore we design and operate our services in a privacy-first manner.
This Privacy Policy is divided into three parts:
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services:
This section explains how Branch collects and uses information about Users in connection with our products and services (the "
Branch Services
" or the "
Services
").
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes:
This section explains how we collect and use information about our website visitors through our website located at branch.io (the “Website”), which includes the dashboard we provide to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. So, if you are a Client using our Branch dashboard, this section applies to the data we collect from you. It also explains how we collect information about potential Clients from service providers and other sources to enhance our marketing efforts.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website:
This section lays out the parts of the Branch Privacy Policy that apply to both the Services and to the Website.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Services
What Information Does Branch Collect from Our Services?
Below, we explain what information we collect on behalf of our Clients through the Services, and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
The Branch Services: Overview
Branch provides a variety of Services intended to help Clients understand the use of their digital properties by their Users across a wide array of platforms, devices and applications. Branch helps Clients by connecting User interactions across siloed applications (email, SMS, web browsers, social platforms, native applications and others), so that Clients understand the multiple steps that a User took to ultimately complete a transaction with the Client. The Client can use this information to better inform marketing and product decisions as well as to provide improved user experiences by using their knowledge of continuity.
Branch has no direct relationship with Users. Branch’s Services are provided when Branch Clients install on their platforms “Branch Mechanisms” (including links, pixels, direct platform integrations, etc.) that capture User action on behalf of the Client. Using the information collected from these Branch Mechanisms, Branch uses a variety of attribution techniques to connect User actions across different channels and platforms. Some of these attribution techniques include a direct pass-through of identifiers from platform to platform, creating and storing identifiers unique to the Branch platform to connect User actions and identifiers together, and predictive modeling algorithms using real-time and historical data parameters observed from User interactions where there are no shared identifiers available, as well as using historical connections Branch has derived over time using our technology. In some cases, these connections are made without the use of cookies. These techniques help Clients match Users with devices they use, including matching the same User across multiple devices.
The key use cases of Branch’s Services are:
To support Clients in implementing deep linking, which uses Branch’s connection information in real time to improve the User experience.
For example, if a User clicks on a link in an email or ad to a specific page in a Client’s app, Branch helps the User get to that page after they download the app.
To report individualized and aggregated analytics metrics about the performance of the Client’s product and marketing initiatives to the Client directly.
For example, Branch can tell a Client how many Users that downloaded an app or that went to a specific page in an app came from clicking on a specific link, and provide corresponding advertising or other identifiers.
To assist the Client by presenting real time, targeted messaging to their Users depending on past behavior observed across the tracked platforms with the purpose of driving more engagement to the Client.
For example, Branch can use Branch Mechanisms to provide a tailored message like a coupon code or special offer in your website to users who have interacted with your app and/or website in the past.
Branch requires that each Client commit to share with Branch only information that it has lawfully obtained (including, where necessary, by obtaining consent from Users), and that it has the right to share with Branch. We strongly discourage Clients from sharing sensitive User information with us, as such information is not necessary for the provision of the Services, and we prohibit them from providing us with data relating to children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16).
In the charts below, we summarize the information collected automatically by the Services.
Information Collected By Branch Links and Pixels
Branch collects the following information from URLs created by the Client (i.e., Branch Links) and pixels placed on Client websites. Branch Links may be embedded into QR Codes as configured by the Client. Some of this information is considered personal data under applicable law (in other words, information that itself may identify a unique individual or can be linked back to an individual) (“
Personal Data
”).
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for attribution and to understand general location
Cookie
Standard web cookies, used for device identification and attribution
Link Data
Metadata controlled by the Client, which may be used to interpret the data for reporting, or for analytics
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; used for device identification and attribution
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request
Phone Number
(Optional) used only to facilitate the “Text me the app” feature if used
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the webpage from which such ads were displayed, and webpages on Client’s website visited by a User.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their website (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
SDKs are Software Development Kits that include code that allows Clients to use the Branch Services. The Branch Mobile App SDKs, Web SDKs, and Over-the-Top (OTT) SDKs collect the following information when Clients use these SDKs in their applications or websites, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Information Collected by Branch SDKs
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
Advertising identifier (e.g., GAID, Android ID, IDFA, IDFV, RIDA)
Used for device identification and attribution
Branch Cookie ID
Used for device identification and attribution
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; used for device identification, attribution, and to understand general location
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for reporting and analytics
Central Processing Unit (CPU) Type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
System build version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Internet connection type
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Application version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device model
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Manufacturer
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Operating system version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen size (height, width)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Screen resolution
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile network status (Wi-Fi, etc.)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Device locale (country and language)
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Local IP address
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Mobile platform
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Branch SDK version
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Developer ID
(optional) Client-supplied unique identifier; metadata feature Used for device identification and attribution
Carrier ID
Metadata feature used for device identification and attribution
Engagement Data
Information relating to the Client’s ad campaigns and User interactions, such as clicks on Client ads, Client ad impressions viewed, audiences or segments to which an ad campaign is attributed, type of ads and the application page from which such ads were displayed, pages on Client’s application visited by a User, downloads, opt-in status for certain tracking mechanisms, and installations of applications.
Other interactions, events and actions Clients choose to measure and analyze within their application (e.g., add to cart, purchases made, clicks, engagement time etc.).
In addition to the information identified above, the Branch Desktop SDKs collect the following identifiers when Clients use these SDKs in their desktop applications, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
MAC address
Used for device identification and attribution
Windows Advertising ID
Used for device identification and attribution
CPU ID
Used for device identification and attribution
Information Collected By Third Parties
As part of Branch’s Services, Branch’s Clients may direct certain of their vendors or business partners (such as an ad network or vendor) to provide certain Engagement Data to Branch on the Client’s behalf.
How Does Branch Use Information Collected by Our Services?
Data Branch collects through the Services is processed:
to better understand how and from where Users come to download certain apps, what types of apps are popular, or to infer that certain browsers and devices are operated by the same User based upon connections Branch has derived across non-affiliated apps and websites.
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Branch Services we provide our Clients, including to support other Branch products and services, develop new products and services, and market products or services; to support the products and services of our Clients; and as permitted or required by applicable law.
to fulfill Clients’ and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services including processing data at the Client’s direction and transferring User data to them. Branch does not control how Clients use information Branch shares with Clients and Users should read Clients’ Privacy Policies to understand how they use information they receive from Branch.
to aggregate data across various sources, including data from various Clients or third parties.
to create reports based on aggregated information, which is information that cannot reasonably be linked back to any individual person or Client and share these reports with the public.
for anti-fraud protection and analysis relating to the Services to ensure more accurate attribution measurement, general fraud prevention, or where otherwise required by law.
We may aggregate and/or de-identify the data we collect through the Services. After data has been aggregated and/or de-identified, Branch cannot use it to personally identify an individual. We may use de-identified and/or aggregated data for any purpose, including without limitation for research and marketing purposes, and may also share such data with any third parties, including business partners, Clients, and/or others.
Our Clients’ Use of Information
Our Clients may use the information collected via the Services to improve their Users’ app experiences, customize their apps to Users, and to better understand their app marketing programs and how Users discover their apps. For example, a User may want to share information about a hotel that she found in a travel app with a friend. When that User sends her friend a Branch link to that hotel, after clicking the link the friend is brought directly to the content relating to that hotel within the app, rather than landing on the app’s homepage and having to search for the hotel. The travel app would also gain insights and analytics as to how the content is being shared from its app.
We require that our Clients utilize our Services responsibly and in accordance with our
Terms & Conditions
. Branch is not responsible for the data practices of any of our Clients through the Services or otherwise. Each Client’s practices are subject to each Client’s individual privacy policy. Users should review the privacy policy of each Client to understand how that Client uses User information collected through the Services.
User Choices
Branch recognizes a number of consumer choice mechanisms. Due to the nature of the Services, some functionality may be degraded or no longer work as a result if you exercise certain of the opt-outs below.
Branch’s Browser Cookie Opt-Out:
Our cookie-based opt-out can be accessed by clicking
here
. This will place a Branch opt-out cookie on your browser. Where Branch detects the presence of that opt-out cookie, we will no longer read or set cookies (beyond the opt-out cookie itself). Cookie-based opt outs must be performed on each device and browser that you wish to have opted-out. For example, if you have opted-out on your computer browser, that opt out will not be effective on your mobile device.
NAI Browser-Based Opt-Out:
Branch is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(“NAI”) and adheres to its Code of Conduct. NAI provides you with the opportunity to opt out (on a browser-by-browser basis) from interest-based advertising by participating NAI members, including Branch. That opt-out is available
here
.
Device-Based Opt-Out:
You can submit a request to opt out of the Branch Services on a particular device by submitting a request
here
.
Device Identifiers:
To use your device’s privacy settings controls, please visit the privacy settings menu of your device to review and access the privacy controls made available on the device. Branch will only be able to collect information from the device as permitted by these settings.
Client App Opt-out Controls:
Branch‘s
SDK Privacy Controls
allow Clients to respect granular controls regarding User data. Clients can flag in the Branch SDK that a particular User’s data should not be processed by Branch, in which case Branch will no longer process engagement data on behalf of the Client for that User.
Engagement Builder:
Branch's Engagement Builder feature may be used to help Clients conduct re-engagement and re-targeting campaigns. We require that Clients using Branch’s Engagement Builder feature for such purposes respect User opt-out preferences passed to them by Branch.
Collection and Use of Information from Our Website and for Marketing Purposes
What Information Does Branch Collect about Website Visitors and Potential Customers?
Branch collects information from Website visitors (
“you”
or
“Website Users”
) located at www.branch.io (
the “Website”
), which includes the dashboard provided to our Clients located at dashboard.branch.io. The types of information we may collect and our privacy practices depend on the nature of the relationship you have with us and the requirements of applicable law. Below are the legal bases and some of the ways we collect information and how we use it. We process information in a way that is relevant for the purpose for which it was collected as described below.
What We Collect from Clients that Use the Website
Branch collects Personal Data and non-personal data via the Website. For example, when Clients register to use our Services, we ask them to provide us with Personal Data, including first and last name and email address.
Dashboard Information:
Information we collect from visitors who register for an account on our dashboard includes the following, some of which is considered Personal Data under applicable law:
Type of Information Collected
Purpose
IP Address
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for limited security login controls
Cookie (ours)
Standard web cookie used for dashboard session management
Cookie (third-party)
Third-party web tracking tools used for business intelligence
First, Last Name
Used for team user identification
Work Email
Used as the primary login identifier
Password
Account registration, secure our Services and prevent fraud
Account Holder Primary Role
Account registration, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners
User Agent
Standard web browser user agent metadata; may be used for limited security login controls
Referer
Standard web browser HTTP referer; may be used for general internal business analytics
Request
Standard web HTTP request; may be used for general internal business analytics
Github ID
(optional) Can be used as a login method
Billing information
Payment account registration
Log Data
Provide the Services, tell Clients about products and services offered by Branch and Branch’s selected partners, personalize our experience, secure our Services and prevent fraud, and defend our legal rights and comply with the law
Account holder feedback
Help us improve your experience on the account dashboard
We also require Clients to set up a user ID and unique password for account security purposes. Clients must not share their passwords with anyone. Clients also have the option of adding other team members to their account. This account information enables us to set up an account for Clients, to provide the Services, and to otherwise manage Client accounts. We may also use this information to notify Clients about updates to our Services and provide them with promotional emails. We offer a mechanism to opt out from promotional emails as described in the “Opt-Out from Promotional Emails” section below.
When a Client creates an account and uses the Services, Branch may collect certain log data, such as IP address from which a Client is connecting to the Services, information related to the device being used to connect to the Services (e.g., browser type and version, device type, OS version) and the features and functions of the Services used by the Client (“Log Data”).
Account and Billing Information:
To the extent that we charge a fee for the Services, we may also collect limited billing, payment, and contract information from Clients through our third-party payment and contract processors.
Third-Party Connection Information:
Some features of the dashboard Services allow you to share your information through your accounts with other companies such as Facebook and Google. If you choose to connect Branch to such third-party services, we may collect information related to your use of those third-party services, such as authentication tokens that allow us to connect to your third-party service accounts. We will ask you for permission before you authorize our collection of this information. We may also collect information about how you are using the Services to interact with those connected third-party services.
Information from Other Sources:
In addition to the information collected through our Website, we or our third-party service providers may obtain additional information, such as job title or contact information, from other public and non-public sources such as business websites, social networking platforms, or third-party databases. We use this information to better enable Branch to identify and contact businesses that might be interested in engaging our Services, and to gain a better understanding of a potential Client’s business needs.
Communications with Branch:
Some Website Users may provide Personal Data to Branch by sending us an email or filling out an online form on the Website. We use this information to answer their question(s), and may store that information for our record keeping, marketing, and advertising purposes.
Research/Survey Solicitations:
From time to time, we may perform research (online and offline) via surveys. We may engage third-party service providers to conduct such surveys on our behalf. All survey responses are voluntary, and the information collected will be used for research and reporting purposes to help us better serve individuals by learning more about their needs and the quality of the products and services we provide. The survey responses may be utilized to determine the effectiveness of our Website, various types of communications, advertising campaigns and/or promotional activities.
Cookies, Pixels and Web Beacons:
We also collect other data via the Website from Website Users, including Website Users employed by or affiliated with Clients, through cookies and/or web beacons. Such information, some of which may be considered Personal Data under applicable law, may include IP address, pages viewed, browser type, Internet browsing and usage habits, how you browse and navigate the Website, Internet Service Provider, domain name, the time/date of your visit to the Website, the referring URL, and your computer’s operating system. For example, we may collect on a real-time basis information on how you use and navigate the Website. This may include mouse movements and how you scroll through the Website, but we do not collect keystroke data.
If you permit the use of cookies and web beacons when you visit and continue to use the Website, we will collect information through those tools. Cookies are small data files stored on your hard drive by a website and web beacons are electronic images that may be used on our Website or in our emails. Cookies help us improve your experience on the Website as well as our marketing activities. We use cookies to see which areas and features are popular and to count visits to our Website. For more information about cookies and web beacons, please visit
http://www.allaboutcookies.org/
. For more information about how to opt-out of cookies and web beacons after you have consented to their use, see the “Opt-out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons” section below.
How Does Branch Use the Information Collected?
Branch processes the data described in the section above for the following purposes:
to provide, maintain, optimize, research and improve the Website;
to fulfill your and prospective Clients’ requests for the Services;
to send information about the Services including confirmations, invoices, payment processing, technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
to communicate about products and services offered by Branch and Branch's selected partners. We receive opt-in consent to send promotional and marketing messages to Website Users where required by applicable law. You can opt-out of receiving these messages at any time as described below in the section titled: “Opt-out from Promotional Emails”;
to conduct research;
to manage your information and account, to improve and administer our Website, to contact Website Users to answer questions or resolve problems, or to verify your identity;
to conduct research to help us to optimally deliver our existing Services or develop new products, processes and services;
for ad delivery and reporting purposes and to create data and analytics products and services;
to make the Website easier to use by reducing the need for Clients and Website Users to enter information;
for other purposes disclosed to you at the time you provide data to us;
with your consent; or
where Branch otherwise has a legitimate interest in collecting the data, such as direct marketing, individual or market research, product improvement, anti-fraud protection, protecting the safety of us, our Website Users, or third parties, or where required by law.
Opt-Out & Do Not Track - Your Choice Mechanisms
In some cases, we rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you. In those cases, and where you have consented to Branch's processing of your Personal Data in connection with your use of the Website, you may withdraw that consent at any time by following the instructions below. Additionally, before we use Personal Data collected with your consent for any new purpose not originally authorized by you, we will provide information regarding the new purpose and ask for your consent for the new purpose. Where your consent for the processing of Personal Data is otherwise required by law or contract, we will comply with the law or contract. In other cases, we do not rely on your consent to process Personal Data about you (for example, if we have a different legal basis to process that data).
Opt Out from Promotional Emails
You can opt-out of receiving promotional emails from us by following the instructions in those emails, or by filling out
this form
. You can also opt-out of certain categories of emails using
this form
. If you opt-out using any of these tools, we may still send you non-promotional emails, such as certain updates about your account or updates to our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy and/or use of the Services.
Opt Out from Website Cookies/Web Beacons
We will only use cookies consistent with your cookie settings and permissions granted on our Website. If you permit us to use cookies/web beacons as discussed above (“What Information Does Branch Collect from our Website”), but would like to opt-out:
For dashboard users, visit
https://dashboard.branch.io/account-settings/user
, and toggle off “Cookie Consent”.
For all other users, click on “Cookie Consent” at the bottom right-hand corner of our homepage (
https://branch.io/
), and click on the opt-out link.
Also, you can choose to set your browser to remove cookies and to reject cookies. To exercise the Do Not Track settings available on certain web browsers, please visit the privacy settings of your browser. Where Branch is able to see that such a selection has been made, we will not use information collected from that device to target advertising on that browser. Dashboard users must use the “Cookie Consent” feature to revoke permission to place cookies.
Note that, even if you opt out, we may still collect and use non-personal data regarding your activities on our Website. This also does not opt you out of being served advertising altogether; you will continue to receive generic advertisements.
Third-Party Tools/Analytics on the Website
The Website utilizes third-party tracking tools from third-party service providers, which may enable these third parties to analyze our Website traffic for analytics purposes. Some of these third-party service providers may collect information from this Website for retargeting and interest-based advertising purposes. For more information about these forms of ad targeting and to understand your right to opt-out from these practices, please visit
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
. All of these tools are hosted by the third parties who provide them, and your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy policies of the third parties providing them. These tools include, but are not limited to, those below.
Google
. We may use Google Analytics and Google Analytics Demographics and Interest Reporting to collect information regarding visitor behavior and visitor demographics on our Website, and to develop website content. For more information about Google Analytics, please visit
www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/
. You can opt-out of Google’s collection and processing of data generated by your use of the Website by going to
http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
.
Mixpanel
. We use a service provided by Mixpanel, Inc. (“Mixpanel”) to provide us with analytics data regarding Website Users’ interactions with our Website and Services. You may opt-out of Mixpanel’s automatic retention of data that is collected while using the Services by visiting
https://mixpanel.com/optout/
. To track opt-outs, Mixpanel uses a persistent opt-out cookie placed on your device. Please note that if you get a new computer, install a new browser, erase or otherwise alter the browser’s cookie file (including upgrading certain browsers), you may delete the Mixpanel opt-out cookie.
Facebook
. We may use certain tools offered by Facebook, Inc. (“Facebook”) that enable it to collect or receive information about actions Website Users take on our Website through use of cookies, web beacons and other storage technologies or in order to provide measurement services, targeted ads and other services. For more information regarding the collection and use of such information by Facebook, please see the Facebook Data Policy, available at:
https://www.facebook.com/policy.php
.
Drift
. We use certain tools offered by Drift to power our Website’s live-chat experience. If you provide information about yourself through that live-chat experience, then we may store that information for marketing purposes. Drift may also infer information about the company that you work for you based on your IP address.
Policies Applicable to Both Our Services & Our Website
How does Branch Share Information?
In addition to the ways described in our
Terms & Conditions
and this Privacy Policy, Branch may also share information with others under the following circumstances:
With third-party vendors, consultants and other service providers who work for us and need access to information we collect to do that work.
With our Clients and their agents, as described in this Policy.
To third parties (such as advertising networks or vendors used by our Clients), as directed by our Clients.
To comply with laws or to respond to lawful requests and legal process including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements, and in order to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding suspected, or actual, prohibited activities, including but not limited to fraud and situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person.
To protect the rights and property of Branch, our agents, Clients, Users, Website Users, and others including to enforce our agreements, policies, and Terms & Conditions.
To Branch’s subsidiaries and affiliates as necessary to help us provide, support, and maintain the Services.
In connection with or during negotiation of any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
Updating Your Information and Contact Preferences; California Shine the Light Law
We provide Clients with a mechanism to access, review and update information via the dashboard. If you wish to review or update your information, please visit branch.io and login using the username and password you created. Next, please select “Account Settings” which can be found in the lower left corner of the dashboard screen, then select the “User” tab near the top. If you would like to delete your account, please email support@branch.io.
Under California law, California residents who have an established business relationship with us may choose to opt-out of the disclosure of Personal Data about them to third parties for such third parties’ direct marketing purposes. Our policy is not to disclose Personal Data collected through our Website to a third party for direct marketing purposes without your approval. If you choose to opt-out at any time after granting approval, email privacy@branch.io.
California residents who have provided us with Personal Data can also request and obtain from us once a year, free of charge, a list of the third parties to whom we have disclosed their Personal Data (if any) for such third parties’ direct marketing purposes in the prior calendar year, as well as the type of Personal Data disclosed to those parties.  If you are a California resident and would like such a list, please email privacy@branch.io.
We Secure the Information We Collect
Securing the information provided by our Clients and collected through our Website is important to us. Branch has implemented industry-standard technical, administrative, and physical safeguards to help protect the information on our servers against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure or destruction. You are responsible for maintaining the secrecy of your own passwords. If you have reason to believe that your passwords or Personal Data are no longer secure, please promptly notify us at privacy@branch.io.
Our Data Retention Policy
For our Services:
Branch stores the information collected by our Services (see the “What Information Does Branch Collect from our Services?” section above) so long as our systems continue to encounter that User. After that User has been inactive for 30 days (or 90 days for specific attribution products), identifiers collected from that User will be deleted unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Usage activity logs, which are used for the purpose of reporting and analytics, are stored in an identifiable form for no more than 7 days (or up to 60 days as determined by the Client or for specific fields), after which these logs are removed or pseudonymized. Any and all pseudonymized logs are deleted after 12 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Aggregated reporting metrics shared with Clients are retained (in aggregate and anonymized form) for up to 24 months, unless otherwise required by applicable law or otherwise agreed between Branch and the Client.
Branch may retain information collected by our Services beyond these periods for fraud prevention, analysis, or response, or to protect the safety of Branch, its Clients, Users or the public.
For the Website:
We store Personal Data such as email address or billing details for so long as you continue to have a business relationship with Branch and for a reasonable time thereafter for record-keeping purposes. If applicable to you, you may ask us to delete that information as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below or pursuant to your right of erasure as described in the “Data Subject Rights” section below.
Links to Other Websites
The Website and/or Services may contain links to other websites and other websites may reference or link to our Website and/or Services. These other domains and websites are not controlled by Branch, and we do not endorse or make any representations about third-party websites or social media platforms. We encourage you to read the privacy policies of each and every website and application that you interact with. We do not endorse, screen, or approve, and are not responsible for the privacy practices or content of such other websites or applications. Visiting these other websites or applications is at your own risk.
International Data Transfers
All information collected via the Website and Services is stored on servers located in the United States. In the process of providing the Services, we may transfer information across borders from other countries or jurisdictions into the United States. By using the Services, each Client and Website User consents to the transfer and processing of information to the U.S. in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Data transfers from the European Union, United Kingdom, and Switzerland are transferred on the basis of legal mechanisms approved by the European Commission and other relevant authorities for cross-border data transfers, such as Standard Contractual Clauses or the Privacy Shield mechanism discussed in the “Privacy Shield For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States” section below.
Privacy Shield For EU, UK, and Swiss Personal Data Transferred into the United States
Branch complies with the E.U.-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework and the Swiss-US Privacy Shield Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of Personal Data from European Union member countries (including European Economic Area member countries), the United Kingdom, and Switzerland transferred to the United States pursuant to Privacy Shield. Branch recognizes that the Court of Justice of the European Union ruled in July 2020 that a certification under the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework no longer can serve as the basis by which entities subject to the GDPR export personal data to jurisdictions outside the European Economic Area, and that the Swiss Data Protection Authority similarly held the Swiss-US Privacy Shield inadequate. Branch will continue to honor its obligation to comply with the Privacy Shield Principles with respect to data that was transferred pursuant to the EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework. If there is any conflict between the policies in this Privacy Policy and data subject rights under the Privacy Shield Principles, the Privacy Shield Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Privacy Shield program, and to view our certification page, please visit visit
https://www.privacyshield.gov
.
Branch no longer relies on the EU-U.S. Privacy Shield to transfer data that originated in the EEA or the United Kingdom to the U.S.
Branch is subject to the investigatory and enforcement authority of the US Federal Trade Commission.
Pursuant to the Privacy Shield Frameworks we are obliged to inform EU, UK, and Swiss individuals whose data is being transferred into the United States that we may be required to release Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities including to meet national security and law enforcement requirements.
Branch remains liable for the onward transfer of EU, UK, and Swiss personal data to agent third parties pursuant to the Privacy Shield unless we can prove we were not a party to the actions giving rise to the damages.
We acknowledge the right of EU, UK, and Swiss individuals to access their Personal Data pursuant to the Privacy Shield. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals wishing to exercise this right may do so by contacting privacy@branch.io.
In compliance with the Privacy Shield Principles, Branch commits to resolve complaints about your privacy and our collection or use of your personal information transferred to the United States pursuant to Privacy Shield. European Union, UK, and Swiss individuals with Privacy Shield inquiries or complaints should first contact Branch at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at privacy@branch.io
Branch has further committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the Privacy Shield Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, the BBB EU PRIVACY SHIELD, operated by BBB National Programs. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit
http://www.bbb.org/EU-privacy-shield/for-eu-consumers
for more information and to file a complaint. This service is provided free of charge to you.
If your Privacy Shield complaint cannot be resolved through the above channels, under certain conditions, you may invoke binding arbitration for some residual claims not resolved by other redress mechanisms.  See Privacy Shield Annex 1 at
https://www.privacyshield.gov/article?id=ANNEX-I-introduction
.
Data Subject Rights
California Consumer Privacy Act
The California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) provides certain rights to natural persons who are residents of California. Our CCPA privacy notice is available
here
.
Rights of Residents of the European Economic Area and United Kingdom
The European General Data Protection Regulation of 2018 (“GDPR”) and equivalent requirements in the United Kingdom including the Data Protection Act 2018 and the United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation (“
UK Data Protection Law
”) provides certain rights to residents of Europe. Information on how you can exercise rights under the GDPR and UK Data Protection Law are set forth
here
.
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (“LGPD”) provides certain rights to residents of Brazil. Information on how you can exercise rights under the LGPD are set forth
here
.
Our Policy Regarding Children
Services:
The Branch Services are not directed to children. We require that Clients agree to not send to us data relating to any children under 13 (or, in certain jurisdictions, under 16). If you are a Client and want to learn more about Branch
SDK Privacy Controls
that you can use in your compliance with the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (COPPA), GDPR, or any other applicable law, please contact privacy@branch.io.
If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16) in violation of applicable law, please contact us at privacy@branch.io, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any information that it may have been provided inappropriately.
Website:
The Branch Website is not directed to children. We do not knowingly collect through the Website Personal Data from anyone under the age of 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16). If you are under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16), please do not attempt to register or send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, or email address. No one under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16) may provide any Personal Data to us. In the event that we learn that we have collected any such data from a child under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16) through our Website, we will take reasonable steps to delete that information as quickly as possible. If you believe that we might have any information from or about a child under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under 16), please contact us at privacy@branch.io, so that Branch can promptly investigate and delete any inappropriately obtained information.
Contact Us, Questions, Changes to This Privacy Policy
We may change this Privacy Policy at any time in our sole discretion. We will post all changes to this Privacy Policy on this page and will indicate at the top of the page the modified Privacy Policy’s effective date. If you have any questions or suggestions regarding this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
Branch Metrics, Inc.
195 Page Mill Road, Suite 101
Palo Alto, CA 94306
or by email at info@branch.io
Compliance
This Privacy Policy shall be implemented by Branch and all its operating divisions, subsidiaries and affiliates. Branch has put in place mechanisms to verify ongoing compliance with Privacy Shield Principles and this Privacy Policy.
Effective January 13th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Branch Metrics, Inc. Privacy Policy For Job Applicants and Personnel
Welcome to Branch! We are the leading mobile linking platform, with solutions that unify user experience and measurement across different devices, platforms, and channels. This Privacy Policy for Job Applicants and Personnel (the “Policy”) describes the information Branch Metrics, Inc. and/or its subsidiaries (“
Branch
”, “We”, “Us”) collect, as well as how we use, retain, share and delete that information as part of our recruiting and employment functions, including for current and former employees, contractors, consultants, interns, and workers.
We may update this Policy at any time. We may also provide you additional privacy notices regarding our collection, use, or disclosure of information. Please read this Policy and any other privacy notices carefully.
This Policy does not form part of any employment contract or contract to provide services. In addition, if you provide services to Branch through or in connection with another company, we are not responsible for that company’s privacy practices.
This Policy does not apply to our handling of data gathered about you when you use the services of Branch customers for which Branch technology is integrated. When you interact with us in that role, the privacy policy associated with the relevant Branch customer applies. This Policy also does not apply to our handling of data gathered about you in your role as a user of our services, such as Branch Discovery. When you interact with us in that role, the privacy policy of the relevant service applies.
This Policy will be accessible via our human resource information system and is made available to new employees as part of the onboarding process.
INTERNATIONAL DATA TRANSFERS
Branch is a United States company. By performing services for Branch as an employee, contractor, consultant, intern, or worker, you agree that your information will be transferred to and stored within the United States. If you are located outside of the United States, please note that applicable data protection laws may not be equivalent to the laws of your local jurisdiction. Branch implements safeguards necessary to comply with the GDPR and other applicable privacy laws.
INFORMATION WE COLLECT
This policy covers the information we collect during the application and recruiting process. This data, which may be collected directly from you or third parties, includes:
Identifiers, such as your name, email address, phone number, and other information about you, and such information about your beneficiaries or emergency contacts;
Your resume or CV, cover letter, copies of identification documents, such as driver’s licenses, passports, visas, background reports, and any other personal information you submit as part of your employment application;
Career information such as work experience, job titles, work dates and work locations, performance information, information about skills, qualifications, experience, publications, and speaking engagements; absence and leave records; professional memberships; disciplinary and grievance information; and termination information;
Financial information, such as information that may be necessary for the administration of payroll, and bank account and tax information;
Business travel and expense information, such as travel itinerary information, corporate expenses, and Branch credit card usage;
Education information, such as institutions attended, degrees, certifications, training courses, publications, and transcript information;
Legally protected classification information, such as sensitive information you submit as part of the application or recruitment process, including demographic information, health information, religious beliefs, sexual orientation, marital status, nationality, and ethnicity;
Sensitive personal information, such as Social Security Number, passport number, and driver’s license number. Some other information, such as legally protected classification information, may be considered “sensitive personal information” under California law;
Electronic and other workplace monitoring information. We may monitor your activity (including online activity) on Branch networks or Branch-issued technology (e.g., smartphones, laptops, tablets, etc.);
Internet, electronic network, and device activity and device information and related identifiers such as information about your use of the Branch network, information, and communication systems, including user IDs, passwords, IP addresses, device IDs, web logs, metadata, and audit trails of system access;
Audio or visual information, such as CCTV footage, as well as other information relating to the security of our premises; recorded presentations in which you participate; and photographs taken at Branch functions;
Medical information about you, and, if applicable, your beneficiaries, such as dependent information, spousal or partner information, health information, sickness records, and medical conditions;
Other information that directly or indirectly identifies you, such as date and place of birth, citizenship, and permanent residence (and such information about your dependents or emergency contacts); and information on any publicly available social media profile of yours that mentions your connection to us or our services.
HOW WE USE YOUR INFORMATION
Branch collects personal information about you to carry out the application and recruitment process, and to support day-to-day business and human resources functions and activities, including:
For talent acquisition and employee lifecycle management purposes, such as recruiting and hiring job applicants (including, where permitted by and in compliance with applicable law, conducting background checks), administering employee compensation and benefits, soliciting survey feedback to improve the employee experience, and managing the employee termination process;
For performance management purposes, including performance reviews, employee mobility and talent development, and attendance monitoring;
For operational purposes, such as for processing payroll, administering benefits, managing the company directory, accounting for purchases by employees, managing workplace safety and security, managing Branch’s network and systems, and developing business continuity and disaster recovery plans;
For policy enforcement purposes, such as conducting ethics and disciplinary investigations, administering and enforcing privacy and security training programs, and managing audit and compliance matters;
To comply with applicable laws, regulations, legal processes, or enforceable government requests as necessary; and
To exercise our legal rights, including seeking advice from our external lawyers or in connection with litigation with a third party.
Certain information we collect may be “sensitive personal information” under California law. We use such information as legally necessary to conduct our relationship with you, in the following ways:
Social Security Number or government identifiers such as passport number, driver’s license number, or state ID card number for legal compliance, payroll, benefits, tax, and immigration purposes;
Health information, which may include disability status, to provide reasonable workplace accommodations and manage absences, for workplace health and safety purposes, and for compliance with applicable law and contracts or to exercise rights thereunder;
Racial/ethnic origin, sexual orientation, and/or disability status for equal opportunity and diversity and inclusion purposes and compliance with applicable law, or to exercise rights thereunder.
If you are offered and accept employment with Branch, the information collected during the application and recruitment process will become part of your employment record.
IF YOU ARE A EUROPEAN ECONOMIC AREA (“EEA"), UNITED KINGDOM (“UK”), OR BRAZIL DATA SUBJECT, OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR PROCESSING YOUR INFORMATION
We collect and process information you provide us to assess the potential for entering an employment contract with you. Our legal bases for processing your information include: (1) where you have provided consent; (2) where necessary for the performance of a contract with you; (3) for compliance with a legal obligation; or (4) for our legitimate interests in managing and administering business and human resources functions and activities, as described above. If you do not provide this data, we may be unable in some circumstances to comply with our obligations and we will tell you about the implications of that decision.
HOW INFORMATION IS SHARED
We do not share your personal information except in the limited circumstances described below:
WHEN YOU AGREE OR DIRECT US TO SHARE
You may agree or direct us to share your personal information with others as part of your employment with Branch. For example, in certain jurisdictions, consent may be legally required for Branch to perform a background check.
FOR EXTERNAL PROCESSING
We may share your personal data with our employees, contractors, consultants and other parties (including Branch affiliates) who require such information to assist us with establishing, managing or terminating our employment relationship with you. We may also share your personal data with service providers, including technology and analytics providers that assist us with operating our business, or with other parties in a manner consistent with the use and disclosure provisions of this Policy.
We may also provide your information to another entity (such as a potential or existing business counterparty or customer) with a means of contacting you in the normal course of business, for example, by providing your contact details, such as your phone number and email address.
FOR LEGAL REASONS OR TO PREVENT HARM
We may preserve or disclose information about you to comply with a law, regulation, legal process, or governmental request; to assert legal rights or defend against legal claims; or to prevent, detect, or investigate illegal activity, fraud, abuse, violations of our terms, or threats to the security of the Services or the physical safety of any person.
Please note: Our policy is to notify you of legal process seeking access to your information, such as search warrants, court orders, or subpoenas, unless we are prohibited by law from doing so. Exceptions to our notice policy include exigent or counterproductive circumstances, for example, when there is an emergency involving a danger of death or serious physical injury to a person.
TRANSFER OF BUSINESS ASSETS
If we are involved in an actual or contemplated merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we may share your information. We will continue to take measures to protect the confidentiality of personal information and give affected users notice before transferring any personal information to a new entity.
Additionally, Branch may share or sell aggregated, de-identified data that does not identify you with our partners and the public. When we provide this information, we perform appropriate procedures so that the data does not identify you and we contractually prohibit recipients of the data from re-identifying it back to you.
HOW TO ACCESS OR DELETE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
You may contact your local HR representative for information about how to access or delete information Branch stores related to your employment. You may also request information by submitting a request
here
, by sending an email to
privacy@branch.io
, or by leaving a message at +1-650-209-6461.
RETENTION OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
For EEA, UK, Brazil, and Korea-based roles, job applications will be deleted within two years unless otherwise required by applicable law.
All other personal information will be retained for as long as necessary to satisfy the purposes for which it was collected. These purposes may include to comply with reporting, legal, and accounting obligations. We determine retention periods by evaluating our legal obligations and our legitimate business interests (such as backing up systems or maintaining our organizational history).
YOUR RIGHTS REGARDING PERSONAL DATA
RESIDENTS OF THE EUROPEAN ECONOMIC AREA, UNITED KINGDOM, OR BRAZIL
Applicants and employees within the EEA, UK, and Brazil have certain rights under the GDPR and other applicable data protection laws. These include the right to request access or to update your information, request that it be deleted, or object to Branch using it for certain purposes.
If you wish to exercise a right of access please submit your request to us
here
, or contact
privacy@branch.io
. We will respond to any requests in accordance with applicable law, and so there may be circumstances where we are not able to comply with your request.
If you are located within the EEA, UK, or Brazil and you can’t find the answer to your question in this policy, you may contact us at
privacy@branch.io
. Depending on your country of residence, you may also raise any questions or concerns you have regarding your personal information with your local data protection authority.
CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS
You may also have certain rights regarding your personal information. Subject to certain exceptions, you may request:
access to your personal information including the right to obtain confirmation that we are processing your personal information and the right to know the categories of personal information we have or will collect about you and the reason we will or have collected such information;
correction of the personal information that we have or will hold about you that is inaccurate;
deletion or removal of your personal information.
Exceptions to Your Rights: There are certain exceptions to these rights. For instance, we may retain your personal information if it is reasonably necessary for us or our service providers to provide a service that you have requested or to comply with law or to detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, or prosecute those responsible for that activity.
You also have the right not to be discriminated against (as provided for in California law) for exercising your rights.
We also will take reasonable steps to verify your identity before responding to a request. In doing so, we may ask you for verification information so that we can match at least two verification points with information we maintain in our files about you. If we are unable to verify you through this method, we shall have the right, but not the obligation, to request additional information from you.
You can have an authorized representative make the request on your behalf, and they will need to also provide verification of identity.
California law also allows you to limit the use or disclosure of your “sensitive personal information” (as defined in the California Consumer Privacy Act) if your sensitive personal information is used for certain purposes. Please note that we do not use or disclose sensitive personal information other than for purposes for which you cannot opt out under the California Consumer Privacy Act.
California law places certain obligations on businesses that “sell” personal information to third parties or “share” personal information with third parties for cross-context behavioral advertising. We do not “sell” or “share” the personal information covered by this Policy and have not done so in the twelve months prior to the effective date of this Policy.
ADHERENCE TO BRANCH POLICIES
Anyone who is hired by Branch will be required to adhere to all Branch policies, where consistent with applicable local law. Failure to adhere to such policies may result in discipline up to, and including, termination. All individuals whose responsibilities include the processing of personal data on Branch’s behalf are expected to protect that data by adherence to Branch’s Privacy Policy.
If you have any concerns regarding how your data is processed, you can contact Branch’s Data Protection Officer at:
privacy@branch.io
.
Effective January 12th 2023
to
January 13th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Branch Metrics, Inc. Privacy Policy For Job Applicants and Personnel
Welcome to Branch! We are the leading mobile linking platform, with solutions that unify user experience and measurement across different devices, platforms, and channels. This Privacy Policy for Job Applicants and Personnel (the “Policy”) describes the information Branch Metrics, Inc. and/or its subsidiaries (“
Branch
”, “We”, “Us”) collect, as well as how we use, retain, share and delete that information as part of our recruiting and employment functions, including for current and former employees, contractors, consultants, interns, and workers.
We may update this Policy at any time. We may also provide you additional privacy notices regarding our collection, use, or disclosure of information. Please read this Policy and any other privacy notices carefully.
This Policy does not form part of any employment contract or contract to provide services. In addition, if you provide services to Branch through or in connection with another company, we are not responsible for that company’s privacy practices.
This Policy does not apply to our handling of data gathered about you when you use the services of Branch customers for which Branch technology is integrated. When you interact with us in that role, the privacy policy associated with the relevant Branch customer applies. This Policy also does not apply to our handling of data gathered about you in your role as a user of our services, such as Branch Navigator. When you interact with us in that role, the privacy policy of the relevant service applies.
This Policy will be accessible via our human resource information system and is made available to new employees as part of the onboarding process.
INTERNATIONAL DATA TRANSFERS
Branch is a United States company. By performing services for Branch as an employee, contractor, consultant, intern, or worker, you agree that your information will be transferred to and stored within the United States. If you are located outside of the United States, please note that applicable data protection laws may not be equivalent to the laws of your local jurisdiction. Branch implements safeguards necessary to comply with the GDPR and other applicable privacy laws.
INFORMATION WE COLLECT
This policy covers the information we collect during the application and recruiting process. This data, which may be collected directly from you or third parties, includes:
Identifiers, such as your name, email address, phone number, and other information about you, and such information about your beneficiaries or emergency contacts;
Your resume or CV, cover letter, copies of identification documents, such as driver’s licenses, passports, visas, background reports, and any other personal information you submit as part of your employment application;
Career information such as work experience, job titles, work dates and work locations, performance information, information about skills, qualifications, experience, publications, and speaking engagements; absence and leave records; professional memberships; disciplinary and grievance information; and termination information;
Financial information, such as information that may be necessary for the administration of payroll, and bank account and tax information;
Business travel and expense information, such as travel itinerary information, corporate expenses, and Branch credit card usage;
Education information, such as institutions attended, degrees, certifications, training courses, publications, and transcript information;
Legally protected classification information, such as sensitive information you submit as part of the application or recruitment process, including demographic information, health information, religious beliefs, sexual orientation, marital status, nationality, and ethnicity;
Sensitive personal information, such as Social Security Number, passport number, and driver’s license number. Some other information, such as legally protected classification information, may be considered “sensitive personal information” under California law;
Electronic and other workplace monitoring information. We may monitor your activity (including online activity) on Branch networks or Branch-issued technology (e.g., smartphones, laptops, tablets, etc.);
Internet, electronic network, and device activity and device information and related identifiers such as information about your use of the Branch network, information, and communication systems, including user IDs, passwords, IP addresses, device IDs, web logs, metadata, and audit trails of system access;
Audio or visual information, such as CCTV footage, as well as other information relating to the security of our premises; recorded presentations in which you participate; and photographs taken at Branch functions;
Medical information about you, and, if applicable, your beneficiaries, such as dependent information, spousal or partner information, health information, sickness records, and medical conditions;
Other information that directly or indirectly identifies you, such as date and place of birth, citizenship, and permanent residence (and such information about your dependents or emergency contacts); and information on any publicly available social media profile of yours that mentions your connection to us or our services.
HOW WE USE YOUR INFORMATION
Branch collects personal information about you to carry out the application and recruitment process, and to support day-to-day business and human resources functions and activities, including:
For talent acquisition and employee lifecycle management purposes, such as recruiting and hiring job applicants (including, where permitted by and in compliance with applicable law, conducting background checks), administering employee compensation and benefits, soliciting survey feedback to improve the employee experience, and managing the employee termination process;
For performance management purposes, including performance reviews, employee mobility and talent development, and attendance monitoring;
For operational purposes, such as for processing payroll, administering benefits, managing the company directory, accounting for purchases by employees, managing workplace safety and security, managing Branch’s network and systems, and developing business continuity and disaster recovery plans;
For policy enforcement purposes, such as conducting ethics and disciplinary investigations, administering and enforcing privacy and security training programs, and managing audit and compliance matters;
To comply with applicable laws, regulations, legal processes, or enforceable government requests as necessary; and
To exercise our legal rights, including seeking advice from our external lawyers or in connection with litigation with a third party.
Certain information we collect may be “sensitive personal information” under California law. We use such information as legally necessary to conduct our relationship with you, in the following ways:
Social Security Number or government identifiers such as passport number, driver’s license number, or state ID card number for legal compliance, payroll, benefits, tax, and immigration purposes;
Health information, which may include disability status, to provide reasonable workplace accommodations and manage absences, for workplace health and safety purposes, and for compliance with applicable law and contracts or to exercise rights thereunder;
Racial/ethnic origin, sexual orientation, and/or disability status for equal opportunity and diversity and inclusion purposes and compliance with applicable law, or to exercise rights thereunder.
If you are offered and accept employment with Branch, the information collected during the application and recruitment process will become part of your employment record.
IF YOU ARE A EUROPEAN ECONOMIC AREA (“EEA"), UNITED KINGDOM (“UK”), OR BRAZIL DATA SUBJECT, OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR PROCESSING YOUR INFORMATION
We collect and process information you provide us to assess the potential for entering an employment contract with you. Our legal bases for processing your information include: (1) where you have provided consent; (2) where necessary for the performance of a contract with you; (3) for compliance with a legal obligation; or (4) for our legitimate interests in managing and administering business and human resources functions and activities, as described above. If you do not provide this data, we may be unable in some circumstances to comply with our obligations and we will tell you about the implications of that decision.
HOW INFORMATION IS SHARED
We do not share your personal information except in the limited circumstances described below:
WHEN YOU AGREE OR DIRECT US TO SHARE
You may agree or direct us to share your personal information with others as part of your employment with Branch. For example, in certain jurisdictions, consent may be legally required for Branch to perform a background check.
FOR EXTERNAL PROCESSING
We may share your personal data with our employees, contractors, consultants and other parties (including Branch affiliates) who require such information to assist us with establishing, managing or terminating our employment relationship with you. We may also share your personal data with service providers, including technology and analytics providers that assist us with operating our business, or with other parties in a manner consistent with the use and disclosure provisions of this Policy.
We may also provide your information to another entity (such as a potential or existing business counterparty or customer) with a means of contacting you in the normal course of business, for example, by providing your contact details, such as your phone number and email address.
FOR LEGAL REASONS OR TO PREVENT HARM
We may preserve or disclose information about you to comply with a law, regulation, legal process, or governmental request; to assert legal rights or defend against legal claims; or to prevent, detect, or investigate illegal activity, fraud, abuse, violations of our terms, or threats to the security of the Services or the physical safety of any person.
Please note: Our policy is to notify you of legal process seeking access to your information, such as search warrants, court orders, or subpoenas, unless we are prohibited by law from doing so. Exceptions to our notice policy include exigent or counterproductive circumstances, for example, when there is an emergency involving a danger of death or serious physical injury to a person.
TRANSFER OF BUSINESS ASSETS
If we are involved in an actual or contemplated merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we may share your information. We will continue to take measures to protect the confidentiality of personal information and give affected users notice before transferring any personal information to a new entity.
Additionally, Branch may share or sell aggregated, de-identified data that does not identify you with our partners and the public. When we provide this information, we perform appropriate procedures so that the data does not identify you and we contractually prohibit recipients of the data from re-identifying it back to you.
HOW TO ACCESS OR DELETE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
You may contact your local HR representative for information about how to access or delete information Branch stores related to your employment. You may also request information by sending an email to
privacy@branch.io
, or by leaving a message at +1-650-209-6461.
RETENTION OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
For EEA, UK, Brazil, and Korea-based roles, job applications will be deleted within two years unless otherwise required by applicable law.
All other personal information will be retained for as long as necessary to satisfy the purposes for which it was collected. These purposes may include to comply with reporting, legal, and accounting obligations. We determine retention periods by evaluating our legal obligations and our legitimate business interests (such as backing up systems or maintaining our organizational history).
YOUR RIGHTS REGARDING PERSONAL DATA
RESIDENTS OF THE EUROPEAN ECONOMIC AREA, UNITED KINGDOM, OR BRAZIL
Applicants and employees within the EEA, UK, and Brazil have certain rights under the GDPR and other applicable data protection laws. These include the right to request access or to update your information, request that it be deleted, or object to Branch using it for certain purposes.
If you wish to exercise a right of access please contact
privacy@branch.io
. We will respond to any requests in accordance with applicable law, and so there may be circumstances where we are not able to comply with your request.
If you are located within the EEA, UK, or Brazil and you can’t find the answer to your question in this policy, you may contact us at
privacy@branch.io
. Depending on your country of residence, you may also raise any questions or concerns you have regarding your personal information with your local data protection authority.
CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS
You may also have certain rights regarding your personal information. Subject to certain exceptions, you may request:
access to your personal information including the right to obtain confirmation that we are processing your personal information and the right to know the categories of personal information we have or will collect about you and the reason we will or have collected such information;
correction of the personal information that we have or will hold about you that is inaccurate;
deletion or removal of your personal information.
Exceptions to Your Rights: There are certain exceptions to these rights. For instance, we may retain your personal information if it is reasonably necessary for us or our service providers to provide a service that you have requested or to comply with law or to detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, or prosecute those responsible for that activity.
You also have the right not to be discriminated against (as provided for in California law) for exercising your rights.
We also will take reasonable steps to verify your identity before responding to a request. In doing so, we may ask you for verification information so that we can match at least two verification points with information we maintain in our files about you. If we are unable to verify you through this method, we shall have the right, but not the obligation, to request additional information from you.
California law also allows you to limit the use or disclosure of your “sensitive personal information” (as defined in the California Consumer Privacy Act) if your sensitive personal information is used for certain purposes. Please note that we do not use or disclose sensitive personal information other than for purposes for which you cannot opt out under the California Consumer Privacy Act.
California law places certain obligations on businesses that “sell” personal information to third parties or “share” personal information with third parties for cross-context behavioral advertising. We do not “sell” or “share” the personal information covered by this Policy and have not done so in the twelve months prior to the effective date of this Policy.
Adherence to Branch Policies
Anyone who is hired by Branch will be required to adhere to all Branch policies, where consistent with applicable local law. Failure to adhere to such policies may result in discipline up to, and including, termination. All individuals whose responsibilities include the processing of personal data on Branch’s behalf are expected to protect that data by adherence to Branch’s Privacy Policy.
If you have any concerns regarding how your data is processed, you can contact Branch’s Data Protection Officer at:
privacy@branch.io
.
Effective November 19th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Professional Services Hours Statement of Work
This Professional Services Hours Statement of Work (“
SOW
”) describes the certain services (“
Professional Services
”) to be performed by Branch Metrics, Inc. (“
Branch
”) for Customer (each a “
Party
”, collectively the “
Parties
”) and is effective as of the date of Customer's Order Form (the “
Effective Date
”). By executing this SOW, Customer agrees to the terms of this SOW and the Professional Services Terms & Conditions available at
https://legal.branch.io/#professional-services
(the “
PS Terms
”). Any capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein shall have the meaning set forth in the PS Terms. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency between this SOW and any Order Form referencing this SOW, the SOW shall control.
I. SCOPE OF PROFESSIONAL SERVICES
Branch provides Professional Services in the form of Customer Professional Services hours and services to Customer within the scope of work set forth below (the “
Project
”). Subject to the terms and conditions of this SOW, the PS Terms, the executed order form between the parties (“
the Order Form
”), and the applicable Terms and Conditions or Master Services Agreement, Customer shall be entitled to the number of Professional Services Hours specified in the Order Form. Branch’s provision of Professional Services is contingent on Customer’s payment of all applicable fees under the Order Form and adherence to the aforementioned contracts. Branch and Customer (collectively, the “
Project Team
”) will each commit reasonable resources as needed to support the execution and completion of the Project in accordance with this SOW.
II. SCOPE OF WORK
Branch reserves the right to define and adjust the Professional Services provided within the Professional Services Hours, aiming to facilitate the Customer’s enablement of and onboarding to Branch's platform during the term specified in the Order Form (the “
Term
”). The following services may be offered by Branch but will vary depending upon the actual scope of work as determined by the parties during the initial consultation:
Engagement Initiation & Planning
Branch's Role:
Supporting project management tasks, as deemed necessary, to ensure the successful completion of the Project.
Provide the following resources to assist the Customer during the engagement: Project Guides, Project Tracker, Quality Assurance (QA) Plan, Question & Answer Tracker, Project Summary/Go-Forward Guide, links to Branch University, and a Training Guide.
Customer Requirements:
The Customer must assign a single Project Owner before the project kickoff to coordinate customer-side tasks for all Branch products.
The Customer is required to allocate adequate resources and time to ensure successful integration with Branch and effective enablement of Branch's products.
Engagement Execution & Delivery
Branch's Role:
Provide and facilitate 45 to 60-minute one-time sessions with Customer Stakeholders, including kickoffs, introductions, discovery, overviews, and training workshops, as determined by Branch.
Technical workshops will be conducted as per Branch's discretion, covering various aspects relevant to the project.
Recurring sessions may be scheduled by Branch, with the frequency and content of these sessions subject to Branch's assessment.
Branch may support implementation, audit, or expansion tasks as they relate to the Branch platform or products.
Advising on ad-hoc requests for support related to new use case implementation advisory, consultation to optimize existing implementation with best practices, or implementation validation.
Business Strategy analysis and/or workshops to support best practice consultation, mobile growth potential, peer benchmarks, and use case or channel prioritization.
Customer Participation:
The Project Owner must actively participate in scheduled meetings and assist in keeping internal Customer resources focused and responsive to Branch's requests.
The Customer shall collaborate with Branch in identifying and ensuring the availability of internal stakeholders necessary for the project’s success.
The Customer will provide Branch with the best available data and resources as needed to complete analysis.
Engagement Testing & Quality Assurance
Branch's Role:
Provide guidance as it deems necessary for testing the integration and ensuring the products function as intended.
Customer Participation:
The Project Owner must actively participate in prioritizing testing & quality assurance with internal Customer resources focused and responsive to Branch's guidance.
The Customer shall collaborate with Branch in identifying and ensuring the availability of internal stakeholders necessary for testing and quality assurance.
Engagement Project Close
At the end of the Term, Branch may deliver a summary of the Project, including any outstanding work, to the Customer.
The Project Team will coordinate in good-faith to allocate the Professional Services Hours, of the nature and scope specified below, to facilitate Customer’s enablement of and onboarding to Branch’s platform during the Term (the “Scope of Work”).
III. CUSTOMER PROJECT ROLES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
The following table sets forth standard Customer roles (not individuals) and expectations. Customer acknowledges its participation in the Project, including the assignment and fulfillment of these roles, is essential to the Project’s timely completion and success. The chart below is Branch’s estimate of frequency and hours expected for successful engagement. These estimates may vary depending upon the scope of a given project and must be confirmed in writing if deviating from these expectations.
Role
Responsibility
Frequency
Estimated Hours
Sponsor
Responsible for providing Customer resources needed for successful Project Completion, and promote process change where necessary.
Once
4 Hours
Project Manager
Responsible for the oversight of Customer resources, schedules and responsibilities including:
Attending all key Project meetings;
Being a point of contact for day-to-day operations;
Securing participation (as required) of key business process owners; &
Participating in Project meetings.
Weekly
5-7 Hours Per Week
Administrator
Responsible for ongoing administration of Branch’s Services, once Professional Services are delivered.
Manages user acceptance tasks, including QA testing, training and adoption.
Manages the organization’s ongoing use of Branch’s Services.
Weekly
2 Hours Per Week
Functional Consultant(s) / Business Process Owner(s)
Responsible for review and acceptance of Branch integration and identification of exceptions/risks.
Attends Project meetings related to area of ownership.
Assists in the definition of unique processes outside of standard Branch practices.
Participates in user acceptance testing activities.
Weekly
5-7 Hours Per Week
Extended Team
Additional Customer resources as needed to support the scope of the Project.
Weekly
2-3 Hours Per Week
IV. GENERAL TERMS
The Parties acknowledge and agree on the following:
Professional Services.
The Professional Services will be rendered only for the Branch App ID(s) specified in the Order Form. Upon the Effective Date, Customer will: (i) allocate appropriate resources necessary to support the completion of the Project, (ii) delegate a single Project Owner prior to commencement of the Project; (iii) test Branch integration and products for quality assurance purposes to ensure that the Branch integration and products are working as intended; and (iv) grant all necessary access rights and permissions to Branch’s Project team members to enable them to perform integration development and testing.
Professional Services Hours.
For services rendered, Branch shall account for time expended in hourly increments by deducting from the pre-purchased pool of Professional Services Hours. Records of service hours and remaining Professional Services Hours will be maintained and provided to the Customer on a periodic basis. Once the Professional Services Hours are fully consumed, Branch will notify the Customer. The Customer may opt to purchase additional hours per the terms and conditions in this SOW.
These pre-purchased Professional Service Hours will expire upon the conclusion of the Term. Customer will not be entitled to any refund or service credit for expired or unused Professional Services Hours. Customer may purchase additional Professional Service hours (“
Additional Hours
”) by following the Change Order Process. Professional Services Hours may only be utilized as specified in the delineated categories under Section II, Scope of Work.
Requesting Hours.
Customer may utilize the Professional Services Hours during the Term of this SOW by requesting usage of the hours 30 days prior to the intended use date, unless otherwise mutually agreed to in writing by the parties. A customer may request a maximum of 50 of its Professional Services Hours to be used in a given calendar month, unless otherwise agreed to by the parties in writing.
Change Order Process
. A Customer may request to purchase Additional Hours or request modification to this SOW by submitting a written request via email to its respective point of contact. Upon receipt, Branch will prepare an updated quote for review, which may include modification or clarification on the scope of work requested. Branch reserves the right to offer Additional Hours at a different pricing structure than the Professional Services Hours. Acceptance of this offer will only occur after Customer affirmatively responds to the updated quote with explicit authorization to proceed with the Change Order at the price quoted by Branch.
V. OUT OF SCOPE
Customer acknowledges and agrees that:
Professional Services Hours Limitation
: Any work exceeding the Professional Services Hours as stipulated in Section I of this SOW will not be undertaken by the Vendor unless explicitly agreed upon in a separate written agreement or through a duly executed Change Order.
Scope of Work Boundary
: Work that falls outside the defined Scope of Work in Section II is deemed out-of-scope and will not be performed under the terms of this SOW. Should the Customer require any additional work that is not encompassed within the current Scope of Work, such work may only be incorporated into this Statement of Work through a mutually agreed upon separate written addendum or an approved Change Order as outlined in Section IV.
Out-of-Scope Work Includes, But Is Not Limited To
:
Code Creation
: Any development or scripting not explicitly outlined in the Scope of Work.
Unlisted Applications
: Services or time devoted to applications not specifically enumerated in this SOW.
Testing and QA
: Comprehensive testing and quality assurance of Branch App ID(s) or other components not detailed in this SOW.
Additional Collaborative Efforts
: Workshops, meetings, or any form of collaborative engagement beyond those listed in this SOW.
Link Template Management
: Ongoing management or modifications of link templates post-implementation.
Post-Completion Support
: Resolution of issues, break fixes, or any support services after the project reaches its completion stage as defined in this SOW.
By executing this SOW, the Customer expressly consents to these limitations and acknowledges that any request for out-of-scope work will require additional negotiation and formal documentation through a Change Order or separate agreement.
VI. PROJECT FEES & BILLING
.
As consideration for the Professional Services Hours and provision of the Professional Services, Customer will pay Branch the fees specified in the Order Form.
Customers shall pay the Project Fees to Branch within thirty (30) days of the invoice date. Customer is responsible for the integration and launch of the Services. Customer must pay the Project Fees regardless if the actual implementation is completed. If Customer disputes any portion of the invoiced fees, then Customer must adhere to the following dispute resolution process: (i) all undisputed amounts will be paid in accordance with the terms in this Order Form, and (ii) all billing disputes must be submitted in writing to billing@branch.io within ninety (90) days of the invoice date. If payment by Customer for any invoiced amount is not received by Branch by the due date set forth in the applicable invoice, then without limiting Branch's rights or remedies, those charges may accrue late interest at the rate of 2.5% (or the maximum rate permitted by law) of the outstanding balance per month.
If Customer utilizes all of its Professional Services Hours and desires additional Professional Services, then Customer may request the reservation of additional hours of Professional Service resources from Branch at a rate specified in the Change Order.
Effective September 23rd 2024
to
November 19th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Professional Services Hours Statement of Work
This Professional Services Hours Statement of Work (“
SOW
”) describes the certain services (“
Professional Services
”) to be performed by Branch Metrics, Inc. (“
Branch
”) for Customer (each a “
Party
”, collectively the “
Parties
”) and is effective as of the date of Customer's Order Form (the “
Effective Date
”). By executing this SOW, Customer agrees to the terms of this SOW and the Professional Services Terms & Conditions available at
https://legal.branch.io/#professional-services
(the “
PS Terms
”). Any capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein shall have the meaning set forth in the PS Terms. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency between this SOW and any Order Form referencing this SOW, the SOW shall control.
SCOPE OF PROFESSIONAL SERVICES
Branch provides Professional Services in the form of Customer Professional Services hours and services to Customer within the scope of work set forth below (the “
Project
”). Subject to the terms and conditions of this SOW, the PS Terms, the executed order form between the parties (“the
Order Form
”), and the applicable Terms and Conditions or Master Services Agreement, Customer shall be entitled to the number of Professional Services Hours specified in the Order Form. Branch’s provision of Professional Services is contingent on Customer’s payment of all applicable fees under the Order Form and adherence to the aforementioned contracts.   Branch and Customer (collectively, the “
Project Team
”) will each commit reasonable resources as needed to support the execution and completion of the Project in accordance with this SOW.
SCOPE OF WORK
Branch reserves the right to define and adjust the Professional Services provided within the Professional Services Hours, aiming to facilitate the Customer’s enablement of and onboarding to Branch's platform during the term specified in the Order Form (the “
Term
”). The following services may be offered by Branch but will vary depending upon the actual scope of work as determined by the parties during the initial consultation:
Engagement Initiation & Planning
Branch's Role:
Supporting project management tasks, as deemed necessary, to ensure the successful completion of the Project.
Provide the following resources to assist the Customer during the engagement: Project Guides, Project Tracker, Quality Assurance (QA) Plan, Question & Answer Tracker, Project Summary/Go-Forward Guide, links to Branch University, and a Training Guide.
Customer Requirements:
The Customer must assign a single Project Owner before the project kickoff to coordinate customer-side tasks for all Branch products.
The Customer is required to allocate adequate resources and time to ensure successful integration with Branch and effective enablement of Branch's products.
Engagement Execution & Delivery
Branch's Role:
Provide and facilitate 45 to 60-minute one-time sessions with Customer Stakeholders, including kickoffs, introductions, discovery, overviews, and training workshops, as determined by Branch.
Technical workshops will be conducted as per Branch's discretion, covering various aspects relevant to the project.
Recurring sessions may be scheduled by Branch, with the frequency and content of these sessions subject to Branch's assessment.
Branch may support implementation, audit, or expansion tasks as they relate to the Branch platform or products.
Advising on ad-hoc requests for support related to new use case implementation advisory, consultation to optimize existing implementation with best practices, or implementation validation.
Customer Participation:
The Project Owner must actively participate in scheduled meetings and assist in keeping internal Customer resources focused and responsive to Branch's requests.
The Customer shall collaborate with Branch in identifying and ensuring the availability of internal stakeholders necessary for the project’s success.
Engagement Testing & Quality Assurance
Branch's Role:
Provide guidance as it deems necessary for testing the integration and ensuring the products function as intended.
Customer Participation:
The Project Owner must actively participate in prioritizing testing & quality assurance with internal Customer resources focused and responsive to Branch's guidance.
The Customer shall collaborate with Branch in identifying and ensuring the availability of internal stakeholders necessary for testing and quality assurance.
Engagement Project Close
At the end of the Term, Branch may deliver a summary of the Project, including any outstanding work, to the Customer.
The Project Team will coordinate in good-faith to allocate the Professional Services Hours, of the nature and scope specified below, to facilitate Customer’s enablement of and onboarding to Branch’s platform during the Term (the “
Scope of Work
”).
CUSTOMER PROJECT ROLES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
The following table sets forth standard Customer roles (not individuals) and expectations. Customer acknowledges its participation in the Project, including the assignment and fulfillment of these roles, is essential to the Project’s timely completion and success. The chart below is Branch’s estimate of frequency and hours expected for successful engagement. These estimates may vary depending upon the scope of a given project and must be confirmed in writing if deviating from these expectations.
Role
Responsibility
Frequency
Estimated Hours
Sponsor
Responsible for providing Customer resources needed for successful Project Completion, and promote process change where necessary
Once
4 Hours
Project Manager
Responsible for the oversight of Customer resources, schedules and responsibilities including:
Attending all key Project meetings
Being a point of contact for day-to-day operations
Securing participation (as required) of key business process owners
Participating in Project meetings
Weekly
5-7 Hours Per Week
Administrator
Responsible for ongoing administration of Branch’s Services, once Professional Services are delivered
Manages user acceptance tasks, including QA testing, training and adoption
Manages the organization’s ongoing use of Branch’s Services
Weekly
2 Hours Per Week
Functional Consultant(s) / Business Process Owner(s)
Responsible for review and acceptance of Branch integration and identification of exceptions/risks
Attends Project meetings related to area of ownership
Assists in the definition of unique processes outside of standard Branch practices
Participates in user acceptance testing activities
Weekly
5-7 Hours Per Week
Extended Team
Additional Customer resources as needed to support the scope of the Project
Weekly
2-3 Hours Per Week
IV.
GENERAL TERMS
The Parties acknowledge and agree on the following:
Professional Services.
The Professional Services will be rendered only for the Branch App ID(s) specified in the Order Form. Upon the Effective Date, Customer will: (i) allocate appropriate resources necessary to support the completion of the Project, (ii) delegate a single Project Owner prior to commencement of the Project; (iii) test Branch integration and products for quality assurance purposes to ensure that the Branch integration and products are working as intended; and (iv) grant all necessary access rights and permissions to Branch’s Project team members to enable them to perform integration development and testing.
Professional Services Hours.
For services rendered, Branch shall account for time expended in hourly increments by deducting from the pre-purchased pool of Professional Services Hours. Records of service hours and remaining Professional Services Hours will be maintained and provided to the Customer on a periodic basis. Once the Professional Services Hours are fully consumed, Branch will notify the Customer. The Customer may opt to purchase additional hours per the terms and conditions in this SOW.
These pre-purchased Professional Service Hours will expire upon the conclusion of the Term. Customer will not be entitled to any refund or service credit for expired or unused Professional Services Hours. Customer may purchase additional Professional Service hours (“Additional Hours”) by following the Change Order Process. Professional Services Hours may only be utilized as specified in the delineated categories under Section II, Scope of Work.
Requesting Hours.
Customer may utilize the Professional Services Hours during the Term of this SOW by requesting usage of the hours 30 days prior to the intended use date, unless otherwise mutually agreed to in writing by the parties. A customer may request a maximum of 50 of its Professional Services Hours to be used in a given calendar month, unless otherwise agreed to by the parties in writing.
Change Order Process.
A Customer may request to purchase Additional Hours or request modification to this SOW by submitting a written request via email to its respective point of contact. Upon receipt, Branch will prepare an updated quote for review, which may include modification or clarification on the scope of work requested. Branch reserves the right to offer  Additional Hours at a different pricing structure than the Professional Services Hours. Acceptance of this offer will only occur after Customer affirmatively responds to the updated quote with explicit authorization to proceed with the Change Order at the price quoted by Branch.
V.
OUT OF SCOPE
Customer acknowledges and agrees that:
Professional Services Hours Limitation
: Any work exceeding the Professional Services Hours as stipulated in Section I of this SOW will not be undertaken by the Vendor unless explicitly agreed upon in a separate written agreement or through a duly executed Change Order.
Scope of Work Boundary
: Work that falls outside the defined Scope of Work in Section II is deemed out-of-scope and will not be performed under the terms of this SOW. Should the Customer require any additional work that is not encompassed within the current Scope of Work, such work may only be incorporated into this Statement of Work through a mutually agreed upon separate written addendum or an approved Change Order as outlined in Section IV.
Out-of-Scope Work Includes, But Is Not Limited To:
Code Creation
: Any development or scripting not explicitly outlined in the Scope of Work.
Unlisted Applications
: Services or time devoted to applications not specifically enumerated in this SOW.
Testing and QA
: Comprehensive testing and quality assurance of Branch App ID(s) or other components not detailed in this SOW.
Additional Collaborative Efforts
: Workshops, meetings, or any form of collaborative engagement beyond those listed in this SOW.
Link Template Management:
Ongoing management or modifications of link templates post-implementation.
Post-Completion Support:
Resolution of issues, break fixes, or any support services after the project reaches its completion stage as defined in this SOW.
By executing this SOW, the Customer expressly consents to these limitations and acknowledges that any request for out-of-scope work will require additional negotiation and formal documentation through a Change Order or separate agreement.
VI.
PROJECT FEES & BILLING.
As consideration for the Professional Services Hours and provision of the Professional Services, Customer will pay Branch the fees specified in the Order Form
Customers shall pay the Project Fees to Branch within thirty (30) days of the invoice date. Customer is responsible for the integration and launch of the Services. Customer must pay the Project Fees regardless if the actual implementation is completed. If Customer disputes any portion of the invoiced fees, then Customer must adhere to the following dispute resolution process: (i) all undisputed amounts will be paid in accordance with the terms in this Order Form, and (ii) all billing disputes must be submitted in writing to billing@branch.io within ninety (90) days of the invoice date. If payment by Customer for any invoiced amount is not received by Branch by the due date set forth in the applicable invoice, then without limiting Branch's rights or remedies, those charges may accrue late interest at the rate of 2.5% (or the maximum rate permitted by law) of the outstanding balance per month.
If Customer utilizes all of its Professional Services Hours and desires additional Professional Services, then Customer may request the reservation of additional hours of Professional Service resources from Branch at a rate specified in the Change Order.
Effective August 29th 2024
to
September 23rd 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Professional Services Statement of Work
Advisory Hours
This Advisory Hours Statement of Work (“SOW”) describes the certain services (“Professional Services”) to be performed by Branch Metrics, Inc. (“Branch”) for Customer (each a “Party”, collectively the “Parties”) and is effective as of the date of Customer's Order Form (the “Effective Date”). By executing this SOW, Customer agrees to the terms of this SOW and the Professional Services Terms & Conditions available at
https://legal.branch.io/#professional-services
(the “PS Terms”). Any capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein shall have the meaning set forth in the PS Terms. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency between this SOW and any Order Form referencing this SOW, the SOW shall control.
SCOPE OF PROFESSIONAL SERVICES
Branch provides Professional Services in the form of Customer advisory hours and services to Customer within the scope of work set forth below (the “Project”). Subject to the terms and conditions of this SOW, the PS Terms, the executed order form between the parties (“the Order Form”), and the applicable Terms and Conditions or Master Services Agreement, Customer shall be entitled to the number of advisory hours specified in the Order Form. Branch’s provision of Professional Services is contingent on Customer’s payment of all applicable fees under the Order Form and adherence to the aforementioned contracts.   Branch and Customer (collectively, the “Project Team”) will each commit reasonable resources as needed to support the execution and completion of the Project in accordance with this SOW.
SCOPE OF WORK
Branch reserves the right to define and adjust the Professional Services provided within the Advisory Hours, aiming to facilitate the Customer’s enablement of and onboarding to Branch's platform during the term specified in the Order Form (the “Term”). The following services may be offered by Branch but will vary depending upon the actual scope of work as determined by the parties during the initial consultation:
Engagement Initiation & Planning
Branch's Role:
Supporting project management tasks, as deemed necessary, to ensure the successful completion of the Project.
Provide the following resources to assist the Customer during the engagement: Project Guides, Project Tracker, Quality Assurance (QA) Plan, Question & Answer Tracker, Project Summary/Go-Forward Guide, links to Branch University, and a Training Guide.
Customer Requirements:
The Customer must assign a single Project Owner before the project kickoff to coordinate customer-side tasks for all Branch products.
The Customer is required to allocate adequate resources and time to ensure successful integration with Branch and effective enablement of Branch's products.
Engagement Execution & Delivery
Branch's Role:
Provide and facilitate 45 to 60-minute one-time sessions with Customer Stakeholders, including kickoffs, introductions, discovery, overviews, and training workshops, as determined by Branch.
Technical workshops will be conducted as per Branch's discretion, covering various aspects relevant to the project.
Recurring sessions may be scheduled by Branch, with the frequency and content of these sessions subject to Branch's assessment.
Branch may support implementation, audit, or expansion tasks as they relate to the Branch platform or products.
Advising on ad-hoc requests for support related to new use case implementation advisory, consultation to optimize existing implementation with best practices, or implementation validation.
Customer Participation:
The Project Owner must actively participate in scheduled meetings and assist in keeping internal Customer resources focused and responsive to Branch's requests.
The Customer shall collaborate with Branch in identifying and ensuring the availability of internal stakeholders necessary for the project’s success.
Engagement Testing & Quality Assurance
Branch's Role:
Provide guidance as it deems necessary for testing the integration and ensuring the products function as intended.
Customer Participation:
The Project Owner must actively participate in prioritizing testing & quality assurance with internal Customer resources focused and responsive to Branch's guidance.
The Customer shall collaborate with Branch in identifying and ensuring the availability of internal stakeholders necessary for testing and quality assurance.
Engagement Project Close
At the end of the Term, Branch may deliver a summary of the Project, including any outstanding work, to the Customer.
The Project Team will coordinate in good-faith to allocate the Advisory Hours with Professional Services, of the nature and scope specified below, to facilitate Customer’s enablement of and onboarding to Branch’s platform during the Term (the “Scope of Work”).
CUSTOMER PROJECT ROLES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
The following table sets forth standard Customer roles (not individuals) and expectations. Customer acknowledges its participation in the Project, including the assignment and fulfillment of these roles, is essential to the Project’s timely completion and success. The chart below is Branch’s estimate of frequency and hours expected for successful engagement. These estimates may vary depending upon the scope of a given project and must be confirmed in writing if deviating from these expectations.
Role
Responsibility
Frequency
Estimated Hours
Sponsor
Responsible for providing Customer resources needed for successful Project Completion, and promote process change where necessary
Once
4 Hours
Project Manager
Responsible for the oversight of Customer resources, schedules and responsibilities including:
Attending all key Project meetings
Being a point of contact for day-to-day operations
Securing participation (as required) of key business process owners
Participating in Project meetings
Weekly
5-7 Hours Per Week
Administrator
Responsible for ongoing administration of Branch’s Services, once Professional Services are delivered
Manages user acceptance tasks, including QA testing, training and adoption
Manages the organization’s ongoing use of Branch’s Services
Weekly
2 Hours Per Week
Functional Consultant(s) / Business Process Owner(s)
Responsible for review and acceptance of Branch integration and identification of exceptions/risks
Attends Project meetings related to area of ownership
Assists in the definition of unique processes outside of standard Branch practices
Participates in user acceptance testing activities
Weekly
5-7 Hours Per Week
Extended Team
Additional Customer resources as needed to support the scope of the Project
Weekly
2-3 Hours Per Week
IV.
GENERAL TERMS
The Parties acknowledge and agree on the following:
Professional Services.
The Professional Services will be rendered only for the Branch App ID(s) specified in the Order Form. Upon the Effective Date, Customer will: (i) allocate appropriate resources necessary to support the completion of the Project, (ii) delegate a single Project Owner prior to commencement of the Project; (iii) test Branch integration and products for quality assurance purposes to ensure that the Branch integration and products are working as intended; and (iv) grant all necessary access rights and permissions to Branch’s Project team members to enable them to perform integration development and testing.
Advisory Hours.
For services rendered, Branch shall account for time expended in hourly increments by deducting from the pre-purchased pool of Advisory Hours. Records of service hours and remaining Advisory Hours will be maintained and provided to the Customer on a periodic basis. Once the Advisory Hours are fully consumed, Branch will notify the Customer. The Customer may opt to purchase additional hours per the terms and conditions in this SOW.
These pre-purchased Advisory Hours will expire upon the conclusion of the Term. Customer will not be entitled to any refund or service credit for expired or unused Advisory Hours. Customer may purchase additional Professional Service hours (“Additional Hours”) by following the Change Order Process. Advisory Hours may only be utilized as specified in the delineated categories under Section II, Scope of Work.
Requesting Hours.
Customer may utilize the Advisory Hours during the Term of this SOW by requesting usage of the hours 30 days prior to the intended use date, unless otherwise mutually agreed to in writing by the parties. A customer may request a maximum of 50 of its Advisory Hours to be used in a given calendar month, unless otherwise agreed to by the parties in writing.
Change Order Process.
A Customer may request to purchase Additional Hours or request modification to this SOW by submitting a written request via email to its respective point of contact. Upon receipt, Branch will prepare an updated quote for review, which may include modification or clarification on the scope of work requested. Branch reserves the right to offer Additional Hours at a different pricing structure than the Advisory Hours. Acceptance of this offer will only occur after Customer affirmatively responds to the updated quote with explicit authorization to proceed with the Change Order at the price quoted by Branch.
V.
OUT OF SCOPE
Customer acknowledges and agrees that:
Advisory Hours Limitation:
Any work exceeding the Advisory Hours as stipulated in Section I of this SOW will not be undertaken by the Vendor unless explicitly agreed upon in a separate written agreement or through a duly executed Change Order.
Scope of Work Boundary:
Work that falls outside the defined Scope of Work in Section II is deemed out-of-scope and will not be performed under the terms of this SOW. Should the Customer require any additional work that is not encompassed within the current Scope of Work, such work may only be incorporated into this Statement of Work through a mutually agreed upon separate written addendum or an approved Change Order as outlined in Section IV.
Out-of-Scope Work Includes, But Is Not Limited To:
Code Creation:
Any development or scripting not explicitly outlined in the Scope of Work.
Unlisted Applications:
Services or time devoted to applications not specifically enumerated in this SOW.
Testing and QA:
Comprehensive testing and quality assurance of Branch App ID(s) or other components not detailed in this SOW.
Additional Collaborative Efforts:
Workshops, meetings, or any form of collaborative engagement beyond those listed in this SOW.
Link Template Management:
Ongoing management or modifications of link templates post-implementation.
Post-Completion Support:
Resolution of issues, break fixes, or any support services after the project reaches its completion stage as defined in this SOW.
By executing this SOW, the Customer expressly consents to these limitations and acknowledges that any request for out-of-scope work will require additional negotiation and formal documentation through a Change Order or separate agreement.
VI.
PROJECT FEES & BILLING.
As consideration for the Advisory Hours and provision of the Professional Services, Customer will pay Branch the fees specified in the Order Form.
Customers shall pay the Project Fees to Branch within thirty (30) days of the invoice date. Customer is responsible for the integration and launch of the Services. Customer must pay the Project Fees regardless if the actual implementation is completed. If Customer disputes any portion of the invoiced fees, then Customer must adhere to the following dispute resolution process: (i) all undisputed amounts will be paid in accordance with the terms in this Order Form, and (ii) all billing disputes must be submitted in writing to billing@branch.io within ninety (90) days of the invoice date. If payment by Customer for any invoiced amount is not received by Branch by the due date set forth in the applicable invoice, then without limiting Branch's rights or remedies, those charges may accrue late interest at the rate of 2.5% (or the maximum rate permitted by law) of the outstanding balance per month.
If Customer utilizes all of its Advisory Hours and desires additional Professional Services, then Customer may request the reservation of additional hours of Professional Service resources from Branch at a rate specified in the Change Order.
Effective September 23rd 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Professional Services Terms & Conditions
These Professional Services Terms & Conditions (“
PS Terms
") are entered into by and between of Branch Metrics, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("
Branch
," "
Branch Metrics
," "
we
," or "
us
") and the entity or person purchasing certain Professional Services made available by Branch (“
Customer
” or “
you
” or “
your
”). By entering into a statement of work for Professional Services (“
SOW
”) you agree to be legally bound by and warrant that you are authorized to agree to these PS Terms on behalf of you and/or your company. Branch may update these PS Terms from time to time. The updated version of these Term will be available at
https://legal.branch.io/#professional-services
(or its successor URL) and effective and binding as of the date indicated at the top of these PS Terms. All other relevant terms are set forth in the Agreement. In the event there is a conflict omission, or inconsistency between the terms of the Professional Service Advisory Hours SOW or any other SOW and these PS Terms as it relates to Professional Services, then these PS Terms shall control. In the event of a conflict, inconsistency,  or omission between these PS Terms and Branch’s Terms and Conditions, or other mutually agreed upon terms of service or  Master Service Agreement between the parties, collectively defined as the “
MSA
”,  the MSA shall control.
I. DEFINITIONS.
“
Branch Materials
” means any documentation, technical configuration, workflow templates, starter code, software components, content, materials, methodologies, or other intellectual property that is developed, conceived, or acquired by Branch or its Affiliates (a) prior to the SOW Effective Date or (b) outside of the scope of the Agreement.
“
Branch PS
” means Branch’s professional services organization including Branch’s and its Affiliates’ employees and subcontractors that assist in providing the Professional Services.
“
Change Order
” means any mutually signed written agreement to change the terms of an SOW. Change Orders will be deemed incorporated by reference in the applicable SOW, or Order Form in the absence of an SOW. To be valid, the Change Order must follow the Change Order Process as set forth in the SOW.
“
Customer Materials
” means Customer-owned or licensed materials, including but not limited to content libraries, logos, trademarks, information, facilities, software, hosted platforms, APIs, personnel, systems, and infrastructure, that are provided to Branch in connection with the Professional Services.
“
Effective Date
” means the date set forth in the SOW on which the SOW takes effect.
“
SOW
” means the statement of work agreed upon by Branch and Customer which outlines the scope of Professional Services being provided to Customer by Branch.
“
Professional Services
” means the limited consulting, onboarding, or other professional services described in an SOW, in accordance with Professional Services expressly excludes Branch’s other Services.
“
Services Agreement
” means the order form or other ordering documentation governing Customer’s use of Services.
“
Services
” means both Professional Services and SaaS Services.
“
SaaS Services
” means software-as-a-service products offered by Branch to Customer.
II. SCOPE OF SERVICES.
The SOW sets forth the Professional Services to be provided by Branch to Customer. Any item or activity not expressly included within the scope of a SOW is deemed outside the scope and may require a Change Order or separate SOW, which may be subject to additional fees. Professional Services referenced in a SOW are in support of Branch’s Services, as defined in the Services Agreement. For the avoidance of doubt, Branch’s provision of the SaaS Services is governed by the applicable SaaS terms and conditions or master service agreement as identified in the Services Agreement.
III. TERM AND TERMINATION.
The term and any applicable timelines for the delivery of Professional Services shall be set forth in the SOW. In the event either Party desires to extend or revise the delivery obligations, the Parties shall enter a mutually agreeable Change Order that outlines all such changes and any additional fees or credits, as applicable.
Either Party may terminate this SOW if the other Party is in material breach of an SOW or the Services Agreement and fails to cure that breach within thirty (30) days after receipt of written notice. Any termination of the applicable Services Agreement will also terminate this SOW.
IV. RESTRICTIONS ON USE.
Except as expressly permitted under these PS Terms, Customer will not, and will not permit anyone else to: (a) film or record Branch’s delivery of Professional Services or Branch Materials, (b) use the Professional Services for the purposes of evaluating or monitoring their quality or performance, or for any other benchmarking or competitive purposes; (c) remove or alter proprietary notices from the Professional Services or Branch Materials; or (d) use, sell, copy, modify, create derivative works based on, publicly perform, publicly display, or distribute the Professional Services or Branch Materials except as necessary to facilitate Customer’s use of Branch’s Professional Services and/or the Services.
V. INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY.
Customer Materials.
Customer retains all right, title, and interest in and to all confidential information as the parties define such term in the MSA, and if undefined as commonly understood by industry standards (“Confidential Information”) of Customer and Customer Materials. Customer grants Branch a worldwide, non-exclusive right to use, copy, distribute, create derivative works based on, display, and modify Customer Materials as is reasonably necessary for Branch to provide the Professional Services to Customer under an SOW. Customer represents and warrants that it has all rights and consents necessary to provide the foregoing license to Branch and that it will use best efforts to timely provide Customer Materials upon Branch’s reasonable request in relation to an SOW.
Deliverables and Branch Materials.
Branch owns and reserves all right, title, and interest in and to all of its Confidential Information, Branch Materials, deliverables, and all intellectual property created or used by, or on behalf of, Branch in providing the Professional Services, including without limitation, all processes, know-how, code, data, reports and related materials (and modifications or derivatives thereof). Subject to Customer’s timely payment of all undisputed fees for the Professional Services, Branch grants Customer a limited, non-exclusive, non-transferable, non-sublicensable, right and license to use (i) the Branch Materials solely as necessary in for Customer’s internal business purposes to use the Services purchased under the Services Agreement. Nothing contained in these PS Terms limits Branch’s right to develop, use, market, or sell services or products that are similar to the Professional Services provided to Customer pursuant to a SOW, or to use such Professional Services (excluding Customer Materials and Confidential Information of Customer) to perform similar services for any other purposes, including without limitation in connection with other projects and customers.
VI. COMPLETION.
Unless otherwise expressly stated in the applicable SOW, all Professional Services will be deemed completed after Branch fulfills its obligations under the applicable SOW
VII. FEES
Fees
. Customer will pay Branch fees for the Professional Services at the rates specified in the applicable SOW within  forty-five (45) days of receipt of invoice or as otherwise agreed to by the parties in the Services Agreement.
VIII. PERFORMANCE & RESPONSIBILITIES.
Branch Performance.
The Branch PS team that will perform the Professional Services as set forth in the SOW. Branch retains the exclusive right to select the Branch personnel that will provide the Professional Services and to make changes to such personnel in Branch’s discretion. As between Customer and Branch, Branch is responsible for (i) the performance of the Professional Services by its personnel in accordance with these PS Terms and (ii) all matters related to the employment of Branch’s personnel, including, without limitation, compensation, benefits, and any statutory obligations. Branch reserves the right to reject any request for work outside the scope of the SOW. Branch and Customer will use commercially reasonable efforts to attend all scheduled meetings and meet all agreed-to deadlines. The timeliness of communications and other activities by Customer will directly affect Branch’s ability to meet agreed-to delivery dates or other schedule deadlines. Delays resulting from Customer-owned (or licensed) software or hardware issues may reasonably require the Parties to contemplate additional fees or delivery extensions in a Change Order. Professional Services will be performed during Branch’s normal business hours (9 AM to 6 PM local time, Monday – Friday, excluding nationally recognized holidays). Issues raised outside of normal business hours must be sent to
support@branch.io
.
Customer Responsibilities.
Customer is responsible for 1) all timely implementation of Branch’s Service, including any technical SDK implementation, and 2) any engagement and management of third-party vendors that Customer uses in conjunction with Branch, including any applications and/or services with which Branch’s Services may be connected through integrations. Customer acknowledges that use of third-party technology and/or services not already licensed or purchased by Customer may require additional licenses and fee(s) that must be obtained separately by the Customer from the specific third-party provider of such applications and/or services. Customer will cooperate reasonably and in good faith with Branch in its provision of the Professional Services including, without limitation: (a) providing Branch with sufficient resources and knowledgeable employees or staff of Customer; (b) timely access to accurate and complete Customer Materials; (c) timely, accurate, and complete responses to inquiries or requests for feedback or information from Branch; (d) appointing a Customer representative for each Professional Services project to serve as a primary point of contact for Branch and to make authorized decisions on behalf of Customer; (e) actively participating in scheduled project meetings with Branch, and (f) abiding by Customer obligations specified in the applicable SOW. If Customer’s failure to comply with this Section VII(b) prevents or unreasonably delays Branch from performing the Professional Services, then, at Branch’s reasonable discretion, Branch may terminate its obligation to continue performing the affected portion of the Professional Services, or the SOW where Branch’s ability to continue performing a majority of the remaining Professional Services is prevented or unreasonably delayed, and Branch will not be responsible for any delays or liabilities resulting therefrom.
Effective March 22nd 2023
to
September 23rd 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Professional Services Terms & Conditions
Last Updated:
March 22, 2023
These Professional Services Terms & Conditions (“PS Terms") are entered into by and between of Branch Metrics, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Branch," "Branch Metrics," "we," or "us") and the entity or person purchasing certain Professional Services made available by Branch (“Customer” or “you” or “your”). By entering into a statement of work for Professional Services (“SOW”) with Branch referencing these PS Terms and/or an Order Form referencing an SOW that incorporates these PS Terms (the “Agreement”), you agree to be legally bound by and warrant that you are authorized to agree to these PS Terms on behalf of you and/or your company. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO THESE PS TERMS, DO NOT USE BRANCH’S PROFESSIONAL SERVICES. Branch may update these PS Terms from time to time. The updated version of these Term will be available at
https://legal.branch.io/#professional-services
(or its successor URL) and effective and binding as of the date indicated at the top of these PS Terms.
I. DEFINITIONS.
“Affiliate”
means any entity which directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the subject entity. “Control,” for purposes of this definition, means direct or indirect ownership or control of more than 50% of the voting interests of the subject entity.
“Branch Materials”
means any documentation, technical configuration, workflow templates, starter code, software components, content, materials, methodologies, or other intellectual property that is developed, conceived, or acquired by Branch or its Affiliates (a) prior to the Effective Date or (b) outside of the scope of the Agreement.
“Branch PS”
means Branch’s Professional Services organization including Branch’s and its Affiliates’ employees and subcontractors, and employees of subcontractors that assist in providing the Professional Services.
“Change Order”
means any change to an SOW or Order Form, as applicable. Change Orders will be deemed incorporated by reference in the applicable SOW or Order Form, as applicable in the absence of an SOW.
“Customer Materials”
means Customer-owned or licensed materials, including but not limited to content libraries, logos, trademarks, information, facilities, software, hosted platforms, APIs, personnel, systems and infrastructure, that are provided to Branch in connection with the Professional Services.
“Deliverables”
means all works of authorship, inventions, know-how, ideas, materials, information, designs, and files made or conceived or reduced to practice, in whole or in part by Branch or on Branch’s behalf in connection with the Professional Services, and all intellectual property rights relating thereto.
“Effective Date”
means the date set forth in the SOW on which the SOW takes effect.
“Order Form”
means an ordering document that is entered into between Customer and Branch, including any addenda and supplements thereto that identifies the applicable Professional Services being purchased, the mutually agreed upon rate(s) for such Professional Services and any other applicable terms related to the Professional Services.
“Professional Services”
means the professional services provided to Customer, as described in the applicable SOW, including, without limitation, the development and delivery of any Deliverables related thereto, in accordance with the applicable Professional Services (as set forth in the applicable SOW). Professional Services excludes Services (as defined below).
“Services”
means Branch’s software-as-a-service offerings.
“Services Agreement”
means the separate agreement governing Customer’s use of Branch’s software-as-a-service offerings.
II. SCOPE OF SERVICES.
The SOW sets forth the Professional Services to be provided by Branch to Customer. Any item or activity not expressly included within the scope of a SOW is deemed outside the scope and may require a Change Order or separate SOW, which may be subject to additional fees. Professional Services referenced in a SOW are in support of Branch’s Services, as defined by the applicable Order Form and/or Services Agreement between Branch and Customer, except as may otherwise be specified in the SOW. Branch’s provision of, or any changes to, Branch’s Services are outside the scope of the SOW.
III. TERM AND TERMINATION.
The term and any applicable timelines for the delivery of Professional Services is set forth in the SOW or Order Form, as applicable. In the event the timeline needs to be extended, the Parties shall enter into a mutually agreeable Change Order that outlines extended term and any additional fees, as applicable.
Either party may terminate this SOW if the other party is in material breach of Agreement and fails to cure that breach within thirty (30) days after receipt of written notice.  Any termination of the applicable Services Agreement will also terminate this SOW.
IV. RESTRICTIONS ON USE.
Customer must comply with all applicable laws when using the Professional Services. Except as expressly permitted under these PS Terms, Customer will not, and will not permit anyone else to: (a) film or record Branch’s delivery of Professional Services or Branch Materials, (b) use the Professional Services for the purposes of evaluating or monitoring their quality or performance, or for any other benchmarking or competitive purposes; (c) remove or alter proprietary notices from the Professional Services or Branch Materials; or (d) use, sell, copy, modify, create derivative works based on, publicly perform, publicly display, or distribute the Professional Services or Branch Materials except as necessary to facilitate Customer’s use of Branch’s Professional Services and/or the Services.
V. INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY.
Customer Materials
. Customer retains all right, title, and interest in and to all Confidential Information of Customer and Customer Materials. In its performance of Professional Services, Branch may require access to certain Customer Materials. Customer grants Branch a worldwide, non-exclusive right to use, copy, distribute, create derivative works based on, display, and modify Customer Materials as reasonably necessary for Branch PS to provide Professional Services to Customer. Customer represents and warrants that it has all rights and consents necessary to provide the foregoing license to Branch and that it will use best efforts to timely provide Customer Materials to Branch upon Branch’s request.
Deliverables and Branch Materials
. Branch owns and reserves all right, title, and interest in and to all Confidential Information of Branch, the Professional Services, Branch Materials, and Deliverables, and all intellectual property used by or on behalf of Branch in providing the Professional Services, including without limitation, all processes, know-how, code, data, reports and related materials (and modifications or derivatives thereof).  If Branch uses the Deliverables for any purpose outside of the scope of the Agreement, such Deliverables will not contain any Confidential Information of Customer or Customer Materials. Subject to Customer’s payment of fees for the Professional Services pursuant to the terms of the applicable SOW and / or Order Form, Branch grants Customer a limited, non-exclusive, non-transferable, non-sublicensable, right and license to use (i) the Branch Materials solely as necessary to use the Deliverables, and (ii) the Deliverables solely as necessary for Customer’s internal business purposes to use the Services during the term of the applicable Services Agreement. Nothing contained in these PS Terms limits Branch’s right to develop, use, market, or sell services or products that are similar to the Deliverables and/or Professional Services provided to Customer pursuant to a SOW, or to use such Deliverables and/or Professional Services (excluding Customer Materials and Confidential Information of Customer) to perform similar services for any other purposes, including without limitation in connection with other projects and customers.
VI. COMPLETION.
Unless otherwise expressly stated in the applicable SOW, all Professional Services will be deemed completed upon delivery of all of the Deliverables set forth in an applicable SOW (“Notice of Completion”). Unless otherwise expressly stated in the applicable SOW, if, in your reasonable discretion, the Deliverables fail to materially conform to the agreed upon specifications set forth in the SOW, you must inform Branch of such non-conformance in writing within five (5) business days of the Notice of Completion and Branch will make reasonable efforts to correct and redeliver the Deliverables promptly, at which point the Professional Services will be deemed completed.
VII. FEES & TAXES.
Fees
. Customer will pay Branch fees for the Professional Services at the rates specified in the applicable SOW or Order Form within thirty (30) days of receipt of invoice or as otherwise agreed to by the parties in the applicable SOW or Order Form. Customer is responsible for all undisputed fees, even if such fees are due and payable after termination of the Professional Services, or any portion thereof. Fees are non-cancellable and failure to use the Professional Services does not constitute a basis for refusing to pay any fees. Except as expressly provided in an applicable SOW or Order Form, you will not receive any refund or prorated refund for amounts previously paid or amounts owed for the term of the SOW or Order Form.
Overdue Charges
. If any invoiced amount is not received by Branch by the due date set forth in the applicable invoice, then without limiting Branch’s rights or remedies, those charges may accrue late interest at the rate of 2.5% of the outstanding balance per month.
Suspension or Cancellation of Service; Payment Acceleration
. Without derogating from any other remedies available to Branch under these PS Terms or by applicable law, if you owe any undisputed fees thirty (30) days or more past due in connection with any Services provided by Branch under any applicable Order Form, then, without affecting any of your payment obligations under the applicable Order Form, SOW, and/or Services Agreement, Branch is entitled to take further action including but not limited to accelerating your unpaid fee obligations under such agreement so that all such obligations become immediately due and payable, and suspending and/or canceling your access to the Professional Services and Services until such amounts are paid in full. Branch reserves the right to send your account to a collections agency for nonpayment (which may, in turn, report the uncollected debt to credit bureaus) and to use your contact information for debt collection purposes if the applicable agreement is terminated for non-payment as set forth herein following a 10-day cure period.
Taxes
. Branch’s fees do not include any local, state, or federal sales, use, excise, personal property, VAT, or other similar taxes, duties, levies, tariffs, and other governmental charges (including, without limitation, any withholding tax, and any such taxes, to the extent legally applicable, which shall be borne and paid by Customer) (collectively, "Taxes"). If Branch has the legal obligation to pay or collect Taxes for which Customer is responsible under this section, Branch will invoice Customer and Customer will pay that amount unless you provide Branch with a valid tax exemption certificate authorized by the appropriate taxing authority. For clarity, Customer is responsible for payment of all Taxes resulting from any fees payable hereunder, other than any taxes based on Branch’s net income, property, and employees.
VIII. CONFIDENTIALITY
Definition
. Each party to these PS Terms (a “Receiving Party”) may have access to, or become acquainted with, certain non-public confidential information of the other party (a “Disclosing Party”) including without limitation all information clearly identified as confidential at the time of disclosure (“Confidential Information”). Customer and Branch further agree that, subject to the rights and licenses granted herein, each party's Confidential Information shall include, without limitation, all non-public information regarding the Disclosing party, including without limitation any customer, customer prospect, the terms of the Agreement, conditions and pricing, marketing, technical, business and/or strategic plans or information provided by the Disclosing Party to the Receiving party in the performance of the Services under the Agreement.
Use and Disclosure
. Each party agrees as follows: (a) to use the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party only for the purposes permitted by these PS Terms and the SOW (the "Purpose"); (b) to take all reasonable steps to ensure that the Disclosing Party’s Confidential Information is not disclosed or distributed by the Receiving Party’s employees or agents to another party in violation of the Agreement, but in no event will the Receiving party use less effort to protect the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party than it uses to protect its own Confidential Information of like importance; (c) to restrict access to the Confidential Information disclosed by the Disclosing Party to such of the Receiving Party’s employees, agents and third parties, if any, who have a legitimate need to have access for the Purpose and who have agreed in writing or are otherwise bound to treat such information in accordance with the Agreement; and (d) to return or destroy all Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party’s written request, after termination of the Agreement.
Exclusions
. The Receiving Party will not be obligated under this confidentiality section with respect to information that: (a) is or has become readily publicly available through no act or omission of the Receiving Party or its employees or agents; (b) is received from a third party lawfully in possession of such information and the Receiving Party has no knowledge of any disclosure restrictions on such third party to disclose such information; (c) is disclosed to a third party by the Disclosing Party without restriction on disclosure; (d) was rightfully in the possession of the Receiving Party without restriction prior to its disclosure by the Disclosing Party; or (e) was independently developed by employees or consultants of the Receiving Party without reliance on, or reference to, such Confidential Information.
Permitted Disclosures
. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Confidential Information may be disclosed as required by any court or governmental agency, provided that before disclosing such information the Receiving Party must provide the Disclosing Party with sufficient advance notice of the court or agency’s request for the information to enable the Receiving Party to exercise any rights it may have to challenge or limit the court or agency’s authority to receive such Confidential Information, to the extent permitted by applicable law.
IX. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY.
INDIRECT DAMAGES DISCLAIMER
. NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE FOR ANY INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, PUNITIVE, CONSEQUENTIAL, OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO, DAMAGES FOR LOSS OF PROFITS, LOSS OF REVENUE, GOODWILL, USE, DATA THAT IS INCOMPLETE, MISSING, OR INCORRECT, OR OTHER INTANGIBLE LOSSES (EVEN IF THAT PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES), RESULTING FROM THIS AGREEMENT.
DIRECT LIABILITY
. UNDER NO CIRCUMSTANCES WILL THE TOTAL LIABILITY OF A PARTY RESULTING FROM THIS AGREEMENT(INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO WARRANTY CLAIMS), REGARDLESS OF THE FORUM AND REGARDLESS OF WHETHER ANY ACTION OR CLAIM IS BASED IN CONTRACT, WARRANTY, NEGLIGENCE, STRICT LIABILITY, OR OTHER TORT, BREACH OF ANY STATUTORY DUTY, OR OTHERWISE, EXCEED THE AMOUNTS PAID OR PAYABLE BY CUSTOMER OR ITS AFFILIATES UNDER THE APPLICABLE ORDER FORM OR SOW FOR THE PROFESSIONAL SERVICES OUT OF WHICH THE LIABILITY AROSE.
X. WARRANTY & DISCLAIMER.
Branch warrants that it will provide the Professional Services in a professional and workmanlike manner. Customer’s sole and exclusive remedy for Branch’s breach of this Section X will be the re-performance of the non-conforming portions of the Professional Services, in accordance with Section IX above. If Branch is unable to re-perform, Customer will be entitled to recover the fees paid to Branch attributable to the non-conforming portions of the Professional Services. EXCEPT AS SET FORTH HEREIN, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW, THE PROFESSIONAL SERVICES AND DELIVERABLES ARE PROVIDED “AS-IS" AND BRANCH DISCLAIMS ALL OTHER WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, WHETHER EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, STATORY OR OTHERWISE REGARDING THE PROFESSIONAL SERVICES AND DELIVERABLES, AND CUSTOMER RELIES ON THE PROFESSIONAL SERVICES AND DELIVERABLES AT ITS OWN RISK.
XI. NON-SOLICITATION.
During the term of the applicable SOW or Order Form and for a period of one (1) year thereafter, Customer shall not interfere with Branch’s relationship with, or endeavor to entice away from Branch, any person who, on the date of the termination of or expiration of the Agreement, was an employee of Branch.
XII. PERFORMANCE & RESPONSIBILITIES.
Branch Performance.
The Branch PS team that will perform the Professional Services as set forth in the SOW or Order Form. Branch retains the exclusive right to select the Branch PS personnel that will provide the Professional Services and to make changes as required in Branch’s discretion. As between Customer and Branch, Branch is responsible for (i) the performance of the Professional Services by Branch PS personnel under in accordance with the Agreement and (ii) all matters related to Branch PS’s employment, including, without limitation, compensation, benefits, and any statutory obligations. Branch reserves the right to reject any request for work outside the scope of the SOW. Branch PS and Customer will use commercially reasonable efforts to attend all scheduled meetings and meet all agreed-to deadlines. The timeliness of communications and other activities by Customer will directly affect Branch’s ability to meet agreed-to schedule deadlines. Additionally, delays resulting from Customer-owned (or licensed) software or hardware issues may result in additional fees. Professional Services will be performed during Branch’s normal business hours (9 AM to 6 PM local time, Monday – Friday, excluding nationally recognized holidays). Issues raised outside of normal business hours may be sent to
support@branch.io
.
Customer Responsibilities.
Customer is responsible for any engagement and management of third-party vendors that Customer uses in conjunction with Branch, including any applications and/or services with which Branch’s Services may be connected through integrations. Customer acknowledges that use of third-party technology and/or services not already licensed or purchased by Customer may require additional licenses and fee(s) that must be obtained separately by the Customer from the specific third-party provider of such applications and/or services. Customer will cooperate reasonably and in good faith with Branch PS in their provision of the Professional Services including, without limitation: (a) providing Branch PS sufficient resources, knowledgeable employees or staff of Customer; (b) timely access to accurate and complete Customer Materials; (c) timely, accurate, and complete responses to inquiries or requests for feedback or information from Branch PS; (d) appointing a Customer representative for each Professional Services project to serve as a primary point of contact for Branch PS and to make authorized decisions on behalf of Customer; (e) actively participating in scheduled project meetings with Branch PS, and (f) abiding by Customer obligations specified in the applicable SOW. If Customer’s failure to comply with this Section XII(b) prevents Branch from providing the Professional Services by the end of the term of the SOW, as determined by Branch in its sole discretion, Branch’s obligation to provide the Professional Services will be excused, Branch will not be responsible for any delays resulting therefrom, and the SOW and all Professional Services provided thereunder, shall terminate unless the Parties mutually agree in writing to extend the term of the SOW by way of a Change Order. If any delay in the provision of Professional Services is caused by Customer and results in additional fees, Customer will pay such additional fees.
XIII. MISCELLANEOUS
Governing Law & Venue
. The Agreement and all matters arising out of or relating to the Agreement shall be governed by and construed under the laws of the State of California, without regard to its conflict of law provisions. The parties expressly disclaim and exclude the application of the United Nations Convention on Contracts for the International Sale of Goods. Any legal action or proceeding arising out of or relating to the Agreement shall be brought exclusively in the state or federal courts located in the Northern District of California.
Assignment
. The Agreement is not assignable, transferable or sublicensable by either party, except with other party’s prior written consent (not to be unreasonably withheld or delayed), unless a party is assigning this Agreement to (a) a successor to all or part of its assets or business or (b) an Affiliate. Any attempted assignment or transfer by either party in violation of this Section XIII(b) will be void. Subject to the foregoing, this Agreement will be binding on the parties and their respective successors and permitted assigns.
Relationship between the Parties
. The parties are independent contractors. No agency, partnership, joint venture, fiduciary or employment relationship is created as a result of the Agreement, and Customer does not have any authority of any kind to bind Branch in any respect whatsoever.
Notices
. Except as otherwise specified in the SOW, all notices of termination (“Legal Notices”) will be provided via email and will be effective upon receipt by e-mail as set forth below. If to Branch, all Legal Notices shall be provided to
legal@branch.io
. Billing-related notices to Customer will be provided via email and addressed to the relevant billing contact designated by Customer on the applicable Order Form. All Legal Notices and other notices to Customer will be provided via email and addressed to the relevant Services account administrator designated by Customer.
Effective June 22nd 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Reseller Terms & Conditions
SERVICES AGREEMENT APPLICABLE TO
CUSTOMERS OF BRANCH RESELLERS
1. Introduction
1.1
You (“
Customer
” or “
you
” or “
your
” or related terms) are acquiring a subscription to the Services (as defined below) operated by Branch Metrics, Inc., a Delaware corporation d/b/a Branch, ("
Branch
," "
Branch Metrics
," "
we
," or "
us
" or related terms)  from an unrelated third party authorized to sell such services (“
Reseller
”) under a separate agreement with Branch (“
Reseller Agreement
”). In addition to any terms and conditions related to your use of the Services pursuant to any agreement by and between you and the Reseller, these Terms & Conditions ("
Terms
") contain the terms and conditions that govern your access to and use of the Services. Branch is an express beneficiary of this Agreement (as defined below), and in acquiring a subscription to the Services, you expressly acknowledge and agree that Branch shall have the right to enforce this Agreement against you and that this Agreement constitutes the entire agreement and supersedes any and all prior agreements between you and Branch with regard to your subscription to the Services or your access to or use thereof under this Agreement and your agreement between you and the Reseller.
1.2
By accepting this Agreement, either by accessing or using the Services, or authorizing or permitting any Agent or End User of your Digital Properties (as defined below) to access or use the Services, you agree to be legally bound by, and use Branch’s Services in compliance with, all terms, conditions, and notices in this Agreement as of the date of such access or use of the Services. If you are entering into this Agreement on behalf of a company, organization or another legal entity (an “
Entity
”), you are agreeing to this Agreement for that Entity and representing to Branch that you have the authority to bind such Entity and its Affiliates (as defined below) to this Agreement, in which case the terms “Customer,” “you,” or “your” herein refers to such Entity and its Affiliates. If you do not have such authority, or if you do not agree with this Agreement, you must not use or authorize any use of the Services. Customer and Branch shall each be referred to as a “
Party
” and collectively referred to as the “
Parties
” for purposes of this Agreement. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO THESE TERMS & CONDITIONS, DO NOT USE ANY SERVICES.
2. Definitions
"
Affiliate
" means any entity that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the subject entity. “Control,” for purposes of this definition, means direct or indirect ownership or control of more than 50% of the voting interests of the subject entity.
"
Agreement
" means these Terms together with any applicable Order Forms, and any exhibits, appendices, schedules, or attachments identified or referenced in these Terms, and any amendments mutually agreed to by the Parties (all of which are incorporated herein by reference).
"
Beta Services
" means Branch’s services or functionality that are not generally available to customers and that may be made available to you to try at your option which are designated as beta, pilot, limited release, developer preview, non-production, evaluation, or other services or functionality with a similar description.
“
Collection Technologies
” means any tags, SDKs, APIs, JavaScript, pixels, attribution or redirect links, cookies or other technology used or made available by Branch to Customer to support the provision of the Services by Branch, including any updates thereto.
“
Digital Properties
” means your mobile applications, websites and program code created by or for you that use the Services or for use by you with the Services.
"
Documentation
" means the applicable Service’s documentation and usage guidelines at
https://docs.branch.io/
, or its successor URL.
"
Order Form
" means an ordering document or online order specifying the Services to be provided hereunder that is entered into between Customer or its Affiliates and the Reseller managing Customer’s subscription to the Services, including any addenda and supplements thereto. By entering into an Order Form with a Reseller, an Affiliate agrees to be bound by the terms of the Agreement as if it were an original party hereto.
“
Services
" means the products and services that are made available online by Branch under these Terms, the Beta Services, and other services or products that Branch may make available from time to time, including associated Branch offline or mobile components. Services exclude (i) Web-based, mobile, offline or other software application functionality that interoperates with a Service, that is provided by Customer or a third party, and (ii) Third-Party Content, as defined in these Terms.
3. SERVICE ACCESS AND AVAILABILITY
Branch will make the Services available to Customer solely for Customer’s internal business needs pursuant to the terms of the Agreement and the applicable Documentation.  Customer acknowledges and agrees that it is solely responsible for its integration and launch of the Services. Branch shall: (a) use commercially reasonable efforts to make the online Services available 24 hours a day, 7 days a week, except for: (i) planned maintenance, (ii) emergency maintenance that is reasonably unforeseeable and necessary for purposes of maintaining the integrity or operation of the Services, and (iii) any unavailability caused by a Force Majeure Event, and (b) provide the Services in accordance with the laws and regulations applicable to Branch’s provision of its Services to its customers generally (i.e., without regard for Customer’s particular use of the Services), and subject to Customer’s use of the Services in accordance with the Agreement and the Documentation. Your right to access and use the Services is limited by all the terms set forth in the Agreement. Branch reserves the right to monitor and periodically audit Customer’s use of the Services to ensure that Customer’s use complies with the Agreement and the limitations of Branch’s Documentation. Should Branch discover that Customer’s use of the Services violates the Agreement or the limitations of Branch’s Documentation, Branch reserves the right to charge the Customer, and the Customer hereby agrees to pay, for such use, in addition to other remedies available to Branch.
4. USE RESTRICTIONS; UPDATES & SUPPORT
4.1 Use Restrictions.
You must comply with all applicable laws when implementing, configuring, and using the Services and, except as expressly permitted under these Terms, you will not directly or indirectly: (a) make the functionality of the Services available to any third party through any means, including, without limitation, any hosting, application services provider, service bureau, or other type of service; (b) use any automated tool (e.g., robots, spiders) to access or use the Services; (c) extend, sell, distribute, rent, lease,  sublicense, or otherwise provide access to the Services to another person; (d) circumvent or disable any digital rights management, usage rules, permissions, or other security features of the Services or attempt to gain unauthorized access to the Services or Branch’s related systems or networks; (e) use the Services in a manner that overburdens, or that threatens the integrity, performance, or availability of, the Services; (f) frame or mirror any part of the Services, other than on Customer’s own internal and non-public intranets for its own internal business purposes, unless otherwise permitted in the Documentation; (g) remove, alter, or obscure any proprietary notices (including copyright and trademark notices) on any portion of the Services; (h) send material containing software viruses, worms, trojan horses, or other harmful computer code, files, scripts, agents, or programs; (i) use Branch’s Services in violation of Branch’s Acceptable Use Policy available at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-aup
, or its successor URL; or (j) use the Services in connection with any Apps or websites that are directed to children under 13 (and in certain jurisdictions under the age of 16), without employing appropriate settings within the Collection Technologies to limit data collection from such children in accordance with applicable law. More information on these settings is available
here
. If you have questions about how to use these settings or have any reason to believe that these resources may not address your particular use case, please reach out to the Branch Support team via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
, or its successor URL. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the Agreement, use of the Services in violation of the foregoing restrictions by Customer that, in Branch’s judgment, threatens the integrity, performance, availability, or security of the Services may result in Branch’s immediate suspension of, or limitation in Customer’s access to, the Services.
4.2 Updates and Support.
Branch will maintain, support, update, and provide error corrections for the Services to the same extent it does so for its customers generally. If Branch provides you with an update or maintenance release for the offline components of the Branch Services, unless you receive a separate license from Branch for that update or release that expressly supersedes these Terms, such update or release will be subject to these Terms. Branch shall have no liability for any damages that may result from Customer’s failure to implement upgrades or updates to the Services provided that Customer is notified in writing by Branch of such upgrade or update. All support requests must be sent to the Branch Support team via the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
, or its successor URL.
5. BETA SERVICES
From time to time, Branch may invite you to try Beta Services. You may accept or decline any such trial in your sole discretion. Beta Services are for evaluation purposes only and not for production use, are not subject to any service level agreements (SLAs) agreed to between you and Branch and may be subject to additional terms. Branch is under no obligation to  maintain, support, update, or provide error corrections for the Beta Services. Branch may discontinue Beta Services at any time in Branch’s sole discretion and reserves the right to never make them generally available. BRANCH WILL HAVE NO LIABILITY FOR ANY HARM OR DAMAGE ARISING OUT OF, OR IN CONNECTION WITH, CUSTOMER’S USE OF A BETA SERVICE. THE BETA SERVICES ARE PROVIDED “AS IS” AND AS AVAILABLE AND ARE EXCLUSIVE OF ANY WARRANTY WHATSOEVER. WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, WITH RESPECT TO THE BETA SERVICES, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE. In the event of a conflict or inconsistency between this section and any other provision of the Agreement, the terms of this section “BETA SERVICES” shall control and prevail with respect to Beta Services.
6. CANCELLATION AND TERMINATION
6.1 Cancellation & Termination Under Reseller Agreement.
Under the terms and conditions of Branch’s Reseller Agreement with the Reseller, Branch is entitled to suspend or terminate your subscription to the Service, your rights to access and use the Services or your account, and remove and delete any your data if: (a) Branch is notified by Reseller of your failure to pay amounts due to Reseller with respect to your subscription to a Service; or (b) Reseller fails to pay any amounts due to Branch pursuant to the Reseller Agreement with respect to your subscription to a Service. You consent to these suspension and termination rights and acknowledge and agree that Branch shall have no liability to you of any kind with respect to any such suspension or termination. Your sole recourse with respect to any such suspension or termination shall be against Reseller. Following the termination or cancellation of your subscription to the Services and/or account, Branch reserves the right to delete all data associated with your account in the normal course of operation consistent with Branch’s standard data retention policies.
6.2. Termination for Material Breach.
Either Party may terminate this Agreement (including access to all Services that are in effect) in the event of a material breach of this Agreement and fails to remedy such breach within thirty (30) days of the date of written notice of such breach. For the avoidance of doubt, a breach of the
Branch Acceptable Use Policy
will be considered a material breach of this Agreement. Termination by either Party for material breach of these Terms will be effective as of the last day of the 30-day cure period provided herein or immediately to the extent such violation reasonably cannot be cured.
6.3 Termination by Branch.
Branch reserves the right to suspend or discontinue, temporarily or permanently, all or any portion of the Services upon at least thirty (30) days’ written notice (email sufficient), provided that Branch will promptly provide a pro-rated refund of all pre-paid and unearned amounts based on the period of suspension or the date of discontinuance, as applicable, and Branch will have no further obligations or liability to you or any third-party as a result of such suspension or discontinuance. Except where there are any Order Form(s) in effect, Branch may terminate your use of the Services without prior notice for any reason at any time by providing you with written notice. Additionally, Branch may immediately terminate this Agreement for cause without notice if provision of the Services violates applicable law, regulation or court order.
7. SURVIVAL
Upon termination of the Agreement, those sections of these Terms that by their nature would reasonably be expected to survive will survive termination or expiration of these Terms, including but not limited to the sections on Termination, Privacy Policy & Data Rights, Confidential Information, Proprietary Rights, Limitation of Liability, and Legal Notices.
8. PRIVACY POLICY & DATA RIGHTS
8.1 Privacy Policy.
(a) You acknowledge and agree that you will provide a privacy policy to your end users, which shall be in compliance with applicable laws and regulations and shall include, at minimum, the following: (i) clear, meaningful, and conspicuous notice of your privacy practices consistent with applicable laws, (ii) disclosures regarding your use of cookies (including third-party cookies placed on your Digital Properties) and/or targeting and online behavioral advertising; (iii) your data collection, use and disclosure practices; and (iv) information regarding how end users may opt out from receiving targeted advertisements by visiting the NAI website opt-out page here:
http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices/
, the DAA opt-out page here:
http://www.aboutads.info/
, and/or the EDAA opt-out page here:
http://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
. Branch’s Privacy Policy does not cover your Digital Properties, or the use of your Digital Properties, by your end users. It is your obligation to provide your own privacy policy to your end users. You acknowledge that Branch has no direct relationship or interface with your end users and that Branch’s ability to comply with certain applicable data protection and privacy laws is dependent on your compliance with the terms of this section of the Terms. (b) If you use Branch’s Engagement Builder feature, you agree to respect opt-out flags passed by Branch to you if you use Engagement Builder data for targeted advertisements. You acknowledge and agree that your use of the Services is subject to Branch’s Privacy Policy, located at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-privacypolicy
, or its successor URL. (c) Where applicable in your use of the Services, you also agree to incorporate and adhere to the best practices and guidelines of the Self-Regulatory Principles of the Digital Advertising Alliance ("
DAA
") (
http://www.aboutads.info/principles
), and the Principles of the European Interactive Digital Alliance ("
EDAA
")(
http://www.edaa.eu/european-principles/
), as may be updated and amended from time to time.
8.2 Data Analytics.
You acknowledge and agree that Branch may collect and process data from your Digital Properties as set forth in
Branch’s Privacy Policy
with respect to your use of the Services. You grant to Branch a limited, non-exclusive, non-sublicensable, non-transferable license to use the data collected through the Services to provide, maintain, optimize and improve the Services.
8.3 Data Security.
Branch will maintain appropriate technical, administrative, and physical safeguards designed to protect information on its servers, including customer data, against unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction. However, you acknowledge and agree that no method of transmission over the Internet or method of electronic storage is completely secure, and that Branch cannot guarantee the absolute security of such information.
8.4 Compliance with Applicable Law.
You will comply with all laws, rules, and regulations applicable to your business and operations and to your use of the Services, including those governing the privacy, security and trans-border transfers of personal data (such as, but not limited to, compliance with the General Data Protection Regulation (EU 2016/679) ("
GDPR
") and the California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CCPA
”)). Where required, you shall be responsible for (a) obtaining consent from end users of your Digital Properties to (i) to place Collection Technologies (including by Branch) on the browsers or devices of end users of your Digital Properties, and (ii) collect and use the data you provide to Branch through the Services and the data that you enable Branch to collect from end users of your Digital Properties and process on your behalf, and (iii) t0 direct Branch to share data it processes on your behalf with any third party; (b) ensuring that you otherwise have any and all rights required in order to provide such data to Branch or to direct Branch to share it with any third party; (c) obtaining data properly and in accordance with applicable law, including, without limitation, the U.S. Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (“
COPPA
”), and the Video Privacy Protection Act (18 U.S.C. § 2710) (“
VPPA
”); and (d) ensuring you do not provide Branch with any sensitive information or personally identifiable information through the Services that is afforded legal protection under applicable regulation or laws (“
PII
”). To the extent that any of your users request that you not share their data with Branch, or to the extent that you believe that any data you may have provided to Branch was inappropriately obtained, you shall inform Branch immediately. Branch shall have no responsibility or liability to the extent resulting from or arising out of your use of the Services not in compliance with the Agreement, the Documentation or applicable law.
8.5 CCPA.
If any data collected through your use of the Services is deemed personal information  subject to the CCPA, then the terms set forth in the Branch California Privacy Addendum (“
California Privacy Addendum
“) available at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-ca-privacy-addendum
, or its successor URL, shall apply to the use and processing of such personal information and the Parties agree to incorporate such California Privacy Addendum by reference into the Agreement as an integral part thereof.
9. RESTRICTED AREAS OF THE SERVICES
9.1 Registration Information.
In order to access and use the Services, you must register an account. Any information provided during your registration must be current, complete, and accurate (“
Registration Information
”). It is your sole responsibility to ensure Registration Information is current, complete, and accurate at all times.
9.2 Access Credentials.
The Services, including account management features, may be password-restricted to registered users or other authorized persons. You may select individuals (your employees, Affiliates, or your independent contractors) to access and use the Services in furtherance of your internal business purposes as expressly permitted by this Agreement, unless otherwise expressly agreed to in writing by Branch. You will obtain separate credentials, e.g., user IDs and passwords, from Branch for such individuals (each, an "
Authorized User
").
9.3 Responsibility.
You are responsible for all actions taken under an Authorized User’s account, regardless of whether such action was taken by an Authorized User or by another party, and regardless of whether such Authorized User authorized or had knowledge of such action. You are responsible for the security of each Authorized User’s credentials and shall take all necessary steps to protect each Authorized User’s credentials from disclosure. You will not share (and will instruct each Authorized User not to share) such credentials with any other person or entity and will notify Branch promptly of unauthorized access or use of the Services.
10. LINKS AND THIRD-PARTY CONTENT
You may enable the Services to display, or contain links to, third party products, services, and websites. You acknowledge that it is your responsibility to evaluate the information, opinion, advice, or other content linked to or made available through Branch’s Services. Any opinions, advice, statements, services, offers, or other information that constitute part of the content expressed, authored, or made available by other users or other third parties on the Services, or which is accessible through or may be located using the Services (collectively, "
Third-Party Content
") are those of the respective authors or producers and not of Branch or its shareholders, directors, officers, employees, agents, or representatives. Branch does not control Third-Party Content and makes no representations, warranties, endorsements, or guarantees regarding the accuracy, integrity or quality of such Third-Party Content. Branch expressly disclaims all responsibility and liability for any Third-Party Content, including but not limited to, any information or materials advertised in any Third-Party Content.  Branch is not responsible or liable, directly or indirectly, for any damage or loss caused to you by your or a third party’s use of or reliance on any goods, services, or information available on or through any third-party service or Third-Party Content.
11. TRADEMARKS
"Branch Metrics", the Branch Metrics logo, and any other trademarks or service marks used by Branch or slogan displayed on the Services ("Branch Marks") are trademarks of Branch and its suppliers or licensors, and may not be copied, imitated or used, in whole or in part, without the prior written permission of Branch or the applicable trademark holder. You may not use any metatags or any other "hidden text" utilizing "Branch Metrics" or any other Branch Marks without Branch’s prior written permission. In addition, the look and feel of the Services, including all page headers, custom graphics, button icons and scripts, is the trade dress of Branch and may not be copied, imitated or used, in whole or in part, without Branch’s prior written permission. All other trademarks, registered trademarks, product names and company names or logos mentioned in the Services are the property of their respective owners. Reference to any products, services, processes or other information, by trade name, trademark, manufacturer, supplier, or otherwise does not constitute or imply endorsement, sponsorship, or recommendation thereof by Branch.
12. AGENCIES & PARTNERS
12.1 Agency Client.
If you are an agency or a party representing, or providing services for the benefit of, a third party (“
Agency Client
“), you represent and warrant that you are authorized to act on behalf of, and bind to the Agreement, that Agency Client (and upon Branch’s request shall provide evidence thereof). You further represent and warrant that, to the extent that you are accessing the Services on the Agency Client’s behalf,  such Agency Client has provided you with explicit permission to collect on its behalf and view Agency Client’s data and that you shall use such data strictly in accordance with the permissions provided to you by such Agency Client and the terms of the Agreement. You shall ensure that each Agency Client agrees to the terms of the Agreement and any applicable Order Form(s) and agrees to abide by its terms, including without limitation, Section 8 (Privacy Policy & Data Rights) of these Terms. You acknowledge and agree that: (i) Branch makes no representations or warranties for the direct or indirect benefit of any Agency Client; and (ii) you shall not make any representations or warranties to such Agency Client on behalf of Branch.
12.2 Partners.
The Services enable you to integrate, measure, and analyze your Branch account (including data contained therein) with certain partners that you work with, such as advertising networks, publishers and analytics providers (“
Partners
“). For such purpose, you may, through your configuration of the Services (“
Partner Features
”), direct Branch to provide data to, and receive data from Partners relating to end users (“
Shared Data
”).  To the extent that you use the Partner Features for Partners you select (“
Permitted Partners
”), then you hereby grant Branch the right to provide Shared Data with Partners pursuant to your configuration of the Services and to obtain and process Shared Data from Permitted Partners pursuant to your configuration of the Services.  You acknowledge and agree that: (i) the sharing of such Shared Data between Branch and Permitted Partners will be available only to the extent enabled by the Permitted Partner and Branch; (ii) any use of Shared Data by a Permitted Partner shall be subject to your own agreements with such Permitted Partner; (iii) Branch shall have no liability or responsibility in connection with any acts or omissions by Permitted Partners; and (iv) any use or processing of Shared Data may be subject to certain limitations and restrictions imposed by Permitted Partners and Branch is not responsible for fulfilling any such limitations and restrictions unless expressly agreed to in writing between you and Branch.
13. CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION
13.1 Definition.
Each Party to these Terms (a “
Receiving Party
”) may have access to, or become acquainted with, certain non-public confidential information of the other Party (a “
Disclosing Party
”) including without limitation all information clearly identified as confidential at the time of disclosure (“
Confidential Information
”). You and Branch further agree that, subject to the rights and licenses granted herein, each Party's Confidential Information shall include all non-public information regarding the Disclosing Party, including without limitation any customer, customer prospect, the terms, conditions and pricing set forth in the Agreement and its Order Form(s), marketing, technical, business and/or strategic plans or information provided by the Disclosing Party to the Receiving Party in the performance of the Services under the Agreement.
13.2 Use and Disclosure.
Each Party agrees as follows: (a) to use the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party only for the purposes permitted by the Agreement, or as otherwise permitted by the Agreement (the "
Purpose
"); (b) to take all reasonable steps to ensure that the Disclosing Party’s Confidential Information is not disclosed or distributed by the Receiving Party’s employees or agents to another party in violation of the Agreement, but in no event will the Receiving party use less effort to protect the Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party than it uses to protect its own Confidential Information of like importance; (c) to restrict access to the Confidential Information disclosed by the Disclosing Party to such of the Receiving Party’s employees, agents and third parties, if any, who have a legitimate need to have access for the Purpose and who have agreed in writing or are otherwise bound to treat such information in accordance with the Agreement; and (d) to return or destroy all Confidential Information of the Disclosing Party’s written request, after termination of the Agreement. The Receiving Party will not be obligated under this confidentiality section with respect to information that: (1) is or has become readily publicly available through no act or omission of the Receiving Party or its employees or agents; (2) is received from a third party lawfully in possession of such information and the Receiving Party has no knowledge of any disclosure restrictions on such third party to disclose such information; (3) is disclosed to a third party by the Disclosing Party without restriction on disclosure; (4) was rightfully in the possession of the Receiving Party without restriction prior to its disclosure by the Disclosing Party; or (5) was independently developed by employees or consultants of the Receiving Party without reliance on, or reference to, such Confidential Information.
13.3 Permitted Disclosures.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, Confidential Information may be disclosed as required by any court order or governmental agency, provided that before disclosing such Confidential Information the Receiving Party must provide the Disclosing Party with sufficient advance notice of the court or agency’s request for the information to enable the Receiving Party to exercise any rights it may have to challenge or limit the court or agency’s authority to receive such Confidential Information, to the extent permitted by applicable law.
14. PROPRIETARY RIGHTS
14.1 Proprietary Rights.
As between you and Branch, you shall retain all right, title and interest in your Digital Properties. If you choose to use your Digital Properties with a Service, you grant Branch permission to allow the Services to interoperate with your Digital Properties as required for the interoperation of your Digital Properties with the Service. Subject to the limited licenses granted herein, Branch acquires no right, title or interest from you or your licensors under the Agreement in or to your Digital Properties. Subject to the limited rights expressly granted hereunder, Branch, its Affiliates, and its licensors reserve all of their right, title and interest in and to the Services (including the Branch application programming interfaces and the Branch software development kits), the Documentation, all technology utilized by Branch to provide the Services, and all of their related intellectual property rights related to, embodied by, or incorporated in any of the foregoing and including any updates, upgrades, enhancements, modifications and improvements made to, or derivatives of, the foregoing. No copyright is granted by Branch to Customer hereunder. No rights are granted to Customer hereunder other than as expressly set forth herein.
14.2 Feedback.
Branch may provide you with a mechanism to provide feedback, suggestions, and ideas, if you choose, about the Services ("
Feedback
"). You agree that Branch may, in its sole discretion, use the Feedback you provide to Branch in any way, including in future enhancements and modifications to the Services. You hereby grant to Branch and its assigns a perpetual, worldwide, fully transferable, sub-licensable, fully paid-up, irrevocable, royalty-free license to use, reproduce, modify, create derivative works from, distribute, and display the Feedback in any manner for any purpose, in any media, software, or technology of any kind now existing or developed in the future, without any obligation to provide attribution or compensation to you or any third party.
15. WARRANTY & DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTIES
15.1 Warranty.
You represent and warrant to Branch that (a) you have validly entered into this Agreement and has the legal power and authority to do so and (b) c) the execution, delivery and performance of the Agreement does not and will not violate the terms or conditions of any other agreement to which you are a party or by which you are otherwise bound.
15.2 DISCLAIMER.
EXCEPT AS EXPRESSLY PROVIDED IN THE AGREEMENT, THE SERVICES, AND THE DOCUMENTATION ARE PROVIDED “AS IS,” WITHOUT REPRESENTATION OR WARRANTY OF ANY KIND. WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, BRANCH EXPLICITLY DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, QUIET ENJOYMENT OR NON-INFRINGEMENT, AND ANY WARRANTIES ARISING OUT OF COURSE OF DEALING, COURSE OF PERFORMANCE, OR USAGE OF TRADE. BRANCH DOES NOT WARRANT THE ACCURACY, COMPLETENESS, OR USEFULNESS OF THE SERVICES, AND THE DOCUMENTATION, NOR DOES BRANCH WARRANT THAT THE SERVICES WILL BE FREE FROM ERRORS, OR THAT THE OPERATIONS OF THE SERVICES WILL BE UNINTERRUPTED. YOU RELY ON THE SERVICES AND THE DOCUMENTATION AT YOUR OWN RISK. SOME JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW THE EXCLUSION OF CERTAIN WARRANTIES IN CERTAIN CIRCUMSTANCES. ACCORDINGLY, THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH ABOVE APPLY TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW.
16. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
16.1
BRANCH AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND LICENSORS WILL NOT BE LIABLE FOR ANY INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, PUNITIVE, CONSEQUENTIAL, OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO, DAMAGES FOR LOSS OF PROFITS, LOSS OF REVENUE, GOODWILL, USE, DATA THAT IS INCOMPLETE, MISSING, OR INCORRECT, OR OTHER INTANGIBLE LOSSES (EVEN IF BRANCH HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES), RESULTING FROM THIS AGREEMENT.
16.2
UNDER NO CIRCUMSTANCES WILL THE TOTAL AGGREGATE LIABILITY OF BRANCH AND ITS SUPPLIERS AND LICENSORS RESULTING FROM THIS AGREEMENT (INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO WARRANTY CLAIMS), REGARDLESS OF THE FORUM AND REGARDLESS OF WHETHER ANY ACTION OR CLAIM IS BASED IN CONTRACT, WARRANTY, NEGLIGENCE, STRICT LIABILITY, OR OTHER TORT, BREACH OF ANY STATUTORY DUTY, INDEMNITY OR CONTRIBUTION, OR OTHERWISE, EXCEED THE AMOUNTS, IF ANY, THAT THE RESELLER HAS PAID, OR HAS AGREED TO PAY, TO BRANCH WITH RESPECT TO YOUR SUBSCRIPTION TO THE SERVICES IN THE TWELVE (12) MONTH PERIOD PRIOR TO THE EVENT GIVING RISE TO THE CLAIM. SOME OF THE LIMITATIONS PROVIDED HEREIN MAY NOT BE ALLOWED UNDER THE LAWS OF CERTAIN JURISDICTIONS. IF ANY SUCH LAW IS DEEMED TO APPLY TO THE AGREEMENT, THEN THE LIMITATIONS SET FORTH HEREIN SHALL APPLY TO THE MAXIMUM EXTENT PERMITTED UNDER SUCH LAWS.
17. INDEMNITY
17.1 Indemnity.
You will defend Branch, its Affiliates and their officers, agents, employees, representatives, and assigns (“
Branch Indemnified Parties
”) against any claim, demand suit or action against Branch brought by a third party to the extent arising out of or relating to: (a) Third Party Content or your use of the Services in violation of the Agreement, the Documentation or applicable law, (b) allegations that your Digital Properties, or the combination of your Digital Properties with the Services, infringes or misappropriates a third party’s intellectual property rights, (c) your instructions to share Shared Data with a Partner, or (d) a regulatory investigation (each a “
Claim Against Branch
”). You will indemnify Branch Indemnified Parties from any costs, damages, and expenses finally awarded against Branch Indemnified Parties as a result of, or for any amounts paid by Branch Indemnified Parties under a settlement approved by you in writing of, a Claim Against Branch. The above defense and indemnification obligations  will be limited to the extent a Claim Against Branch arises from Branch’s fraud, or reckless or willful misconduct.
17.2 Agency Indemnity.
If you are an agency or a party representing, or providing services for the benefit of an Agency Client, in addition to the obligations set forth in the section “Agencies & Partners” of these Terms, you further agree to indemnify, hold harmless and defend Branch Indemnified Parties from and against any claim, demand, suit, or action and any related liability against a Branch Indemnified Party brought by a third party, arising out of or relating to: (a) any representations and warranties made by you concerning any aspect of the Services to an Agency Client; (b) any claims made by or on behalf of any Agency Client arising out or relating to your use of the Services; and (c) any claims arising out of or relating to acts or omissions of an Agency Client in connection with the Services.
17.3 Indemnification Procedure.
Your indemnification obligations under this Agreement will be contingent upon: (a) Branch promptly giving you written notice of any claim for which indemnification is sought (provided that the Branch’s failure to notify you will not diminish your obligations under this section, except to the extent that you are materially prejudiced as a result of such failure), (b) you having sole control of the defense and settlement of any and all claims for which indemnification is sought (provided that no settlement may be entered into without either (i) Branch’s consent where a settlement requires any action on the part of Branch or (ii) the securing of an unconditional release of Branch for all liability), and (c) Branch giving you reasonably requested assistance at your expense. Branch may, at its own expense, and without limiting the obligations of the indemnifying party, maintain its own counsel and participate in the defense with counsel of its own choosing at any time.
18. MISCELLANEOUS
18.1 Governing Law.
The Agreement and all matters arising out of or relating to the Agreement shall be governed by and construed under the laws of the State of California, without regard to its conflict of law provisions. The parties expressly disclaim and exclude the application of the United Nations Convention on Contracts for the International Sale of Goods.
18.2 Dispute Resolution.
In the event of any dispute, claim, or controversy in connection with this Agreement (other than for disputes, claims, or controversies related to the intellectual property of a party) (collectively, "
Disputes
"), each Party's senior representatives will, in good faith, attempt to resolve a Dispute. If the Parties are unable to resolve a Dispute within thirty (30) days or within such other time period as the Parties may agree in writing, then the Parties may commence binding arbitration under JAMS' Comprehensive Arbitration Rules and Procedures. The Parties will share equally the fees and expenses of the JAMS arbitrator. The arbitration will be conducted by a sole arbitrator mutually agreed to between the Parties or, failing that, by JAMS under its then prevailing rules. Judgment on the award rendered by the arbitrator may be entered in any court of competent jurisdiction. The arbitrator will have the authority to grant specific performance or any other equitable or legal remedy, including provisional remedies. Each Party will be responsible for its own incurred expenses arising out of any dispute resolution procedure. Any arbitration proceedings will take place in the English language in (a) San Francisco, California, if you are domiciled in any country outside of the (i) European Economic Area or its regions or territories, the United Kingdom, Switzerland, Andorra, Vatican City, and Monaco and (ii) Asia-Pacific region; (b) London, England, if you are domiciled in any country within the European Economic Area or its regions or territories, the United Kingdom, Switzerland, Andorra, Vatican City, or Monaco; or (c) Singapore, if you are domiciled in any country within the Asia-Pacific region.
18.3 No Waiver; Severability.
Branch’s failure to enforce any right or provision in the Agreement will not constitute a waiver of such right or provision unless acknowledged and agreed to by Branch in writing. If any provision of the Agreement is found to be unenforceable or invalid, that provision will be limited or eliminated to the minimum extent necessary so that the Agreement will otherwise remain in full force and effect and enforceable.
18.4 Assignment.
Under the terms of the Reseller Agreement, your agreement with the Reseller with respect to your subscription to the Services may be assigned to Branch. you agree that if your agreement with Reseller is assigned to Branch, your continued rights to access and use the Services shall be subject to Branch then standard Terms & Conditions governing the Services available at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-ts-cs
(or its successor URL) and you consent to the application of such terms and conditions, including without limitation, the billing and payment provisions contained therein. You agree that following any such assignment, you shall, upon request by Branch, provide such information as is required to secure payment for any subscription term commencing after such assignment. You may not, directly or indirectly, by operation of law or otherwise, assign all or any part of this Agreement or your rights under this Agreement or delegate performance of your duties under this Agreement without Branch prior written consent, which consent will not be unreasonably withheld. Branch may transfer and assign any of its rights and obligations under the Agreement freely and without consent. If requested by Branch, You must execute a document to give effect to Branch’s assignment. Subject to the foregoing restrictions, this Agreement will be fully binding upon, inure to the benefit of and be enforceable by the Parties and their respective successors and assigns.
18.5 Entire Agreement.
Both you and Branch agree that the Agreement is the complete and exclusive statement of the mutual understanding of the Parties and supersedes all previous written and oral agreements, communications and other understandings relating to your use of the Services, and that all waivers and modifications must be in a signed writing by both Parties, except as otherwise provided herein. Preprinted terms in your purchase orders or other customer-generated ordering documents, or terms referenced or linked within them, will have no effect on the Agreement and are hereby rejected, regardless of whether they are signed, clicked through, or otherwise agreed to by Branch and/or purport to take precedence over the Agreement. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency among the following documents, the order of precedence shall be: (1) any applicable Order Form(s) incorporating these Terms; (2) any exhibit, schedule or addendum expressly incorporated into to these Terms, (2) the body of these Terms, and (3) the Documentation.
18.6 Relationship between the Parties.
The Parties are independent contractors. No agency, partnership, joint venture, fiduciary or employment relationship is created as a result of the Agreement, and you do not have any authority of any kind to bind Branch in any respect whatsoever.
18.7  International Trade and Anti-Corruption and Laws.
Each party (a) warrants that it will comply with all applicable anti-corruption, anti-money laundering, economic and trade sanctions, export controls, and other international trade laws, regulations, and governmental orders (collectively, “
Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws
”) in the jurisdictions that apply directly or indirectly to the Services, including, without limitation, the United States, and (b) represents that it has not made, offered, promised to make, or authorized any payment or anything of value in violation of Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws. You will promptly notify Branch in writing of any actual or potential violation of Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws in connection with the use of the Services and take all appropriate steps to remedy or resolve such violations, including any steps requested by Branch. If applicable, you represent that you have obtained, and warrant that you will continue to obtain, all licenses or other authorizations required to export, re-export, or transfer the Services.
18.8 Sanctions Lists.
The Services and any derivatives thereof, may be subject to export control and economic sanctions laws and regulations of the United States and other jurisdictions. Both you and Branch each represent that (and in your case, also your end users of your Digital Properties) it is not named on any government prohibited, denied, or unverified-party, sanctions, debarment, or exclusion list or export-controlled related restricted party list (collectively, “
Sanctions Lists
”).  Customer shall not permit any entity or individual to access or use any of the Services who is listed on the Consolidated Screening List or located in a U.S. government-embargoed country (currently Cuba, Iran, North Korea, Syria and Crimea), or known to be engaged in proliferation of nuclear, chemical or biological weapons or missiles, or otherwise in violation of any U.S. export law or regulation. You will immediately (i) discontinue your use of the Services if you become placed on any Sanctions List and (ii) remove your End Users’ access to the Services if your end users become placed on any Sanctions List. You represent that you have not, and warrant that you will not, export, re-export, or transfer the Services to an entity on any Sanctions List without prior authorization from the applicable governmental authority. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, either Party may terminate this Agreement immediately upon written notice to the other party if the other party is in breach of its obligations hereunder with respect to Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws or Sanction Lists. If your account is blocked because it is operating in a country or region prohibited by Anti-Corruption and Trade Laws, you will receive notice of your account being inoperable when you attempt to log into your account in such prohibited country or region.
18.9 Third Party Beneficiary.
Except where expressly provided herein, no provision of the Agreement is intended, nor shall it be interpreted, to provide or create any third-party beneficiary rights or any other rights of any kind in any customer, affiliate, stockholder, partner, member, director, officer, or employee of any Party hereto or any other person or entity.
18.10 Marketing Support.
You agree to comply with reasonable requests of Branch to support public relations efforts pertaining to the Services, which efforts may include: (a) a press release highlighting your company’s use of the Services, (b) participation in targeted press and analyst interviews highlighting benefits of implementing the Services, and (c) participation in customer case studies developed by Branch and used on Branch’s website(s) and other collateral. You grant to Branch a non-exclusive, non-transferable, limited right to use your name, trademarks, and logos (collectively, the "
Customer Marks
") (i) for the purpose of referencing You as a customer of Branch on the Branch website(s) and (ii) in the production of marketing materials, provided that such use is in accordance with any trademark and logo use guidelines that you provide to Branch. All goodwill developed from such use shall be solely for your benefit.
18.11 Force Majeure.
Neither Party will be responsible for any delay or failure in performance of any part of this Agreement to the extent that such delay or failure is caused by an event or circumstance beyond the reasonable control of the Party whose performance is affected and could not have been prevented or corrected through the exercise of reasonable diligence, including , for example, an act of God, act of government, flood, fire, earthquake, civil unrest, act of terror, strike or other labor problem (other than one involving Branch employees), Internet service provider failure or delay, integrated third party applications, or denial of service attack (each such event, a “
Force Majeure Event
”). The Party alleging a Force Majeure Event (the “
Affected Party
”) will promptly notify the other Party in writing of the Force Majeure Event, providing reasonable detail of the circumstances giving rise to the Force Majeure Event, and the steps it is taking to remedy the delay or failure. Notwithstanding the foregoing, financial incapability will not be considered as a Force Majeure Event.
18.12 Notices.
Except as otherwise specified in the Agreement, all notices of termination or an indemnifiable claim related to the Agreement (“
Legal Notices
”) will be provided via email and will be effective upon receipt by e-mail as set forth below. If to Branch, all notices shall be provided to legal@branch.io ("
Branch Notices
"). Billing-related notices to Customer will be provided via email and addressed to the relevant billing contact designated by Customer on the applicable Order Form or the relevant Services account administrator designated by Customer. All Legal Notices and other notices to Customer will be provided via email and addressed to the relevant Services account administrator designated by Customer.
18.13 Modifications.
We may make changes to these Terms from time to time. When we do, we will revise the "Last updated" date given above. It is your responsibility to review these Terms frequently and to remain informed of any changes to them. The then-current version of these Terms will supersede all earlier versions. You agree that your continued use of Branch’s Services after such changes have been published to Branch’s Services will constitute your acceptance of such revised Terms.
19. CONTACTING US
If you have any questions or concerns about Branch’s Services or these Terms, you may contact us by email at
info@branch.io
.
Effective March 24th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
SERVICE LEVEL ADDENDUM
Last Updated: March 21, 2023
Customer Support
This Service Level Addendum (“Addendum”) is made by and between Branch Metrics, Inc. (“Branch”) and Customer (each a “Party”, collectively the “Parties”) as an integral part of the Master Services Agreement or other written agreement (“Agreement”) between Branch and Customer for the provisions of deep linking and attribution analytics services (“Services”). “Customer” means the entity that executed the Agreement.
These terms govern Branch’s provision of service level support to Customer. All other relevant terms are set forth in the Agreement. In the event there is a conflict or inconsistency between the terms of the Agreement and this Addendum, the terms of this Addendum shall supersede and control over conflicting or inconsistent Agreement language.
Exclusions
This Addendum does not apply to any: (a) features designated beta services (unless otherwise stated in the associated Branch documentation available at
https://help.branch.io/developers-hub
(or its successor URL), (b) responding to problems caused by third party software, (c) configuration changes for third party software, (d) support for issues related to the operation of the Services on local personal computers and related printing issues or problems with the browser and loading the required add-on programs, (e) firewall support, (f) responding to problems caused by hardware, (g) on-site support, (h) Maintenance (as defined below), (i) errors: (i) caused by factors outside of Branch’s reasonable control, (ii) that resulted from Customer's equipment, software or hardware or third party software or hardware, or both; (iii) that resulted from abuses or other behaviors that violate the Agreement, (iv) from Customer’s employees, agents, contractors, or vendors, or anyone gaining access to Branch’s Services by means of Customer’s passwords or equipment, or otherwise resulting from Customer’s failure to follow appropriate security practices; or (v) that result from Customer’s failure to adhere to the Agreement (including Branch’s Documentation).
Support Channels
The service levels set forth in this Addendum are only available for support requests submitted according to the requirements set forth in this Addendum.
In order to provide support to Customer, all technical support requests must expressly identify the applicable customer account and be submitted to Branch via email at
support@branch.io
or the “Submit a Ticket” function at
http://help.branch.io/
(herein referred to as “Support Team”).
Availability
Branch customer support is available based on the level of support purchased by Customer via the Order Form.  All Branch customers are entitled to Standard Support.  Additional support may be purchased in the form of Enhanced Support or Premium Support.  The purchase of either Enhanced Support or Premium Support under an applicable Order Form supersedes the provision of Standard Support.
Standard Support
Support is available to Customer between 09:00 to 17:00, local time for Customer, not including Saturday, Sunday, or Branch company holidays.
Customers who have executed an Order Form with Branch but have not purchased Enhanced Support or Premium Support in such Order Form will receive Standard Support as described in the Issue Response Time table provided below.
Enhanced Support
If Customer has purchased Enhanced Support as indicated on the applicable Order Form, the Support will be available to Customer during weekdays from 00:00 Monday to 24:00 Friday, local time for Customer, not including Saturday, Sunday, or Branch company holidays.
Premium Support
If Customer has purchased Premium Support as indicated on the applicable Order Form, the Support Team will be available to Customer twenty-four (24) hours a day, seven (7) days a week.
Customer may request a live troubleshooting session for technical support requests submitted per the requirements above. Such requests must be submitted electronically in writing to
http://help.branch.io/
(or its successor URL) at least one (1) Business Day in advance. The Support Team will not be available for live troubleshooting sessions during weekends and Branch company holidays. Customer is entitled to a maximum of ten (10) hours of live troubleshooting calls per calendar year, with a maximum of thirty (30) minutes allocated by Branch for each call. “Business Day” means between 09:00 to 17:00, local time for Customer, not including Saturday, Sunday, or Branch company holidays.
Service Level Agreement (SLA)
The following table will be used by Branch to prioritize Customer technical support requests and to give Customer a target first response time. Assignment of Severity Level is at Branch’s sole discretion. Branch’s first response time and frequency of updates to Customer will be made on a case-by-case basis.
Severity Levels and First Response Time by Support Tier
Severity Level
Definition
Standard Support
Enhanced Support
Premium Support
Sev 0 - Outage
A service outage of Branch systems that would impact link redirection or attribution.
2 Hours
1 Hour
1 Hour
Sev 1 - High
The Services are completely unavailable for use by Customer, and no procedural workaround exists, thereby causing a severe impact to Customer’s business operations.
1 Business Day
4 hours
2 hours
Sev 2 - Medium
Customer experiences a severe defect or configuration issue with the use of the Services and no procedural workaround exists, thereby causing a high impact to Customer’s business operations (excluding Service failures that qualify as Severity Level High).
2 Business Days
8 hours
4 hours
Sev 3 - Low
Customer experiences an issue where Customer’s use of the Services are partially reduced, thereby causing a low-to-medium impact to Customer’s business operations. A procedural workaround exists (excluding Service issues that qualify as Severity Level High or Medium).
5 Business Days
1 Business Day
8 hours
Effective February 15th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Supplier Code of Conduct
Introduction
This Supplier Code of Conduct (“Supplier Code”) has been established to summarize Branch's  core values and expected standards of conduct for its vendors, contractors, consulting firms, staffing agencies, agency temps, partners, licensees and other intermediaries and their respective employees and affiliates (collectively, “Suppliers” or “you”) to comply with when working with Branch. All Suppliers shall promote a safe, diverse, lawful and respectful work environment. We believe that this Supplier Code will reinforce those qualities and attributes that have made both Branch and you successful.
Suppliers are expected to review, understand and comply with the policies set forth in this Supplier Code. The Supplier Code should be viewed as the minimum standards that we expect and is not intended in any way to lessen your contractual obligations with Branch. Failure to comply with this Supplier Code may result in Branch’s review of its engagement with a Supplier and may result in termination of Supplier’s relationship with Branch.
This Supplier Code and all policies contained herein will be administered in accordance with applicable law and may be updated from time to time. If you have questions about this Supplier Code, you can contact Branch at
legal@branch.io
.
Compliance with Rules, Laws, and Regulations
Suppliers are expected to comply with all applicable rules, laws, and regulations at all times while working with Branch. You have a responsibility to be knowledgeable about specific laws and regulations that apply to your area of business. If a law conflicts with this Supplier Code, you must comply with the law.
Diversity and
Non-Discrimination
Diversity is at the forefront of Branch’s mission and culture. We are and remain committed to being a globally diverse, ethical, moral and inclusive company that is tolerant of all individuals from all different backgrounds because we believe the best ideas come from a diverse way of looking at technology and the world.
Accordingly, Suppliers shall provide an environment free from unlawful discrimination on the basis of personal characteristics, such as age, race, religion, national origin, caste, ancestry, disability, medical condition, marital status, sex, pregnancy, gender identity, sexual orientation, or any other basis protected by applicable law. Additionally, we expect all Suppliers to promote working environments where all individuals are entitled to equal opportunities and fair treatment.
Anti-Harassment
Each Supplier shall ensure its workplace is free of harassment. Harassment means any verbal, physical, and visual conduct that creates an intimidating, offensive, or hostile working environment or that interferes with an individual’s work performance. Harassing conduct can take many forms and may include, but is not limited to, the following: slurs, jokes, statements, gestures, assault, impeding or blocking another’s movement or otherwise physically interfering with normal work, or sharing inappropriate materials.
Non-Retaliation
No Supplier will retaliate against an individual for filing a good faith complaint of unlawful discrimination or harassment or for participating in any good faith investigation of alleged discrimination or harassment.
Conflicts of Interest
Branch expects all Suppliers to avoid conflicts of interest and to operate with the highest level of ethics and integrity. A potential conflict of interest, or the appearance of one, occurs when your outside interests (for example, financial or personal interests) interfere with or influence, or even just appear to interfere with or influence, yours or Branch’s business interests or your work-related duties.
Suppliers may give and accept common courtesy items that are of modest cost, provided for legitimate business purposes and are understood as customary in Supplier’s industry. However, Suppliers must refrain from giving or accepting any gifts or other items with an intent to influence Branch, its customers, prospects, agents, employees or representatives or to obtain an improper business advantage, or in exchange for favors or benefits.
Anti-Corruption and Anti-Bribery
Branch Supplier's are strictly prohibited from partaking in any and all forms of corruption and bribery, including, but not limited to, payment or receipt of bribes or kickbacks to or from foreign or domestic government employees or officials, representatives of commercial enterprises or any other persons, whether made directly or through others such as agents, consultants or other associated parties. Suppliers will take all necessary steps to ensure that corruption and bribery do not occur in its business activities, wherever those business activities may take place. Violations of this nature may result in the termination of Supplier's partnership with Branch and may also lead to civil and criminal penalties.
Suppliers will also ensure their compliance with all applicable anti-corruption laws such as the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, the UK Bribery Act 2010 and other applicable laws that prohibit unlawful activities to procure a business advantage.
Antitrust
Suppliers shall refrain from engaging in any and all acts which are or may be considered counter to antitrust and fair competition legislation and regulations. Additionally, Branch expects its Suppliers to promote a free, open and competitive marketplace by avoiding all forms of anti-competitive acts or collusion. Suppliers’ responsibilities under this section shall apply wherever a Supplier conducts business.
Confidential Information, Data Privacy and Intellectual Property
Our customers, partners and employees entrust us to safeguard their confidential information with the utmost security. As follows, Branch expects all of its Suppliers to protect confidential information and trade secrets regarding Branch and its business practices. Branch confidential information should only be used in accordance with existing confidentiality obligations for authorized purposes, disclosed on a need-to-know basis, and subject to separate written confidentiality obligations. Similarly, intellectual property including, but not limited to trade secrets, patents, copyrights, trademarks, logos, and other inventions, belonging to Branch, shall be handled with the appropriate level of care and preserved to the extent legally permissible. We encourage all Suppliers to regularly review their confidentiality practices.
In the event Supplier controls or processes personal information and/or personal data as defined under applicable data protection laws, Suppliers must ensure that their control and processing of such information and data is in accordance with applicable data protection laws, rules, statutes, and regulations. Suppliers are expected to maintain a privacy policy describing its privacy practices and handling of personal information.
Healthy Workplace and Labor Practices
Branch Suppliers must provide all employees with safe and healthy workplace conditions that comply with all applicable laws.
Suppliers will also refrain from engaging or attempting to engage in any and all forms of child labor, modern slavery, and human trafficking in violation of all applicable laws.
Environmental Protection
Branch Suppliers shall conduct their business and operations in such a manner that is respectful, responsible and protective of the environment. At a minimum, Suppliers shall comply with all applicable environmental laws, regulations and standards. Whenever possible, Branch encourages its Suppliers to continually review their internal operations in order to reduce waste, promote clean air initiatives, and conserve resources.
International Trade and Export Controls
Branch expects Suppliers to comply with all applicable import, export, customs, sanctions, embargoes, boycott and other trade compliance laws and regulations during the entirety of Branch and Supplier’s engagement.
Accurate and Complete Books and Records
All Suppliers must maintain accurate records of all transactions and ensure that the Supplier’s books and records accurately and fairly reflect, with appropriate detail, all transactions, expenses, or other dispositions of assets with regard to its business with Branch. No Supplier employee or other worker shall falsify or otherwise mislead Branch with regard to any records or books Supplier maintains.
Reporting Breaches of this Policy
Compliance with this Supplier Code is, first and foremost, the personal responsibility of Suppliers, including every individual employed by Supplier. All personnel are encouraged to report, in person or in writing, any known or suspected violations of this Supplier Code to Branch at
legal@branch.io
. Any questions or violation reports will be addressed promptly.
Branch will not tolerate any retaliation by Supplier against any individual who acts in good faith in reporting any violation of this Supplier Code. Supplier will investigate reported violations and will determine an appropriate response, including corrective action and preventive measures, and will include Branch in this process at its request.
***
Effective June 7th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Technical Audit Services
Statement of Work
This Technical Audit Services Statement of Work (“SOW”) describes the Technical Audit Services (herein referred to as “Audit Services” or “Professional Services”) to be performed by Branch Metrics, Inc. (“Branch”) for the customer purchasing the Audit Services, as set forth in the Order Form (“Customer”) (each a “Party”, collectively the “Parties”) to the extent Customer has purchased Audit Services, and is effective as of the date of Customer’s Order Form. By executing an Order Form that references this SOW, Customer agrees to the terms of this SOW and the Professional Services Terms & Conditions available at
https://legal.branch.io/#professional-services
(the “PS Terms”). Any capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein shall have the meaning set forth in the PS Terms. In the event of any conflict or inconsistency between this SOW and an Order Form referencing this SOW, the SOW shall control.
SCOPE OF AUDIT SERVICES
Branch PS will provide Customer with resources to assist Customer, as set forth below (the “Project”), subject to Customer’s payment of all applicable fees as set forth in the applicable Order Form. Branch PS and Customer (collectively, the “Project Team”) will commit reasonable resources to work on the Project in accordance with the terms herein. The term of this SOW, the payment terms, and the fees for the Audit Services provided hereunder are set forth in the Order Form.
Service
Description
Discovery
Conduct remote discovery sessions to assist with identifying Customer's integration settings of Branch and review documentation of their configuration
Gather information on Customer’s use cases and priorities
Meet with Customer’s key stakeholders and personnel to gather information about the Customer's current system and integration of Branch
Engagement Management
Support Customers in tracking requests and action items
Conduct regular cadence check-ins to review status of the Audit Services and any issues or problems identified during the engagement
Provide guidance and assistance in identifying key use cases and their expected benefits
Actively monitor for and escalate risks and issues as they pertain to the Audit Services
Integration Assessment
Review Customer’s configuration of its Branch dashboard
Review Customer’s integration of Branch’s iOS and Android SDKs and associated use cases
Review Customer’s integration of their Branch provisioned products and associated use cases
Review analytics tag usage for data hygiene
Summary Findings; Recommendations
Present audit findings to the Customer
Provide assessment of Customer’s Branch integration and outline recommendations on how to leverage Branch’s Services and their provisioned products and use cases
PROJECT ROLES & RESPONSIBILITIES
The following table sets forth a list of Project roles (not individuals) required to complete the Project. A single individual may take responsibility for any number of roles, or a single role may require more than one individual. Customer acknowledges its participation is critical for Project success.
Role
Responsibility
Frequency
Estimated Hours
Sponsor
Responsible for providing Customer resources needed for successful Project Completion, and promote process change where necessary
Monthly
5 Hours per Month
Project Manager
Responsible for the oversight of Customer resources, schedules and responsibilities including:
Attending all key Project meetings
Being a point of contact for day-to-day operations
Securing participation (as required) of key business process owners
Participating in Project meetings
Weekly
2 Hours per Week
Functional Consultant(s) / Business Process Owner(s)
Responsible for review and acceptance of Branch integration, and identification of exceptions/risks
Attends Project meetings related to area of ownership
Assists in the definition of unique processes outside of standard Branch practices
Participates in user acceptance testing activities
Weekly
2 Hours per Week
Extended Team
Additional Customer resources as needed to support the scope of the Project
Weekly
2 Hours per Week
III.
ASSUMPTIONS
Unless otherwise noted in this SOW or agreed to in writing by the Parties, the following assumptions are based on information provided by the Customer relating to the Project and have been used to estimate Branch PS’s required time, level of effort, and fees. Deviations from these assumptions may lead to commensurate changes in the timeline and fees and will be handled through a formal Change Order.
The Audit Services will be provided for the Branch App ID(s) specified in the Order Form. Upon the Effective Date, Customer shall make available to Branch the resources necessary to support completion of the Project described in this SOW.  Customer will assign a single Project Owner prior to commence the Project who will oversee and help coordinate across all Customer-side resources and tasks in collaboration with Branch PS throughout the Project. It is Customer’s responsibility to assess summary findings and recommendations provided by Branch PS under this SOW and execute any desired changes to Customer’s configuration of Branch’s Services to effectuate Branch’s recommendations. Customer will grant administrative access to its Branch dashboard, as well as an appropriate level of access to other platforms for required support for the Project.
Effective April 13th 2023
to
June 7th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Technical Audit Services
Statement of Work
This Technical Audit Services Statement of Work (“SOW”) describes the Technical Audit Services (herein referred to as “Audit Services” or “Professional Services”) to be performed by Branch Metrics, Inc. (“Branch”) for the customer purchasing the Audit Services, as set forth in the Order Form (“Customer”) (each a “Party”, collectively the “Parties”) to the extent Customer has purchased Audit Services, and is effective as of the date of Customer’s Order Form. By executing an Order Form that references this SOW, Customer agrees to the terms of this SOW and the Professional Services Terms & Conditions available at
https://legal.branch.io/#professional-services
(the “PS Terms”). Any capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein shall have the meaning set forth in the PS Terms.
SCOPE OF AUDIT SERVICES
Branch PS will provide Customer with resources to assist Customer, as set forth below (the “Project”), subject to Customer’s payment of all applicable fees as set forth in the applicable Order Form. Branch PS and Customer (collectively, the “Project Team”) will commit resources to work on the Project in accordance with the terms herein. The term of this SOW, the payment terms, and the fees for the Audit Services provided hereunder are set forth in the Order Form.
Audit Service
Description
Discovery
Conduct remote discovery sessions to assist with identifying Customer's integration settings of Branch and review documentation of their configuration
Gather information on Customer’s use cases and priorities
Meet with Customer’s key stakeholders and personnel to gather information about the Customer's current system and integration of Branch
Engagement Management
Support Customers in tracking requests and action items
Conduct regular cadence check-ins to review status of the Audit Services and any issues or problems identified during the engagement
Provide guidance and assistance in identifying key use cases and their expected benefits
Actively monitor for and escalate risks and issues as they pertain to the Audit Services
Integration Assessment
Review Customer’s configuration of its Branch dashboard
Review Customer’s integration of Branch’s iOS and Android SDKs and associated use cases
Review Customer’s integration of their Branch provisioned products and associated use cases
Review analytics tag usage for data hygiene
Summary Findings; Recommendations
Present audit findings to the Customer
Provide assessment of Customer’s Branch integration and outline recommendations on how to leverage Branch’s Services and their provisioned products and use cases
PROJECT ROLES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
The following table sets forth a list of Project roles (not individuals) required to complete the Project. A single individual may take responsibility for any number of roles, or a single role may require more than one individual. Customer acknowledges its participation is critical for Project success.
Role
Branch PS
Customer
Sponsor
Responsible for allocating Branch PS resources
Serve as escalation contact for issues not resolvable by Branch Project Manager
Advises the Branch PS team
Manages Project resources
Responsible for providing Customer resources needed for successful service delivery, and promote process change where necessary
Project Manager
Responsible for oversight of Branch PS resources, schedules. Supporting responsibilities include:
Attending all key Project meetings
Being a point of contact for day-to-day operations
Providing guidance and assistance for management of Project issues
Leading Project meetings
Responsible for the oversight of Customer resources, schedules and responsibilities including:
Attending all key Project meetings
Being a point of contact for day-to-day operations
Securing participation (as required) of key business process owners
Participating in Project meetings
Administrator
N/A
Responsible for ongoing Branch administration, once services are delivered
Manage user acceptance tasks, including QA testing, training and adoption
Manage organization’s ongoing Branch use
Functional Consultant(s) / Business Process Owner(s)
N/A
Responsible for review and acceptance of Branch integration, and identification of exceptions/risks
Attend Project meetings related to area of ownership
Assist in the definition of unique processes outside of standard Branch practices
Participate in user acceptance testing activities
Extended Team
As needed Branch PS resources (including Solution Architects, Subject Matter Experts, Technical and/or Education resources) to support the scope of the Project
Additional Customer resources as needed to support the scope of the Project
III.
ASSUMPTIONS
The Audit Services will be provided for the Branch App ID(s) specified in the Order Form. Upon the Effective Date, Customer shall make available to Branch the resources necessary to support completion of the Project described in this SOW.  Customer will assign a single Project Owner prior to commence the Project who will oversee and help coordinate across all Customer-side resources and tasks in collaboration with Branch PS throughout the Project. It is Customer’s responsibility to assess summary findings and recommendations provided by Branch PS under this SOW and execute any desired changes to Customer’s configuration of Branch’s Services to effectuate Branch’s recommendations. Customer will grant administrative access to its Branch dashboard, as well as an appropriate level of access to other platforms for required support for the Project.
Effective January 24th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Branch’s Subprocessors
The list below identifies vendors currently authorized by Branch to process personal data on Branch's behalf where Branch is providing services to customers as their processor, service provider, or equivalent under applicable privacy law(s). Branch will update the vendors listed on this page as appropriate, and will further provide any contractually-required additional notifications to customers.
Subprocessor
Description of Processing
Data Center Location(s)
Amazon Web Services (AWS)
Branch is hosted on AWS cloud servers
USA
Zendesk
Customer support ticketing platform
USA
Atlassian
Internal ticketing platform
USA
Software Minds, Inc.
Engineering support services
No data centers; Software Minds may access data center(s) Branch utilizes while providing support. Support team is located in Poland.
DataGrail, Inc.
Data subject request portal
USA
You can submit an email to
privacy@branch.io
to subscribe to receive email notifications regarding any new subprocessor.
Effective January 1st 2023
to
January 24th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Branch’s Subprocessors
The list below identifies vendors who process personal data on Branch's behalf where Branch is providing    services to customers as their processor, service provider, or equivalent under applicable privacy law(s).    Branch will update the vendors listed on this page as appropriate, and will further provide any    contractually-required additional notifications to customers.
Vendor Name
Purpose
Amazon Web Services (AWS)
Branch is hosted on AWS cloud servers
Zendesk
Branch data subject request portal
Atlassian
Internal tool used to process data subject requests
Effective December 22nd 2022
to
January 1st 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Branch’s Subprocessors
The list below identifies vendors who process personal data on Branch's behalf where Branch is providing services to customers as their processor, service provider, or equivalent under applicable privacy law(s). Branch will update the vendors listed on this page as appropriate, and will further provide any contractually-required additional notifications to customers.
Vendor Name
Purpose
Amazon Web Services (AWS)
Branch is hosted on AWS cloud servers
Zendesk
Branch data subject request portal
Atlassian
Internal tool used to process data subject requests
Effective December 6th 2022
to
December 22nd 2022
Download
Table of Contents
Branch’s Subprocessors
The list below identifies vendors who process personal data on Branch's behalf where Branch is providing services to customers as their processor, service provider, or equivalent under applicable privacy law(s). Branch will update the vendors listed on this page as appropriate, and will further provide any contractually-required additional notifications to customers.
Vendor Name
Purpose
Amazon Web Services (AWS)
Branch is hosted on AWS cloud servers
Twilio
Only for the Text-Me-the-App feature
Zendesk
Branch data subject request portal
Atlassian
Internal tool used to process data subject requests
Effective January 30th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Website Terms of Service
1. ACCEPTANCE OF TERMS OF SERVICE
Thank you for your interest in Branch Metrics, Inc. (“Branch”, “Us” or “We”) Please read these Website Terms of Service carefully before using any website, and any services made available via such website(s) (collectively, the “Site”) owned or operated by Branch. These terms and conditions, together with Branch’s
Privacy Policy
, which is available at
https://legal.branch.io/#branchio-privacypolicy
(collectively, “Terms”) govern your use of any Site that links to these Terms. Your use of the products and services that are made available online by Branch are governed by a separate agreement.
By clicking “Agree,” accessing, using, or otherwise logging into the Site you agree to be bound by these Terms. If you do not agree to these Terms, do not access or use this Site. Branch may modify these Terms at any time at its sole discretion, and as indicated by the “Effective Date” referenced above. By continuing to use or login to the Site after these Terms have changed, you agree to the revised Terms.
2. ACCESS AND USE RESTRICTIONS
You agree not to access or use the Site in any manner that violates any applicable law, regulation, or any industry guidelines or practices applicable to you or your use of the Site. Failure to comply with these restrictions may result in termination of your access to the Site pursuant to section 10 “Termination” within these Terms.
Whether on behalf of yourself or on behalf of any third party, you agree not to:
Copy, reproduce, modify, create derivative works of, publish, license, sell, distribute, scrape, reverse engineer, adapt, alter, emulate, translate, compile, decompile the Site or any portion thereof for any purpose without Branch’s prior express written authorization
Interfere with or violate any other user’s privacy rights, intellectual property rights, or other rights, or harvest or collect personally identifiable information or personal data (as defined in various data protection regulations) about visitors or users of the Site;
Access or attempt to access or use the Site or any portion thereof through any automated means including but not limited to using any robot, spider, crawler, script, site search or retrieval application
Access or attempt to access or use the Site other than through the interface provided by Branch, or through user accounts of others, without express prior written authorization from Branch;
Use the Site to store, transmit, distribute, display or otherwise make available any infringing or unlawful content, or store or transmit content which may infringe third party rights, including but not limited to intellectual property rights and privacy rights;
Impersonate any person or entity or provide false information on the Site, or otherwise misrepresent your affiliation with any person or entity, in connection with the Site;
Use the Site to store or transmit material containing software viruses, worms, trojan horses, or other malicious code, files, scripts, agents, or programs;
Engage in any activity that disrupts, overburdens, or interferes with the operation of the Site, or the servers or networks that host the Site or make the Site available, including disrupting or threatening the integrity or security of the Site, or interferes, or inhibits any other person from using the Site .
Spam, or send unsolicited email or similar conduct;
Transfer or assign any rights or obligations under these Terms, even temporarily, to a third party;
Use the Site for any fraudulent, illegal, immoral or unauthorized purpose; or
Frame or mirror any part of the Site, without Branch’s express prior written authorization.
3. ACCOUNTS
To access and use certain services, features or content on the Site you may be required to create an account and specify a password. Any information provided during your account registration must be current, complete, true and accurate. If you create an account or an account is created for you, you may not share your account information with anyone else and you agree to treat your account information as confidential. It is your sole responsibility to maintain the confidentiality of your account information and to prevent the unauthorized use of your account information. You must ensure that account information is current, complete, and accurate at all times. You must immediately notify Branch of any confidentiality breach or unauthorized use of your account or your account information. You are solely responsible for any and all activities that are conducted through your account. Branch reserves the right to suspend, disable, deactivate, or block your account at any time, for any lawful reason.
4. LINKS
The Site may include links to third party sites; such linked sites are not under Branch’s control and Branch is not responsible for the contents of any linked sites or any links contained in any linked sites, or any changes or updates to such sites. Branch is providing these links to you only as a convenience, and the inclusion of any link does not imply endorsement of, or affiliation with, any third party site by Branch. Branch reserves the right to remove any links at any time. YOUR ACCESS AND USE OF THIRD PARTY SITES IS AT YOUR OWN RISK AND IS SUBJECT TO ANY TERMS, CONDITIONS, AND POLICIES APPLICABLE TO SUCH THIRD PARTY SITES.
5. INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY
Except as otherwise specifically noted, the Site and the content included in or made available through the Site such as text, documents, names, logos, trademarks, service marks, brand identities, software characters, trade names, page headers, graphics, button icons, scripts, images, videos, designs, copyrights, trade dress, are and shall remain the exclusive property of of Branch and its affiliates or its licensors, and are protected under copyright, trademark and other intellectual property and proprietary rights laws. As between Branch and you, all right, title and interest in and to the Site and the content included in or made available through the Site will at all times remain with Branch and/or its licensors.
The word “Branch Metrics”, “Branch” and the “Branch” graphics, logos, and other marks, logos and titles are registered and/or common law trade names, trademarks or service marks of Branch and may not be used in any manner without prior written permission of Branch. All other names, logos, product and service names, designs and slogans that may appear on the Site are the property of their respective owners, who may or may not be affiliated with, connected to, or sponsored by Branch. Except as expressly provided herein, nothing on the Site shall be construed as conferring any license under Branch and/or its licensors’ intellectual property rights, whether by estoppel, implication or otherwise. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, Branch may revoke any of the foregoing rights and/or your access to the Site, or any part thereof, including the blocking of your IP Address, at any time without prior notice.
6. COPYRIGHT INFRINGEMENT
Branch is committed to respecting and protecting the intellectual property rights of others and asks that you do the same. We will respond to notices of alleged copyright infringement that comply with applicable law. If you believe in good faith that any materials accessible on or from the Site infringe upon your copyright, you may request removal of those materials (or access thereto) from the Site by submitting written notification (a “
DMCA
Notice
”) to our copyright agent (designated below) in accordance with the Online Copyright Infringement Liability Limitation Act of the Digital Millennium Copyright Act (17 U.S.C. § 512) (“
DMCA
”). See
http://www.copyright.gov/
for more information. Notices should be sent to:
Branch Copyright Agent
Branch Metrics, Inc.
1975 W El Camino Real Ste. 102
Mountain View, CA 94040
legal@branch.io
650-209-6461
7. DISCLAIMER
TO THE FULL EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, THE SITE AND ALL INFORMATION, CONTENT, MATERIALS, OR SERVICES INCLUDED ON OR OTHERWISE MADE AVAILABLE THROUGH THE SITE ARE PROVIDED ON AN “AS IS” AND “AS AVAILABLE” BASIS, AND BRANCH DISCLAIMS ALL WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, WHETHER EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, ANY IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, TITLE, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, AND NON-INFRINGEMENT WITH RESPECT TO THE OPERATION OF THIS SITE OR THE INFORMATION, CONTENT, MATERIALS, OR SERVICES INCLUDED ON OR OTHERWISE MADE AVAILABLE THROUGH THE SITE. BRANCH FURTHER DOES NOT REPRESENT OR WARRANT THAT THE SITE OR ANY PART THEREOF WILL ALWAYS BE AVAILABLE, ACCESSIBLE, FUNCTIONAL, UNINTERRUPTED, SECURE, ACCURATE, COMPLETE AND ERROR-FREE. BRANCH FURTHER DISCLAIMS ANY AND ALL WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND IN RELATION TO THE ACCURACY, CORRECTNESS AND COMPLETENESS OF THE CONTENT AVAILABLE ON THE SITE.
YOU EXPRESSLY AGREE THAT YOUR USE OF THE SITE IS AT YOUR OWN RISK.
8. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
TO THE FULL EXTENT PERMITTED UNDER APPLICABLE LAW, IN NO EVENT WILL
BRANCH AND/OR ITS AFFILIATES AND THEIR OFFICERS, DIRECTORS, EMPLOYEES OR AGENTS BE LIABLE FOR ANY LOSSES OR DAMAGES WHATSOEVER, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, PUNITIVE, CONSEQUENTIAL, OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES, OR, DAMAGES FOR LOSS OF PROFITS, LOSS OF REVENUE, GOODWILL, USE, DATA THAT IS INCOMPLETE, MISSING, OR INCORRECT, OR OTHER INTANGIBLE LOSSES , HOWEVER CAUSED CAUSED AND WHETHER AN ACTION IN CONTRACT, TORT OR UNDER ANY OTHER THEORY OF LIABILITY (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE), ARISING FROM OR IN CONNECTION WITH YOUR ACCESS TO, OR USE OF, THE SITE OR ANY INFORMATION, CONTENT, OR MATERIALS, MADE AVAILABLE ON OR THROUGH THE SITE, WHETHER OR NOT BRANCH HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES.
9. INDEMNIFICATION
To the full extent permitted by applicable law, you agree to defend, indemnify, release, and hold harmless Branch, its Affiliates and their officers, agents, employees, representatives, and assigns from and against any third party claims, demands, suits, actions, costs, damages, and expenses (including, without limitation, reasonable attorneys’ fees) arising out of or relating to: (a) your use of the Site, (b) your violation or alleged violation of these Terms.
10. TERMINATION
Branch may, in its sole discretion, at any time for any reason or no reason, with or without notice, terminate your access to the Site, including if Branch believes that you have violated or acted inconsistently with the Terms or if it is required by applicable law, regulation, court or governing agency order.
11. SURVIVAL; MODIFICATION
Branch reserves the right to modify the Site, including adding, amending, suspending, or removing functionality, features, material and content on the Site, and these Terms at any time without notice. Upon termination of the Terms, those sections of these Terms that by their nature would reasonably be expected to survive will survive termination or expiration of these Terms, including but not limited to the sections on Termination, Disclaimers, Proprietary Rights, Limitation of Liability, and Indemnity.
12. FEEDBACK
Branch may provide you with a mechanism to provide feedback, suggestions, and ideas, if you choose, relating to the Site or any part thereof ("
Feedback
"). You agree that Branch may, in its sole discretion, use the Feedback you provide to Branch in any way, including in future enhancements and modifications to its products or services. You hereby grant to Branch and its assigns a perpetual, worldwide, fully transferable, sub-licensable, fully paid-up, irrevocable, royalty-free license to use, reproduce, modify, create derivative works from, distribute, and display the Feedback in any manner for any purpose, in any media, software, or technology of any kind now existing or developed in the future, without any obligation to provide attribution or compensation to you or any third party.
13. PRIVACY POLICY
Branch respects your privacy. Our website
Privacy Policy
is incorporated herein by reference and describes the collection, use, and sharing of certain personally identifiable information that may be provided in connection with the use of the Site. Please read and understand our Privacy Policy before accessing or using the Site.
14. GOVERNING LAW
Any and all claims arising out of or relating to the Site or these Terms shall be governed by and construed under the laws of the State of California, without regard to its conflict of law provisions.
15. GENERAL
These Terms constitute the entire agreement between you and Branch with respect to your use of this Site and supersede all prior or contemporaneous communications and proposals, whether electronic, oral or written, between you and Branch with respect to this Site. A party may only waive its rights under these Terms, by a written document executed by both parties. Any failure to enforce any provision of these Terms shall not constitute a waiver thereof or of any other provision hereof. If any provision of these Terms is found by a court of competent jurisdiction to be unenforceable or invalid, that provision will be limited or eliminated to the minimum extent necessary so that the other provisions of these Terms will otherwise remain in full force and effect and enforceable.
16. ASSIGNMENT
These Terms, and any rights and licenses granted hereunder, are not assignable, transferable or sublicensable by you except with Branch’s prior written consent. Branch may transfer and assign any of its rights and obligations under these Terms freely and without consent.
17. FORCE MAJEURE
Neither Party or it affiliates, subsidiaries, officers, directors, employees, agents, partners, and licensors will be responsible for any delay or failure in performance of any part of these Terms to the extent that such delay or failure is caused by an event or circumstance beyond the reasonable control of the Party whose performance is affected and could not have been prevented or corrected through the exercise of reasonable diligence, including, for example, an act of God, act of government, flood, fire, earthquake, civil unrest, act of terror, strike or other labor problem (other than one involving Branch employees), Internet service provider failure or delay, integrated third party applications, or denial of service attack (each such event, a “
Force Majeure Event
”). The Party alleging a Force Majeure Event (the “
Affected Party
”) will promptly notify the other Party in writing of the Force Majeure Event, providing reasonable detail of the circumstances giving rise to the Force Majeure Event, and the steps it is taking to remedy the delay or failure. Notwithstanding the foregoing, financial incapability will not be considered as a Force Majeure Event.
18. CONTACTING US
If you have any questions or concerns about the Site or these Terms you may send an email to
legal@branch.io
.
Sub-policy 4
https://mixpanel.com/legal/privacy-policy/:

Sub-policy 5
https://clevertap.com/privacy-policy/:
x
Talk to us
Learn how you can Unlock Limitless Customer Lifetime Value with CleverTap’s All-in-One Customer Engagement Platform.
See a tailored demo of CleverTap's key capabilities.
Get a walk-through of industry specific use cases.
Obtain answers to any questions about integration, go-live, and support.
Talk to us
Get to know CleverTap from the scratch. To book your personal product demo, fill out the form and start at your preferred date. Afterwards we will get in touch with you.
Please enter a valid work email
Please enter a valid phone number
Choose State/Province
Monthly Active Users (MAU) / Unique Visitors
Pre-launch
Under 50k
50k-99k
100k-250k
250k-750k
750k-1 million
1 million +
Don't know
Yes, I'd like to receive the latest news and other communications from CleverTap. You can unsubscribe anytime. For more details, go to the
Privacy Policy
.
By submitting this form, you agree to CleverTap's
Privacy Policy
Site is protected by reCAPTCHA (
Privacy
|
Terms
)
Submit
Thank you for your interest in CleverTap
We’ll get back to you soon!
Privacy Policy
Last Updated – 13th Aug, 2024
Introduction and Purpose of this Privacy Policy
WizRocket Inc. (a Delaware corporation) and its affiliates doing business as CleverTap (“CleverTap,” “we,” “us,” or “our”). CleverTap provides customers (“Customers”) with an online cloud-hosted solution providing them with the ability to analyze how their end users (“Customer End Users”) interact with Customers’ websites or mobile applications and contact Customer End Users via CleverTap’s platform (the “Service”)
CleverTap is committed to respecting your privacy and protecting your personal data. This privacy notice will inform you about CleverTap’s roles in managing personal data, the categories of personal data it collects, their sources, the purposes for using personal data, its practices in disclosing personal data, and how it secures personal data. This notice also tells you about your privacy rights and how to exercise them.
This privacy notice governs, among other things, CleverTap’s privacy practices regarding the clevertap.com website (the “Site”), its relationship with representatives of its business and organizational customers, representatives of other businesses, and candidates for jobs at CleverTap.
Please direct all privacy questions, comments, complaints, or requests to exercise privacy rights to CleverTap’s Data Protection Officer by using the following contact information:
Postal mail or courier: WizRocket Inc., Attention: Angel Indzhov, 607 W Dana St. Suite A Mountain View, CA 94041
Email:
privacy@clevertap.com
Web:
https://clevertap.com/contact-us/
Types of Personal Data Received by CleverTap.
CleverTap receives four categories of personal data via its Site, its marketing and business practices:
Personal data collected via CleverTap’s site from site visitors
Personal data collected from representatives of CleverTap’s Customers
Personal data collected from representatives of our vendors, business partners, and other businesses or organizations with which CleverTap has a relationship
Personal data collected from job candidates
Personal data of Customer End Users processed by CleverTap in connection with its operation of the CleverTap Service
CleverTap’s Role as Controller and Processor.
Data protection legislation such as the European Union’s General Data Protection Regulation defines two types of businesses that manage personal data. Data “controllers” determine the purposes and means of processing personal data. Controllers have direct contact with the individuals whose personal data is collected and used. By contrast, data “processors” process personal data on behalf of a controller as a service provider to the controller. Processors do not have direct contact with the individuals whose personal data is collected and used. CleverTap acts as both a data controller and a data processor. However, this privacy notice focuses only CleverTap’s activities as a controller.
CleverTap’s Role as Controller.
When CleverTap manages personal data collected from its site; representatives of its Customers; representatives of vendors, business partners, and other businesses or organizations; and job candidates, CleverTap acts as a controller. As mentioned above, this privacy notice focuses only CleverTap’s role as controller.
CleverTap’s Role as Processor.
When CleverTap processes personal data of Customer End Users via the Service, CleverTap is acting as a processor. As a processor, CleverTap provides its Customers with an online cloud-hosted solution allowing them to analyze how Customer End Users inter act with their websites or mobile applications. CleverTap’s function is limited to providing and managing the Service and the control on the usage, transmission of personal data, is always in accordance with the discretion of a Customer and how a Customer interacts and uses the Service and the agreement between CleverTap and the Customer. However, it is each Customer that has the direct relationship with its Customer End Users. Our Customers would handle all privacy questions, comments, complaints, or requests to exercise privacy rights from Customer End Users under their own privacy policies. If you are an end user of a website or mobile application of one of our Customers, and wish to discuss any privacy matters, please contact the operator of the website or mobile application, not CleverTap.
Customers should be prepared to handle requests for individual rights from Customer End Users regarding personal data about their use of Customers’ websites or mobile applications.
If CleverTap receives a request for individual rights from a Customer End User, CleverTap will use reasonable efforts to identify the applicable Customer and direct the request to that Customer.
Personal Data We Collect, Sources of Personal Data, and Purposes of Use.
Personal Data Collected from Site Visitors
CleverTap collects several types of information from and about users of our site, including information by which you may be personally identified, such as name, company name, e-mail address, telephone number, or any other identifier by which you may be contacted online or offline (“identifiers”). We may also collect from job candidates, in the nature of professional or employment-related information, including education, employment, and employment history.Also, if you use a web form on the Site to communicate with us, we will collect your name, work email, Company name, country, and whatever personal data you include in your message to us. The You are the source of this data. The legal basis for processing this personal data is your consent.
Finally, CleverTap may obtain analytics data in aggregate form or that does not relate or identify an individual. This is not personal data. CleverTap reserves the right to use and disclose this non-personal data without restriction.
Personal Data Collected from CleverTap’s Customers.
Personal Data collected from Representatives of CleverTap’s Customers. CleverTap collects Personal Data from Customer Representatives relating to Customer accounts and management of them. For instance, when Customer Representatives engage in certain activities via the CleverTap Service, including but not limited to creating an account, sending feedback, or otherwise using or participating in the CleverTap Service (collectively, “Identification Activities”), we may ask Customer Representatives to provide certain information. If they elect to engage in an Identification Activity, however, we may ask them to provide us with certain Personal Data, such as name, address (including zip code), email address and/or telephone number. Depending on the Identification Activity, some of the information we ask Customer Representatives to provide may be identified as mandatory and some identified as voluntary. If Customer Representatives do not provide mandatory information for a particular Identification Activity, they will not be permitted to engage in that Identification Activity with the CleverTap Service.
As Customer Representatives navigate the CleverTap Service, we may also collect information through the use of commonly-used information-gathering tools, such as cookies and Web beacons (“Web Site Navigational Information”). Web Site Navigational Information includes standard information from Customers Representative’s Web browsers (such as browser type and browser language), their Internet Protocol (“IP”) address, and the actions they take on the CleverTap Service (such as the Web pages viewed and the links clicked). Through our “import Customer End Users” feature option, a Customer Representative may also provide us with Personal Data about other Customer Representatives such as the name, company name, address, phone number, email address, and/or IP address of the Customer Representatives that you choose to share with us. When you provide us with Personal Data about Customer Representatives that have not provided Personal Data to us, we will only use this information for the specific reason for which it is provided, such as to add new records to your CleverTap account, or as agreed in the applicable agreement with Customer.
We may use Personal Data from Customer Representatives to provide products and/or services to Customers, collect payment for our products and/or services, administer sweepstakes and contests, enhance the operation of the CleverTap Service, improve our marketing and promotional efforts, analyze use of the CleverTap Service, improve the CleverTap Service, and tailor the experience of Customer Representatives in using the CleverTap Service. We may also use Personal Data to troubleshoot, resolve disputes, accomplish administrative tasks, contact Customer Representatives, enforce our agreements with Customers, including our Master SaaS Subscription Agreements or Terms of Service, and this Privacy Policy, comply with applicable law, and cooperate with law enforcement activities. The CleverTap Service may include social media features such as the Facebook “like” button or other associated social media buttons and widgets and such social media features which are hosted by a third party or directly on the CleverTap Service may collect Customer Representatives’ IP addresses and other information. Such interactions are governed by the applicable privacy policy of those social media features.
Customer End User Data.
As part of the provision of the CleverTap Service to Customers, CleverTap collects certain Personal Data and other, Non-Personal Data about Customer End Users as determined by the applicable Customer (“Customer End User Data”). CleverTap does not control or otherwise approve any messages or requests for Customer End User Data made by a Customer to a Customer End User. Customer End Users should be aware that a Customer can request such Customer End User Data from them in order to use the Customer’s website(s) and/or mobile application(s) and that Customer End User Data may then be included in information given to CleverTap through your use of the CleverTap Service. Therefore, Customer End Users should review the privacy policy of a Customer’s website and/or mobile application to assess the security of any information a Customer End User discloses. To the extent that CleverTap does receive any Customer End User Data, CleverTap shall make reasonable efforts, consistent with the terms of this Privacy Policy, to maintain the confidentiality of such Customer End User Data. CleverTap has no direct relationship to the Customer End Users whose Customer End User Data it processes and such Customer End User who seeks access, or who seeks to correct, amend, or delete inaccurate Customer End User Data should direct his or her query to the applicable Customer for removal. Once such Customer requests removal of such applicable Customer End User Data, CleverTap will respond to such request within one month; provided that (i) such period may be extended by up to 2 additional months when necessary, taking into account the complexity and number of the requests and (ii) CleverTap shall inform you of any such extension within one month of receipt of the request, together with the reasons for the delay.
CleverTap’s Customers may electronically submit Customer End User Data to the CleverTap Service. CleverTap will not review, share, distribute, or reference any such Customer End User Data except as provided in CleverTap’s applicable agreement with Customer, or as may be required by applicable law. CleverTap acknowledges that Customer End Users have the right to access their Personal Data. If Personal Data pertaining to a Customer End User has been submitted to us by a Customer, and a Customer End User wishes to exercise any rights it may have to access, correct, amend, or delete such Personal Data, the Customer End User should inquire with the Customer directly. Because CleverTap personnel have limited ability to access data our Customers submit to the CleverTap Service, if a Customer End User wishes to make a request directly to CleverTap, please provide the name of the Customer who submitted your data to the CleverTap Service. We will refer your request to such Customer and will support them as needed in responding to your request within one month; provided that (i) such period may be extended by up to 2 additional months when necessary, taking into account the complexity and number of the requests and (ii) CleverTap shall inform you of any such extension within one month of receipt of the request, together with the reasons for the delay.
Personal Data Collected from Representatives of Vendors, Business Partners, and Other Businesses.
We collect Business Card Data from representatives of CleverTap’s vendors, business partners, and other businesses and organizations with which CleverTap has a relationship. We use this personal data to communicate with these businesses and organizations and in order to initiate, maintain, and terminate our relationship with them. Representatives of these businesses and organizations are the source of this information and the legal basis for processing this personal data is the performance of a contract with the applicable business or organization or the legitimate interests of CleverTap or the business or organization.
Personal Data Collected from Job Candidates.
Job candidates can view open positions at CleverTap on the Site and apply for these positions. The portion of the Site for job candidates is managed by
Lever
, an Employ Inc. brand, acting as a service provider to CleverTap. Candidates submit personal data to CleverTap using this portion of the Site, and candidates are the sources of this personal data.
CleverTap collects full name, email address, phone number, resume/CV, LinkedIn profile, expected salary information, notice period, and the candidate’s current location from every job candidate. Optionally, job candidates may submit the name of their current employers, Twitter URL, Github or portfolio URL, other websites, and any other personal data that the candidate provides using the Lever web form, such as a cover letter.
We use personal data collected from job candidates to review, consider, and process their job applications. The legal basis for processing this personal data is the consent of job candidates. If a job candidate withholds or withdraws such consent, we will not be able to consider the job candidate for a CleverTap position.
California resident job candidates: CleverTap has a separate notice of privacy practices covering job candidates who are California residents. California residents should consult the CleverTap Notice of Workplace Privacy Practices for California Candidates and Workers to understand CleverTap’s California privacy practices and their privacy rights.
Cookie Policy.
To facilitate and customize your experience with the CleverTap Service, we may store cookies on your computer or other similar device through which you access the CleverTap Service. A cookie is a small text file that is stored on your computer or other devices for record-keeping purposes that contains information about you. We use cookies to save you time while using the CleverTap Service, remind us who you are, and track and target your interests in order to provide a customized experience. Cookies also allow us to collect information collected on an aggregate basis that does not identify you, like which pages you visited, what links you clicked on, and how you used the CleverTap Service. Most browsers automatically accept cookies. However, you may be able to modify your browser settings to decline cookies. If you decline cookies, however, you may be unable to use some of the functionality of the Site.
Sharing or Disclosing Personal Data.
CleverTap does not sell the personal data described in this notice in the ordinary course of its business. CleverTap may disclose or share personal data under the circumstances described below.
Authorized Service Providers.
CleverTap provides the Service with the assistance of third parties. These “Service Providers” perform functions on our or your behalf. You or we may share personal data with such Service Providers to fulfill orders, analyze collected personal data, operate the Service, collect payment for the Service, troubleshoot, and provide customer service. We may also share your information with Service Providers to accomplish our administrative tasks. We require our Service Providers to maintain data protection policies and procedures at least as protective of personal data as the practices described in this privacy notice.
Corporate Transactions.
We may share or transfer personal data about you in connection with a merger, acquisition, reorganization, or sale of assets of our business, in the event of bankruptcy, or during the negotiations leading to such an event. We will seek assurances from any buyer that your personal data will be used, shared, maintained, and disclosed consistent with the terms of this privacy notice.
Cross-Border Transfers of Personal Data.
Exports of Personal Data.
CleverTap may process your personal data in and transfer it to a country other than where you are located. The privacy laws in these other countries may be different from your country of residence and may not offer the level of protection in your own country. We may maintain your personal data in any country in which we have an office or facility or in countries where our Service Providers are located. We will only process personal data and allow Service providers to process personal data in jurisdictions with an adequate level of protection for personal data or use another lawful transfer mechanism to provide an adequate level of protection when exporting personal data covered by this notice.
EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Compliance.
CleverTap has certified to the U.S. Department of State that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Policy Principles intended as a transfer mechanism to provide an adequate level of protection when exporting personal data to the United States. See
CleverTap’s EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Policy
for details.
Securing Your Personal Data.
We are committed to ensuring that your personal data is secure. In order to prevent unauthorized access or disclosure, we have put in place industry-standard administrative, physical, and technical safeguards to secure the personal information we collect.
Customer representatives using the Service use authentication credentials or mechanisms to limit access to the Service. We require Customer representatives to protect these credentials or mechanisms by agreement.
Customer End User Data resides on a secure server that only selected personnel and contractors have access to. We encrypt certain sensitive information using session encryption initiated by Secure Socket
However, no data transmission can be guaranteed to be 100% secure. As a result, while we employ industry standard security measures to protect personal data being transmitted and seek to partner with companies that do the same, we cannot guarantee the security of any information transmitted over the Internet, and we are not responsible for the actions of any third parties involved in the transmission of personal data.
Links to Other Websites.
Our Site may contain links to other websites of interest. However, once you have used these links to leave our Site, you should note that we do not have any control over that other website. Therefore, we cannot be responsible for the protection and privacy of any information which you provide while visiting such websites and these websites are not governed by this policy. You should exercise caution and look at the privacy statement applicable to the website in question.
Your Rights Regarding Personal Data.
We provide the following rights under this privacy notice, which mirror your rights under the EU’s General Data Protection Regulation. Your rights described in this section may be limited by applicable law and there may be circumstances under applicable in which CleverTap must or is permitted to limit or deny your request.
Right of Access.
You have a right to disclosure of the categories of personal data collected by CleverTap, the purposes of processing it, the categories of recipients of your personal data, and (where we obtained personal data by your consent or by automated means) copies of electronic information for data portability purposes.
Right to Rectification.
You have the right to update or correct personal data about you in our records. Please be aware that applicable law may require or permit CleverTap to preserve some of your personal information as it is presently stored in our systems. Also, Customer representatives may change any of their applicable personal data by logging into their account and accessing the relevant section of the CleverTap Service. We encourage Customer representatives to promptly update their personal data to facilitate continuity of service.
Right of Erasure of Personal Data.
If you wish for CleverTap to delete your personal data, please contact us. Please be aware that applicable law may permit or require CleverTap to retain some of your personal data.
Right to Restrict or Suspend Processing of Personal Data.
If you contest the accuracy of personal data in our records, you believe our processing of personal data is unlawful (but you don’t wish for us to delete it), you have asked us to preserve personal data for legal reasons even though CleverTap no longer needs it, or you otherwise object to our processing it, please contact us.
Right to Withdraw Consent.
If we have relied on your consent to process personal data, you may withdraw your consent at any time by contacting us. For instance, CleverTap offers the option to opt out of routine marketing communications from us. Note that even if you opt out of receiving communications from us, we reserve the right to continue communicating with you regarding announcements, administrative messages, and messages regarding account administration relating to the Service that are necessary to our relationship with you and performance of our contract with the applicable Customer.
Exercising Your Rights.
To exercise any of the rights listed in Section 12, please contact us using the contact information.
We may need additional information to act on your request to exercise your rights. For instance, we may ask for information to confirm your identity as a security measure to prevent unauthorized access to your personal data.
We will respond to your request within the time limits provided under applicable law. If we deny your request, we will provide the reasons for the denial and the contact information of a CleverTap representative as a point of contact for following up.
We may deny your request if your request is manifestly unfounded or excessive (for instance because you make repetitive requests).
Right to Complain.
You have the right to make a complaint at any time to the Republic of Bulgaria’s Commission for Personal Data Protection, the Bulgarian supervisory authority for data protection issues (https://www.cpdp.bg/en/). We would, however, appreciate the chance to address your concerns before you approach the Bulgarian supervisory authority. So please contact us first before lodging a complaint. You may also have the right to submit a complaint to a supervisory authority or regulator in your local jurisdiction.
Notice to California Residents.
If you are a resident of the state of California, USA, California law may provide you with additional rights regarding our use of your personal data (which California law calls “personal information”). To learn more about your California privacy rights, visit
https://clevertap.com/ccpa/
.
Children.
Anyone CleverTap deals with as a potential or current representative or a Customer or other business or organization must be at least 18 years if age. If a business or organization becomes aware that a child has provided us with personal data purporting to be a representative, please contact using the contact information in Section 1 so that we can delete it.
CleverTap Applications
Developer: CT Device Platforms Team
Clevertap Applications:
CleverTap Signed Call (com.clevertap.directcall): A signed call application that demonstrates the capabilities of CleverTap’s technology.
Signed Call Sales Demo (com.clevertap.signedcalldemo): A sales demo application that showcases the features and benefits of CleverTap’s signed call functionality.
CT Sample (com.clevertap.demo): A sample application that provides a glimpse into the capabilities of CleverTap’s technology.
CleverTap Demo App (com.clevertap.ct_mart): A demo application that demonstrates the features and functionality of CleverTap’s platform.
All applications developed by the CT Device Platforms Team are subject to CleverTap’s privacy policy. The CT Device Platforms Team is associated with CleverTap and is responsible for the development and maintenance of these applications
Amendments to this Notice.
CleverTap may change this privacy notice from time to time by posting a revised copy of the notice on the Site. Any amended notice will be effective as of the date at the top of the notice.
Live Event
Join us for the 2nd Annual GDC Product x LiveOps Symposium on Mar 19
Apply to Attend
Analyst Report
CleverTap Recognized in the 2025 Gartner® Magic Quadrant™ for Personalization Engines
Download Report 🚀
Analyst Report
CleverTap Recognized in the 2025 Gartner® Magic Quadrant™ for Personalization Engines
Download Report 🚀
Analyst Report
CleverTap Recognized in the 2025 Gartner® Magic Quadrant™ for Personalization Engines
Download Report 🚀
Analyst Report
CleverTap Recognized in the 2025 Gartner® Magic Quadrant™ for Personalization Engines
Download Report 🚀
Analyst Report
CleverTap Recognized in the 2025 Gartner® Magic Quadrant™ for Personalization Engines
Download Report 🚀
Sub-policy 6
https://www.appsflyer.com/privacy-policy/:
Platform
Measure
Measurement suite
Measure every action on mobile, web and CTV
ROI measurement
Understand your true mobile marketing ROI
Creative Optimization
Unlock creative performance with the power of AI
Analyze
Marketing analytics
Turn insights on campaign performance into action
Incrementality
Prove the real value of your marketing campaigns
Engage
CX & deep linking
Boost revenue with exceptional customer experience
Audience segmentation
Create meaningful conversations with your customers
Protect
Fraud protection
Protect your marketing budget from mobile ad fraud
Collaborate
Privacy Cloud
Collaborate with your partners in a privacy-centric way
AppsFlyer Data Collaboration Platform
First-party data monetization that fuels retail media growth
Partner marketplace
Connect to over 10,000 tech and media partners
Interactive product tours
iOS 14+ solutions
Data feeds & APIs
Solutions
Team
Marketing
Product
Data & Analytics
R&D
Goal
Regain iOS visibility
Kickstart app growth
Scale user acquisition
Increase engagement & LTV
Maximize ROAS
Industry
Gaming
Shopping
Finance
Food & drink
Health & fitness
Travel
Platform
iOS
Android
PC & console
CTV & OTT
Web
Mobile
Web3
Partnerships
Tech and media partners
Agency partners
Partner Program
Interactive product tours
Customer stories
The AppsFlyer difference
Learn
Resources
Stay informed with industry insights, the latest trends, original content, and all things AppsFlyer
Ecosystem
Blog
Reports & guides
Events & webinars
Tools & templates
Industry benchmarks
Videos
Podcasts
Glossary
Metrics comparison
Customers
Customer stories
Product news
Use cases
Help center
Developer Hub
AppsFlyer Learning
Come to MAMA
Company
Who we are
Find out more about our history, our team, what we stand for, and why we do what we do
About us
Newsroom
CEO blog spot
Trust hub
Careers
Social impact
Contact
From our CEO
The future of our ecosystem and web
On privacy and user experience
Aggregated advanced privacy
Pricing
Login
Sign up free
Contact sales
Legal hub
MSA
Site Terms
Website Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
DPA
Opt Out
Processing Customer Data
Supplier Portal
Subprocessors
Modern Slavery Statement
Documentation
MSA
Site Terms
Website Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
DPA
Opt Out
Processing Customer Data
Supplier Portal
Subprocessors
Modern Slavery Statement
Website Privacy Policy
Last updated May 28, 2024
This Privacy Policy applies to: (i) use of the AppsFlyer owned and operated Websites (appsflyer.com, onelink.me and their subdomains); (ii) our marketing activities including, registrations as part of webinars, conference events, emails etc.; and (iii) any other product or activity that links to, or otherwise references, this privacy policy (collectively, the “Marketing Platforms“). We respect your privacy rights and value your trust. This Privacy Policy describes how we collect, receive, use, store, share, transfer, and process your personal information, as well as your rights in determining what we do with the information that we collect or hold about you.
This Privacy Policy does not apply to information collected through use by customers of the AppsFlyer service, which is described under our
Services Privacy Policy
.
Information We Collect
When using or interacting with our Marketing Platforms, we may collect or receive the following types of information (collectively, “Information”).
“Personal Information” such as name, email, contact details or any other personal content that you provide to us whether through a form or field on our website or any other communication (e.g. email, phone, post etc.).
“Technical Information” such as browser type, operating system, device type, IP address and other similar technical information typically received from a browser or device automatically when visiting or interacting with our Marketing Platforms. This may include the referring URL that led you to our website.
“Usage Information” such as the pages you visited on our website, where you clicked, searches performed on our website and other similar information related to how you have used our website. It may also include information related to whether you receive, opened or clicked on any links in an email sent to you.
We understand that certain Technical information or Usage Information may, either alone or when combined with other data, be deemed personal data under various laws and jurisdictions and we are committed to treating such data in compliance with applicable laws.
The Methods We Use to Collect and Receive Information
Depending on the type of Information, we may collect or receive Information in the following ways:
When you voluntarily share Information with us. For example, when you register to one of our events, request that we contact you through our online forms, submit your CV, or when you request to receive certain content that we may make available (e.g. research and white papers).
Through use of cookies and other similar technologies (e.g. HTML5 Local Storage, LSO, web beacons, JavaScript, etc.). These technologies help us to analyze how our Marketing Platforms are used and to tailor content that is relevant to you. It also helps us to deliver more relevant advertisements to you on our own or third party sites. For more information on such technologies, including how to manage your cookie preferences please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Information obtained from third party sources. This includes Information received through the various business support tools and services that we use (e.g. marketing platforms, analytics services etc.) and public sources such as social media sites. We may combine the Information received through these sources with other Information we have in order to ensure our records are up to date and so that we are able to provide you with relevant content.
You have choices in how we collect and use Information. See the “
Your Choices
” section below for more information.
The Purposes
We use Information for the following purposes:
To process your inquiries and to respond to your requests. For example, when you contact us to learn more about our products or services or when you request to receive certain materials from us (e.g. white papers, research papers, product and services information). Additionally, if you submit your CV to us, we use it to evaluate your candidacy (including by assessing your qualifications and skills).
To send you information related to our services and products that we believe may interest you, such as newsletters or product and service updates. Such communications will be sent to you when you have chosen to receive such communication or when we have a legitimate interest to market our products and services. In any event, you will always be able to opt-out of receiving such communications. Opting out may be done either directly in the communication received or through the ways described in the instructions in the “
Your Choices
” section below.
To understand how you have used our Marketing Platforms and to customize them in accordance with your interests and past actions and choices. We do this based on our legitimate interest to operate our Marketing Platforms, diagnose any problems with the Marketing Platforms and to improve the Marketing Platforms and your experience when navigating through them.
In our legitimate interest to prevent fraud or harm to us or to any third party, and ensure the security of our network and services.
Where it is necessary for AppsFlyer to comply with its legal obligations and to exercise and enforce its legal rights.
We may use certain third-party marketing and advertising networks to help us market our products on our own website and on third party websites (e.g. remarketing ads across the Internet by Google).
Who We Share Information With
In order to conduct our business and operate our Marketing Platforms, we may share Information with various third parties, such as:
Our subsidiary companies and global branches.
Third parties that help us operate our Marketing Platforms (e.g. hosting company, recruitment platforms and agencies, payment processors, business management and email distribution service providers and other similar service providers). These companies are authorized to use your personal information only as necessary to provide these services to us.
When required by law, such as to comply with court orders, search warrants, regulatory orders, subpoenas, and other lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements;
Legal authorities, consultants, advisors or service providers when required to investigate, respond to, or prevent, fraud; or when required to ensure the security of our network and services and protect the safety of AppsFlyer or the public.
As part of any merger or acquisition of AppsFlyer, Information may be transferred to the merging or acquiring company, as well as to any advisors representing a party during discussions of such merger or acquisition.
AppsFlyer resellers, agents, partners or service providers acting on our behalf in connection with the offering of AppsFlyer’s products or services.
Third-party marketing and advertising networks to help us market our products on our own website and on third party websites (e.g. remarketing ads across the Internet by Google).
Without derogating from the foregoing, AppsFlyer may publish general aggregate and unidentifiable information (e.g. statistical information) relating to use of its Marketing Platforms.
Cross Border Data Transfers and Mechanisms
We may need to transfer Information to countries where we and/or our service providers operate. Such countries may be different from the country in which the data originated and where data protection laws may not be equivalent to, or offer the same protection as, those in your country. By using our Marketing Platforms, you agree to any such transfers. In any event, where appropriate given the nature of services, we will put in place agreements with our service providers to ensure a level of privacy consistent with the terms of this policy.
With regards to the collection, use, and retention of personal information transferred from the European Economic Area to the United States, please be assured that AppsFlyer continues to comply with all applicable laws in respect of such transfers and any data transfers to the United States will be governed by the Standard Contractual Clauses as set forth in our DPA with the relevant service provider.
AppsFlyer Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. AppsFlyer Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, as well as to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the DPF Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view AppsFlyer’s certification, please visit
Data Privacy Framework website
.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over AppsFlyer Inc.’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, and in case of onward transfer of data to third parties, AppsFlyer maintains liability.
In compliance with the DPF Principles, AppsFlyer is committed to resolving any complaints arising regarding our processing of your personal data. You may direct your queries to privacy@appsflyer.com and, in compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, we are committed to referring unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the DPF to Truste, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://trustarc.com/dispute-resolution/
for more information or to file a complaint. The services of Truste are provided at no cost to you and allow for binding arbitration.
Protecting Your Information
We strive to meet the highest standards of security measures across our business units. We have implemented appropriate technical and organizational measures based on industry-leading standards. Such measures are designed to protect against unauthorized access or unlawful processing of Personal Information and against accidental loss, destruction or damage of Personal Information. As part of such measures, we have established various policies and procedures that guide us, including in respect of asset management, access management, physical security, people security, product security, cloud and network infrastructure security, third-party security, vulnerability management, security monitoring, and incident response.
Information Storage and Retention
We may store Information on our own servers as well as those operated by third party data hosting providers. As specified in Section 5 above (Cross Border Transfers), such servers may be located worldwide. We will only retain your Personal Information for as long as necessary to pursue the purpose of the collection. We may also retain your Personal Information for such time needed to pursue our legitimate business interests, in connection with any legal claims and compliance with legal obligations. When we use your information for direct marketing purposes, we will retain your data until you opt-out from receiving the marketing materials; provided that we will need to retain certain information to maintain a record of your request.
Modifications to This Policy
AppsFlyer may amend this Privacy Policy at any time, provided that in the event of a material change we shall provide notice on this page and/or a note near the link to this page. The updates shall apply immediately for new Information collected or provided as of the day of the update and following thirty (30) days for any Information collected or provided to AppsFlyer prior to the update date. If you do not agree to the terms of the new policy you are requested to contact the Legal Department using the contact details listed in Section 11 below. We encourage you to periodically review this page for any updates.
Your Choices
We provide you with various choices on how we may use Information in connection with: (i) our marketing activities; and (ii) our use of cookies and similar technologies to serve your interest-based advertisements and to analyze usage of our Marketing Platforms.
You may choose to stop receiving our newsletter or marketing emails by following the unsubscribe instructions included in these emails, accessing the email preferences in your account settings page, or you can contact us at
https://www.appsflyer.com/company/contact/
. You can manage your preferences related to our use of cookies and similar technologies that we use, among other things, to provide you with targeted interest-based advertisements and to analyze your use of our Marketing Platforms – please see our
Cookie Policy
for instructions. Additionally, certain advertisers (including Google) we work with may be members of NAI and/or the Digital Advertising Alliance. You may opt-out from such advertisers’ services here or at the following link:
https://youradchoices.com/
In addition, the laws of some jurisdictions may provide you with various rights in connection with our processing of certain Information. Such rights may include:
The right to withdraw any previously provided consent;
The right to access certain information about you that we process;
The right to have us correct or update any Personal Information;
The right to have certain Information erased;
The right to have us temporarily block our processing of certain Information;
The right to have Information exported into common machine-readable format;
The right to object to our processing of Information in cases of direct marketing, or when we rely on legitimate interests as our lawful basis to process your information; and
The right to lodge a complaint with the appropriate data protection authority.
We will respond to your requests within a reasonable timeframe. Please note these rights may be limited in certain circumstances as provided by applicable law. For any additional information regarding such rights or to exercise any such rights please contact AppsFlyer at: privacy@appsflyer.com
If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
Social Media and Third Party Services
Our website may offer a blog with ‘comments’ section and various social media features, such as a ‘share’ button or links to third party websites and services, including Twitter, LinkedIn, Google+ and Facebook. When using any such features, certain information may be collected by such third parties, including your IP address or which page you are visiting on our website, and such third parties may set a cookie to enable the feature to function properly. Any data collected by such third parties is governed by such third party’s privacy policy. You are encouraged to carefully review such third party privacy policies.
Children’s Privacy
AppsFlyer does not knowingly collect or process personal data from or with respect to children under the age of 16, and you must be 16 years of age or older in order to establish an account for AppsFlyer’s Services. If you are a parent or legal guardian and believe that your child under the age of 16 has submitted his or her personal data or other data without your consent, permission, or authorization – please let us know immediately, and we will promptly act to remove your child’s data from our database, cease the use of such data and inform any other party we suspect to have access to such data to do the same.
California Privacy Rights
We may collect personal information about California residents who are afforded additional rights under the California Consumer Privacy Act, Cal. Civ. Code §§ 1798.100 et seq. (the “CCPA“). If you are a California resident, you can see more details about the types of personal information we have collected from you in the past 12 months and may collect from you in Section 1 above (
Information We Collect
) and how we collect such personal information in Section 2 above (
The Methods We Use to Collect and Receive Information
). The purposes for which we collect your personal information are further described in Section 3 above (
The Purpose
). We do not share your personal information with any third party except as further described in Section 4 above (
Who We Share Information With
). Please refer to the other terms of this Privacy Policy to see further rights afforded to you and how we use your personal information.
We do not “Sell” (as defined in the CCPA) your personal information which we have collected or may collect and in the event we will Sell your personal information, we will notify you by updating this Privacy Policy in accordance with Section 8 above (
Modifications to this Policy
) and we will provide you with the option of opting out of such “sale”.
You, as a California resident, have certain rights regarding your personal information pursuant to the CCPA, subject to certain restrictions under applicable laws, including the rights to access your personal information, to delete your personal information, and to opt out of the “sale” of your personal data. You may request any of these by contacting us via email at
privacy@appsflyer.com
or by physical mail to: AppsFlyer Ltd. (Attn: Legal Dept.) 14 Maskit St., Herzliya, Israel. Upon your request, we will verify that you are the person making this request and in order to do so, we may request identification documents from you.
Contacting Us
If you have any questions or concerns about this Website Privacy Policy, the information we collect, the practices of AppsFlyer, or your dealings with the Marketing Platforms, please contact us or our Data Protection Officer by sending an email to:
privacy@appsflyer.com
or by physical mail to: AppsFlyer Ltd. (Attn: Legal Dept.) 14 Maskit St., Herzliya, Israel. For the purposes of Article 27 of the General Data Protection Regulation, the representative within the EU of AppsFlyer is AppsFlyer Germany Schönhauser Allee 180, 10119 Berlin, Germany (contact
privacy@appsflyer.com
; +49 30 166373500).
Sub-policy 7
https://www.freshworks.com/privacy/:
Privacy
Cookie Policy
Data hosting
TOMs
Sub-processors
Freshworks Privacy Notice
Effective Date
February, 5th 2025
For prior version, please click
here
Freshworks is committed to protecting your privacy. This Privacy Notice (“
Notice
”) describes how Freshworks processes personal data in connection with our business, including the provision of our website at (
https://www.freshworks.com/
) (“
Website
”) and our Services.
This Notice explains Freshworks’ approach to any Personal Data that we might collect from you, or which we have obtained about you from a third party, and the purposes for which we process your Personal Data in our capacity as a Controller (i.e. when Freshworks determines the purposes and means of the processing of personal data). It also describes your rights in respect of our processing of your Personal Data.
We process Personal Data in the countries in which we are established, including the United States, the United Kingdom and the European Economic Area (“EEA”) and in other countries where third parties that we may use are based.
While processing the Personal Data we comply with the principles and rules of the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) and to the rights of EU and UK individuals and Swiss individuals.
By transferring Personal Data to a third party where Freshworks is acting as a controller, we have the full responsibility that the processing of a third party as a processor takes place under the DPF Principles. Freshworks shall remain liable under the DPF Principles if its processors process Personal Data in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles, unless Freshworks proves that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
This Notice only applies to the use of your Personal Data by us or on our behalf. It does not apply to:
Personal Data collected by third parties during your communications/dealings with those third parties or your use of their products or services (for example, where you follow links to third party websites over which we have no control).
Personal Data processed, stored or hosted by us when we act as a Processor on behalf of our Customers in the course of providing our Services, in which case the privacy statement of the relevant Customer will apply, and our data processing agreement with such Customer will govern our processing of your Personal Data.
DEFINITIONS
The capitalized terms used in this Notice are defined in Annex 1.
QUICK LINKS
We recommend that you read this Notice in full to ensure you are fully informed. However, if you only want to access a particular section of this Notice, you can click on the relevant link below to jump to that section.
1. WHO IS THE DATA CONTROLLER?
2. WHO WE COLLECT PERSONAL DATA ABOUT?
3. WHAT PERSONAL DATA DOES FRESHWORKS COLLECT, HOW DO WE USE YOUR PERSONAL DATA AND WHAT LEGAL BASIS DO WE RELY ON?
4. WITH WHOM DO WE SHARE PERSONAL DATA?
5. INTERNATIONAL TRANSFER OF DATA
6. HOW DOES FRESHWORKS KEEP PERSONAL DATA SECURE?
7. EEA, UK AND SWISS SPECIFIC RIGHTS
8. CALIFORNIA-RESIDENT SPECIFIC RIGHTS
9. BRAZILIAN GENERAL DATA PROTECTION LAW (LGPD)
10. OPTING OUT PROCEDURE
11. OTHER COMMUNICATIONS
12. RETENTION OF PERSONAL DATA
13. LINKS TO THIRD-PARTY SITES
14. GOOGLE API DISCLOSURE
15. CHILDREN'S PERSONAL DATA
16. AMENDMENTS
17. EFFECT OF MERGER OR ACQUISITION
18. CONTACTING FRESHWORKS
1. WHO IS THE DATA CONTROLLER?
The Website and our Services are made available by various companies in the Freshworks group of companies (each a “
Group Company
”).
Where this Privacy Notice refers to “
Freshworks
”, “
we
”, “
us
, “
our
”, this means one or more of the particular Group Companies that provide the particular Website, Mobile Application, Newsletter or Services to you, recruits you, uses testimonials from you, sends marketing communications to you, hosts an event you visit, or organizes a program in which you participate.For the purposes of the GDPR and LGPD, the following Group Companies act as a data controller when the processing of your Personal Data is governed by the requirements of the GDPR or LGPD.
Location: United States
Freshworks Inc.
(company no: 4861858) is a company established under the laws of Delaware with its registered office at 16192 Coastal Highway, Lewes, Delaware 19958, USA and its principal business address can be found
here
.
Location: Germany
Freshworks GmbH
(company no: HRB 176669 B) is a company established under the laws of Germany and its registered office address can be found
here
.
Location: Netherlands
Freshworks Technologies B.V. (company no: 73582166) is a company established under the laws of the Netherlands and its registered office address can be found
here
.
Location: France
Freshworks SAS (company no: 842815581) is a company established under the laws of France and its registered office address can be found
here
.
Location: United Kingdom
Freshworks Technologies UK Limited (company no: 09338697) is a company established under the laws of England and Wales and its registered office address can be found
here
.
Location: India
Freshworks Technologies Private Limited (company no: U72200TN2010PTC078458) is a company established under the laws of India with its registered office at Module - 1 & 2, 1st Floor, Block B, No 40, Global Infocity Park, MGR Salai, Perungudi Chennai – 600096, Tamil Nadu, India
here
.
2. WHO WE COLLECT PERSONAL DATA ABOUT
We collect, process and store Personal Data about the following people:
Website visitors: If you browse our Website or contact us via our Website (Contact Sales) we will collect, process and store your Personal Data in connection with your interaction with us and our Website.
Users of our Services: If you use our Services, whether it is through our Website or our Mobile Applications, we will process your Personal Data for certain data analytics purposes and in order to offer, deliver and improve our Services.
Visitors to our Offices: If you visit our office, we may process Personal Data about you that you volunteer in connection with your visit and any enquiries you make. For example, you may volunteer Personal Data when signing in as a guest. CCTV footage may also be collected for security purposes.
Recipients of marketing communications from us: If you are a potential lead or existing customer, we may process Personal Data about you in order to send you marketing communications.
Event attendees: If you register for, attend or take part in our events, webinars or contests hosted by us we will process Personal Data about you in connection with your attendance at the event. For example, we may ask you to complete a registration or feedback form, or other documents relating to the event.
Personnel that work for our Customers, partners and suppliers (including subcontractors and personnel who work for us as freelancers or contractors). If you (or your organization) are:
in receipt of services from us;
supply products or services to us; or
otherwise partner with us;
We may collect, process and store your Personal Data in connection with our provision of those Services to you, our receipt of those Services from you and/or our partnership. This may include Personal Data included in any email or telephone communications or recorded on any document relating to an order for the Services.
Job applicants: If you apply for a job with us, whether through our Website or otherwise, we will collect, process and store your Personal Data in connection with your application.
Shareholders: If you are a shareholder of our Group Companies, we will process your personal data in relation to your investment and for our reporting obligations.
We also make available a Market Place platform where individuals can download applications developed by Freshworks or by third parties (the “
Applications
”). This Notice will apply to our processing of your Personal Data during your use of the Applications when the Applications are provided by us, and the Application shall include a link to this Notice. When Applications are provided by a third party, the privacy statement of the relevant third party will apply.
Hosted Data
Some of our Services include processing of data on behalf of our Customers in relation to applications, tools or software that we provide (“
Hosted Data
”). Save for the limited circumstances set out in this Notice, we are not the data controller of this Hosted Data as we do not determine the purposes or the means of the processing. If you believe your Personal Data is being processed by us in this way, you should refer to the privacy notice of the data controller on whose behalf we are acting.
3. WHAT PERSONAL DATA DOES FRESHWORKS COLLECT, HOW DO WE USE YOUR PERSONAL DATA AND WHAT LEGAL BASIS DO WE RELY ON?
WHAT PERSONAL DATA WE COLLECT AND HOW WE USE YOUR PERSONAL DATA
WHAT LEGAL BASIS DO WE RELY ON TO PROCESS YOUR PERSONAL DATA
A) Personal Data we collect directly from you (“Collected Data”)
Purpose: providing you with the Services.
We may use, retain and process your Personal Data for the following purposes when providing our Services:
to provide the Services.
to administer your account (including when you subscribe and sign-up to any of our Services)
to assess the needs of your business to suggest suitable Services and respond to service requests, questions or concerns.
to facilitate your transactions with other users when you use our Services.
to prevent or respond to any misuse of our Services or Applications or any violations of our Terms and any applicable laws.
to collect subscription fees.
The data processed includes:
contact information such as name, e-mail address, mailing address, IP address, geographic location, or phone number of the Account admin;
billing information, such as credit card number and billing address details about payments made between you and us; details of Services purchased from us;
name and e-mail address when Account admin/Agent(s) provide feedback from within the Service(s);
unique identifiers, such as username, account number or password
your feedback and survey responses; and
the content of any messages you send us, including, without limitation, messages transmitted via the Services, email, telephone, or via the Website (including web-based chat interfaces).
We process your Personal Data for these purposes based on our legitimate interests or a third party’s legitimate interest to ensure we provide our Services in an effective, safe and efficient way. Where we process your Personal Data to administer your account, or to the extent necessary to collect your subscription fees, we do so for the purposes of our contract with you.
Purpose: Recruitment, Freshworks Careers
. When you apply for an open position by either populating the application form, by email or by hard copy and whether submitted directly by you or by a third-party recruitment agency on your behalf, we will use such data to evaluate you for the open position that you have applied for or any position that we consider you suitable for at the time you submit your resume (application?) or at any later date. For the purposes of evaluating you for an open position, you understand that we may internally rate you based on parts of your resume (application?) and your information. If you do not wish to be rated by us, please do not provide us your information. The data processed includes:
contact information, such as name, email address, mailing address, phone number, and (subject to local laws) links to your social networking profiles;
any other information you volunteer, including during any interview or your interactions with us and contained in the resume that you submit to us;
personal data obtained from any third parties we work with in relation to our recruitment activities, including without limitation (and subject to local laws), recruitment agencies, background check providers, credit reference agencies and your referees; and
details of your education, qualifications and employment history, any other personal data which is contained in any reference about you that we receive. Such information may also include special categories of personal data (such as information about your health, any medical conditions and your health and sickness records) and information relating to criminal convictions and offences (only if that information is relevant to the role you are applying for and subject to local laws).
Subject to local laws, we may also use your personal data for the purpose of reviewing our equal opportunity profile in accordance with applicable legislation. We do not discriminate on the grounds of gender, race, ethnic origin, age, religion, sexual orientation, disability or any other basis covered by local legislation. All employment-related decisions are made entirely on merit. We will retain data from applications for a limited period for record keeping and legal (or, subject to local law, regulatory) purposes. We may (subject to the laws in your jurisdiction) also retain your data in order to contact you if a role arises for which we think you would be suitable. Further information about this will be provided during the application process and we will ask for consent where necessary according to local law.
Where we use your Personal Data in connection with recruitment, it will be in connection with us taking steps at your request to enter into a contract we may have with you or it is in our legitimate interest to use personal data in such a way to ensure that we can make the best recruitment decisions. We will not process any special (or sensitive) categories of Personal Data or Personal Data relating to criminal convictions or offences except where we are able to do so under applicable legislation or with your explicit consent.
Purpose: Freshworks hosting or managing Events and programs.
From time to time, we may organize and host events for the purpose of promoting our business or other reasons.
The data processed includes:
We may process your name, email address, designation and company name to communicate with you about such events where you have specifically requested information about such events or where we have another lawful basis for sending that information to you.
When you attend an event conducted by Freshworks, including webinars or seminars, we may collect your contact information such as name, e-mail address, phone number, designation and company name to record your attendance at the event and for related record-keeping purposes.
If you attend any user conferences hosted by us at a physical location where we serve food and other refreshments, we collect information about your food preferences and allergies.
You may also feature in photographs taken at our events and such photographs may appear in publications that we make available.
When you register for any of our programs through a registration form on our Site, we may collect information such as your name, e-mail address, company name, designation, company website URL, IP address, location and contact information.
It is necessary for us to use your Personal Data in this way to perform our obligations in accordance with any contract that we may have with you where you have signed up to attend an event, or it is in our legitimate interest or a third party’s legitimate interest to use Personal Data in such a way to ensure that the event is operated in a secure and effective way. We may specifically ask your permission to use your photographs, quotes, testimonials, or other content that you make available or publish at the event. Where this is the case, our processing of such Personal Data will be based on consent (or, if we enter into a contract with you for this purpose, on the performance of said contract)
Purpose: Prize draws, prize competitions and other promotions.
From time to time, we may run prize draws, prize competitions and other promotions on our Site and/or on our social media accounts.
The data processed includes:
For the purposes of administering such promotions, we may process:
your name, e-mail address, company name, designation, company website URL, IP address, location and contact information, banking details;
information about when your current or previous sessions started, IP address; browser type and operating system; geolocation, any other unique numbers assigned to a device and other data that is collected through your interactions with third party websites and services; and
any other personal data volunteered by you or that we ask for in relation to your promotion entry.
Our promotions are subject to separate terms and conditions, which you may be required to accept as a condition of entry.
It is necessary for us to use your personal data to perform our obligations in accordance with any contract that we may have with you (e.g. the promotion terms and conditions) or it is in our legitimate interest to use your personal data to enable us to administer our promotion fairly and effectively and to ensure that we comply with self-regulatory codes governing the operation of promotions.
Purpose: Participation in Public forums, Community platform, Forms and use of your statements for testimonials.
When you visit or register our publicly accessible community forums and blogs or submit any forms on our Site, you should be aware that any information you provide in these areas may be read, collected and used by others who access them. We may post your testimonials/comments/reviews on our Websites which may contain your Personal Data. The data processed includes:
contact information such as name, e-mail address, mailing address, or phone number;
information about your business, such as company name, company size, business type; and
a short bio about you to identify you as the author of the post.
We may post your testimonials/comments/reviews on our Websites which may contain your Personal Data. Where we use your content in connection with Services that we provide via our Website, it is in our legitimate interest to use any Personal Data that you provide to us to ensure that we provide the relevant Services in an effective way. Prior to posting the testimonial, we will obtain your consent to post your name along with the testimonial. If you do not consent, we are only allowed to use the testimonial in a fully anonymized way. If you want to revoke your consent and your testimonial to be removed, please contact us at support@freshworks.com. If we enter into a contract with you for this purpose, our legal basis may be the performance of said contract.
Purpose: Newsletters.
When you actively subscribe to our newsletters, we collect and store your e-mail address to share our newsletters with you.
If you have requested content from us, i.e. a newsletter, it is in our legitimate interest to use your Personal Data in such a way to ensure that we process your request in an effective way.
Purpose: Advertising and marketing to our Customers and prospective leads - sending marketing communications by post and/or email.
The data processed includes: We use your name, email address, job title; and organization that you represent, social media handle and details of any marketing preferences that you have communicated to us to send you (or the organization you represent) marketing communications by post and/or email. Our marketing will include press releases and information about us, our Website and our Services, any events we may hold and any offers or promotions we offer from time to time. Our marketing communications will include personalized and non-personalized marketing. Personalized marketing has been specifically tailored to you and will include content that we think is most relevant to you, based on what we know about you. We may use technology to do this, but generally all our marketing methods involve human intervention. Non-personalized marketing is marketing that is not tailored to you. Where we are sending you personalized marketing, we may also use other types of Personal Data to help us decide what sort of personalized marketing to send you (please see the “Cookies and Similar Technologies”, “Usage Data” and “Mobile Applications” sections below for more details).
In the UK, EU and Brazil we will rely on your consent when sending marketing communications. Otherwise, it is in our legitimate interest to use your Personal Data for marketing purposes, for example to decide what marketing content we think may appeal to you or for postal or email marketing (except where we are required by applicable law to obtain your consent).
Purpose: Advertising and marketing to our Customers and prospective leads: Online personalized marketing. The data processed includes:
We and our third party partners may use your data relating to your behaviors, interests and preferences, including data collected as a result of your browsing activity and/or interaction with our Website and/or our emails, which is obtained through the use of cookies, pixel tags and other similar technologies; information about when your current or previous sessions started, IP address; browser type and operating system; geolocation, any other unique numbers assigned to a device and other data that is collected through your interactions with third party websites and services to provide you with, and analyze the effectiveness of, personalized ads when you visit other websites and/or use other services (including the social media and other platforms described in the “
advertising to you on social media and other platforms
” section. By “personalized ads”, we mean advertisements for services that you have shown an interest in when you have used our Website or which we or our partners otherwise think you might be interested in based on your browsing habits. Note, our third-party partners may also use the data that is collected to show personalized ads for products and services offered by third parties.
Please see the “
Cookies and Similar technologies
” section to learn about the legal basis that we rely on to collect data via the use of cookies. https://www.freshworks.com/list-of-cookies/ Where we use your personal data to display online personal advertising to you, we rely on the consent that you have provided in respect of the collection of such data, or, subject to local law, it is otherwise in our legitimate interests to promote our Website and our Services to you.
Purpose: Advertising and marketing to our Customers and prospective leads - advertising to you on social media and other platforms.
We share your email address and other identifiers such as your phone number or device ID (usually in an encrypted or ‘hashed’ form) with third-party providers of social media platforms and other services, such as [Facebook, LinkedIn] and other similar platforms (“
Social Platforms
”), so that the third party providers can try to “match” your data with the data of their registered users of their Social Platforms. Where there is a successful match, we will display our advertising to you when you use the relevant Social Platform (e.g. on your Facebook newsfeed). This is known as “custom audience” advertising, because we “customize” the audience that we want to reach on the relevant service. Some of the advertising that you see may be personalized to you.
The data that we use to personalize our advertising, will include:
Data relating to your browsing activity or interaction with our emails, obtained through the use of cookies, pixel tags and other similar technologies; information about when your current or previous sessions started; details about any products you viewed through the Site; and
IP address; browser type and operating system; geolocation; any other unique numbers assigned to a device.
Such data used to personalize advertising will not be provided to the third-party providers of the Social Platforms for this purpose but please see the “
Cookies and Similar Technologies
” section for details of where we may share such data. This activity is also subject to the privacy choices you have elected to make on such Social Platforms.
We will only share your Personal Data with the third-party providers of the Social Platforms, so that we can advertise our Services to you when you use those Social Platforms, where you have provided your consent or where it is otherwise in our legitimate interests to do so in order to promote our Services. Where this activity is undertaken through the use of Cookies, please see the “
Cookies and Similar Technologies
” section) to learn about the legal basis that we rely on. You can opt-out of our sharing of your personal information with the third-party providers by exercising your
rights as a data subject
as set out below.
Purpose: Advertising and marketing to our Customers and prospective leads - advertising to other people who share similar interests and characteristics to you (or if you are someone that sees such advertising).
We will provide your Personal Data to third-party providers of Social Platforms as described in the “
advertising to you on social media and other platforms
” and the “
Cookies and Similar Technologies
” sections. If you are a user of those Social Platforms, we may ask the third-party providers of those Social Platforms to find other registered users of their services who share similar interests and characteristics to you, which will be based on information that the third party holds about you and its other registered users. This is known as “lookalike” audience advertising because we are trying to show our advertising to people who “look like” you. If you are someone who has seen this advertising on a Social Platform, please note that this activity is based on data that you have provided to the Social Platform (which we do not receive) and is also subject to the privacy choices you have elected to make on such third-party services.
Please see the “
advertising to you on social media and other platforms
” section for details of the lawful basis that we rely on to share your personal data with the Social Platforms. It is in our legitimate interests to further use your Personal Data to advertise our Services to other individuals that use those Social Platforms and who share similar interests and characteristics with you. If you are someone who has seen this advertising on a Social Platform, it is in our legitimate interests that the Social Platform uses the data that you have provided to it to advertise our Services, although please note that we do not receive this data and you should exercise your rights in respect of such data in accordance with the privacy notice of the relevant Social Platform.
Purpose: Service Analytics.
We perform analytics on Personal Data that we process in order to: provide the Services, assess the needs of our Customer’s business to determine or suggest suitable Service(s); send Customers requested information about the Service(s) and improve the quality of this information; respond to customer service requests, questions and concerns and improve the quality of these responses; and for product improvement purposes. The data processed includes: Email addresses; mobile or landline telephone numbers; IP address; chat identifiers and chat content (including the contents of chatbot sessions); widgets. As set out above we are generally not a data controller of any Hosted Data – i.e. data which we process on behalf of our customers.  However, some Hosted Data may be used as part of our analytics for the above purposes.
It is necessary for us to use your Personal Data in this way to fulfil our obligations in accordance with any contract that we may have with you to provide our Services. It is also in our legitimate interests to process Personal Data in this way in order to perform analytics, train our algorithms, improve, enhance, develop, support and operate the Services and its availability, compile statistical reports and record insights into usage patterns, develop new products and services using machine learning technologies and more generally to better serve our Customers and be able to provide customized content and features.
Purpose: Cookies and Similar Technologies, Mobile Applications, Usage Data, Single Sign on and Social Media.
We use commonly used tools to automatically collect information that may contain Personal Data from your computer or mobile device as you visit our Websites, use our application or in general use our Services.
a) Cookies and Similar Technologies.
We and our third-party advertising partners use cookies, web beacons, pixel tags and similar technologies (which we generically refer to as ‘cookies’) to collect data from the devices that you use to access our Website. Data collected via these cookies are used for the purposes of:
analyzing trends;
administering the Website;
to count users who have visited our Site and collect other types of information including insights about visitors’ browsing habits on the Websites;
gathering demographic information about our user base as a whole;
to learn what parts of our Website are most popular and what kind of features and functionalities our visitors like to see;
to help us understand the type of marketing content that is most likely to appeal to our visitors and Customers; and
to help us with the selection of future product and service lines, website design and to remember your preferences.
We may receive reports from third party companies based on the use of these technologies on an individual and aggregated basis. Most web browsers support cookies and users can control the use of cookies at the individual browser level. Please note that if you choose to disable cookies, it may limit your use of certain features or functions on our Websites and Services. As is true of most websites, we gather certain information automatically and store it in log files. This information may include internet protocol (IP) addresses, browser type, internet service provider (ISP), referring/exit pages, the files viewed on our Websites (e.g., HTML pages, graphics, etc.), operating system, date/time stamp, and/or clickstream data. We link this automatically collected data to other data we collect about you. Please see our
Cookies Policy
https://www.freshworks.com/list-of-cookies/
for further information about our use of Cookies and similar technologies.
Cookies and Similar Technologies:
Where your data is collected through the use of non-essential cookies, we rely on consent to collect your personal data and for the onward processing purpose. Please see our Cookie Policy
https://www.freshworks.com/list-of-cookies/
for further details.
b) Mobile Applications.
When you download, install and use our Mobile Applications, we automatically collect information on the type of device you use, operating system version, and the device identifier (or “UDID”). We use mobile analytics software to allow us to better understand the functionality of our Mobile Software on your phone. This Software may record certain information such as how often you use the application, the events that occur within the application, aggregated usage, performance data, and where the application was downloaded from. We do not link the information we store within the analytics software to any personal data you submit within Mobile Applications. When you open the Mobile Applications for the first time, you may be asked for permission to send you push notifications. If you allow this feature, our Mobile Applications will send you push notifications, for example, reminders, alerts, updates and other information. You can configure and turn off push notifications via your device settings at any time.
Mobile Applications:
Functionality: It is in our legitimate interest to use the data collected here in order to send error messages (if applicable) and in order to secure our Mobile Applications and to detect and resolve errors and cyberattacks. Mobile Analytics: Where we use mobile analytics software to understand the functionality of our Mobile Software on your phone, we rely on our legitimate interests in order to secure our Mobile Applications and ensure the proper functioning of our Mobile Applications and ensure the effective provision of our Services. Where this involves the use of cookies, please see the “
Cookies and Similar Technologies
” section) to learn about the legal basis that we rely on.
https://www.freshworks.com/list-of-cookies/
Push notifications: In the UK, EU and Brazil, where we send push notifications about any events or promotions that we may be running and/or update you about new features to our Services we will do so on the basis of your consent. Otherwise, we will rely on our legitimate interests in doing so.
c) Usage Data.
In addition to the information mentioned in the
Cookies and Similar Technologies
https://www.freshworks.com/list-of-cookies/
section above that we automatically collect, we also collect clicks, scrolls, conversion and drop-off on our Websites and Service(s) to monitor user journey in real-time (“
Usage Data
”). Subject to this Notice, we will use such Usage Data and Customer data, including without limitation, to (i) assess the needs of your business to determine or suggest suitable Services; (ii) send you requested information about the Services; (iii) respond to customer service requests, questions and concerns; (iv) for any analytical purposes; and (v) to provide and improves the Services.
For Freshcaller users only: your calls will be recorded, subject to the consent of both parties to the call, and this recording will be used for product improvement, including to train our applications to better recognize human speech.
For Freshchat, Freshworks and Freshmarketer customers: you will have the option to opt out of analytics or tracking certain events from within these products.
For FreshworksCRM users only: Your calls made using FreshworksCRM will be recorded, subject to the consent of both parties to the call, and this recording will be used for product improvement, including to train our applications to better recognize human speech. You will have the option to opt out of analytics or tracking certain events from within FreshworksCRM.
Analytics opt-out for products other than Freshchat, Freshworks and Freshmarketer: Customers may opt-out of analytics by writing to
dpo@freshworks.com.
Usage Data:
We will rely on our legitimate interests to process Usage Data for the purposes outlined, except for call recording which we base on consent exclusively. Where Usage Data is collected via cookies or similar technologies, please see the “
Cookies and Similar Technologies
” section) to learn about the legal basis that we rely on.
https://www.freshworks.com/list-of-cookies/
d) Single sign-on.
You can log in to our Websites using sign-in services such as Google, Facebook Connect and LinkedIn. These services will authenticate your identity and provide you the option to share certain Personal Data with us such as your name and e-mail address. Services like Google, Facebook Connect, Twitter, LinkedIn give you the option to post information about your activities on our Websites to your profile page and to share information with others within your network.
Single sign on:
Where you have opted to use single sign on – it is in our legitimate interest to process your Personal Data in order to facilitate the single sign on function.
e) Social media features and third-party cookies
. Our Websites include social media features, such as the Facebook “Like” button, the “Share This” button or interactive mini-programs. Where you interact with these features, those third parties may collect your IP address, which page you are visiting on our Websites, and may set a cookie to enable the feature to function properly. Social media features and widgets are either hosted by a third party or hosted directly on our Websites. Your interactions with these features are governed by the privacy notice of the company providing them. If the widget is shown on our Websites, our Privacy Notice applies.  Please see our
Cookies Policy
for further information. If you provide us or our service providers with any Personal Data relating to other individuals, including End-User data or your employee’s data, you represent that you have the authority to do so and acknowledge that it will be used in accordance with this Notice.
Social media features:
Where this activity is undertaken through the use of Cookies on our Website, we rely on consent to collect your personal data and for the onward processing purpose. Please see our Cookie Policy
https://www.freshworks.com/list-of-cookies/
for further details. Where we use social media features, we do so in line with the terms and conditions of those providers.
Purpose: Business administration and legal compliance.
We may use your Personal Data to: a) respond to lawful requests by public authorities, including meeting national security or law enforcement requirements; b) when we believe that disclosure is necessary to protect our rights and/or to comply with a judicial proceeding, court order, police request or other legal process served on us; c) to protect the rights of third parties; and d) in connection with a business transition such as a merger, reorganization, acquisition by another company, or sale of any of our assets.
Where we use your Personal Data in connection with a business transition, to enforce our legal rights or to protect the rights of third parties, it is in our legitimate interest to do so. For all other purposes described in this section, we have a legal obligation to use your Personal Data to comply with any legal obligations imposed upon us, such as a court order. In some jurisdictions the applicable legal basis will be the exercise of legal rights in judicial, administrative or arbitration proceedings. We will not process any special (or sensitive) categories of Personal Data or Personal Data relating to criminal convictions or offences except where we are able to do so under applicable legislation and/ or with your explicit consent.
Purpose: Receipt of products and services from our suppliers.
If we have engaged you or the organization you represent to provide us with products or services (for example, if you or the organization you represent provide us with services such as IT support or financial advice), we will collect and process your Personal Data in order to manage our relationship with you or the organization you represent, to receive products and services from you or the organization you represent and, where relevant, to provide our Services to others.
The data processed includes:
The Personal Data we collect from you may include your name, email address, telephone number, designation, billing address and any other personal data you volunteer which is relevant to our relationship with you or the organization you represent.
It is necessary for us to use your Personal Data to perform our obligations in accordance with any contract that we may have with you or the organization you represent, or it is in our legitimate interest to use Personal Data in such a way to ensure that we have an effective working relationship with you or the organization you represent and are able to receive the products and services that you or your organization provides, and provide our Services to others, in an effective way.
Purpose: Security.
We may process your Personal Data in connection with the administration of our security measures. We have security measures in place at our premises, including CCTV and building access controls. There are signs in place showing that CCTV is in operation. The images captured are securely stored and only accessed on a need to know basis (e.g. to look into an incident). CCTV recordings are typically automatically overwritten after a short period of time unless an issue is identified that requires investigation (such as a theft). We may require visitors to our premises to sign in on arrival and where that is the case we will keep a record of visitors for a short period of time – normally only for as long as is necessary for legitimate security purposes. Our visitor records are securely stored and only accessible on a need-to-know basis (e.g. to look into an incident).
It is in our legitimate interests to process your Personal Data so that we can keep our premises secure and provide a safe environment for our personnel and visitors.
What Personal Data we collect and how we use your Personal Data?
What legal basis we rely on to process your Personal Data?
B) Information that we collect from third parties.
From time to time, we may receive Personal Data about you from third party sources like databases and social media but only where we have checked that these third parties either have your consent to or are otherwise legally permitted or required to disclose your personal information to us. The types of information we obtain from such third parties include your name, e-mail address, postal address, location, designation, telephone number and we use the information we receive from these third parties to maintain and improve customer support experience, improve the accuracy of the records we hold about you and for our sales and marketing purposes.
When processing your Personal Data received by third parties for these purposes, we will rely on the consent that you have given such third party to share data with us. Otherwise, subject to local law, our processing activities will rely on our legitimate interests to improve our customer service and ensure our marketing databases are accurate.
4. WITH WHOM DO WE SHARE PERSONAL DATA?
We process Personal Data in the countries in which we are established, including the United States, the United Kingdom and the European Economic Area (“EEA”) and in other countries where third parties that we may use are based.
You may refer to the Freshworks Data Hosting page
here
for more information about the locations in which the Hosted Data (i.e., that which we process as a Processor during the provision of our Services) is stored.
When processing your Personal Data, we may need to share it with other third parties (including other entities within our Group Companies), as set out below. This list is non-exhaustive and there may be circumstances where we need to share Personal Data with other third parties:
With third parties assisting Freshworks in providing our Customers with the Service(s) (“
Sub-Processors
" listed
here
). Our Sub-Processors are given access to Customers’ Account and Customer data only as reasonably necessary to provide the Service(s) and will be subject to confidentiality obligations in their service agreements;
With third party service providers providing us with services, such as research and analytics, anti-spamming and anti-phishing services, marketing and data enrichment or for them to reach out to you on our behalf;
With third party payment processors who process your credit card and other payment information for Freshworks but who are otherwise not permitted to store, retain or use such information;
With third party partners for the purpose of assisting us in onboarding you and providing any further support needed to use our Services;
With sponsors of contests for which you register;
With third-party service providers that are assisting us with the operation and administration of events. If we are running an event in partnership with other organizations, we will share your Personal Data with such organizations for use in relation to the event;
With third-party social media networks, advertising networks and websites;
With external recruiters, and related organizations such as third-party providers that undertake employee background checks on our behalf and on behalf of other entities within our Group Companies;
With auditors, lawyers, accountants and other professional advisers who advise and assist us in relation to the lawful and effective management of our organization and in relation to any disputes we may become involved in;
Law enforcement or other government and regulatory agencies and bodies or other third parties as required by, and in accordance with, applicable law or regulation;
With Affiliates within Freshworks and companies that we will acquire in the future when they are made part of the Freshworks group – this may be for customer support, marketing, technical operations, account management or organizational purposes and to provide, enhance and improve the Services;
If we are involved in a merger, reorganization or other fundamental corporate change with a third party, or sell/buy a business unit to/from a third party, or if all or a portion of our business, assets or stock are acquired by a third party, with such third party including at the due diligence stage;
Other third parties - Occasionally, we may receive requests from third parties with authority to obtain disclosure of Personal Data, such as to check that we are complying with applicable law and regulation, to investigate an alleged crime, or to establish, exercise or defend legal rights. We will only fulfil requests for Personal Data where we are permitted to do so in accordance with applicable law or regulation.
When you connect your Gmail mailbox with your Freshworks Account (see section 14 (Google API Disclosure) below).
Where necessary (such as when we transfer data to service providers) we put in place appropriate contractual arrangements and security mechanisms to protect the Personal Data shared and to comply with our data protection, confidentiality and security standards and obligations. Further details can be provided upon request.
5. INTERNATIONAL TRANSFER OF DATA
Freshworks complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF). Freshworks has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union and the United Kingdom in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Freshworks has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
Model Clauses:
Where we use certain service providers, we may use specific contracts approved by the UK and/or European Authorities which give Personal Data the same protection it has in the UK and the EEA. For further details, see
https://ec.europa.eu/info/law/law-topic/data-protection/data- transfers-outside-eu/model-contracts-transfer-personal-data-third-countries_en
.
This is true whether or not the transfer is within our group, or to a third party.
With respect to Personal Data received or transferred to the United States, Freshworks is subject to the regulatory enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission.
With respect to Personal Data subject to LGPD’s jurisdiction, Freshworks will also accomplish LGPD’s requirements for transfers of Personal Data to countries which do not have the same data protection laws.
In certain situations, Freshworks. and/or its Group Companies may be required to disclose Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements. If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, you can contact us at
dpo@freshworks.com
or via postal mail at Freshworks Inc., 2950 S. Delaware Street, Suite 201, San Mateo, CA 94403 at the attention of the Data Protection Officer with a copy to
dpo@freshworks.com
.
6. HOW DOES FRESHWORKS KEEP PERSONAL DATA SECURE?
We use appropriate technical and organizational measures to protect the Personal Data that we collect and process. We have implemented information security policies, rules and technical measures to protect the Personal Data under our control from unauthorized access, improper use or disclosure, unauthorized modification and unlawful destruction or accidental loss. In addition, all our employees and data processors (i.e. those who process your Personal Data on our behalf) are obliged to respect the confidentiality of the Personal Data of all users of our Website and those who purchase our Services. The measures we use are designed to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk of processing your Personal Data.
While information security risks are always evolving, so are the controls. The controls, so implemented, are periodically reviewed as part of internal and external audits. If you have questions about the security of your Personal Data, please contact us using the details in section 18.
7. EEA, UK AND SWISS SPECIFIC RIGHTS
A) Collected Data (excluding Hosted Data)
If you are an individual resident in EEA, UK or Switzerland, you have the following data protection rights regarding Collected Data:
If you wish to
exercise an
y of the following rights in relation to your Personal Data (hereinafter referred to as a “
Request
”), you can do so at any time by contacting us using the details in section 18:
Your right of access
If you ask us, we will confirm whether we are processing your Personal Data and, if so, provide you with a copy of that Personal Data (along with certain other details). If you require additional copies, we may charge a reasonable fee for producing those additional copies.
Your right to rectification
If the Personal Data we hold about you is inaccurate or incomplete, you are entitled to have it rectified. If we have shared your Personal Data with others, we will let them know about the rectification where possible. If you ask us, where possible and lawful to do so, we will also tell you who we have shared your Personal Data with so that you can contact them.
Your right to erasure
You can ask us to delete or remove your Personal Data in some circumstances, such as where we no longer need it or where you withdraw your consent (where applicable). If we have shared your Personal Data with others, we will let them know about the erasure where possible. If you ask us, where it is possible and lawful for us to do so, we will also tell you who we have shared your Personal Data with so that you can contact them directly.
Your right to restrict processing
You can ask us to “block” or suppress the processing of your Personal Data in certain circumstances such as where you contest the accuracy of that Personal Data, or you object to us processing it for a particular purpose. This may not mean that we will stop storing your Personal Data but, where we do keep it, we will tell you if we remove any restriction that we have placed on your Personal Data to stop us processing it further. If we have shared your Personal Data with others, we will let them know about the restriction where it is possible for us to do so. If you ask us, where it is possible and lawful for us to do so, we will also tell you who we have shared your Personal Data with so that you can contact them directly.
Your right to data portability
You have the right, in certain circumstances, to obtain Personal Data you have provided to us (in a structured, commonly used and machine-readable format) and to reuse it elsewhere or to ask us to transfer it to your chosen third party.
Your right to object
You can ask us to stop processing your Personal Data, and we will do so, if we are: (i) relying on our own or someone else’s legitimate interest to process your Personal Data, except if we can demonstrate compelling legal grounds for the processing; or (ii) processing your Personal Data for direct marketing purposes.
Your rights in relation to automated decision-making and profiling
You have the right not to be subject to a decision when it is based on automatic processing, including profiling, if it produces a legal effect or similarly significantly affects you, unless such profiling is necessary for the entering into, or the performance of, a contract between you and us.
Your right to withdraw consent
If we have collected and processed your Personal Data with your consent, then you can
withdraw your consent
at any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your Personal Data conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
Your right to opt out of marketing communications
You have the right to
opt-out of marketing communications
we send you at any time. You can exercise this right by clicking on the “unsubscribe” or “opt-out” link in the marketing e-mails we send you. To opt-out of other forms of marketing (such as postal marketing or telemarketing), please contact us using the details in section 18.
Your right to lodge a complaint with the supervisory authority
If you have a concern about any aspect of our privacy practices, including the way we have handled your Personal Data, please contact us using the details in section 18. You also have the
right to complain to a data protection authority
in the Member State of your residence or the place of the alleged infringement. You can find a list of contact details for all EU supervisory authorities at
http://ec.europa.eu/justice/data-protection/bodies/authorities/index_en.htm
. The UK data protection regulator is the Information Commissioner’s Office and contact details can be found at https://ico.org.uk.
If you are residing in France: your right to give instructions regarding the processing of your data after your death
You have the right to give instructions regarding the retention, deletion and disclosure of your Personal Data after your death. You may designate a person to carry out these instructions. This person is then entitled to be informed of the directives and to request their implementation from us.
We respond to all requests we receive from individuals wishing to exercise their data protection rights within a reasonable timeframe in accordance with applicable data protection laws. We can only process requests after we have verified your identity, which may mean requesting further information from you.
B) Hosted Data
As explained above, some of our Services include processing data on behalf of our customers in relation to Applications, tools or software that we provide. Save for the limited circumstances set out in this Notice, we are not the Data Controller of this Hosted Data as we do not determine the purposes or the means of the processing.
If you wish to access, correct, update, modify or delete Hosted Data or if you would no longer like to be contacted by one of our Customers you should direct your query to the Customer, who is the Data Controller of your data. If requested by the Customer to action a Request, we will respond within a reasonable timeframe.
If you are a Customer of our Services and wish to raise a Request on behalf of data subjects in connection with Hosted Data, you may raise a ticket on the support portal of the relevant Service. Please note that if a Customer has subscribed to more than one Service, a Request on a particular Service support portal is specific to that Service only and separate Requests need to be raised across other relevant Service support portals.
C) General Compliance
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Freshworks commits to cooperate and comply respectively with the advice of the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (DPAs) and the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
If you have a question or complaint related to participation by Freshworks in the DPF Frameworks, we encourage you to contact us via dpo@freshworks.com. For any complaints related to the DPF Frameworks that Freshworks cannot resolve directly, we have chosen to co-operate with the relevant EU Data Protection Authority, or a panel established by the European data protection authorities, for resolving disputes with EU individuals, the UK Information Commissioner (for UK individuals) and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) for resolving disputes with Swiss individuals. As further explained in Annex I of DPF Principles, binding arbitration is available to address residual complaints not resolved by other means. Freshworks is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission (FTC).
8. CALIFORNIA-RESIDENT SPECIFIC RIGHTS
Your California Privacy Rights; “Shine the Light” Law
California residents are entitled once a year, free of charge, to request and obtain certain information regarding our disclosure, if any, of certain categories of personal information to third parties for their own direct marketing purposes in the preceding calendar year. We do not share your personal information with third parties for those third parties’ direct marketing purposes.
California Consumer Privacy Act
To the extent you are a 'consumer' as defined under the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 ("CCPA") and Freshworks is a 'business' as defined under CCPA, the following applies to you:
Under the CCPA, “personal information” is information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household. Subject to the provisions of the CCPA, consumers have the rights to receive certain disclosures regarding the collection, use, and disclosure of information about them, as well as rights to know/access, delete, correct, and limit the use and disclosure of sensitive personal information and opt out of the sale or sharing of personal information. You have the right to be free from discrimination based on your exercise of your CCPA rights. To the extent that we collect personal information that is subject to the CCPA, that information, our practices, and your rights are described below.
Notice at Collection Regarding the Categories of Personal Information Collected
You have the right to receive notice of certain information about our data collection, use, and disclosure. Freshworks does not sell personal information as defined by the CCPA. The following table summarizes the categories of personal information we may collect that may be disclosed to service providers. Freshworks does share personal information (as defined by the CCPA) as explained below the following table. The categories we use to describe personal information are those enumerated in the CCPA.
We may collect this personal information for the purposes described in the section above titled
'WHAT PERSONAL DATA DOES FRESHWORKS COLLECT, HOW DO WE USE YOUR PERSONAL DATA AND WHAT LEGAL BASIS DO WE RELY ON.'
Category
Source
Identifiers (such as contact information or personal characteristics like name, email address or postal address, or social media handles)
You; our social media pages
Health Information (such as protected health information or physical or mental health status)
You
Financial Information (such as payment data, bank account information, or credit information)
You
Protected Classifications and Other Sensitive Data (such as date of birth or gender)
You
Commercial Information (such as transaction information, billing and payment records, or order history)
You
Biometric Information (such as fingerprint, voiceprint, facial recognition, or eye recognition)
You
Geolocation Information (such as approximate location based on your IP address)
You
Internet or Electronic Network Activity Information (such as IP address, device identifier (e.g. Mac), cookie or tracking pixel information, browsing or search history, or diagnostic information)
You
Audio, Electronic, Visual, Thermal, Olfactory, or Similar Information (such as call recordings, photographs, or video)
You
Professional or Employment-Related Information (such as current employer or job title)
You
Education Information (such as education history and level of education)
You
Inferences Drawn About You (such as user profile reflecting preferences, characteristics, psychological trends, or predispositions)
You
Content of Communications (such as contents of phone calls, emails, text messages, or photos)
You
Contacts (such as list of contacts you supply to us or that we may collect from your device with your permission)
You
We may share the categories of Identifiers, Geolocation Information (coarse location only), and Internet or Electronic Network Activity Information as described above with advertising partners.
We determine the retention period for each of the categories of personal information listed above based on (1) the length of time we need to retain the information to achieve the business or commercial purpose for which it was obtained, (2) any legal or regulatory requirements applicable to such information, (3) internal operational needs, and (4) any need for the information based on any actual or anticipated investigation or litigation.
Entities to whom we disclose information for business purposes are service providers, which are companies that we engage to conduct activities on our behalf. We restrict service providers from using personal information for any purpose that is not related to our engagement.
We may disclose personal information that we collect or that you provide as described in this privacy notice:
To our Group Companies
To the following categories of service providers who are bound by law and contractual obligations to keep your personal information confidential. Service providers may use information that we share with them only for the purposes for which we disclose it to them and as otherwise permitted by law.
Payroll services providers that assist us in calculating and disbursing your salary and other compensation.
Auditing and accounting firms, such as firms that assist us in the creation of our financial records.
Professional services consultants, such as firms that perform analytics, assist with improving our business, provide legal services, or supply project-based resources and assistance.
Recruitment vendors that assist with the application process, including assessing candidate qualifications and providing the platform through which candidates submit their candidacy.
Analytics services, including entities that analyze traffic to and on our website and assist with identifying and communicating with potential customers.
Security vendors, such as entities that assist with security incident verification and response, service notifications, and fraud prevention.
IT vendors, such as entities that assist with website design, hosting and maintenance; data and software storage; and network operation.
To other external parties when required by law or to protect Freshworks or other persons, as described in this privacy notice.
To a buyer or other successor in the event of a merger, divestiture, restructuring, reorganization, dissolution or other sale or transfer of some or all of Freshworks’ assets or capital stock, whether as a going concern or as part of bankruptcy, liquidation or a similar proceeding, in which personal information held by Freshworks about our employees, workers and contractors is among the assets transferred. If this happens, the recipient of the personal information will continue to honor the promises made in this privacy notice, or else provide you notice of any changes.
Your rights under the CCPA
Know and request access to and correction and deletion of personal information:
You have the right to request access to personal information collected about you and information regarding the source of that personal information, the purposes for which we collect it, and the third parties and service providers with to whom we sell or disclose it. You also have the right to request in certain circumstances that we delete personal information that we have collected directly from you or correct information that we have collected about you.
Right to opt out of selling/sharing personal information:
You have the right to opt out of the sale of your personal information to, and the sharing of your personal information with, third parties. Please note that the right to opt out does not apply to our sharing of data with service providers, who are parties we engage to perform a function on our behalf and are legally and contractually obligated to use the data only for that function.
In case you would like to exercise this right please go
here
.
Right to limit the use and disclosure of sensitive personal information:
You have the right to limit the use and disclosure of sensitive personal information that we use to infer characteristics about you. If you exercise this right, we may still use and disclose sensitive information about you for limited purposes.
Colorado, Connecticut, Utah, and Virginia
Residents of the States of Colorado, Connecticut, Utah, and Virginia have the following rights:
Opt out of “sales” of personal information and use of their personal information for “targeted advertising,
” as those terms are defined under applicable law.
Opt out of “profiling
” under certain circumstances, as defined under applicable law. (Residents of Colorado, Connecticut, and Virginia only.)
Confirm processing of and access to personal information
under certain circumstances.
Correct personal information
under certain circumstances. (Residents of Colorado, Connecticut, and Virginia only.)
Delete personal information
under certain circumstances.
Residents of these states can exercise their rights by contacting us using one of the methods listed below.
How to submit an opt-out, access or deletion request:
If you seek to exercise the foregoing rights to access, correct, or delete Personal Information, please contact us at
dpo@freshworks.com
or write to us
here
. We respond to all requests we receive from you wishing to exercise your rights within a reasonable timeframe in accordance with applicable data protection laws. By writing to us, you agree to receive communication from us seeking information from you in order to verify you to be the consumer from whom we have collected the Personal Information and such other information as reasonably required to enable us to honor your request.
If you are a resident of California, Colorado, or Connecticut, you may, under certain circumstances, authorize another individual or a business, called an authorized agent, to make requests on your behalf. (Authorized agents in California must be registered with the California Secretary of State.) The request should include your contact information and describe your request with sufficient detail that allows us to properly understand, evaluate, and respond to it. In addition, you should provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify that you are the person about whom we collected the personal information or an authorized representative of that person. In order to protect the security of your personal information, we will not honor a request if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request and confirm that the personal information relates to you. The method used to verify your identity will depend on the type, sensitivity, and value of the information, including the risk of harm to you posed by any authorized access, correction, or deletion. Generally speaking, verification will be performed by matching the identifying information provided by you to the personal information that we already have.
Any disclosures we provide will only cover the 12-month period preceding receipt of your request (and will not be made more than twice in a 12-month period). If we cannot comply with a request, or cannot fully comply with a request, the response we provide will also explain the reasons we cannot comply.
Appeals
Residents of Colorado, Connecticut, and Virginia have the right to appeal a denial of their request by contacting us as described in the notice of denial.
9. LGPD
The LGPD grants control and self-determination to data subjects and provides compliance responsibilities for organizations such as Freshworks in regard to personal data whose data subject is located within Brazilian territory at the moment of data collection or to any offering or providing of goods or service for individuals located within Brazilian territory. The LGPD gives national regulators powers to impose significant fines and indemnification liabilities on organizations that breach this law. All content of this notice and Freshworks’s processing of personal data are in strict compliance with LGPD, where applicable. At Freshworks we take a global approach to ensure all members benefit from increased control and clarity, which is in line with our commitment to putting our Customers first and working every day to maintain the trust they put in us.
LGPD grants the following rights to those individuals subject to its jurisdiction:
Confirmation of data processing and access
You have the right to know and have access to the data we process about you.
Data correction
You have the right to request a correction of any incomplete, inaccurate or outdated data of yours that we process.
Anonymization, blocking or deletion
You have the right to request anonymization, blocking or elimination of unnecessary or excessive data or of any data being processed contrary to the law.
Data portability
You have the right, in certain circumstances, to reuse the Personal Data you have provided to us elsewhere or to ask us to transfer it to your chosen third party.
Information on data sharing
You have the right to be informed about the public and private entities with which we may share your Personal Data.
Withdraw Consent
If we have collected and processed your Personal Data with your consent, you can withdraw your consent at any time, for all or part of the data. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your personal information conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent, in case which (as other applicable situations) you have the right to know what data we can retain.
You also have the right to know what the consequences of you withdrawing consent will be (for example, if it will prevent you from receiving a service).
File a complaint
You have the right to file a complaint with a supervisory authority about our collection and processing of your Personal Data. The Brazilian data protection regulator is the Autoridade Nacional de Proteção de Dados and contact details can be found at
https://www.gov.br/anpd/pt-br.
10. OPTING OUT PROCEDURE
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Freshworks commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your personal information. EU and UK individuals and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF should first contact Freshworks at: support@freshworks.com.
If you no longer wish to receive marketing communications from Freshworks, you may click on the “unsubscribe” link located on the bottom of our marketing emails or you can contact us at
support@freshworks.com
. When using our Mobile Applications, you also have the option to turn off push notifications.
If you would like to object to the use of your Personal Data for analytics, you can contact us at
support@freshworks.com
To opt out of the use of cookies, please see update your preferences
here
.
You have the right to opt-out of the sharing of your personal data with third parties
for purposes not essential to the delivery of our services. To exercise this option, you can contact us at
support@freshworks.com
.
We will only process sensitive personal data with your explicit, affirmative consent. This includes any data related to health, ethnicity, political opinions, or similar categories.
If we receive sensitive personal data from third parties, we will treat such data with the same safeguards and restrictions applied to data collected directly from individuals.
11. OTHER COMMUNICATIONS
If you are our Customer, we will send you announcements (email or in product notifications related to the Services) on occasions when it is necessary to do so. For instance, if our Services are temporarily suspended for maintenance, we might send you an e-mail. Generally, you may not opt-out of such communications as they are a key part of delivering our Services to you effectively. If you do not wish to receive them, you may deactivate your Account.
12. RETENTION OF PERSONAL DATA
We will retain Personal Data only as long as is necessary for the purposes for which it is collected, as set out in this Notice. We will also retain it as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, for legal and litigation purposes, to maintain accurate financial and other records, deal with complaints, and enforce our agreements.
Generally, in respect of Personal Data that we process in connection with the supply of our Services, we may retain your Personal Data for up to six years from the date of supply of the relevant Services and in compliance with our data protection obligations. We may then destroy such files without further notice or liability.
Where we process any other Personal Data, we will generally retain relevant Personal Data for up to three years from the date of our last interaction with you (and in compliance with our data protection obligations). We may then destroy such files without further notice or liability.
If any Personal Data is only useful for a short period (e.g., for a specific activity, promotion or marketing campaign), we will not retain it for longer than the period for which it is used by us. If you have opted out of receiving marketing communications from us, we will need to retain certain Personal Data on a suppression list indefinitely so that we know not to send you further marketing communications in the future. However, we will not use this Personal Data to send you further marketing unless you subsequently opt back in to receive such marketing.
Should you apply to work for us, we will retain data from your application for a limited period for record keeping and legal purposes. We may (subject to the laws in your jurisdiction) also retain your data in order to contact you if a role arises for which we think you would be suitable. Further information about this will be provided during the application process and we will ask for consent where necessary according to local law.
The above examples may vary in some cases due to local laws, liability periods and mandatory retention requirements. For example, if certain information needs to be retained for longer according to local laws, regulations or because different legal limitation periods apply, then we will keep the Personal Data for these longer periods.
13. LINKS TO THIRD PARTY SITES
Our Websites contain links to other websites that are not owned or controlled by Freshworks. Please be aware that we are not responsible for the privacy practices of such other websites or third parties. We encourage you to be aware when you leave our Websites and to read the privacy policies of each and every website that collects Personal Data.
14. GOOGLE API DISCLOSURE
Freshworks has developed a functionality that allows its customers to connect their Gmail mailbox using Oauth with our products. Connecting your Gmail mailbox to your Freshworks account allows Freshworks to associate your account with your personal information on Google, to see your personal information, including any personal information you have made available, to view your email address and access your emails in order to create them as a ticket in our products, and to transmit the Customer data to third-party applications listed on
Freshworks’ Marketplace
that you integrate with your Account. The connection will further allow you to respond to your emails directly from our product and to delete them once they are fetched into our product.
Google Workspace APIs are not used to develop, improve, or train generalized AI and/or ML models.
Freshworks's use of information received from Google APIs will adhere to
Google API Services User Data Policy's App's
, including the Limited Use requirement.
15. CHILDREN'S PERSONAL DATA
Freshworks does not knowingly collect any Personal Data from children under the age of sixteen. If you are under the age of sixteen, please do not submit any Personal Data through our Websites or Services. We encourage parents and legal guardians to monitor their children’s Internet usage and to help enforce this Notice by instructing their children never to provide Personal Data through our Services or Websites without their permission. If you have reason to believe that a child under the age of sixteen has provided Personal Data to us through our Websites or Services, please contact us using the details in section 18 and we will endeavor to delete that information and terminate the child's account from our databases.
16. AMENDMENTS
Amendments to this Notice will be posted to this URL and will be effective when posted. If we make any material changes, we will notify you by means of a conspicuous notice on this Website or via e-mail or via in-product notification, but we encourage you to review this Notice periodically to keep up to date on how we use your Personal Data. You should frequently visit this Notice to stay fully informed. Your continued use of our Websites or the Service(s) following the posting of any amendment, modification, or change to this Notice shall constitute your acceptance of the amendments to this Notice. You can choose to discontinue use of the Websites or Service(s), if you do not accept the terms of this Notice, or any modified version of this Notice.
17. EFFECT OF MERGER OR ACQUISITION
In the event Freshworks goes through a business transition, such as a merger or acquisition by another company, or sale of all or a portion of its assets, Customers’ Accounts, Collected Data and Customer data will likely be among the assets transferred. A prominent notice will be displayed on our Websites to notify you of any such change in ownership or control and Customers will be notified via an e-mail.
18. CONTACTING FRESHWORKS
If you have any questions about this Privacy Notice or our privacy practices, you can contact us at dpo@freshworks.com or via postal mail at Freshworks Inc., 2950 S.Delaware Street, Suite 201, San Mateo, CA 94403 at the attention of the Data Protection Officer with a copy to
dpo@freshworks.com
.
Annex 1 – Definitions
"Controller", "Data Subject", "Personal Data Breach", "Processor"
and
"Process"
shall have the meaning given to them in the GDPR or other applicable law.
“Account”:
means any accounts or instances created by or on behalf of Customer for access to and use of any of the Service(s).
“Affiliate”:
means, with respect to a Freshworks entity, any entity that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with such Freshworks entity, whereby
“control”
(including, with correlative meaning, the terms “controlled by” and “under common control”) means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct, or cause the direction of the management and policies of such person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, or otherwise.
“API”:
means the application programming interfaces developed, enabled by, or licensed to Provider that permits a User to access certain functionality provided by the Service(s).
“Apps”:
mean the software applications listed on the Market Place which are created, developed, licensed, or owned by third-party developers. The term also includes any updates, upgrades and other changes to such software applications and versions thereof.
“Documentation”:
means, the then-current, generally available user documentation provided by Freshworks detailing the functionalities of the Software and the Services.
"GDPR"
shall mean the Regulation (EU) 2016/679 of the European Parliament and of the Council of 27 April 2016 on the protection of natural persons with regard to the Processing of personal data and on the free movement of such data, and any legislation relating to the processing of personal data effective in the UK and/or Switzerland that is intended to replicate or maintain some or all of the provisions, rights and obligations set out in Regulation (EU) 2016/679, as relevant.
“LGPD”
means “Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais”, which corresponds to the Brazilian data protection law no. 13.709/2018.
“Market Place”:
means an online marketplace for Apps that interoperate with the Service(s). Its Website(s) is
https://www.freshworks.com/apps/
.
“Mobile Applications”:
mean the software applications created, developed, and owned by Freshworks to enable access and use of the Service(s) through mobile or other handheld devices (such as apps on iOS or Android devices).
"Personal Data"
means, data relating to an individual who is or can be identified either from the data or from the data in conjunction with other information that is in, or is likely to come into, the possession of the data controller (as defined under applicable data protection laws).
“Processing”/“To Process”:
means any operation or set of operations which is performed upon Personal Data, whether or not by automatic means, such as collection, recording, organization, storage, adaptation or alteration, retrieval, consultation, use, disclosure by transmission, dissemination or otherwise making available, alignment or combination, blocking, erasure or destruction.
“Customer Data":
means all electronic data, text, messages or other materials, including, without limitation, Personal Data of Users and End Users, submitted to the Services by Customer or its Users through Customer’s Account in connection with Customer’ use of the Services.
“Service(s)”:
means, the Freshworks software-based service offerings identified on the SOF and any Updates, including any Software, API or Documentation made available by Freshworks with such offering, but excludes any applications or APIs separately provided by third parties.
“Software”:
means the generally available software provided by Freshworks in connection with Customer’s use of the Services, and includes Mobile Apps, but excludes any applications or APIs that are provided by third parties.
“User”
: means, any individual who is authorized by Customer to use the Services, including an Account administrator, employees, consultants, contractors, and agents of Customer or its Affiliates, and third parties with which Customer or its Affiliates transact business.
Login to account
We make it fast and easy for your  to delight customers and employees.
Start new trial
We use cookies to track visitors, measure ads, ad campaign effectiveness and analyze site traffic. We may also share information about your use of our site with 3rd parties. For more info, see, our
Cookie Policy
and our
Privacy Policy
. By clicking on "
Cookie Preference Manager
" you can choose to enable only certain cookie categories. By clicking "Accept all" you agree to the storing of all cookies on your device.
Reject all
Accept all
Your Privacy
Your Privacy
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
More information
Strictly Necessary Cookies
Always Active
Strictly Necessary Cookies
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms.    You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Functional Cookies
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages.    If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Performance Cookies
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site.    All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Targeting Cookies
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites.    They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Back Button
Advertising Cookies
Filter Button
Consent
Leg.Interest
Select All Vendors
Select All Vendors
Select All Hosts
Select All
Clear Filters
Information storage and access
Apply
Confirm My Choices
Allow All
Sub-policy 8
https://foursquare.com/legal/privacy:
Skip to content
Consumer Apps & Website
Foursquare Privacy Policy
Korean 한국어
Download a copy of this Privacy Policy (PDF)
Privacy Center
Your Privacy Choices
Privacy Policies
Cookies
Last Updated: February 18, 2025
Effective Date: March 20, 2025
Consumer Services Privacy Policy
Foursquare’s Consumer Services Privacy Policy explains how Foursquare and its affiliates collect, use, share, and otherwise process your personal data in the context of our applications, websites, and other online services offered directly to consumers in their personal, familial or household capacities (collectively “Consumer Services”). Please see our Developer & Enterprise Services Privacy Policy for details about our information practices related to our Developer & Enterprise Services.
About Precise Geolocation Data
Precise geolocation data
can help you navigate and interact with the physical and digital worlds around you. Precise geolocation data is collected using various technologies such as the location services of your operating system or browser, sensor data from your device, and other data that may help us understand your location with accuracy. Ever type in a business name into a ride-share app, or tag your location in a photo before sharing on social media? Or, have you ever received a notification for a coupon when you’re passing by your favorite fast food joint? Foursquare powers these features as well as others that help people navigate, explore, and enjoy the world around them.
Precise geolocation data is both powerful and sensitive. Please read this Privacy Policy carefully and visit our
Privacy Center
to understand Foursquare’s commitment to your data privacy. We are also a participating member of the Network Advertising Initiative’s Precise Location Solution Provider Enhanced Standards which, among other things, requires that participating members not use, allow the use of, sell, or share any information about device or user activity correlated to known sensitive places, such as:
– Places of religious worship
– Correctional facilities
– Places that may be used to infer an LGBTQ+ identification
– Places that may be used to infer engagement with explicit sexual content, material, or acts
– Places primarily intended to be occupied by children under 16
– Domestic abuse shelters, including rape crisis centers
– Welfare or homeless shelters and halfway houses
– Dependency or addiction treatment centers
– Medical facilities that cater predominantly to sensitive conditions, such as cancer centers, HIV/AIDS, fertility or abortion clinics, mental health treatment facilities, or emergency room trauma centers
– Places that may be used to infer refugee or immigrant status, such as refugee or immigration centers and immigration services
– Credit repair, debt services, bankruptcy services, or payday lending institutions
– Temporary places of assembly such as political rallies, marches, or protests, during the times that such rallies, marches, or protests take place
– Military Bases
Commitment to Accountability
Foursquare participates in the following organizations and programs:
Digital Advertising Alliance (“DAA”).
Foursquare designs our products to adhere to the DAA’s
Self-Regulatory Principles
and participates in the DAA’s
Your AdChoices
, which is an easy way to opt out of digital advertising.
Network Advertising Initiative (“NAI”).
Foursquare is a member of the NAI and adheres to the NAI
Privacy Principles
and the
Precise Location Solution Provider Enhanced Standards
.
EU/UK/Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework.
Foursquare’s privacy practices comply with the Data Privacy Framework Principles of Notice; Choice; Accountability for Onward Transfer; Security; Data Integrity and Purpose Limitation; Access; and Recourse, Enforcement and Liability. For more information relating to our participation in the EU/UK/Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework, please read about our International Data Transfers.
Personal Data We Collect and Process
The nature of the data collected often depends on the Consumer Services you are using; however, there are three main sources for the personal data we collect:
Data You Choose to Provide.
We collect data when you create an account for our Consumer Services, when you consent or opt-in to providing data (e.g., geolocation data or contact information from people in your contact list to enable you to find friends when using our apps) via our mobile apps or websites, when you upload content using Consumer Services, or when you contact us for customer support.
Data Automatically Collected.
We automatically collect data about how you interact with our Consumer Services, such as through cookies, pixels, and similar technologies. This data, among other things, helps us better understand your use, interactions, and experiences with our Consumer Services. You can learn more about our use of these tools in our
Cookies & Similar Technologies Policy
.
Data From Third Parties.
We also receive data from third parties such as from the following categories of entities:
–
Foursquare Affiliates
– This includes, for example, our corporate parent, subsidiaries, and affiliates.
–
Business Partners, Developers & Enterprise Customers
– This includes, for example, third parties who create and deliver experiences using our Developer & Enterprise Services, such as the incorporation of our location technology (i.e., SDK or APIs) into their apps and websites. In some cases, these third parties may license data to us.
–
Data Suppliers/Brokers and Advertising Networks
– This includes, for example, third parties who provide us commercially available data, including demographic data, data about how you interact with a third party’s websites, apps, smart TVs and streaming devices, device data (including mobile device and advertising identifiers, such as Apple IDFA or Google Advertising ID, and location data), and information from cookies, pixels and other technologies.
–
Social Media –
This includes, for example, when you access our apps through social media logins (i.e., logging in to our apps using your Facebook or other social media credentials). The details we receive may depend on your social network account privacy settings, but could include name, email address, date of birth, gender, hometown and/or friends.
–
Foursquare Service Providers –
This includes, for example, third parties who specialize in providing enterprise data, analytics and software as a service.
–
Public Sources
– This includes, for example, public records, government agencies, social media platforms, and other publicly available sources.
–
Business Transaction Partners
– This includes, for example, an entity we acquire or are acquired by, a successor, an assignee, or any party involved in a business transaction such as a merger, acquisition, sale of assets, or similar transaction, and/or in the context of an insolvency, bankruptcy, or receivership. These transactions may be actual or prospective.
You can learn more about Foursquare’s data collection, including categories, examples and sources, at A Glance.
At A Glance
Data that does not contain any personal data that can be used to identify you or has otherwise been de-identified or aggregated is not considered personal data. To the extent we process de-identified data, we will maintain and use the data in de-identified form and will not attempt to reidentify the data unless permitted by applicable law.
When we collect data, we rely on several legal bases, including:
Contract Performance.
When the processing is necessary to perform our contract with you, such as our Terms of Service. This may include providing you with our Consumer Services or tailoring the Consumer Services to your preferences;
Legitimate Interests.
When the processing is necessary for our legitimate business interests (or those of our enterprise customers), including but not limited to, improving the Consumer Services or providing our Products;
Consent.
When you have given us your consent, including as described in this Privacy Policy. You may withdraw your consent to processing at any time using the settings on your device or in your account;
Legal Obligation.
When we have a legal obligation to do so, as described in this Privacy Policy.
How We Use Your Personal Data
We may use your personal data for the following purposes:
Account & Registration.
To operate, support, and improve the Consumer Services. This includes maintaining or servicing your accounts (including repairing errors that impair existing or intended functionality), providing customer service, processing transactions and payments, and verifying customer information.
Personalization.
To personalize your experience with our Consumer Services. These personalization features make inferences based on your location about your interests, and whether separate devices (e.g., mobile phones, tablets, and/or TVs) may be owned by you or members of your household, to tailor Consumer Services based on the data we have about you. You may also choose to provide us with access to your contact list so that we can help you to find your friends when using our apps.
Business Operations.
To conduct and maintain business operations such as verifying your identity across Consumer Services, conducting business research, auditing, analytics, planning and strategy, corporate reporting, and management.
Communications.
To communicate with you about our Consumer Services, such as responding to requests for support, sharing updates, and providing information required by law or applicable corporate updates related to mergers, acquisitions, or divestitures.
Marketing & Advertising.
For different types of advertising, including the contextual customization of ads shown as part of your interaction with us. We may also use data collected from your use of our Consumer Services and data from your engagement with apps and services provided by third parties to provide you with advertising about products and services tailored to your inferred interests, preferences, and locations.
Rewards, Contests & Sweepstakes.
To administer rewards (e.g., give points for survey completion), contests, and sweepstakes. If you enter a sweepstakes, we may use data such as your name and email address to run the sweepstakes and fulfill prizes.
Events.
To facilitate events, including contacting you about an event for which you registered or may be interested.
If you register for an event with us, we will add your contact information to our list of expected attendees.
Research & Innovation.
To conduct data analytics and use artificial intelligence and machine learning to support internal research, create new products and services, improve functionality of existing products and services, and develop new features.
Product & Service Provision.
To offer products and services to developers, our partners, and our enterprise customers. These product and service offerings currently include the following:
Points of Interest (POI)
– POI, or Places, data relates to physical places (restaurants, shops, airports, hotels, etc.) and is used to identify and provide context to points of interest worldwide.
Visits
– When you opt-in to the collection and sharing of precise geolocation data from your mobile device, we may use your data to create an inferred visit to that location, which we call a “Visit.”
Targeting (Audience)
– Using our Visits, along with inferences about your interests, location and other demographics that we derive from the data we have about you, we create “Audiences.” Audiences may be used to send you advertisements tailored to your inferred interests.
Targeting (Proximity)
– Using a dataset of geographically-placed points of interest, such as a fast food joint, we create geofences called “Proximity” around such points of interest. Proximity may be used to send advertisements to your device when it is detected near a point of interest.
Attribution
–
We also help brands measure the effectiveness of their advertisement campaigns by attributing purchases or other actions, such as a store visit, to their ads by matching ad impressions to such actions. As part of Attribution, we may also associate devices that we believe are related to each other.
Aggregated Products and Services
– We may also use your data in an aggregated manner to power products and services that offer movement- and location-based insights and trends. In addition, your data may be used to power Foursquare Geospatial Intelligence Platform which is a geospatial data analytics platform that enables visualization of aggregated data.
Security.
To detect security threats (e.g., malware or other malicious activities), troubleshoot performance issues and to protect the security and safety of our products, systems, and customers. Our security measures may include the use of automated systems.
Protect Our Rights & Property.
To prevent fraud, identity theft, activities that violate our policies, terms of service, or the law, or to prevent other criminal activity that compromises our ability to protect our rights and property, secure our services, your data or the safety of our customers, employees and others.
Data Sharing in the Context of Corporate Events.
To share certain data in the context of actual or prospective corporate events.
Comply with Law & Industry Standards.
To comply with applicable laws, regulations, court orders, legally-binding requests (such as from law enforcement), and relevant industry standards.
Disclosing Your Personal Data
We may disclose the categories of personal data we process about you (as described At A Glance above) to third parties as follows:
Disclosures with Your Consent or at Your Direction.
With your consent or as necessary to complete any transaction or provide any product you have requested or authorized. For example, we disclose data to third parties when you instruct us to do so, such as when you authorize friends to see your data or make your data publicly available (e.g., profile photo, users you are following, or other information you post), when you communicate via our Consumer Services with your friends, or when you check-in to a store, restaurant or other point of interest. You can control what you want visible to others, including your friends, in your applicable Foursquare account “Settings.”
Disclosures to Affiliates.
To other Foursquare affiliates for the purposes outlined in this Privacy Policy.
Service Providers & for Business Purposes.
To service providers that perform services on our behalf, such as cloud storage, IT services, marketing, analytics and search engine and other software services. These service providers may be located in countries other than the country where the information originally was collected, such as the US and Canada.
Disclosures to Business Partners, Developers & Enterprise Customers.
To business partners, developers, and enterprise customers for their own purposes. For example, we use “Visits” to infer stops that you may make to disclose them to our enterprise customer, Replica HQ, a data platform primarily serving public agencies, transit authorities, and urban planners that applies advanced modeling and simulation techniques to analyze complex urban dynamics across time and space, in accordance with their Privacy Policy which you can find
here
.  We may also use “Visits” combined with data that our business partners, developers, and other enterprise customers collect to understand movement patterns to determine where to open a physical store, to conduct research and development, to perform analytics, to serve targeted ads, and to determine whether an online or offline advertisement  (including on unaffiliated apps, websites, and billboards) you were exposed to resulted in a visit to a physical store. Under certain privacy and data protection laws, this activity may be considered a “sale” of personal data, “sharing” of personal data for cross-context behavioral advertising, or targeted advertising.
Disclosures to Advertising Partners.
To advertising partners (including ad networks, ad-serving companies such as social media companies, and other service providers they may use) so that they may recognize your devices and deliver content and advertisements (including interest-based) to you. Under certain privacy and data protection laws, this activity may be considered a “sale” of personal data, “sharing” of personal data for cross-context behavioral advertising, or targeted advertising.
Disclosures to Comply with Law & Protect Our Rights.
To law enforcement, government authorities, and private parties (i) if we are required to do so by law or legal process (such as a court order or subpoena); (ii) in response to duly authorized requests from public authorities, including to meet national security, public interest or law enforcement requirements; (iii) to establish, exercise or defend our legal rights; (iv) when we believe disclosure is necessary or appropriate to prevent physical or other harm or financial loss; (v) in connection with an investigation of suspected or actual illegal activity; (vi) to protect the rights, property, or safety of Foursquare and our products and services, our employees, or users and others; or (vii) to otherwise comply with legal obligation (i.e., conducting due diligence or screening for compliance purposes).
Sharing for Corporate Transactions.
As part or in anticipation of a business sale, merger, consolidation, investment, change in control, transfer of substantial corporate assets, reorganization, liquidation, or other business transaction or corporate event.
How We Secure & Retain Your Personal Data
We maintain administrative, technical and physical safeguards designed to protect personal data we obtain through the Consumer Services against accidental, unlawful or unauthorized destruction, loss, alteration, access, disclosure or use.  However, security risk is inherent in all internet and information technologies, and no online provider can fully guarantee the security of your personal data.
We will retain your personal data for as long as necessary to fulfil the purposes for which it was collected and processed, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, regulatory, accounting, or reporting requirements. To determine the appropriate retention period for your personal data, we will consider the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the personal data, the potential risk from unauthorized use or disclosure, the purposes for which we process personal data and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, and applicable legal requirements.
Children’s Privacy
Our Consumer Services are intended for a general audience and are not directed at children under the age of 18.  We do not knowingly collect personal data online from individuals under the age of 18.
Cookies & Similar Technologies
We may use cookies and similar technologies (such as, web beacons or pixels on our website, in our emails, and identifiers supplied by app platform companies within our apps) to understand your use of our Consumer Services; improve your user experience and enable personalized features and content; optimize our advertisements and marketing; and enable third-party advertising companies to assist us in serving ads specific to your interests across the internet. You can learn more about our use of these tools in our
Cookies & Similar Technologies Policy
.
Foursquare provides you with choices about the setting of cookies and similar technologies through our Privacy Preference Center.
Your Privacy Choices – Global
You can learn how to exercise your privacy choices
here
. These choices (and rights, depending upon the applicable law), in summary include:
Data Access, Copies or Transfer.
You may request access to or copies of the personal data we have about you (including for transfer purposes), together with details about how we collect, use, disclose or sell your personal data. In some cases, we may only provide access to the categories of personal data that we collect, use, disclose and sell.
Data Correction and Deletion.
You may ask us to update or correct any inaccurate personal data or to delete any personal data that we may hold about you.
Opting Out of Sales, Sharing for Cross-Context Behavioral Advertising and Processing for Targeted Advertising.
You may opt-out of the sale of your personal data, the sharing of your personal data for cross-context behavioral advertising purposes and the processing of your personal data for targeted advertising.
Limiting Processing of Sensitive Personal Data.
We may collect certain categories of sensitive personal data as described in this Privacy Policy. You may ask us to stop the processing of your sensitive personal data for purposes of inferring characteristics about you.
Withdrawal of Consent.
To the extent that we relied upon your consent for processing of your personal data,
you may withdraw your consent to our processing of your personal data.
Unsubscribe from Marketing Emails & Text Messages.
You may opt out of receiving marketing communications from us.
In some instances, your request to exercise your privacy choices may be limited, for example, if fulfilling your request would reveal personal data about another person or you ask us to delete information that we are required by law to keep or have compelling legitimate interests to keep.
We will not discriminate against you for exercising your choices. If you reside in certain jurisdictions, you may have the ability (including right) to appeal our decision with respect to a request you have submitted via our
Privacy Portal
. If we are unable to resolve your concerns and if you reside in certain jurisdictions, you may have the right to contact a data privacy supervisory authority in the country where you live or work, or where you consider that the data protection rules may have been breached, or seek a remedy through the courts. For questions, concerns or complaints about our participation in the EU/UK/Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework, please read about our International Data Transfers.
Your Privacy Choices – US Consumers
In the US, the Network Advertising Initiative (“NAI”) and the Digital Advertising Alliance (“DAA”) have established rules about interest-based advertising, including cross-device linking for such advertising. Interest-based advertising is digital advertising that is tailored to a consumer’s inferred interests, preferences, and locations. Cross-device linking is the practice of associating different browsers and/or devices (such as mobile devices and televisions) based on information about the potential relationships among them.
You may have the right to opt-out of seeing interest-based ads from us, or our Business Partners, Developers & Enterprise Customers that are delivered on various platforms. To do so, please visit:
–
Desktop/Mobile Web Browser
–
DAA WebChoices
or
NAI Consumer Opt-Out
–
Connected TVs/TV Streaming Devices –
NAI Connected TV Choices
–
Mobile Apps
–
DAA AppChoices iOS
,
DAA AppChoices Android
,
DAA AppChoices Amazon
.
You can learn more about how opting-out of interest-based advertising works by visiting our
Cookies & Similar Technologies Policy
.
Specific US State Residents
If you reside in a U.S. state with a privacy law applicable to us, please review our
US State Consumer Privacy Notice
.
International Data Transfers
In order to provide you with our Consumer Services, it is possible that data you provide may be transferred to or accessed by Foursquare affiliates or third parties located in countries other than the country in which you reside. These countries may not have the same data protection laws as the country in which you reside. Foursquare will conduct any data transfers in accordance with this Privacy Policy and all applicable laws and permissible data transfer mechanisms. Where the international data transfer programs do not apply, when you download and use our Consumer Services, you consent to the transfer of your data.
Foursquare Labs, Inc. complies with the EU-US, UK-US, and Swiss-US Data Privacy Frameworks, as set forth by the US Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal data transferred from the EU, UK, and/or Switzerland to the US.
Foursquare has certified to the Department of Commerce that we adhere to the Data Privacy Framework Principles.  If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Policy and the Data Privacy Framework Principles, the Data Privacy Framework Principles shall govern.  To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
Foursquare commits to resolve complaints about our collection or use of your personal data in compliance with the Data Privacy Framework Principles. Therefore, EU, UK, and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our Data Privacy Framework compliance should first contact us via the methods outlined in the Contact Us section.
Foursquare has further committed to refer any unresolved Data Privacy Framework complaints to the JAMS Data Privacy Framework program, an alternative dispute resolution provider. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint from us, or have not resolved your complaint, please visit the
JAMS Data Privacy Framework program
(
https://www.jamsadr.com/DPF-Dispute-Resolution
) for more information or to file a complaint. The JAMS Data Privacy Framework program services are provided at no cost to you.
If your complaint is not resolved through the above channels, under limited circumstances, you may be able to invoke binding arbitration before a Data Privacy Framework Panel. For more information, visit:
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/ANNEX-I-introduction-dpf
.
The US Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Foursquare’s compliance with the Data Privacy Framework.
Contact Us
If you have any questions or concerns regarding this Privacy Policy, please visit our
Privacy Center
.  You may also contact
privacy@foursquare.com
or write to us at Foursquare Labs, Inc., 50 West 23rd Street, 8th Floor, New York, NY 10010.
Changes to This Privacy Policy
We may update this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will post the revised Privacy Policy here and indicate when it was most recently updated. If we make material changes in the way we use your data, we will notify you by posting an announcement on our sites or apps, or by sending you an email (to the last email address you provided us).
By clicking “Accept All”, continuing to scroll or closing this banner, you agree to the storing of cookies on your device to enhance site navigation, analyze site usage, and assist in our marketing efforts. You can manage your preferences in Cookie Settings, withdraw your consent at any time or learn more about the use of cookies.
Foursquare Cookie Policy
More Options
Reject All
Accept All
Your Opt Out Preference Signal is Honored
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
Foursquare Cookie Policy
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts may not function properly. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Cookies Details‎
Performance & Analytics Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and cannot be used to identify you. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Cookies Details‎
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. These cookies are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Cookies Details‎
Social Media Cookies
These cookies are set by a range of social media services that we have added to the site to enable you to share our content with your friends and networks. They are capable of tracking your browser across other sites and building up a profile of your interests. This may impact the content and messages you see on other websites you visit. If you do not allow these cookies you may not be able to use or see these sharing tools.
Cookies Details‎
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Cookies Details‎
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 9
https://www.algolia.com/policies/privacy:
Brand guidelines
Download logo pack
Privacy Policy
Relating to the use of Algolia's Website and Services.
Select Policy
Terms of Service
Service Level Agreement
Privacy Policy
Support Policy
Acceptable Use Policy
Legal Information
Cookies
Infrastructure & Sub-Processors
Effective Date: March 3rd, 2025
We take our obligation to protect the privacy of your personal information seriously.
Your personal information will be treated in a secure and confidential manner in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations.
When you use Algolia Websites and Services (as defined below), we receive information that may directly or indirectly identify you (“personal information” or “personal data”).
This privacy policy (this “Privacy Policy”) governs and describes how Algolia, Inc. and its subsidiaries (“Algolia”, “we,” “us” or “our”) may collect, use, and disclose personal information that we obtain through or from:
https://www.algolia.com/
and all websites within that domain (such as
https://status.algolia.com
,
https://www.algolia.com/blog/
,
https://community.algolia.com/
,
https://algolia.com/doc/
and
https://www.algolia.com/users/sign_up
(our “Websites”) and mobile applications,
individuals that register to attend our marketing or corporate events or receive our marketing materials (“Marketing Activities”),
third-party sources such as data brokers, publicly available sources, and our partners,
our subscribers’ personnel who register to use our Services (including through our Services user interface dashboard registration forms on our Websites), and
subscriber data submitted to our hosted search or related services (the “Services”) by our subscribers or their internet clients or end users, or that we collect through our Services on behalf of our subscribers. Section 9 of this Privacy Policy separately covers and describes how Algolia collects, uses and discloses the personal information submitted to our Services by our subscribers (or their internet clients or end users) or that we collect through our Services (on behalf of our subscribers), which use by our subscribers is governed by our subscription agreements with our subscribers.
In this Policy we will explain:
What types of personal information Algolia collects and how it is used.
How Algolia collects your personal information, including whether personal information is collected automatically.
How long Algolia retains your personal information.
How and when Algolia shares your personal information with others.
How Algolia protects your personal information.
What choices and rights are available to you regarding the use of your personal information, including how to access and update personal information.
How personal information submitted to our Services or collected through our Services on behalf of or at the direction of our subscribers is treated.
How to update your communication preferences.
Whether children under the age of 13 are permitted to use our Services.
Contact Information
Depending on the context of personal information you provide, Algolia may be the data controller (“controller”) or data processor (“processor”) of your personal information under this policy. Algolia is a processor of personal information submitted to the Services or collected through the Services on behalf of or at the direction of subscribers. If you have any questions or concerns regarding this Privacy Policy or our privacy practices, including the processing of your personal information, if you would like to exercise your data rights under applicable laws, or if you believe your privacy rights have been violated, please contact Algolia at
privacy@algolia.com
, or:
Algolia, Inc.
3790 El Camino Real
Unit #518
Palo Alto, CA 94306
Algolia SAS
55 Rue d'Amsterdam
75008 Paris
France
Algolia Limited
1 Primrose St, London
EC2A 2EX
UK
1. What types of personal information does Algolia collect?
Section 9 of this Privacy Policy separately covers and applies to personal information submitted by our subscribers to our Services, or collected through our Services on behalf of or at the direction of our subscribers.
The types of personal information we collect and share depend on which of our Websites or Marketing Activities you use. In general, we may collect information that identifies you, information about how you use our Websites, and the information that you create while you interact with our Websites.
Information that we collect from you may include the following:
Information that can personally identify you, such as name, photograph, postal address, email address, or telephone number.
Information about your Internet connection, the equipment you use to access our Websites, and your use of our Websites.
Information that you provide when you fill in forms on our Websites (e.g. name, email address or other information requested in the form).
Information that identifies you in planning and hosting corporate events related to our Marketing Activities (e.g., user conferences).
Records and copies of your correspondence (including email addresses and Twitter handles), if you contact us.
Your responses to surveys that we might ask you to complete for research purposes.
Details of transactions you carry out through our Websites or related to orders of our Services.
You also may provide information as a contributing user that is published or displayed (hereafter, referred to as "posted") on public areas of our Websites, on the Algolia Community site, or transmitted to other users of our Websites or third-parties. Your user contributions are posted and transmitted to others at your own risk.
2. How does Algolia use my personal information
Section 9 of this Privacy Policy separately covers and applies to personal information submitted by our subscribers to our Services, or collected through our Services on behalf of or at the direction of our subscribers.
Algolia uses personal information that you provide to us to deliver content on our Websites, plan and host Marketing Activities, and to provide our Services.
We may use this information in the following ways:
To present our Websites and their contents to you.
To allow you to participate in interactive features on our Websites.
To enhance the experience of using our Websites, Services, and Marketing Activities.
To manage your access to the Services.
To carry out our obligations and enforce our rights that arise from any contracts entered into between you and us, including for billing and collection.
To provide you with notices about your account and/or subscription, including expiration and renewal notices.
To notify you about changes to our Websites or Services.
To provide you with information or services that you request from us.
To communicate with you about Marketing Activities, which may include promotional information.
To send promotional information and other communications regarding our products or Services.
To create a list of actual and prospective users and subscribers for our products or Services.
To assemble statistics regarding the use of our Websites, product or Services.
To prevent fraud or abuse.
To comply with any legal or regulatory obligations.
For any other purpose we describe at the time we collect information.
For any reason you engage us.
For any other purpose with your consent.
3. How does Algolia collect my personal information?
Section 9 of this Privacy Policy separately covers and applies to personal information submitted by our subscribers to our Services, or collected through our Services on behalf of or at the direction of our subscribers.
Algolia may directly collect personal information you provide us in the following ways:
When you complete forms on our Websites, such as registering an account, subscribing to a Service, or posting a comment.
When you create an account to use our Services or create a new user for that account.
When you complete transactions through our Websites, such as fulfilling an order for our Services.
When you perform search queries on our Websites.
When you post messages on our Websites, either in public areas or directly to other users or third-parties.
When you use our publicly accessible blogs.
When you contact us outside of our Websites, such via email or Twitter.
When you request assistance from our Support team.
When you respond to surveys we ask you to complete for research purposes.
When you provide information that will be posted on public areas of our Websites.
When you transmit information to other users of our Websites or third-parties as a user contribution.
When you register for or attend our Marketing Activities.
Third-Parties and Data Supplementation
To the extent allowed by law, Algolia may collect personal information about you from other third-party sources. We may maintain this information or associate it with personal information we already have about you (“data supplementation”). This information helps us to improve our Websites, to deliver better and more personalized Services, to update, expand, and analyze our records, identify new customers, and provide products and services that may be of interest to you. To the extent we combine such third-party sourced information with information we already have about you, we will treat the combined information in accordance with the practices described under this Privacy Policy and any additional restrictions imposed by the source of the data.
Third-party sources we may use vary over time, but have included or may include:
Data brokers from which we purchase demographic data to supplement the information we collect.
Social networks when you reference our Services or grant permission to Algolia to access your data on one or more of these services.
Our partners with whom we may offer co-branded services, sell or distribute our Services, or engage in joint marketing activities.
Publicly-available sources or data in the public domain.
Examples of the types of personal information that may be obtained from public sources or purchased from third-parties and combined with information we already have about you, may include:
contact information about you from third-party sources to verify your address so we can properly prevent fraud or communicate with you, or
data purchased from third-parties, such as social networking sites and conference attendee lists, that is combined with information we already have about you, to create more tailored advertising and products.
We are not responsible for the accuracy of any information provided by third-parties or third-party policies or practices.
Financial Information
We use third-party payment processors to process payments made to us. In connection with the processing of such payments, we do not retain any personally identifiable information or any financial information such as credit card numbers. Rather, all such information is provided directly to our third-party processors. Our third-party processors currently include Stripe, and Stripe’s privacy policy can be viewed at
https://stripe.com/us/privacy
.
4. Does Algolia collect personal information automatically?
Section 9 of this Privacy Policy separately covers and applies to personal information submitted by our subscribers to our Services, or collected through our Services on behalf of or at the direction of our subscribers.
As is true of most websites, Algolia gathers certain information automatically as you navigate through and interact with our Websites. This information helps us to improve and personalize our Websites, Marketing Activities, and Services, as well as prevent fraud or abuse. This information may be gathered and stored in log files.
Information that we collect from you automatically may include the following:
Internet Protocol (IP) addresses,
Internet Service Provider (ISP),
browser type,
referring/exit pages,
operating system,
date/time stamp, and/or
browsing actions and browsing patterns.
Cookies
Algolia and our partners use cookies or similar technologies to analyze trends, administer our Websites and Services, track users' movements around our Websites and Services, and to gather demographic information about our user base as a whole. A cookie is a small piece of information that is placed on your device when you visit certain websites. You can control the use of cookies at the individual browser level, but if you choose to disable cookies, it may limit your use of certain features or functions on our Websites or Services.
For more information on how Algolia uses cookies, refer to
https://www.algolia.com/policies/cookies/
.
For more information on third-party cookies, refer to Section 6 of this Privacy Policy.
5. How long does Algolia keep my personal information?
Section 9 of this Privacy Policy separately covers and applies to personal information submitted by our subscribers to our Services, or collected through our Services on behalf of or at the direction of our subscribers.
Algolia may retain your personal information for a period of time consistent with the original purpose of collection. For instance, we may retain your personal information during the time you have an account to use our Websites or Services, or as agreed in our subscription agreements, and for a reasonable period of time thereafter. We also may retain your personal information during the period of time needed for Algolia to pursue our legitimate business interests, conduct audits, comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements.
6. When and how does Algolia share my personal information with others?
Section 9 of this Privacy Policy separately covers and applies to personal information submitted by our subscribers to our Services, or collected through our Services on behalf of or at the direction of our subscribers.
Algolia may share your personal information with certain third-parties. This sharing is based on our relationship with those third-parties, your consent, or legal or contractual obligations that require us to share such information.
We may share your personal information that we collect or you provide as follows:
To our subsidiaries and affiliates for the purposes outlined in this Privacy Policy.
To contractors, service providers such as Stripe and Intercom, and other third-parties we use to support our business. These entities are bound by contractual obligations to keep personal information confidential and can use it only for the purposes for which we disclose the information to them.
When you create an account on our community forum. Please note that the information you share in public areas of our Websites may be viewed by any user of our Websites.
To a buyer or other successor in the event of a merger, divestiture, restructuring, reorganization, dissolution, or other sale or transfer of some or all of Algolia’s assets, whether as a going concern or as part of bankruptcy, liquidation or similar proceeding, in which personal information held by Algolia about our Websites users is among the assets transferred. You will be notified via email and/or a prominent notice on our Websites of any change in ownership or uses of your personal information, as well as any choices you may have regarding your personal information.
To comply with any court order, law, or legal process (such as a subpoena), to investigate fraud, including responding to any government or regulatory request, lawful requests by public authorities, or to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
To enforce or apply our Terms of Service and other subscription agreements, including for billing and collection purposes.
If we believe disclosure is necessary or appropriate to protect the rights, property, or safety of Algolia, our subscribers or others. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for the purposes of fraud protection and credit risk reduction.
For any other purpose disclosed by us when you provide the information.
With your consent.
Algolia may disclose aggregated statistical data that does not contain Personal Data with third-parties.
Algolia partners with third-parties that serve content or applications. These partners, including (i) third-parties that either display advertising on our Websites or manage our advertising on other sites and (ii) applications providers such as Github, may collect your information as you interact with them through our Websites. Such third-party partners may also use cookies or similar technologies in order to provide you advertising based upon your browsing activities and interests. If you wish to opt out of interest-based advertising, click
here
(or if located in the European Union click
here
). Please note you will continue to receive generic ads.
You may login to our Websites using a sign-in service such as your Github profile, Google profile, or Heroku profile. These services authenticate your identity and provide you the option to share certain personal information with us such as your name and email address to pre-populate our sign-in form and collection of your personal information may occur as a result of login to our Websites using these sign-in services.
From time to time, we may include links to other websites whose privacy practices may differ from ours. If you submit personal information to any of those sites, your information will be governed by such third-party’s privacy policies. Please carefully read the privacy policy of any website you visit.
7. How does Algolia keep my information secure?
Section 9 of this Privacy Policy separately covers and applies to personal information submitted by our subscribers to our Services, or collected through our Services on behalf of or at the direction of our subscribers.
Algolia will maintain appropriate technical and organizational security measures designed to protect your personal information from accidental loss, unauthorized use, alteration, or disclosure. Although we implement and maintain security measures that are appropriate for our business activities, please be aware that no security measures are perfect or impenetrable and any transmission of personal information is at your own risk. You may review the most up to date version of our security measures at
https://www.algolia.com/distributed-secure/security-compliance/
.
You must also make sure that your information is safe and secure. We are not responsible if you circumvent any privacy settings or security measures on our Websites. Even if we give you (or you have chosen) a password for access to certain parts of our Websites, you are responsible for keeping this password confidential. Do not share your password with anyone. Please be careful about giving out information in public areas of our Websites, for example, community message boards or forums. The information you share in public areas may be viewed by any user of our Websites. We cannot control the actions of other users of our Websites with whom you choose to share your information; as such we cannot guarantee your contributed information cannot be viewed by unauthorized parties.
8. What choices and rights are available to me regarding the use of my personal information?
Section 9 of this Privacy Policy separately covers and applies to personal information submitted by our subscribers to our Services, or collected through our Services on behalf of or at the direction of our subscribers. In regards to personal information we process on behalf of our subscribers, please contact the applicable subscriber directly as described in Section 9 of this Privacy Policy.
By using our Websites, Services, and Marketing Activities you expressly give your consent for the collection and use of your personal information in compliance with this Privacy Policy. This does not affect lawful processing under applicable laws based on other legal basis such as contractual obligation, compliance with applicable laws, and legitimate purposes.
If you receive a marketing communication or promotion from us, you may opt-out of these communications at any time (i) by following the unsubscribe instructions included in the promotion (if sent by email), (ii) through
Algolia preference page
, (iii) by accessing the email preferences in your account settings page in the Services user interface dashboard, or (iv) sending us an email at the address noted in the Contact Information section above.
Right to Access or Correct Personal Information
If Algolia processes your personal information on behalf of or at the direction of one of our subscribers, you should first look to that subscriber for assistance regarding the modification or correction of your personal information as described in Section 9 of this Privacy Policy.
You have the right to access and correct your personal information. If you want to review or correct your personal information, you can login to the appropriate Website or Service and visit your account profile page, typically designated as “My Account”, or contact us through the Support Center, or you may send us an email at the address noted in the Contact Information section above.
Right to Delete Personal Information (“Right to be Forgotten”)
If Algolia processes your personal information on behalf of or at the direction of one of our subscribers, you should first look to that subscriber for assistance regarding the removal of your personal information as described in Section 9 of this Privacy Policy.
You have the right to request deletion of personal information we hold about you and we have the obligation to erase your personal information, where:
the personal information is no longer necessary in relation to the purposes for which it was collected or otherwise processed,
you withdraw consent on which the processing is based and where there is no other legal ground for the processing,
you object to the processing and there are no overriding legitimate grounds for the processing,
the personal information has been unlawfully processed, or
the personal information has to be erased for compliance with a legal obligation in the European Union or a Member State law to which Algolia is subject.
If you want to request removal of your personal information from our Websites or Services, you can login to the appropriate Website or Service and contact us through the Support Center, or you may send us an email at the address noted in the Contact Information section above. You can also request closure of your account. We will respond to your request within 30 days.
In some cases, we may not be able to remove your personal information, in which case we will let you know that we are unable to do so and why.
Right to Data Portability
If Algolia processes your personal information on behalf of or at the direction of one of our subscribers, you should first look to that subscriber for assistance regarding the data portability of your personal information as described in Section 9 of this Privacy Policy.
You have the right to receive or transfer a copy of your personal information, where:
we are relying upon your consent or the fact that the processing is necessary for the performance of a contract to which you are party as the legal basis for the processing, and
personal information is processed by automatic means.
This copy will be provided to you in a common machine-readable format. You may also require us to transmit it to another party where this is technically feasible.
If you want to request a copy of your personal information, you can login to the appropriate Website or Service and contact us through the Support Center, or you may send us an email at the address noted in the Contact Information section above.
Right to Restrict Personal Information Processing
If Algolia processes your personal information on behalf of or at the direction of one of our subscribers, you should first look to that subscriber for assistance regarding the restriction of processing of your personal information as described in Section 9 of this Privacy Policy.
You have the right to request the restriction of processing of your personal information, where:
you contest the accuracy of the personal information until we take sufficient steps to correct or verify its accuracy,
where the processing is unlawful but you do not want us to erase the personal information,
where we no longer need the personal information for the purposes of the processing, but you require the information for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims, or
where you have objected to processing justified on legitimate interest grounds (see below) pending verification as to whether Algolia has compelling legitimate grounds to continue processing.
Where personal information is subjected to restriction in this way we will only process it with your consent or for the establishment, exercise, or defense of legal claims. This right includes restricting the processing of your personal information to only include storage of your personal information (e.g. during the time when Algolia assesses whether you are entitled to have personal information erased).
If you want to request restriction of processing of your personal information, you can login to the appropriate Website or Service and contact us through the Support Center, or you may send us an email at the address noted in the Contact Information section above.
Right to object to processing justified on legitimate interest grounds
If Algolia processes your personal information on behalf of or at the direction of one of our subscribers, you should first look to that subscriber for assistance regarding objections to processing your personal information as described in Section 9 of this Privacy Policy.
Where we are relying upon legitimate interest to process personal information, you have the right to object to that processing. If you object, we must stop that processing unless we can either demonstrate compelling legitimate grounds for the processing that override your interests, rights and freedoms or where we need to process the personal information for the establishment, exercise, or defense of legal claims. Where we rely upon legitimate interest as a basis for processing we believe that we can demonstrate such compelling legitimate grounds, but we will consider each case on an individual basis.
If you want to object to the processing of your personal information, you can login to the appropriate Website or Service and contact us through the Support Center, or you may send us an email at the address noted in the Contact Information section above.
Right to be informed of the appropriate safeguards where personal information are transferred to a third country or to an international organization
If Algolia processes your personal information on behalf of or at the direction of one of our subscribers, you should first look to that subscriber for assistance regarding safeguards when transferring your personal information to a third country as described in Section 9 of this Privacy Policy.
Refer to the Terms of Service for information on the safeguards that have been put in place to protect your personal information for transfer outside of the European Economic Area. For transfers to countries without an adequacy decision by the European Commission, Algolia puts appropriate safeguards through contractual obligations.
Right to Withdraw Consent
If Algolia processes your personal information on behalf of or at the direction of one of our subscribers, you should first look to that subscriber for assistance regarding withdrawing consent for processing your personal information as described in Section 9 of this Privacy Policy.
Where you have provided us with your consent to process personal information, you have the right to withdraw such consent at any time, without affecting the lawfulness of processing based on consent before its withdrawal.
You can do this by:
using certain web browser and opt-out options discussed in this Privacy Policy to limit the personal information you provide to us or our third-party partners (please see Section 4 “Does Algolia collect personal information automatically?”, Section 6 “When and how does Algolia share my personal information with others?” and Section 10 "Communication Preferences and Subscriptions”),
logging into the appropriate Website or Service and contacting us through the Support Center,
following the unsubscribe instructions included in emails,
through
Algolia preference page
,
by accessing the email preferences in your account settings page in the Services user interface dashboard, or
sending us an email at the address noted in the Contact Information section above.
Right to Submit Complaints or Report Abuse
You also have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority, in particular in your country of residence, if you consider that the processing of your personal information infringes applicable laws.
If you need to report abuse, please contact us by email at
abuse@algolia.com
.
California Privacy Rights
California Civil Code Section § 1798.83 permits users of our Websites and Services that are California residents to opt-out from the disclosure of your personal information to third-parties for their direct marketing purposes. To make such a request, you can login to the appropriate Website or Service and contact us through the Support Center, or you may send us an email at the address noted in the Contact Information section above.
Please be advised that where California State residents opt-out from permitting their personal information to be shared, such individuals may still receive selected offers directly from us, in accordance with applicable law.
9. Subscriber Data submitted to our Services or collected through our Services (on behalf of our subscribers)
Algolia subscribers electronically submit (or cause to be submitted) data to the Services for hosting, indexing and related processing. Algolia processes data only as provided in our subscription agreements with our subscribers, such as our Terms of Service available at
https://www.algolia.com/policies/terms/
and our Data Processing Agreement available at
https://www.algolia.com/pdf/DPA-latest.pdf
. Additional information about our privacy and security practices with respect to our Services is available in our security and compliance documentation available at
https://www.algolia.com/distributed-secure/security-compliance/
.
As subscribers (or in some cases their internet clients or end users) control the data to be processed, Algolia’s network, platform, and Services may be used as a conduit for information.
The use of personal information collected through our Services at the direction of our subscribers shall be limited to the purpose of providing the Services for which the subscriber has engaged Algolia.
Although Algolia collects personal information related to subscriber personnel as they configure a subscriber’s use of our Services, Algolia has no direct relationship with individuals whose personal information is hosted or transmitted through the Services by subscribers or their permitted internet clients or end users. Subscribers are responsible for complying with any regulations or laws that require providing notice, disclosure, and/or obtaining consent prior to transferring the data to Algolia for processing purposes.
Algolia also collects, uses, and discloses personal information of individuals who visit our Websites (“Visitors”) and individual representatives of our subscribers, suppliers, and business partners (“Business Contacts”). This Section 9 does not apply to personal information associated with Visitors and Business Contacts collected, stored, and processed by Algolia which are governed by the other provisions of this Privacy Policy.
Choice
Our Services collect personal information for our subscribers. As a data processor of this personal information on our subscriber’s behalf, Algolia has limited ability to access personal information our subscribers submit to our Services. If you are a data subject for whom a subscriber has submitted personal information to the Services and would like your information not to be disclosed to a third-party or to be used for a purpose that is materially different from the purpose(s) for which the personal information was originally collected, then you should contact the subscriber directly. Concerns with personal information hosted or transmitted at the direction of our subscribers may be reported according to our acceptable use policy available at
https://www.algolia.com/distributed-secure/security-compliance/
. We will refer your requests to the appropriate subscriber.
Sub-processor Accountability
Algolia is responsible for the processing of personal information it receives, and subsequently transfers to a third-party acting as an agent on its behalf in accordance with our subscription agreements. Algolia may use from time to time third-party service providers, contractors, and sub-processors to assist in providing the Services on our behalf. Algolia maintains contracts with these third-parties restricting their access, use, and disclosure of personal information.
Security Measures
Algolia maintains administrative, physical, and technical safeguards to protect data submitted to the Services, including personal information. These security measures are set forth in our security and compliance documentation available at
https://www.algolia.com/distributed-secure/security-compliance/
.
Subscriber Data Integrity and Purpose Limitation
As a data processor, Algolia hosts, transmits, discloses, and processes data, which may include personal information about EU personnel of our subscribers administering, using or supporting the Services. Algolia may process data to provide the Services, to prevent or address technical or service problems, to follow the instructions of our subscribers and their personnel who submitted the personal information, or in response to contractual or legal requirements. Algolia does not control or own the data submitted by its subscribers, or their internet clients or end users, to the Services. Algolia may share personal information with its subsidiaries, contractors, or third-parties if Algolia undergoes a business transaction, such as a merger, acquisition by another company or sale of all or substantially all of its assets.
Data Subject Rights to Subscriber Data
Algolia acknowledges that you have the right to access your personal information. Algolia has no direct relationship with the individuals whose personal information our Services process on behalf of our subscribers. An individual who seeks access, or who seeks to correct, amend, or delete inaccurate personal information should direct his or her query to the appropriate subscriber (i.e., the data controller). Subscribers have the ability to fulfill these requests, and Algolia will provide assistance for requests that subscribers are not able to complete. If the subscriber requests that Algolia remove the personal information, we will refer your request to the applicable subscriber and we will respond to the request within 30 days.
Subscriber Data Retention
Algolia retains the personal information we process on behalf of our subscribers for as long as needed to provide the Services to our subscribers and in accordance with our subscription agreements. To the extent not deleted by our subscribers, Algolia may also retain and use certain personal information for a reasonable period of time thereafter as necessary to pursue our legitimate business interests, conduct audits, comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements.
10. Communication Preferences and Subscriptions
Algolia offers visitors of its Websites and Services, personnel of our subscribers whose personal information is collected through our Websites or Services, and attendees or recipients of Marketing Activities a means to choose how we use the information provided. You may choose to stop receiving or participating in Marketing Activities, including newsletters, by following the unsubscribe instructions included in emails, through
Algolia preference page
, by accessing the email preferences in your account settings page in the Services user interface dashboard, or sending us an email at the address noted in the Contact Information section above.
11. Children under the age of 13
Our Websites and Services are not intended for children under 13 years old. No one under age 13 years old may provide any personal information to or on the Websites and Services.
We do not knowingly collect personal information from children under 13 years old. If you are under 13 years old, do not use or provide any information on our Websites or Services including on or through any of their features, register on the Websites or Services, make any purchases through the Websites or Services, use any of the interactive or public comment features of our Websites or Services, or provide any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, email address, or any screen name or user name you may use. If we learn we have collected or received personal information from a child under 13 years old, we will delete that information without undue delay.
If you believe we might have any information from or about a child under 13 years old, please contact us using the information in the “Contact Information” section above.
12. Dispute Resolution
If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that Algolia has not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.trustarc.com/watchdog/request
.
13. Modifications
Algolia reserves the right to modify this Privacy Policy at any time. It is our policy to post any changes we make to this Privacy Policy on this page and the changes will be effective upon Algolia’s publication of the updated Privacy Policy except as described below. If Algolia makes material changes to how we treat your personal information, we will notify you by email (sent to the email address specified in your account) or by means of a notice on this page thirty (30) days prior to the change becoming effective. However, changes made to comply with applicable laws will be effective immediately. You are responsible for ensuring we have an up-to-date email address for you and periodically visiting this page to check for any changes to our Privacy Policy. Your continued use of the Websites and the Services expressly indicates your acceptance of Algolia’s then-current Privacy Policy and your consent to Algolia’s collection of personal information in accordance with the then-current Privacy Policy.
If you have questions or concerns about this Privacy Policy, please contact Algolia using the information in the “Contact Information” section above. The date this Privacy Policy was last revised is identified at the top of the page.
Previous Versions:
Version 1 (June 10, 2013)
Version 2 (August 19, 2013)
Version 3 (July 4, 2016)
Version 4 (May 25, 2018)
Version 5 (January 29, 2021)
We use cookies to improve your experience and for marketing.
Read more here.
Reject all
Accept all
Adjust settings
Privacy Preference Center
When you visit any website, it may store or retrieve information on your browser, mostly in the form of cookies. This information might be about you, your preferences or your device and is mostly used to make the site work as you expect it to. The information does not usually directly identify you, but it can give you a more personalized web experience. Because we respect your right to privacy, you can choose not to allow some types of cookies. Click on the different category headings to find out more and change our default settings. However, blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of the site and the services we are able to offer.
More information
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site.
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 10
https://www.honeybadger.io/privacy/:
Tour
Features
Error Tracking
Uptime Monitoring
Status Pages
Logging & Observability
Cron & Heartbeat Monitoring
Frameworks
Ruby on Rails
Laravel
Django
Phoenix
Languages
Ruby
PHP
Python
JavaScript
Elixir
Crystal
Node
Go
programming language
Pricing
Blog
Docs
Status
Contact
Meet the 'Badgers
Log In
Start free trial
Protecting your private information is our priority. This Privacy Statement applies to the www.honeybadger.io website operated by Honeybadger Industries LLC and other sites, apps, or services that link to this Statement, and it governs collection, usage, and disclosure of your personal information. This Statement does not apply to websites, applications, or services that link to different privacy statements.
We collect and process personal information about you with your consent and/or as necessary to provide the products you use, operate our business, meet our contractual and legal obligations, protect the security of our systems and our customers, or fulfill other legitimate interests.
Collection of Your Personal Information
Honeybadger may collect personal information in a variety of ways when you use our services. We collect personal information you provide to us, such as your name and email address. If you purchase Honeybadger's products and services, we collect billing and credit card information. We may gather additional personal or non-personal information in the future. Some services may not be available or function correctly if you are not willing to provide personal information. We may also obtain information from other sources and combine that with information we collect on our services.
Information about your computer hardware and software may be automatically collected by Honeybadger when you visit our sites. This information can include: your IP address, operating system, browser type, domain names, access times, language, and referring website addresses. When you use our mobile application we may collect certain information about your device automatically, including device identifier and operating system.
Cookies.
We may automatically collect information using "cookies". Cookies are small data files stored on your hard drive by a website. Among other things, cookies help us improve our services and your experience. We use cookies to see which areas and features are popular and to count visits to our services.
Web Beacons.
We may collect information using web beacons. Web beacons are electronic images that may be used on our services or in our emails. We use web beacons to deliver cookies, count visits, understand usage and campaign effectiveness and to tell if an email has been opened and acted upon.
Analytics.
Third parties who provide us with analytics services for the services may also automatically collect some of the information described above, including, for example, IP address, access times, browser type and language, device type, device identifiers and Wi-Fi information. Please consult the respective privacy policies and statements of these third parties for more information, including how
Fathom Analytics
use this data.
Use of Your Personal Information
Honeybadger collects and uses your personal information as described in this Statement or disclosed to you in our services, to operate its website(s), and deliver the services you have requested. For example, we may use your information to:
operate and improve our internal operations, systems, products, and services;
understand you and your preferences to enhance your experience and enjoyment using our services;
respond to your comments and questions and provide customer service;
send you related information, including confirmations, invoices, technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
link or combine information about you with other personal information we get from third parties, to help understand your needs and provide you with better and more personalized service; and
protect, investigate, and deter against fraudulent, unauthorized, or illegal activity.
Honeybadger may also use your personally identifiable information to inform you of other products or services available from Honeybadger. Honeybadger may also contact you via surveys to conduct research about your opinion of current services or of potential new services that may be offered.
Disclosure of Your Personal Information
Honeybadger does not sell, rent or lease its customer lists to third parties. We may share your information with your consent. Honeybadger may share data with trusted partners and service providers to help provide backup and disaster-recovery services, provide data storage and processing services, perform statistical analysis, send you email or postal mail, provide customer support, or arrange for deliveries. All such third parties are prohibited from using your personal information except to provide these services to Honeybadger, and they are required to maintain the confidentiality of your information.
Honeybadger may include personal data in connection with or during negotiation of any merger, financing, acquisitions, bankruptcy, dissolution, transaction or proceeding involving sale, transfer, divestiture, or disclosure of all or a portion of our business or assets to another company.
Honeybadger may disclose your personal information to respond to lawful requests or in the good faith belief that such action is necessary to: (a) conform to the edicts of the law or comply with legal process served on Honeybadger or the site; (b) protect and defend the rights or property of Honeybadger, its customers, and others; (c) respond to valid requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements; (d) protect against legal liability; and, (e) act under emergency to protect the personal safety of users of Honeybadger, its customers, or the public.
We may also share aggregated or deidentified information.
Your Information Choices and Changes
If you wish to ask for access, correction, or deletion of any of your personal information held by us or a change in the way we use your information (for which we reserve the right to charge you a fee, as permitted by applicable law), please contact us at:
support@honeybadger.io
. However, we may decline requests that are unreasonable, prohibited by law, or are not required to be honored by applicable law.
You may opt out of receiving promotional emails from us by following the instructions in those emails. If you opt out, we may still send you non-promotional emails, such as emails about your accounts or our ongoing business relations. You may also send requests about your contact preferences, changes to your information including requests to opt-out of sharing your personal information with third parties by emailing
support@honeybadger.io
.
You have the ability to accept or decline cookies. Most Web browsers automatically accept cookies, but you can usually modify your browser setting to decline cookies if you prefer. If you choose to decline cookies, you may not be able to fully experience the interactive features of the Honeybadger services or websites you visit.
Our third-party analytics partners may provide you with options to opt-out of certain information collection. For more information about the applicable choices they provide you, please visit
https://usefathom.com/privacy
.
There are many ways through which web browser signals and other similar mechanisms (for example, "Do Not Track") can indicate your choice to disable tracking, and, while we and others give you choices described in this Statement, we do not currently honor these mechanisms.
Security of your Personal Information
Honeybadger takes reasonable steps to help secure your personal information in an effort to prevent loss, misuse, and unauthorized access, use, alteration, destruction, or disclosure.
Transfers of Your Personal Information
Personal information we collect may be stored and processed in your region, in the United States or in any other country where we or our affiliates, subsidiaries or service providers maintain facilities. We maintain primary data centers in the United States. We take steps designed to ensure that the data we collect under this Statement is processed according to the provisions of this Statement and applicable law wherever the data is located.
When we transfer personal information from the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland to other countries, some of which have not been determined by the European Commission to have an adequate level of data protection, we use a variety of legal mechanisms, including contracts, in an effort to help ensure your rights and protections.
For EU Users
We adhere to applicable data protection laws in the European Economic Area, which, if applicable to you, includes the following rights:
If we are processing personal information based on your consent, you have a right to withdraw consent at any time for future processing;
You have a right to request access to, rectification, or erasure of your personal information, or to transfer or receive a copy of your personal information in a usable format;
You have a right to object to the processing of your personal information under certain circumstances; and
You have a right to lodge a complaint with a data protection authority.
Please see our
Data Processing Addendum
for more information about how we handle data transfers from the EEA.
Storage and Retention of Your Personal Information
We retain your personal information for as long as necessary to provide services requested by you, or for other essential purposes such as complying with our legal obligations, resolving disputes, and enforcing our agreements.  Because these needs can vary for different data types in the context of different services, actual retention periods can vary significantly. The criteria used to determine retention include:
How long is the personal information needed to provide applicable services?
This includes such things as maintaining and improving the performance of the services, enabling system security measures, and maintaining appropriate business and financial records.
Do users provide, create, or maintain the data with the expectation we will retain it until they affirmatively remove it?
In such cases, we may maintain the data until actively deleted by the user.
Is the personal information of a sensitive type?
If so, a shortened retention time may be appropriate.
Are we subject to a legal, contractual, or similar obligation to retain the data?
Examples can include mandatory data retention laws in the applicable jurisdiction, government orders to preserve data, or data that must be retained for the purposes of litigation.
Changes to This Statement
Honeybadger will occasionally update this Privacy Statement from time to time. If we make any changes to this Statement, we will change the "Last modified" date below or by providing such notice about or obtaining consent to changes as may be required by applicable law. Honeybadger encourages you to periodically review this Statement to be informed of how Honeybadger is protecting your information.
Questions
If you have any questions about this policy, or if you wish to lodge a complaint about our privacy practices, please contact us at
support@honeybadger.io
.
Last modified June 24th, 2024
Sub-policy 11
https://superfeedr.com/privacy/:
Superfeedr, Inc. and our affiliates ("Company") knows that you care about how your personal information is used and shared, and we take your privacy seriously. Please read the following to learn more about our privacy policy. By visiting the Superfeedr website and domain name, and any other linked pages, features, content, or application services offered from time to time by Company in connection therewith (collectively, the "Website"), or using any of our services, you, whether individually or on behalf of a company or other entity, acknowledge that you accept the practices and policies outlined in this Privacy Policy.
WHAT DOES THIS PRIVACY POLICY COVER?
This Privacy Policy covers Company's treatment of personally identifiable information ("Personal Information") that Company gathers when you access the Website and when you use Company's services. This policy does not apply to the practices of companies that Company does not own or control, or to individuals that Company does not employ or manage.
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION DOES COMPANY COLLECT?
The information we gather from users enables us to personalize and improve our services. We collect the following types of information from our users:
Personal Information You Provide to Us:
In order to use certain features of our Website, you must first complete the registration and create a username and password. We receive and store any information you enter on our Website or provide to us in any other way. The types of Personal Information collected include your name, physical or mailing address, email address, phone number, credit card and/or other payment information, IP address, browser information, use information, username, password, and any other information necessary for us to provide our services. You can choose not to provide us with certain information, but then you may not be able to take advantage of our features. The Personal Information you provide is used for such purposes as answering questions, sending product updates, and communicating with you about Company's products and services, including specials and new features. Our Website is for use only by individuals 18 and up.
Personal Information Collected Automatically:
We receive and store certain types of information whenever you interact with our Website or use our services. Company automatically receives and records information on our server logs from your browser including your IP address, cookie information, and the page you requested.
Generally, our service automatically collects usage information, such as the numbers and frequency of visitors to our Website and its components. We only uses this data in aggregate form, that is, as a statistical measure, and not in a manner that would identify you personally. This type of aggregate data enables us to figure out how often users use parts of the Website or services so that we can make the Website appealing to as many users as possible, and improve those services. As part of this use of information, we may provide aggregate information to our partners about how our users, collectively, use our Website or services. We may share this type of statistical data so that our partners also understand how often people use the Website or services, so that they, too, may provide you with an optimal online experience. Again, Company never discloses aggregate information to a partner in a manner that would identify you personally.
E-mail Communications:
We often receive a confirmation when you open an email from Company if your computer supports this type of program. Company uses this confirmation to help us make emails more interesting and helpful. We also compare our user list to lists received from other companies, in an effort to avoid sending unnecessary messages to our users. When you receive e-mail from Company, you can opt out of receiving further e-mails by following the included instructions to unsubscribe.
What About Cookies?
Cookies are alphanumeric identifiers that we transfer to your computer's hard drive through your browser to enable our systems to recognize your browser and tell us how and when pages in our site are visited and by how many people. We use cookies to enhance visitors' experiences, to learn more about their use of the Website and to improve quality.
Most browsers have an option for turning off the cookie feature, which will prevent your browser from accepting new cookies, as well as (depending on the sophistication of your browser software) allowing you to decide on acceptance of each new cookie in a variety of ways. We strongly recommend that you leave the cookies activated, however, because cookies enable you to take advantage of some of our Website's most attractive features.
If there are Ads appearing on the Website, such Ads may be delivered to users by our advertising partners, who may set cookies. These cookies allow the ad server to recognize your computer each time they send you an online advertisement to compile information about you or others who use your computer. This information allows ad networks to, among other things, deliver targeted advertisements that they believe will be of most interest to you. This Privacy Policy covers the use of cookies by Company and does not cover the use of cookies by any advertisers.
Will Company Share Any of the Personal Information it Receives?
Personal Information about our users is an integral part of our business. We neither rent nor sell your Personal Information to anyone. We share your Personal Information only as described below.
Affiliated Businesses We Do Not Control
: We anticipate that we may become affiliated with a variety of businesses and work closely with them. In certain situations, these businesses may sell items to you through the Website. In other situations, Company may provide services, or sell products jointly with affiliated businesses. You can easily recognize when an affiliated business is associated with your transaction, and we will share your Personal Information that is related to such transactions with that affiliated business.
Agents
: We employ other companies and people to perform tasks on our behalf and need to share your information with them to provide products or services to you. Unless we tell you differently, Company's agents do not have any right to use Personal Information we share with them beyond what is necessary to assist us. You hereby consent to our sharing of Personal Information for the above purposes.
User profiles
: User profile information including users' name, email address, and other information you enter ("User Submissions") may be displayed to other users to facilitate user interaction within the Website. Email addresses are used to add new User Submissions to user profiles and to communicate through User Submissions. Users' email addresses will not be directly revealed to other users by Company, except, when the user is "connected" to another user via a shared group membership, or an invitation, or if the user has chosen to include their email address in their User Profile.
Communication in response to User Submissions
: As part of the Website and services, you will receive from Company email and other communication relating to your User Submissions. You acknowledge and agree that by posting such User Submissions, Company may send you email and other communication that it determines in its sole discretion relate to your User Submissions.
Promotional Offers
: We may send offers to you on behalf of other businesses. However, when we do so, we do not give the other business your name and address. If you do not wish to receive these offers, please send an email with your request to info@superfeedr.com.
Business Transfers
: The Company may go through a business transition, such as a merger, acquisition by another company, or sale of all or portion of our assets. In these types of transactions, user information is typically one of the business assets that are transferred. Moreover, if Company, or substantially all of its assets were acquired, or in the unlikely event that Company goes out of business or enters bankruptcy, user information would be one of the assets that is transferred or acquired by a third party. You acknowledge that such transfers may occur, and that any acquirer of Company may continue to use your Personal Information as set forth in this policy or as subject to the acquirer’s policy.
Protection of Company and Others
: We may release Personal Information when we believe in good faith that release is necessary to comply with the law; enforce or apply our conditions of use and other agreements; or protect the rights, property, or safety of Company, our employees, our users, or others. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for fraud protection and credit risk reduction. You acknowledge and consent to such disclosure.
With Your Consent
: Except as set forth above, you will be notified when your Personal Information may be shared with third parties, and will be able to prevent the sharing of this information.
IS PERSONAL INFORMATION ABOUT ME SECURE?
Your Company account Personal Information is protected by a password for your privacy and security. You need to ensure that there is no unauthorized access to your account and Personal Information by selecting and protecting your password appropriately and limiting access to your computer and browser by signing off after you have finished accessing your account.
Company endeavors to protect user information to ensure that user account information is kept private, however, Company cannot guarantee the security of user account information. Unauthorized entry or use, hardware or software failure, and other factors, may compromise the security of user information at any time.
The Website contains links to other sites. Company is not responsible for the privacy policies and/or practices on other sites. When linking to another site you should read the privacy policy stated on that site. This Privacy Policy only governs information collected on the Website.
WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION CAN I ACCESS?
Company allows you to access the following information about you for the purpose of viewing, and in certain situations, updating that information. This list will change as the Website changes.
Real name
Account and user profile information
User e-mail address
Username and password
User preferences
What Choices Do I Have?
As stated previously, you can always opt not to disclose information, even though it may be needed to take advantage of certain features of the Website and services.
You are able to add or update certain information on pages, such as those listed in the "What Personal Information Can I Access" section above. When you update information, however, we often maintain a copy of the unrevised information in our records.
You delete your account via your account settings page. Please note that Company will need to verify that you have the authority to delete the account, and some information may remain in our records after deletion of your account.
You may request deletion of your Company account by sending an e-mail to info@superfeedr.com. Please note that some information may remain in our records after deletion of your account.
If you do not wish to receive email or other mail from us, please indicate this preference during the registration process. Please note that if you do not want to receive legal notices from us, such as this Privacy Policy, those legal notices will still govern your use of the Website, and you are responsible for reviewing such legal notices for changes.
CHANGES TO THIS PRIVACY POLICY
Company may amend this Privacy Policy from time to time. Use of information we collect now is subject to the Privacy Policy in effect at the time such information is used. If we make changes in the way we use Personal Information, we will notify you by posting an announcement on our Website or sending you an email. Users are bound by any changes to the Privacy Policy when he or she uses the Website after such changes have been first posted.
QUESTIONS OR CONCERNS
If you have any questions or concerns regarding privacy on our Website, please send us a detailed message at info@superfeedr.com. We will make every effort to resolve your concerns.
Effective Date: March 31, 2010
Sub-policy 12
https://cloudinary.com/privacy/:
Cloudinary Privacy Policy
Cloudinary Ltd. and its affiliates (“
we
” or “
us
”), value your privacy and are committed to secure and protect identifiable information related to you (“
Personal Information
”).This Privacy Policy forms an integral part of the
Cloudinary’s Terms of Use
, which govern the use of Cloudinary’s media optimization solutions (the “
Services
”).This policy describes how we receive, collect, use, store, share, transfer, and process Personal Information, and your rights in relation to the Personal Information.
This policy applies to: (a) use of Cloudinary’s websites (
Cloudinary.com
and any of its subdomains), including any information provided through registration and contact pages; (b) our marketing activities including, registrations as part of webinars, conferences, events, demo requests, emails etc.; and (c) information and data provided as part of your use of the Services following a subscription to the Services via our website, whether as a free or a fee-based account.
If you purchased subscription to the Services, by executing an order form with Cloudinary, the information collected through your use of the Services is processed under the terms of our
Data Processing Agreement
(“
DPA
”).
The summary of this policy highlights important elements of our privacy practices. Please take the time to read our full policy.
Policy Highlights
Personal Information You Provide
We receive and store any information you enter on our website or provide us in any other way. If you register with the Services, as part of registration and for notice purposes, you will be asked to provide your name, your company name, email address and password, and your payment details to process your payment for the Services. We further receive any Personal Information that you provide when contacting us.
Read More ->
Personal Information We Collect
We use “cookies” and obtain information when your browser interacts with our websites. We automatically log ‘traffic/session’ information such as the IP address that your device uses and your browser or operating system identifiers. We collect session durations and additional activity and usage information.
Read More ->
Personal Information Uploaded to the Services
As part of your use of the Services, you may upload content such as images and other media to the Services containing Personal Information. Please use caution and do not upload personal information related to others without their knowledge and approval, and do not upload any intimate and sensitive information.
Read More ->
How Personal Information is Used
We use Personal Information to provide and maintain the Services, make it better and continue developing it, and protect us and the Services from misuse and law violations.
Read More ->
Sharing Personal Information with Others
We will share Personal Information only subject to the terms of this policy, or subject to your prior consent. We use service providers and partners to support the Services that we provide, for example, to process payments, to understand user behavior on our Services and to send messages. We also share Personal Information with our affiliated companies and when we change our corporate structure.
Read More ->
Transfer of Personal Information
We use cloud-based services to store, process and access Personal Information in the European Union, in the United States and in other regions to support our Services. These service providers provide us adequate privacy, security and confidentiality commitments.
Further,
w
e participate
in the
EU-US Data Privacy Framework, as set forth by the US Department of Commerce
.
Read More ->
Your Rights Under Specific Laws
Specific chapters under this policy address additional disclosures related to our processing and use of Personal Information under the European Union data protection laws and the United States consumer privacy laws, applicable specifically for residents of the EU or US.
Read More ->
Data Privacy Framework Notice
We participate in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework, as set forth by the US Department of Commerce.
Read More ->
Your Choice
We provide you with choice and control on how we use personal information.
Read More ->
Contact Us
If you have any questions about this policy or believe that your privacy rights are compromised, please contact us at:
privacy@cloudinary.com
.
Cloudinary Privacy Policy
Personal Information You Provide
We receive and store any information you provide us when you access and use our Services.
When you sign up to our Services through our website at:
www.cloudinary.com
, or through a separate subscription agreement with us, then as part of such registration we will ask you to provide Personal Information, including your name, your company name, your email address and to set a password. You can also sign up with your existing account with third parties such as Google or Github, and in these cases we will use your credentials with these services to sign you up. You can upload your media to the Services from a variety of sources such as Google Drive, Dropbox and more. Google Workspace APIs are not used by Cloudinary to develop, improve, or train generalized AI and/or ML models.
If you subscribe to a paid account of the Services, we will receive your payment transaction details (for example, your name, the amount paid and the date of payment), from the payment service provider that processed your payment. We do not receive or process the details of your credit card or other payment method that you use to pay for the Services.
When you contact us, or when we contact you, we will receive and process any Personal Information that you provide us.
Personal Information We Collect
We use “cookies” and obtain information when your browser interacts with our websites. For further information about cookies, please see our
Cookies and Similar Tracking Technologies Policy
.
Examples of the information we collect and analyze include the Internet Protocol (IP) address used by your device to connect your device to the Internet and automatically sent by your browser to our Services; login details; e-mail address; password; device and connection information such as browser type, version, and time zone setting, browser plug-in types and versions, operating system, and platform.
When you use the Services, we collect information about your activities, for example, your log-in and log-out time, the duration of your Services’ sessions, the content that you have uploaded and downloaded, viewed online-pages or specific content on online-pages, activity measures and geolocation.
Personal Information Uploaded to the Services
You have control over the content that you upload to the Services, whether from your personal device or from a cloud-based hosting service.
Please refer to
Cloudinary’s Terms of Use
for information about acceptable use of the Services and guidelines with respect to uploading Contributed Content (as defined in the Terms of Use). Such content may include Personal Information.
PLEASE NOTE THAT CONTENT UPLOADED TO THE SERVICES IS DESIGNATED BY DEFAULT AS PUBLIC AND WILL BE ACCESSIBLE TO OTHERS, INCLUDING VISITORS OF YOUR WEBSITE AND WEB APPLICATION. THEY ARE NOT DESIGNED TO HOST INTIMATE AND SENSITIVE INFORMATION OF ANY KIND.
PLEASE USE CAUTION WHEN UPLOADING CONTENT AND AVOID ANY INVOLUNTARY DISCLOSURE OF PERSONAL INFORMATION, DISCLOSURE OF SENSITIVE PERSONAL INFORMATION, OR DISCLOSURE OF PERSONAL INFORMATION RELATED TO OTHERS WITHOUT THEIR KNOWLEDGE AND APPROVAL.
How Personal Information is Used
We use the Personal Information we collect and receive to provide the Services to you and to other users, to enable the Service’s tools and features, to study and analyze the functionality of the Services and users’ activities, to provide support, to measure Service activity for pricing purposes, to maintain and support the Service, to make it better and to continue developing the Service.
We will use your email address to contact you when necessary, to send you reminders and to provide you information and notices about the Service. We will include commercial and marketing information about our Service and related services to the Cloudinary platform.
Please note that by registering for our Services or creating an account, you will be receiving different communications from us, including marketing materials. If required by law, we will ask for your explicit consent for sending marketing communications. Please refer to the “Your Choice” section below if you wish to opt out of receiving marketing communications.
If necessary, we will use Personal Information to enforce our terms, policies and legal agreements, to comply with court orders and warrants, and assist law enforcement agencies, to collect debts, prevent fraud, misappropriation, infringements, identity thefts and any other misuse of the Service, and to take any action in any legal dispute and proceeding.
We commit to process Personal Information solely for the purposes described in this policy.
Sharing Personal Information with Others
We do not sell, rent or lease Personal Information. We will share Personal Information only subject to the terms of this policy, or subject to your prior consent.
To support the purposes of using Personal Information under this policy, we will share Personal Information with service providers, business partners and certain other third parties, including:
Operations service providers that, for example, host and back up content, provide analytics related to the use of the Services, authenticate and secure log-ins, log activities, manage our production and development activities, operate our systems, networks and databases, and enable cyber security and fraud detection and prevention.
Payment service providers – we will share your payment transaction details to process and verify your payments.
Communications and marketing service providers, for example, we will use a service provider to manage our email messages transmission, engage local resellers to provide our Services to you in a local language, or for enriching user data in order to improve your user experience.
Our affiliates within the Cloudinary group.
Law enforcement, courts and other agencies, authorities and other relevant entities. We will comply with court orders, search warrants, regulatory orders, subpoenas, and provide information in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements. We will also report uploaded content and shared Personal Information , if we have a good-faith belief that the content, or the sharing of the content is illegal, abusive or violates third-party rights.
Other entities as part of a merger, acquisition or any other corporate structural change.
Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies
We use cookies and similar tracking technologies to make sure that our Service is continuously improved and meets your needs. Please view our
Cookies and Similar Tracking Technologies Policy
.
We also use standard analytics tools such as Google Analytics, to learn about how you and other users use the Service, in support of our Service-related activities and operations. The privacy practices of these tools are subject to their own privacy policies and they use their own cookies to provide their services.
As part of our business and Services operations, we de-identify Personal Information and use the data in a statistical and aggregated form. We will share it with our partners, affiliates and other third parties for legitimate business purposes. We make considerable efforts to ensure that such data is unlikely to identify you or be associated specifically with you.
Your Choice
If personal data covered by this Privacy Policy is to be used for a new purpose that is materially different from that for which the personal data was originally collected or subsequently authorized, or is to be disclosed to a third party in a manner not described in this Policy, we will provide you with an opportunity to choose whether to have your personal data so used or disclosed. Requests to opt out of such uses or disclosures of personal data should be sent to us to
privacy@cloudinary.com
.
Further, we provide you with choice and control on how we use Personal Information in connection with various aspect of our processing, as follows:
Please contact us at
privacy@cloudinary.com
if you would like to stop receiving our newsletter or marketing emails.
At any time, you can unsubscribe from our mailing lists or newsletters by following the unsubscribe instructions included in these emails or by accessing our
unsubscribe page
.
You can manage your preferences related to use of cookies and similar technologies on our Services by following the instructions in our
Cookies and Similar Tracking Technologies Policy
.
At any time, you can stop using the Services. Termination of your Cloudinary’s Services account is subject to the terms of your subscription agreement with us and the Terms of Use.
Some internet browsers offer a “do not track” or “DNT” signals to indicate your preference for tracking your activities on a service or through cross-site online activities. These features are varied with no uniform or common standard adopted yet by industry groups or regulators. Therefore, our Services do not currently respond to DNT signals. We continue to monitor developments around DNT technology and the implementation of a standard.
Accessing Personal Information
If you find that the information on your account is inaccurate, incomplete or not up-to-date, please contact us at:
privacy@cloudinary.com
and provide us with the necessary information to correct it.
At any time, you can contact us at:
privacy@cloudinary.com
and request to access the Personal Information that we keep about you. We will ask you to provide us certain credentials to make sure that you are who you claim to be and to as required under applicable law, we will make good-faith efforts to locate the Personal Information that you request to access and provide you with a copy.
Following your review of the Personal Information you can request to correct, amend or delete Personal Information, if it is inaccurate, incomplete or not up-to-date, or if you believe that the processing of the Personal Information is in violation of applicable law.
We will use discretion and due care to redact from the data which we will make available to you, personal information related to others. Where you believe that content containing Personal Information was uploaded to our Services by a third-party user, please contact such user who uploaded that content with a request to remove Personal Information.
Data Retention
We retain Personal Information for different periods of time, depending on the purposes for processing the information, our legitimate business purposes, and pursuant to legal requirements under the applicable law.
For example, we will need to keep the information about your payment transactions for several years due to tax related requirements, for accounts settling, record keeping, archiving and legal issues.
We will maintain your contact details to help us stay in contact with you. At any time before or after the termination of your account, you can contact our privacy team at:
privacy@cloudinary.com
and request to delete your contact details. Note that we keep your details for the necessary period of time for legal requirements and proceedings, if and when necessary.
Content uploaded to the Services such as images, videos, text, graphics or tags, and any data which is contained in such content will be deleted following the termination or deactivation of your subscription to the Services, and Cloudinary will not be responsible for any backup or retention of your content. However, the logs which indicate your access to such data and are used to create metrics for usage and billing, such as CDN logs, will be retained to allow you to resubscribe to the Services.
We will keep aggregated non-identifiable information without limitation, and to the extent reasonable we will delete or de-identify potentially identifiable information, when we no longer need to process the information in an identifiable form.
In any case, as long as you use the Service, we will keep information about you, unless the law requires us to delete it, or if we decide to remove it at our discretion, according to the terms of this policy.
Transfer of Personal Information
We use AWS servers located either in the United States or in the European Union, depending on your location, and provide enterprise customers with the ability to restrict the hosting of their data to the European Economic Area (EEA). We process and access information, either directly or by using third parties such as data hosting service providers, in the European Union, the United States, the United Kingdom, Singapore and Israel. The laws of these territories may differ from the laws of the jurisdiction in which you live or conduct your business.
We make sure that our third-party service providers provide us with adequate confidentiality and security commitments and we take all steps reasonably necessary to ensure that Personal Information related to you is treated securely and in accordance with this privacy policy.
If you are a resident in a jurisdiction where transfer of Personal Information to another jurisdiction requires your consent, then your consent to this Privacy Policy means that you expressly and unambiguously consent also to such transfer of Personal Information. If our use of the Personal Information is governed by laws restricting the transfer of personal information to other countries that do not provide an adequate level of protection to the Personal Information, we will use appropriate safeguards, in particular, by way of entering into appropriate contractual agreements with the relevant recipients, or by adhering to equivalent data transfer regulations to protect the security and confidentiality of such personal information.
If mandated by law, you can obtain a copy of the suitable safeguards that we use when transferring personal information as described above or receive further information about the transfers by contacting us at:
privacy@cloudinary.com
.
Data Privacy Framework Notice
We participate in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework (“
EU-US DPF
”), the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF (“
UK Extension
”), and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework (“
Swiss-US DPF
”), as set forth by the US Department of Commerce. You can review our Data Privacy Framework registration at:
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/
.
We have certified to the US Department of Commerce that we adhere to the EU-US Data Privacy Framework Principles (“
EU-US DPF Principles
”) with regard to the processing of Personal Information received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-US DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF.
We have certified to the US Department of Commerce that we adhere to the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework Principles (“
Swiss-US DPF Principles
”) with regard to the processing of Personal Information received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-US DPF.
If there is any conflict between the terms in this notice or our policy with the EU-US DPF Principles (including the UK Extension) or the Swiss-US DPF Principles, the Principles will govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (“
DPF
”) program, visit the data privacy framework website
here
.
In accordance with the EU-US DPF, the UK Extension and the Swiss-US DPF, we commit to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of Personal Information related to you. If you have any inquiries or complaints about our handling of Personal Information received in reliance on the EU-US DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF, and the Swiss-US DPF (as applicable), please contact us at:
privacy@cloudinary.com
. We will do our best to respond to your inquiry as soon as we can.
In accordance with the EU-US DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF, and the Swiss-US DPF, we commit to cooperate (respectively) with the advice of the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (“
DPAs
”), the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (“
ICO
”) and the Gibraltar Regulatory Authority (GRA), and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (“
FDPIC
”), as applicable, with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of Personal Information received in reliance on the EU-US DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF, and the Swiss-US DPF.
You may also decide to involve the binding arbitration option under the EU-US DPF, UK Extension and the Swiss-US DPF, under certain conditions detailed
here
.
As explained under the section titled “Sharing Personal Information with Others” in our policy, we share Personal Information with third parties to perform services on our behalf.
When we share Personal Information received under the EU-US DPF, UK Extension and the Swiss-US DPF. with a third party, the third party’s access to, and use and disclosure of such Personal Information must also comply with our obligations under the Data Privacy Framework. We will remain liable under the Data Privacy Framework for any failure to do so by such a third party, unless we can demonstrate that we are not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
We are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the Federal Trade Commission (“
FTC
”).
Note that we may be required to disclose Personal Information related to you in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
Information Security
We and our hosting services implement systems, applications, measures, safeguards and procedures to secure Personal Information, to minimize the risks of theft, damage, loss of information, or unauthorized access or use of personal information.
These measures provide sound industry standard security. However, although we make efforts to protect your privacy, we cannot guarantee that the Services will be immune from any wrongdoings, malfunctions, unlawful interceptions or access, or other kinds of abuse and misuse.
Changes to this Privacy Policy
From time to time, we will update this policy. If the updates have minor if any consequences, or if they are mandated by applicable laws, they will take effect immediately, or as required after we post a notice on the Service’s website or the notice through email. Substantial changes will be effective 30 days after we initially posted the notice.
Until the updated policy takes effect, if it materially reduces the protection of your privacy rights under the then-existing policy you can choose not to accept it and terminate your use of the Services. Continuing to use the Services after the updated policy takes effect means that you acknowledge our updated practices and agree to them.
Contact Us
We conduct periodical assessments of our data processing activities and privacy practices, to make sure that we comply with this policy, to update the policy when we believe that we need to, and to verify that we display the policy properly and in an accessible manner.
If you have any concerns about the way we process Personal Information, please contact our privacy team at:
privacy@cloudinary.com
, or write to us. Our address is published on our website at:
www.cloudinary.com
and indicated in your subscription agreement.
Processing Personal Information Under EU Data Protection laws
If EU data protection laws apply to the processing of Personal Information by Cloudinary, then the following terms apply in addition to the general terms of the policy:
If you are a data controller, then for the purposes of content uploaded to the Services, Cloudinary acts as a data processor, and Cloudinary’s
Data Processing Agreement
applies to such processing.
Lawful Grounds
for Processing
Where we process Personal Data related to you, as a data controller, the processing is based on the following lawful grounds:
We process your account and payment details to perform the contract with you.
We will process Personal Information to comply with a legal obligation and to protect your and others’ vital interests.
We will further rely on our legitimate interests, which we believe are not overridden by your fundamental rights and freedoms, for the following purposes:
Communications with you, including direct marketing where you are our client or a user of our client, or where you make contact with us through our websites, Services or otherwise.
Cyber security.
Support, customer relations, service operations.
Enhancements and improvements to yours and other users’ experience with the website and Services.
Fraud detection and misuse of the websites and Services.
All processing of Personal Information which are not based on the lawful grounds indicated below, are based on your consent.
Y
our Rights under EU Data Protection Laws
In addition to your rights under other sections in this policy, you have the following rights:
AT ANY TIME, CONTACT US IF YOU WANT TO WITHDRAW YOUR CONSENT TO THE PROCESSING OF PERSONAL INFORMATION. EXERCISING THIS RIGHT WILL NOT AFFECT THE LAWFULNESS OF PROCESSING BASED ON CONSENT BEFORE ITS WITHDRAWAL.
Request to delete or restrict access to Personal Information. We will review your request and use our discretion, pursuant to the provisions of the applicable law, to reach a decision about your request and respond to it.
If you exercise one (or more) of the above-mentioned rights, in accordance with the provisions of applicable law, you may request to be informed that third parties that hold Personal Information, in accordance with this policy, will act accordingly.
You may ask to transfer Personal Information in accordance with your right to data portability.
You may object to the processing of Personal Information for direct marketing purposes. Additional information about this right is available under the Choice section in this policy.
You have the right not to be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, including profiling, which produces legal effects concerning you or similarly significantly affecting you.
You have a right to lodge a complaint with a data protection supervisory authority of your habitual residence, place of work or of an alleged infringement of the GDPR.
A summary and further details about your rights under EU data protection laws, is available on the EU Commission’s website at:
https://ec.europa.eu/info/law/law-topic/data-protection/reform/rights-citizens_en
.
R
equest to Exercise Your Rights
Note that when you send us a request to exercise your rights, we will need to reasonably authenticate your identity and location. We will ask you to provide us credentials to make sure that you are who you claim to be and will further ask you questions to understand the nature and scope of your request.
If we need to delete Personal Information following your request, it will take some time until we completely delete residual copies of Personal Information from our active servers and from our backup systems.
If you have any concerns about the way we process Personal Information, you are welcome to contact our privacy team and our EU and UK representatives at:
privacy@cloudinary.com
. We will look into your inquiry and make good-faith efforts to respond promptly.
Processing Personal Information Under US Consumer Privacy Laws
This section of the policy applies solely to users of our Service who reside in the State of California and other applicable US states. This chapter supersedes any contradicting provisions under the other sections of the policy.
This chapter also serves as a notice at collection.
The Categories of Personal Information that we Collect
In the preceding twelve (12) months we have collected the following categories of Personal Information:
Identifiers and Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e)), such as name, email address and IP address.
Commercial information, such as payment details.
Internet or other similar network activity.
Geolocation data.
If you use of the Cloudinary media management platform service as an individual user and not on behalf of a Business, then we will collect and process any Personal Information embedded in the content that you upload to the platform.
Inferences drawn from other Personal Information.
Categories of Sensitive Personal Information
Our Services are not intended for Sensitive Personal Information. We do not knowingly collect Sensitive Personal Information, and we require you not to use our Services or provide us with any such information.
We do not collect or process Sensitive Personal Information for the purpose of inferring characteristics about you and we do not sell Sensitive Personal Information or share Sensitive Personal Information for cross-context behavioral advertising.
For the purpose of applicable laws under this section of the policy, Sensitive Personal Information means:
A consumer’s social security, driver’s license, state identification card, or passport number.
A consumer’s account log-in, financial account, debit card, or credit card number in combination with any required security or access code, password, or credentials allowing access to an account.
A consumer’s precise geolocation.
A consumer’s racial or ethnic origin, religious or philosophical beliefs, or union membership.
The contents of a consumer’s mail, email, and text messages unless we are the business that is the intended recipient of the communication.
A consumer’s genetic data.
The processing of biometric information for the purpose of uniquely identifying a consumer.
Personal information collected and analyzed concerning a consumer’s health.
Personal information collected and analyzed concerning a consumer’s sex life or sexual orientation.
Categories of Sources for Personal Information Collection, Sharing and
Disclosure
We obtain the Personal Information directly from you, from your Services activities, from third parties such as event organizers, data providers and publicly available resources.
We share Personal Information with third parties such as our service providers and our affiliates, as further described above under the section titled “Sharing Personal Information with Others” and for the purposes listed there.
In the preceding twelve (12) months we have disclosed the categories of Personal Information as listed above in this section of the policy, for business purposes.
In the preceding twelve (12) months, we have not sold Personal Information or shared Personal Information for cross-context behavioral advertising.
Selling and Sharing Personal Information
We do not sell or share Personal Information as these terms are defined under applicable laws. However, we engage third parties to provide us with services such as analytics, marketing automation and user experience and allow them to collect Personal Information on our website and Services.
We do not knowingly sell or share the Personal Information of consumers under 16 years of age.
The categories of Personal Information collected by these third parties in the preceding 12 months include identifiers, online activities and inferences drawn from such activities.
These third parties do not pay us for collecting such information, but the right granted to them to collect Personal Information may be considered as disclosure for the purpose of sale or share for cross-context behavioral advertising. At any time, you can opt-out of the collection of Personal Information by our service providers.
Your Rights under US Consumer Laws
You are entitled to the following specific rights under the California Consumer Privacy Act (‘
CCPA’
), the California Privacy Rights Act (‘
CPRA’
), and other US state consumer privacy acts, as applicable, in relation to Personal Information:
You have a right to know what Personal Information we have collected about you. You can request that we will disclose certain information to you about our collection and use of Personal Information over the past 12 months. After verifying your request, we will disclose to you:
The categories of Personal Information we collected about you;
The categories of sources for the Personal Information we collected about you;
Our business or commercial purpose for collecting that Personal Information;
The categories of third parties with whom we share Personal Information;
The specific pieces of Personal Information we collected about you;
If we disclosed Personal Information for a business purpose, we will provide you with a list which will identify the Personal Information categories that each category of recipient obtained.
You have a right to correct inaccurate Personal Information that we maintain about you.
You have a right to delete Personal Information that we have collected from you, subject to certain exceptions.
For guidance about your opt-out options, please review our
Cookies and Similar Tracking Technologies Policy
. You can also request to opt-out by contacting us at:
privacy@Cloudinary.com
.
We do not hold identifying details of every user of our Service, website, and our other online assets. In these cases, you can restrict the ‘sale’ or ‘share’ of Personal Information by opting-out of receiving cookies from the relevant third parties.
Opt-out cookies installed on your browser to signal your opt-out request may only apply to the specific device and browser that you have used to request the opt-out. If you use another device or browser, or if you delete cookies through your browser settings, we may automatically prompt the cookies consent notice when you revisit our Services, website or other online assets.
If you would like to maintain your opt-out status with other devices or browsers that you use, please use your browser setting to block cookies, or otherwise reject the cookies when you are prompted with the cookie consent notice.
We do not knowingly use or disclose Sensitive Personal Information. We will process such information only if you violate our Terms of Use and the terms of this policy, and upload Sensitive Personal Information to our Cloudinary media management platform service, or otherwise provide us with such information.
If we hold such information, we will use and disclose it for reasons under applicable law that do not require us to provide you a right to limit the use of the Sensitive Personal Information. That said, you can contact our privacy team at:
privacy@Cloudinary.com
with requests or inquiries related to Sensitive Personal Information that may reside on our systems.
We will not discriminate against you and you will not be retaliated against because you have requested to exercise any of the rights under this section of the policy, including, but not limited to, by:
Denying you from goods or Services.
Charging different prices or rates for the Services, including through the use of discounts or other benefits or imposing penalties.
Providing a different level or quality of the Services to you.
Suggesting that you will receive a different price or rate for the services or a different level or quality of the Services.
Limit the Use of Sensitive Personal Information
As further provided above, we do not collect Sensitive Personal Information, we do not infer characteristics from Sensitive Personal Information and therefore we do not expect you to request us to limit the use of such information.
If you have violated Cloudinary’s Terms of Use, or the provisions of this policy, and have provided us, or used our website or Services to process Sensitive Personal Information, you can still contact us at: privacy@cloudinary.com with questions or requests related to such information.
Requests to Exercise Your Rights
Please submit your request to us by sending an email to our privacy team at:
privacy@cloudinary.com
.
Only you or a person authorized to act on your behalf, may make a request related to Personal Information.
When you send the request on your own behalf, we will ask you for additional identifying information, apart from your name and email address, to ensure that you are who you claim to be.
If you ask someone else to exercise your rights for you (an ‘authorized agent’), we will need to receive from the authorized agent a signed permission by you demonstrating that you have authorized that agent to act on your behalf, or a power of attorney that meets the requirements under applicable laws. We will make an effort to verify the identity of your authorized agent and will not share Personal Information with your authorized agent without receiving the signed permission and verifying the identity of your authorized agent.
A request for access can be made by you only twice within a 12-month period.
We cannot respond to your request or provide you with the requested Personal Information if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request and confirm the Personal Information relates to you. We will only use the Personal Information provided in your request to verify your identity or authority to make the request.
We will do our best to respond to your request within 45 days of its receipt.  If we require more time (up to an additional 45 days), we will inform you of the reason and extension period in writing.  If you do not have an account with us, we will deliver our written response by mail or electronically.
Any disclosures that we provide will only cover the 12-month period preceding receipt of your request.
The response we provide will also explain the reasons for our inability to comply with your request, if applicable.
We do not charge a fee to process or respond to your request unless it is excessive, repetitive, or manifestly unfounded.  If we determine that the request warrants a fee, we will inform you of the reasons for such decision and provide you with a cost estimate before processing further your request.
Last updated: September 30, 2024
Sub-policy 13
https://www.cloudflare.com/privacypolicy/:
Solutions
By topic
By need
By industry
Public interest
Global services
Connectivity cloud
Contact sales
Products
Our products
For your employees
For apps and infrastructure
For developers
Register domain name
Free DNS resolver
Need help choosing?
Latest product news
Contact sales
Pricing
Our plans & pricing
For enterprise
For small business
For hobbyists and individuals
Compare all plans
Need help choosing?
View FAQs
Contact sales
Resources
Library
Documentation
Getting Started
Application Security
Application Services
Zero Trust Services
Developer Platform
Network Services
Insights
API
AI
Learning
Trust & compliance
Trends & insights
Blog
Cloudflare TV
Community forum
Get help
Contact sales
Partners
Partner network
Peering portal
Partner Network
Why Cloudflare
Why choose Cloudflare
Learn about Cloudflare
Comparisons
Why trust Cloudflare
Contact sales
Sign up
Sign up
Under attack?
Under attack?
Log in
Log in
Support
Community Support
Help Center
Contact Cloudflare
Lost account access?
Log in
Log in
Privacy Policy
Overview
Policy application
Information we collect
How we use information we collect
Data aggregation
Information sharing
Notice to UK and EU residents
International information transfers
Data subject rights and choices
Communication preferences
Data security, data integrity and access
Data retention
Notification of changes
Business transactions
English language controls
Dispute resolution
Notice to California residents
Contact information
Legal questions
Have Questions?
If you have questions about these terms or anything else about Cloudflare, please don't hesitate to contact us:
+1 (650) 319-8930
Cloudflare, Inc.
101 Townsend St,
San Francisco, CA 94107
USA
Cloudflare Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy is effective as of August 28, 2024.
We have updated our July 18, 2024 Privacy Policy to update the contact email of our Data Protection Officer.
This Cloudflare Privacy Policy (“Policy”) outlines the personal information that Cloudflare, Inc. (“Cloudflare”, “we”, “us” or “our”) gathers, how we use that personal information, and the options you have to access, correct, or delete such personal information.
CLOUDFLARE’S PROMISE
Our mission to help build a better Internet is rooted in the importance we place on establishing trust with our Customers, users, and the Internet community globally. To earn and maintain that trust, we commit to communicating transparently, providing security, and protecting the privacy of data on our systems.
We keep your personal information personal and private. We will not sell or rent your personal information. We will only share or otherwise disclose your personal information as necessary to provide our Services or as otherwise described in this Policy, except in cases where we first provide you with notice and the opportunity to consent.
1. POLICY APPLICATION
This Policy applies to Cloudflare’s collection, use, and disclosure of the personal information of the following categories of data subjects:
Attendees
: Those who visit our offices or provide their information to Cloudflare or Cloudflare representatives when they attend or register to attend Cloudflare-sponsored events or other events at which Cloudflare (and/or its representatives) participates, as well as those who participate in Cloudflare’s studies such as user experience research.
Website Visitors
: Those who visit our Websites, including those who may opt to provide an email address or other contact information to receive communications from Cloudflare, fill out a survey, or provide feedback. For the purposes of this Policy, “Websites” refer collectively to
www.cloudflare.com
as well as any other websites Cloudflare operates for its own behalf and that link to this Policy. For clarity, “Websites” does not include any sites owned or operated by our Customers, including where we serve as Registrar.
Customers
: Individuals or entities who enter into a subscription agreement with Cloudflare (or its authorized partner) and to whom Cloudflare provides Services pursuant to such agreement. For purposes of this Policy, “Services” shall refer to all of the cloud-based solutions offered, marketed, or sold by Cloudflare or its authorized partners that are designed to increase the performance, security, and availability of Internet properties, applications, devices, and networks, along with any software, software development kits, and application programming interfaces ("APIs") made available in connection with the foregoing.
Administrative Users
: Those with login credentials for a Cloudflare account and/or those who administer any of the Services for a Customer. In some cases, an Administrative User and Customer may be the same individual. In other cases, an Administrative User may be an agent acting on behalf of a Customer.
Public DNS Resolver Users
: Those who use Cloudflare’s 1.1.1.1 public recursive Domain Name System (“DNS”) resolver service, including 1.1.1.1 for Families ("1.1.1.1 resolver"). Learn more about the 1.1.1.1 resolver
here
.
End Users
: Those who (i) access or use our Customers’ domains, networks, websites, application programming interfaces, and applications, or (ii) Customers’ employees, agents, or contractors, who access or use Services, such as Cloudflare Zero Trust end users.
Registrants:
Users of Cloudflare’s domain registrar services. Cloudflare is an
ICANN
-accredited registrar and complies with the
2013 Registrar Accreditation Agreement
(“RAA”).
This Policy does not apply to “Application Users”—those individuals who use Cloudflare’s consumer-facing 1.1.1.1 Application. See the
1.1.1.1 Application Privacy Policy
for more information about the data collection and use practices for Cloudflare's 1.1.1.1 Application and the associated 1.1.1.1 Application Services.
This Policy also does not apply to our Customers’ domains, websites, APIs, applications, and networks, which may have their own terms and privacy policies. Our Customers are solely responsible for establishing policies for and ensuring compliance with all applicable laws and regulations, including those relating to the collection of personal information, in connection with the use of our Services by End Users with whom our Customers interact.
Cloudflare’s Websites and Services are not intended for, nor designed to attract, individuals under the age of eighteen. Cloudflare does not knowingly collect or share personal information from any person under the age of eighteen. To the extent we become aware that we have the personal information of a person under the age of eighteen, we will delete that information.
When Cloudflare is a reverse proxy, our IP addresses may appear in WHOIS and DNS records for websites using our Services. We are a conduit for information controlled by others. It is our Customers and their users who are responsible for the content transmitted across our network (e.g., images, written content, graphics, etc.).
2. INFORMATION WE COLLECT (Categories of Data Subjects)
Attendees
Name, email address, and other contact information
: We may ask for and collect personal information such as your name, address, phone number and email address when you visit our offices, register for or attend a sponsored event or other events at which Cloudflare (and/or its representatives) participates, or participate in Cloudflare’s studies such as user experience research.
Image and voice
: When you participate in a Cloudflare study, we may ask for your permission to record your voice and/or image during your participation in the study.
Website Visitors
Name, email address, and other contact information
: We ask for and—at your option—collect personal information from you when you submit web forms on our Websites, including opportunities to sign up for and agree to receive email communications from us. We may ask you to submit such personal information if you choose to use interactive features of the Websites, including participation in surveys, contests, promotions, sweepstakes, or studies, requesting customer support, submitting feedback, or otherwise communicating with us. We will send such communications in accordance with applicable law.
Log files
: Just as when you visit and interact with most websites and services delivered via the Internet, when you visit our Websites, including the Cloudflare Community Forum, we gather certain information and store it in log files. This information may include but is not limited to Internet Protocol (IP) addresses, system configuration information, URLs of referring pages, and locale and language preferences.
Cookies and other tracking technologies
: We may use cookies and other information-gathering technologies for a variety of purposes, such as providing us with information about how you interact with our Websites and assisting us in our marketing efforts. You may view a complete list of cookies and change your cookie preferences by clicking on the “Cookie Preferences” link (or, in the United States, the “Your Privacy Choices” link) in the footer of the Cloudflare homepage at cloudflare.com or in the banner displayed when you visit our Websites from certain countries (such as the European Economic Area and the UK). Note that if you disable cookies entirely, Cloudflare’s Websites may not function properly. We may also use cookies and similar technologies to provide you advertising on third-party sites based upon your browsing activities and interests. In addition to exercising cookie choices through our “Cookie Preferences” or “Your Privacy Choices” links, if you do not want to have cookies and similar technologies used for the purpose of serving you interest-based ads, you may opt-out by clicking
here
(or if located in the European Union, the United Kingdom, or Switzerland, click
here
). For more information about the cookies Cloudflare uses and your privacy choices, please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Material contributed in Interactive Areas
: The Websites may offer publicly accessible blogs, community forums, comments sections, discussion forums, or other interactive features (“Interactive Areas”). If you choose to participate in any of these Interactive Areas, please be aware that any information that you post in an Interactive Area might be read, collected, and used by others who access it. If you wish to remove your personal information from any of our Interactive Areas, please see the Section 8, below.
Customers and Administrative Users
Customer Account Information
: When you register for an account, we collect contact information. Depending on subscription level, this contact information may include your Customer name, the email address(es) of your account administrator(s), telephone number, and addresses necessary to process payment and delivery of Services. In addition, when you use the Services, we collect information about how you configure your account and the Services (e.g., firewall settings for the domains you administer). We refer to all of this information collectively as “Customer Account Information” for the purposes of this Policy. Customer Account Information is required to enable your access to your Cloudflare account and Services. By providing us with any personal information, you represent that you are the owner of such personal information or otherwise have the requisite consent to provide it to us. We also maintain logs of Administrative Users’ activity (e.g., actions taken to configure settings in Customers’ account).
Payment information
: We do not require our Customers to have payment information on file with us unless they have a paid subscription to our Services. When you sign up for one of our paid Services, you must provide payment and billing information. The information you will need to submit depends on which payment method you choose. For example, if you pay with a credit card, we will collect your card information and billing address, although we do not store full credit card numbers or personal account numbers.
Crash Reports
: When our Services encounter an unexpected error, you may be asked to submit a crash report, which may contain personal information. You will have an opportunity to review the content of the report prior to submitting the report to us.
Public DNS Resolver Users
Limited DNS query data
: We will collect limited DNS query data that is sent to our 1.1.1.1 resolver. Our 1.1.1.1 resolver service does not log personal information, and the bulk of the limited non-personally identifiable query data is only stored for 25 hours. You can learn more about our 1.1.1.1 resolver commitment to privacy
here
.
Please note that our data handling practices for our 1.1.1.1 Application, which is not covered by this Policy, are somewhat different than our 1.1.1.1 resolver data handling practices and are described
here
.
End Users
Cloudflare processes End Users’ interactions with Customer’s Internet Properties and the Services. This information is processed when End Users access or use our Customers’ domains, websites, APIs, applications, devices, end points, and networks that use one or more of our Services, and when End Users access or use Services, such as Cloudflare Zero Trust. The information processed may include but is not limited to IP addresses, traffic routing data, system configuration information, and other information about traffic to and from Customers’ websites, devices, applications, and/or networks.
The End User data that we make available to our Customers via the Service dashboard or other online interface are specifically defined as “Customer Logs”.
Registrants
Contact and domain information: We collect data such as domain name and status, contact information (such as name, organization, address, phone number and email address), name server, DNSSEC, and Form of Approval (i.e., full WHOIS capture at time of transfer into our system, including the IP address that initiated the transfer).
Network Data.
Cloudflare collects and stores Network Data, which are models, observations, reports, analyses, statistics, databases and other information created, compiled, analyzed, generated or derived by Cloudflare from server, network or traffic data generated by Cloudflare in the course of providing the Service, including information required to help Cloudflare identify, analyze, mitigate, prevent, and block malicious activities on Cloudflare’s network. Examples of Network Data include service uptime and service availability metrics, request volumes, error rates, cache rates, origin and nature of malware, and IP threat scores.
3. HOW WE USE INFORMATION WE COLLECT
Cloudflare only processes personal information in a way that is compatible with and relevant to the purpose for which it was collected or authorized. As a general matter, for the categories of data described in Section 2 above, except 1.1.1.1 resolver user data as explained below, we may use your personal information to:
Provide, operate, maintain, improve, and promote the Websites and Services for all users of the Websites and Services;
Enable you to access and use the Websites and Services;
Process and complete transactions, and send you related information, including purchase confirmations and invoices;
Send transactional messages, including responses to your comments, questions, and requests; provide customer service and support; and send you technical notices, updates, security alerts, and support and administrative messages;
Comply with legal obligations as well as to investigate and prevent fraudulent transactions, unauthorized access to the Services, and other illegal activities;
For other purposes for which we obtain your consent.
In addition, we may use the information we collect from Attendees, Websites Visitors, and Registrants, as well as Customer Account Information for the following purposes:
Send commercial communications, in accordance with your communication preferences, such as providing you with information about products and services, features, surveys, newsletters, offers, promotions, contests, and events about us and our partners; and send other news or information about us and our partners. See Section 9 below for information on managing your communication preferences.
Process and deliver contest or sweepstakes entries and rewards;
Monitor and analyze trends, usage, and activities in connection with the Websites and Services and for marketing or advertising purposes;
Personalize the Websites and Services, including by providing features or content that match your interests and preferences;
To register visitors to our offices and to manage non-disclosure agreements that visitors may be required to sign, to the extent such processing is necessary for our legitimate interest in protecting our offices and our confidential information against unauthorized access; and
Public DNS Resolver Users
. We use information we collect from 1.1.1.1 resolver users to operate and improve the 1.1.1.1 resolver, such as to assist us in our debugging efforts if an issue arises. Our 1.1.1.1 resolver service does not store 1.1.1.1 resolver users’ personal information. We will not combine any information collected from DNS queries to our 1.1.1.1 resolver with any other Cloudflare or third party data in any way that can be used to identify individual end users. Cloudflare may store aggregated data, as outlined within our 1.1.1.1 resolver commitments to privacy, indefinitely in order to power Cloudflare Radar and assist Cloudflare in improving Cloudflare services, such as, enhancing the overall performance of the Cloudflare Resolver and identifying security threats. Learn more about our 1.1.1.1 resolver commitment to privacy
here
.
Information from Third Party Services
. We may combine information we collect as described in Section 2 above with personal information we obtain from third parties. For example, we may combine information entered on a Cloudflare sales submission form with information we receive from a third-party sales intelligence platform vendor to enhance our ability to market our Services to Customers or potential Customers.
4. DATA AGGREGATION
Cloudflare may aggregate data we acquire about our Customers, Administrators, and End Users. For example, we may assemble data to determine how Web crawlers index the Internet and whether they are engaged in malicious activity or to compile web traffic reports and statistics. Non-personally identifiable, aggregated data may be shared with third parties.
5. INFORMATION SHARING
We work with other companies who provide us with services that help run our business and the Cloudflare Service (“Service Providers”). These companies provide services to help us deliver customer support, process credit card payments, manage and contact our existing Customers and Administrators as well as sales leads, provide marketing support, and otherwise operate and improve our Services. These Service Providers may only process personal information pursuant to our instructions and in compliance both with this Privacy Policy, the contracts we have in place with such Service Providers, and other applicable confidentiality, data protection, and security measures and regulations.
Specifically, we do not permit our Service Providers to sell any personal information we share with them or to use any personal information we share with them for their own marketing purposes or for any purpose other than in connection with the services they provide to us.
In addition to sharing with Service Providers as described above, we also may share your information with others in the following circumstances:
Within the Cloudflare Group (defined for the purposes of this Policy as Cloudflare, Inc. (United States) and its subsidiaries listed Section 15);
With our resellers and other sales partners who may help us distribute the Services to Customers;
With an app developer when you install an app from our App Marketplace;
In the event of a merger, sale, change in control, or reorganization of all or part of our business;
When we are required to disclose personal information to respond to subpoenas, court orders, or legal process, or to establish or exercise our legal rights or defend against legal claims. (Learn more about how we handle law enforcement requests
here
);
Where we have a good-faith belief sharing is necessary to investigate, prevent or take action regarding illegal activities, suspected fraud, situations involving potential threats to the physical safety of any person, or violations of our Website Terms of Use, Self-Serve Subscription Agreement, and/or Enterprise Subscription Terms of Service; or as otherwise required to comply with our legal obligations; or
As you may otherwise consent from time to time.
Additional Information on Sharing
Public DNS Resolver Users.
Cloudflare does not share 1.1.1.1 resolver logs with any third parties except for anonymous logs shared with APNIC pursuant to a Research Cooperative Agreement. Learn more about information sharing specific to the 1.1.1.1 resolver
here
.
Registrants.
If you purchase a domain name from Cloudflare’s registrar service, ICANN (The Internet Corporation for Assigned Names and Numbers) and the relevant registry operators overseeing the domain’s top-level domain require us to collect registrant data for the purposes of domain registration and via the WHOIS protocol. We may also be required to share this public data with ICANN, the relevant registry operators and other such providers with whom we contract in order to provide our domain name services, and additionally upon the legitimate request of third parties. Registrant data may include the domain name, registrant name and other contact information, and domain name server information. See our Domain Registration Agreement
here
.
Marketing & Advertising Partners.
Our marketing and advertising partners may collect or receive personal information about you and/or collect certain information about your interactions with our Websites, or your email communications with Cloudflare, including through the use of cookies, beacons, and similar technologies, in order to gain insights that may help us market and advertise our services to you.  You may opt out of such sharing using our “Cookie Preferences” link (or, in the United States, the “Your Privacy Choices” link) on the cloudflare.com homepage.
In addition, we may also provide these marketing and advertising partners with your email address or other limited account information. You may opt out of such sharing by emailing us at sar@cloudflare.com.
These partners’ use of your information will be based on their own privacy policies. We share this personal information for our business purposes.
California residents can find additional information about data sharing for marketing and advertising purposes and their data subject rights in Section 16, below
6. NOTICE TO EU, UK, AND SWISS RESIDENTS
“Personal information” as referenced in this Privacy Policy means “personal data” as that term is defined under the European Union (“EU”) General Data Protection Regulations (“GDPR”) and its United Kingdom (“UK”) GDPR counterpart. Cloudflare is a data controller for the personal information collected from all categories of data subjects listed above, with the following exceptions: Cloudflare is a data processor of Customer Logs, Administrative User logs, and some account settings information. In addition, Cloudflare is a data processor for any of the content provided by Customers and End Users through the Services that transits, or in some cases, is stored on, the Cloudflare network. Where Cloudflare is a data processor, Cloudflare processes data on behalf of its Customers pursuant to their data processing instructions.
If you are an individual from the European Economic Area (the “EEA”), the UK or Switzerland, please note that our legal basis for collecting and using your personal information will depend on the personal information collected and the specific context in which we collect it. We normally will collect personal information from you only where: (a) we have your consent to do so, (b) where we need your personal information to perform a contract with you (e.g. to deliver the Cloudflare Services you have requested), or (c) where the processing is in our legitimate interests. Please note that in most cases, if you do not provide the requested information, Cloudflare will not be able to provide the requested service to you.
In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect personal information from you, or may otherwise need the personal information to protect your vital interests or those of another person. Where we rely on your consent to process your personal data, you have the right to withdraw or decline consent at any time. Where we rely on our legitimate interests to process your personal data, you have the right to object by emailing us at sar@cloudflare.com.
If you have any questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your personal information, please contact us at
privacyquestions@cloudflare.com
.
7. INTERNATIONAL INFORMATION TRANSFERS
Cloudflare is a U.S. based, global company. We primarily store your information in the United States and the European Economic Area. To facilitate our global operations, we may transfer and access such information from around the world, including from other countries in which the Cloudflare Group has operations for the purposes described in this Policy.
Whenever a Cloudflare company transfers personal information originating from one country to another Cloudflare group company or a third party service provider or partner in a different country, we will implement appropriate safeguards, consistent with the laws of the territory from which the data is exported. We describe the safeguards we implement
here
. If you have any questions about or need further information concerning the safeguards Cloudflare has in place to protect your personal information, please contact us at
privacyquestions@cloudflare.com
.
When Cloudflare transfers personal data from the EEA, Switzerland, or the United Kingdom (UK) to the United States, we rely on our certifications under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF), and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Should these certifications lapse or become otherwise invalidated, Cloudflare relies on the standard contractual clauses, including supplementary measures as necessary for transfers to the United States. We also use standard contractual clauses for other international transfers from the EEA, Switzerland, or the United Kingdom.
Self-certification to the Data Privacy Framework
Cloudflare complies with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce.  Cloudflare has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.  Cloudflare has also certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.  If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern.  To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF (together, the “DPFs”), Cloudflare commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your personal information. EU, UK, and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of personal data received in reliance on the DPFs should first contact us by emailing sar@cloudflare.com or via mail to: Cloudflare, Inc., 101 Townsend St., San Francisco, CA 94107, Attn: Data Protection Officer. We will respond to your inquiry within 30 days of receipt and verification of your identity.
In compliance with the DPFs, Cloudflare commits to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal information received in reliance on the DPFs to TRUSTe, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States.  If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
for more information or to file a complaint.  The services of TRUSTe, LLC are provided at no cost to you. You have the possibility, under certain conditions, to invoke binding arbitration for complaints regarding DPF compliance not resolved by any of the other mechanisms set out in this DPF Notice or our Privacy Notice.  For more information, please see Annex 1 of the DPF Principles, available
here
.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Cloudflare’s compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF). We may be required to disclose personal information we receive under the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
Cloudflare is liable for the processing of personal information it receives under the DPF Principles and subsequently transfers to a third party acting as an agent on its behalf.  Cloudflare shall remain liable under the DPF Principles if its agent processes such personal information in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles, unless Cloudflare proves that it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
8. DATA SUBJECT RIGHTS AND CHOICES
Cloudflare  recognizes individuals’ data protection rights. You have the right to access, correct, update, port, or delete your personal information, and to restrict or object to the processing of your personal information (each of these a “Rights Request”). You may email us at sar@cloudflare.com with any Rights Request, and we will respond within thirty (30) days. Customers and Administrative Users also can access, correct, export, or update their Account Information by editing their profile or organization record at Cloudflare.com.
Please note that before we can complete your Rights Request, we will need to verify that your identity matches that of the data in which you are requesting to exercise your rights. You can expect a verification email under separate cover, to the email address associated with your personal information on file. If you are making a Rights Request on behalf of another individual as an authorized agent, we require that either (a) the data subject must verify their identity and directly confirm with Cloudflare they provided the authorized agent permission to submit the Rights Request, (b) the authorized agent must be provided power of attorney by the data subject in accordance with the law of the data subject’s jurisdiction, or (c) the Rights Request must otherwise be submitted in accordance with applicable privacy law.
For any Rights Request, we will need to verify a requestor is inquiring about their own information before we can assist. Where a Rights Request may implicate the personal information of another individual, we must balance the request against the risk of violating another person’s privacy rights. We will comply with Rights Requests to the extent required by applicable law or the Swiss-U.S. or EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework. In the event that your Rights Request is denied, residents of the U.S. states Virginia and Colorado may appeal our decision by responding to the email informing them of the denial or by submitting a Rights Request to appeal to sar@cloudflare.com, and we will respond within sixty (60) days. In the EEA, the UK, and Switzerland, you also have the right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority.
Please note that we do not retain any personal information about 1.1.1.1 resolver users that would be subject to the Rights Requests described above. In addition, Cloudflare has no direct relationship with End Users. Even where “Cloudflare” may be indicated as the authoritative name server for a domain, unless Cloudflare is the owner of that domain, we have no control over a domain’s content. Accordingly, we rely upon our Customers to comply with the underlying legal requirements for Rights Requests in accordance with their obligations under applicable data protection laws. If an End User requests that we fulfill a Rights Request, we will direct that End User to contact the Customer website(s) with which they interacted directly. Our Customers are solely responsible for ensuring compliance with all applicable laws and regulations with respect to their website users.
9. COMMUNICATION PREFERENCES
Cloudflare will send you commercial communications based on the communication preferences in your account settings. Cloudflare also will send you service-related communications. You may manage your receipt of commercial communications by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link located on the bottom of such emails, through your account settings if you have a Cloudflare account, or you may send a request to unsubscribe@cloudflare.com.
10. DATA SECURITY, DATA INTEGRITY AND ACCESS
We take all reasonable steps to protect information we receive from you from accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, and unauthorized disclosure or access. We have put in place appropriate physical, technical and administrative measures to safeguard and secure your information, and we make use of privacy-enhancing technologies such as encryption. If you have any questions about the security of your personal information, you can contact us at
privacyquestions@cloudflare.com
.
11. DATA RETENTION
We store your personal information for a period of time that is consistent with the business purposes set forth in Section 3 of this policy or as long as needed to fulfill and comply with legal obligations. The criteria we used to determine how long we store your personal information will vary depending on several different factors. We typically consider the following when determining data retention:
The purpose for collecting the personal information in the first place. For example, if you have an active account with us, we need to keep your contact information during the entirety of that time in order to provide you with support or contact you regarding your account;
The volume, nature, and sensitivity of the personal information we are processing;
The potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of the personal information;
Whether we can achieve the purposes for processing with less data or through other means
Legal requirements that may apply to the data, such as applicable statutes of limitation or contractual obligations.
When the data retention period expires for a given type of data, we will delete or destroy it. If, for technical reasons, we are unable to do so, we will implement appropriate security measures to prevent any further use of such data.
12. NOTIFICATION OF CHANGES
If we make changes to this Policy that we believe materially impact the privacy of your personal information, we will promptly provide notice of any such changes (and, where necessary, obtain consent), as well as post the updated Policy on this website noting the effective date of any changes.
13. BUSINESS TRANSACTIONS
We may assign or transfer this Policy, as well as information covered by this Policy, in the event of a merger, sale, change in control, or reorganization of all or part of our business.
14. ENGLISH LANGUAGE CONTROLS
Non-English translations of this Policy are provided for convenience only. In the event of any ambiguity or conflict between translations, the English version is authoritative and controls.
15. DISPUTE RESOLUTION
If you have an unresolved privacy or data-use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
16. NOTICE TO CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS
This section applies only to California residents. It describes how we collect, use, and share Personal Information of California residents in operating our business, and their rights with respect to that Personal Information. For purposes of this section, “Personal Information” means information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household as defined in the CCPA. It does not include information exempted from the scope of the CCPA.
How We Collect, Use, and Share Your Personal Information under the CCPA
We may collect, use, and disclose for our business and commercial purposes, the following categories of Personal Information:
Identifiers for the categories of individuals/users defined in Section 1 of the Cloudflare Privacy Policy (e.g., email address of Customers and Administrative Users, name and contact information of Attendees);
Payment and customer records information of our Customers;
Protected classification characteristics (e.g., age, ethnicity, race, languages spoken, or gender) to the extent these characteristics are voluntarily disclosed to us or contained in any  content transmitted across or stored on our network;
Commercial information (e.g., records of products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or usage histories);
Professional or employment information;
Internet or other electronic network activity information; and
Inferences (e.g., information about your interests or preferences).
The sources from which we collect information are described in Section 2 of the Cloudflare Privacy Policy.
The business and commercial purposes for which we collect and use this information are described in Section 3 of the Cloudflare Privacy Policy.
The categories of third parties to whom we “disclose” the information for a business purpose are described in Section 5 of the Cloudflare Privacy Policy.
Your California Privacy Rights
As a California resident, you have the rights listed below. However, these rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may decline your request as permitted by law.
Knowledge
. You can request information about what personal information we have collected about you, including:
the categories of personal information;
the categories of sources from which the personal information is collected;
the business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling, or sharing personal information;
the categories of third parties to whom we disclose personal information;
the specific pieces of personal information that we have collected about you.
Access
. You can request a copy of the Personal Information that we have collected about you.
Deletion
. You can ask us to delete the Personal Information that we have collected from you.
Correction
. You can ask us to rectify inaccurate personal information and, taking into account the purpose of processing the personal information, ensure it is complete;
Opt-out of sales or sharing
. You can ask that we do not “sell” or “share” your Personal Information as “sell” and “share” are explicitly defined under the CCPA. For more information, please refer to the section titled “Right to Opt Out of the Sale and Sharing of Your Personal Information” below.
Nondiscrimination
. You are entitled to exercise the rights described above free from discrimination. This means that we will not penalize you for exercising your rights by taking actions such as denying you the Services; increasing the price/rate of the Services; decreasing service quality; or suggesting that we may penalize you as described above for exercising your rights.
In order to submit a request to exercise your right of information, access, or deletion pursuant to the CCPA, please follow the instructions for the submitting a Rights Request detailed in Section 8, above. Please note, we reserve the right to confirm your California residence to process your requests and may need to confirm your identity to process certain requests using the verification methods described in Section 8. For example, we take reasonable precautions to verify the identities of those California residents submitting requests to delete or access Personal Information.
Right to Opt Out of the Sale and Sharing of Your Personal Information
Cloudflare does not sell your Personal Information in the conventional sense (i.e., for money). Like many companies, however, we use services that help deliver interest-based ads to you and may transfer Personal Information to business partners for their use. Making Personal Information (such as online identifiers or browsing activity) available to these companies may be considered a “sale” or “sharing” of your Personal Information under the CCPA.
You can request to opt out of such “sale” or “sharing” of your Personal Information using the “
Your Privacy Choices”
link in the footer below
.
In addition, some internet browsers offer the option to enable opt-out signals such as Global Privacy Control that lets you tell websites that you do not want to have your online activities tracked. Cloudflare responds to these signals by processing them as a request to opt out of the “sale” or “sharing” of your Personal Information as discussed above.
Please note that you will still see some advertising, regardless of your selection. We do not impose verification protocols for processing opt out requests unless we have reason to question the authenticity of a requester’s identity, in which case we may request evidence of identity and California residency.
17. CONTACT INFORMATION
Cloudflare, Inc.
101 Townsend St.
San Francisco, CA 94107
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare (Canada) Information Technology Co., Ltd.
Suite 2600, Three Bentall Centre
595 Burrard Street, P.O. Box 49314
Vancouver, BC V7X 1L3
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare, Ltd.
County Hall/The Riverside Building
Belvedere Road
London, SE1 7PB
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Portugal, Unipessoal Lda.
Largo Rafael Bordalo Pinheiro 29
1200-369 Lisboa
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Germany GmbH
Rosental 7
80331 München
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare France SAS
6 place de la Madeleine
75008 Paris
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Netherlands B.V.
Keizersgracht 62,
1015CS Amsterdam
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Pte., Ltd.
182 Cecil Street, #35-01
Frasers Tower, Singapore 069547
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Australia Pty Ltd.
333 George St., 5th Floor
Sydney, NSW 2000
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare (Beijing) Information Technology Co., Ltd.
16 South Guangshun Street
Donghuang Building 17th Floor
Chaoyang District Beijing 100015
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Japan K.K.
Marunouchi Kitaguchi Building 9F
1-6-5 Marunouchi, Chiyoda-ku
Tokyo, 100-0005
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Middle East FZ-LLC
DIC 1 Internet City Road
Building 1, Ground Floor, Office 17
Jumeirah
Dubai UAE
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare India Private Limited
No. 215 Richmond Towers, 12 Richmond Road, Richmond Town
Banglore, Bangalore, Karnataka, India, 560025
Attention: Grievance Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Area 1 Security, LLC
838 Walker Road Suite 21-2,
Dover, DE, 19904
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Korea LLC
8-113 (Samseong-dong), Teheran-ro 507
Gangnam-gu, Seoul, South Korea, 06168
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Mexico S. de R.L de C.V.
Bosque de Ciruelos No. 180 int. PP 101, Col. Bosque de las Lomas, Miguel Hidalgo
Ciudad de México, 11700, México
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Cloudflare Malaysia Sdn. Bhd.
Level 21, Suite 21.01, The Gardens South Tower,
Mid Valley City,
Lingkaran Syed Putra,
Kuala Lumpur
Wilayah Persekutuan
59200
Attention: Data Protection Officer
dpo@cloudflare.com
Getting Started
Free plans
For enterprises
Compare plans
Domain name search
Get a recommendation
Request a demo
Contact sales
Resources
Learning center
Analyst reports
Cloudflare Radar
Cloudflare TV
Case studies
Webinars
White Papers
Developer docs
Architecture Center
theNET
Blog
Find an expert
Solutions
Connectivity cloud
SSE and SASE services
Application services
Network services
Developer services
Community
Community hub
Project Galileo
Athenian Project
Cloudflare for Campaigns
Critical Infrastructure Defense Project
Support
Help center
Cloudflare status
Trust-hub
Compliance
GDPR
Trust & safety
Company
About Cloudflare
Our team
Investor relations
Press
Careers
Diversity, equity, & inclusion
Impact/ESG
Network map
Logos & press kit
Become a partner
Sub-policy 14
https://aws.amazon.com/privacy/:
Select your cookie preferences
We use essential cookies and similar tools that are necessary to provide our site and services. We use performance cookies to collect anonymous statistics, so we can understand how customers use our site and make improvements. Essential cookies cannot be deactivated, but you can choose “Customize” or “Decline” to decline performance cookies.
If you agree, AWS and approved third parties will also use cookies to provide useful site features, remember your preferences, and display relevant content, including relevant advertising. To accept or decline all non-essential cookies, choose “Accept” or “Decline.” To make more detailed choices, choose “Customize.”
Accept
Decline
Customize
We use cookies and similar tools (collectively, "cookies") for the following purposes.
Essential
Essential cookies are necessary to provide our site and services and cannot be deactivated. They are usually set in response to your actions on the site, such as setting your privacy preferences, signing in, or filling in forms.
Performance
Performance cookies provide anonymous statistics about how customers navigate our site so we can improve site experience and performance. Approved third parties may perform analytics on our behalf, but they cannot use the data for their own purposes.
Allow performance category
Allowed
Functional
Functional cookies help us provide useful site features, remember your preferences, and display relevant content. Approved third parties may set these cookies to provide certain site features. If you do not allow these cookies, then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Allow functional category
Allowed
Advertising
Advertising cookies may be set through our site by us or our advertising partners and help us deliver relevant marketing content. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less relevant advertising.
Allow advertising category
Allowed
Blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of our sites. You may review and change your choices at any time by selecting Cookie preferences in the footer of this site. We and selected third-parties use cookies or similar technologies as specified in the
AWS Cookie Notice
.
We display ads relevant to your interests on AWS sites and on other properties, including cross-context behavioral advertising. Cross-context behavioral advertising uses data from one site or app to advertise to you on a different company’s site or app.
To not allow AWS cross-context behavioral advertising based on cookies or similar technologies, select “Don't allow” and “Save privacy choices” below, or visit an AWS site with a legally-recognized decline signal enabled, such as the Global Privacy Control. If you delete your cookies or visit this site from a different browser or device, you will need to make your selection again. For more information about cookies and how we use them, please read our
AWS Cookie Notice
.
Cross-context behavioral ads
Allow
Don't allow
To not allow all other AWS cross-context behavioral advertising,
complete this form by email
.
For more information about how AWS handles your information, please read the
AWS Privacy Notice
.
We will only store essential cookies at this time, because we were unable to save your cookie preferences.
If you want to change your cookie preferences, try again later using the link in the AWS console footer, or contact support if the problem persists.
Skip to main content
Privacy Notice
Last Updated: February 21, 2025
To see prior version, click
here
.
This Privacy Notice describes how we collect and use your personal information in relation to AWS websites, applications, products, services, events, and experiences that reference this Privacy Notice (together, “AWS Offerings”).
This Privacy Notice does not apply to the “content” processed, stored, or hosted by our customers using AWS Offerings in connection with an AWS account. See the agreement governing your access to your AWS account and the
AWS Data Privacy FAQ
for more information about how we handle content and how our customers can control their content through AWS Offerings. This Privacy Notice also does not apply to any products, services, websites, or content that are offered by third parties or have their own privacy notice.
Personal Information We Collect
How We Use Personal Information
Cookies
How We Share Personal Information
Location of Personal Information
How We Secure Information
Access and Choice
Children’s Personal Information
Third Party Sites and Services
Retention of Personal Information
Contacts, Notices, and Revisions
EU-US Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension, and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework
Additional Information for Certain Jurisdictions
Examples of Information Collected
Personal Information We Collect
We collect your personal information in the course of providing AWS Offerings to you.
Here are the types of information we gather:
Information You Give Us:
We collect any information you provide in relation to AWS Offerings. Click
here
to see examples of information you give us.
Automatic Information:
We automatically collect certain types of information when you interact with AWS Offerings. Click
here
to see examples of information we collect automatically.
Information from Other Sources:
We might collect information about you from other sources, including service providers, partners, and publicly available sources. Click
here
to see examples of information we collect from other sources.
How We Use Personal Information
We use your personal information to operate, provide, and improve AWS Offerings. Our purposes for using personal information include:
Provide AWS Offerings:
We use your personal information to provide and deliver AWS Offerings and process transactions related to AWS Offerings, including registrations, subscriptions, purchases, and payments.
Measure, Support, and Improve AWS Offerings:
We use your personal information to measure use of, analyze performance of, fix errors in, provide support for, improve, and develop AWS Offerings.
Recommendations and Personalization:
We use your personal information to recommend AWS Offerings that might be of interest to you, identify your preferences, and personalize your experience with AWS Offerings.
Comply with Legal Obligations:
In certain cases, we have a legal obligation to collect, use, or retain your personal information. For example, we collect bank account information from AWS Marketplace sellers for identity verification.
Communicate with You:
We use your personal information to communicate with you in relation to AWS Offerings via different channels (e.g., by phone, email, chat) and to respond to your requests.
Marketing:
We use your personal information to market and promote AWS Offerings.
Fraud and Abuse Prevention and Credit Risks:
We use your personal information to prevent and detect fraud and abuse in order to protect the security of our customers, AWS, and others. We may also use scoring methods to assess and manage credit risks.
Purposes for Which We Seek Your Consent:
We may also ask for your consent to use your personal information for a specific purpose that we communicate to you.
Cookies
To enable our systems to recognize your browser or device and to provide, market, and improve AWS Offerings, we and approved third parties use cookies and other identifiers. For more information about cookies and how we use them, please read our
Cookie Notice
.
How We Share Personal Information
Information about our customers is an important part of our business and we are not in the business of selling our customers’ personal information to others. We share personal information only as described below and with Amazon.com, Inc. and the affiliates that Amazon.com, Inc. controls that are either subject to this Privacy Notice or follow practices at least as protective as those described in this Privacy Notice.
Transactions Involving Third Parties:
We make available to you services, software, and content provided by third parties for use on or through AWS Offerings. You can tell when a third party is involved in your transactions, and we share information related to those transactions with that third party. For example, you can order services, software, and content from sellers using the AWS Marketplace and we provide those sellers information to facilitate your subscription, purchases, or support.
Third-Party Service Providers:
We employ other companies and individuals to perform functions on our behalf. Examples include: delivering AWS hardware, sending communications, processing payments, assessing credit and compliance risks, analyzing data, providing marketing and sales assistance (including advertising and event management), conducting customer relationship management, and providing training. These third-party service providers have access to personal information needed to perform their functions, but may not use it for other purposes. Further, they must process that information in accordance with this Privacy Notice and as permitted by applicable data protection law.
Business Transfers:
As we continue to develop our business, we might sell or buy businesses or services. In such transactions, personal information generally is one of the transferred business assets but remains subject to the promises made in any pre-existing Privacy Notice (unless, of course, the individual consents otherwise). Also, in the unlikely event that AWS or substantially all of its assets are acquired, your information will of course be one of the transferred assets.
Protection of Us and Others:
We release account and other personal information when we believe release is appropriate to comply with the law, enforce or apply our terms and other agreements, or protect the rights, property, or security of AWS, our customers, or others. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for fraud prevention and detection and credit risk reduction.
At Your Option:
Other than as set out above, you will receive notice when personal information about you might be shared with third parties, and you will have an opportunity to choose not to share the information.
Location of Personal Information
Amazon Web Services, Inc. is located in the United States, and our affiliated companies are located throughout the world. Depending on the scope of your interactions with AWS Offerings, your personal information may be stored in or accessed from multiple countries, including the United States. Whenever we transfer personal information to other jurisdictions, we will ensure that the information is transferred in accordance with this Privacy Notice and as permitted by applicable data protection laws.
How We Secure Information
At AWS, security is our highest priority. We design our systems with your security and privacy in mind.
We maintain a wide variety of compliance programs that validate our security controls. Click
here
to learn more about our compliance programs.
We protect the security of your information during transmission to or from AWS websites, applications, products, or services by using encryption protocols and software.
We follow the Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard (PCI DSS) when handling credit card data.
We maintain physical, electronic, and procedural safeguards in connection with the collection, storage, and disclosure of personal information. Our security procedures mean that we may request proof of identity before we disclose personal information to you.
Access and Choice
You can view, update, and delete certain information about your account and your interactions with AWS Offerings. Click
here
for a list of examples of information that you can access. If you cannot access or update your information yourself, you can always contact us for assistance.
You have choices about the collection and use of your personal information. Many AWS Offerings include settings that provide you with options as to how your information is being used. You can choose not to provide certain information, but then you might not be able to take advantage of certain AWS Offerings.
Account Information:
If you want to add, update, or delete information related to your account, please go to the
AWS Management Console
. When you update or delete any information, we usually keep a copy of the prior version for our records.
Communications:
If you do not want to receive promotional messages from us, please unsubscribe or adjust your communication preferences in the
AWS Management Console
or the
AWS Email Preference Center
. If you do not want to receive in-app notifications from us, please adjust your notification settings in the app or your device.
Cookies Preferences:
You can change your cookie preferences on AWS sites at any time by clicking Cookie Preferences in the footer of the AWS site. You can also manage cookies through your browser settings.
The "Help" feature on most browsers and devices will tell you how to remove cookies from your device, how to prevent your browser or device from accepting new cookies, how to have the browser notify you when you receive a new cookie, or how to disable cookies altogether.
Sellers and Amazon Partners:
Sellers and Amazon Partner Network members can add, update, or delete information in the
AWS Marketplace
and
APN Partner Central
, respectively.
Children’s Personal Information
We don’t provide AWS Offerings for purchase by children. If you’re under 18, you may use AWS Offerings only with the involvement of a parent or guardian.
Third Party Sites and Services
AWS Offerings may embed content provided by others or include links to other websites and applications. These companies may collect information about you when you interact with their content or services. We are not responsible for the practices of these companies. Please consult their privacy policies to learn about their data practices.
Retention of Personal Information
We keep your personal information to enable your continued use of AWS Offerings, for as long as it is required in order to fulfill the relevant purposes described in this Privacy Notice, as may be required by law (including for tax and accounting purposes), or as otherwise communicated to you. How long we retain specific personal information varies depending on the purpose for its use, and we will delete your personal information in accordance with applicable law.
Contacts, Notices, and Revisions
If you have any concerns about privacy at AWS, please
contact us
with a thorough description, and we will try to resolve the issue for you.
For any prospective or current customers of Amazon Web Services, Inc., our mailing address is: Amazon Web Services, Inc., 410 Terry Avenue North, Seattle, WA 98109-5210, ATTN: AWS Legal
Contact details for specific jurisdictions including the European Economic Area, the UK and Switzerland, can be found in “Additional Information for Certain Jurisdictions” below.
If you interact with AWS Offerings on behalf of or through your organization, then your personal information may also be subject to your organization’s privacy practices, and you should direct privacy inquiries to your organization.
Our business changes constantly, and our Privacy Notice may also change. You should check our website frequently to see recent changes. You can see the date on which the latest version of this Privacy Notice was posted. Unless stated otherwise, our current Privacy Notice applies to all personal information we have about you and your account. We stand behind the promises we make, however, and will never materially change our policies and practices to make them less protective of personal information collected in the past without informing affected customers and giving them a choice.
EU-US Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension, and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework
Amazon Web Services, Inc. participates in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension to the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework. Click
here
to learn more.
Additional Information for Certain Jurisdictions
We provide additional information about our controllers and data protection officers (as applicable), the privacy, collection, and use of personal information of prospective and current customers of AWS Offerings located in certain jurisdictions.
Brazil
Controller of Personal Information
. When Amazon AWS Serviços Brasil Ltda. is the provider of an AWS Offering, Amazon AWS Serviços Brasil Ltda., A. Presidente Juscelino Kubitschek, 2.041, Torre E - 18th and 19th Floors, Vila Nova Conceicao, Sao Paulo, is the data controller of personal information collected or processed through the AWS Offering. The data protection officer for Amazon AWS Serviços Brasil Ltda. can be contacted at aws-brazil-privacy@amazon.com.
Processing
. We process your personal information on one or more of the following legal bases:
as necessary to enter into a contract with you or a legal entity you represent, to perform our contractual obligations, to provide AWS Offerings, to respond to requests from you, or to provide customer support;
where we have a legitimate interest, as described in this Privacy Notice (see How We Use Personal Information above);
as necessary to comply with relevant law and legal obligations, including to respond to lawful requests and orders; or
with your consent.
Your Rights
. Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information;
request portability of personal information that you have provided to us (which does not include information derived from the collected information), where the processing of such personal information is based on consent or a contract with you and is carried out by automated means; and
request information about the possibility of refusing consent and the consequences of doing so.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or at the address under Controller of Personal Information above.
You can also file a complaint with Brazil’s National Data Protection Authority (ANPD) through its official channels.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Transfers outside of Brazil
. When we transfer your personal information outside Brazil, we do so in accordance with the terms of this Privacy Notice and applicable data protection law.
Canada
Your Rights
. Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements; and
lodge a complaint with us regarding our practices related to your personal information.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please
contact us
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or by mail at 120 Bremner Blvd, 26th Floor, Toronto, Ontario, M5J 0A8, Canada, ATTN: AWS Canada Legal. Further, the Amazon Web Services Canada, Inc. Privacy Officer can be contacted at
aws-canada-privacy@amazon.com
or by mail at the address noted above.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Costa Rica
Your Rights
. With respect to data collected and processed by Amazon Web Services Costa Rica (“AWS Costa Rica”), you have the rights of access, rectification, erasure, restriction, or complaint. When you consent to AWS Costa Rica processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time and AWS Costa Rica will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please
contact us
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us at Zona Franca America, Edificio C7. 600 norte de Plaza Real Cariari, sobre la paralela a la Autopista General Cañas. San Francisco de Heredia, Costa Rica.
European Economic Area, UK, and Switzerland
Controller of Personal Information.
When Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL is the provider of an AWS Offering, Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL, 38 Avenue John F. Kennedy, L-1855, Luxembourg, is the data controller of personal information collected or processed through the AWS Offering.
Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL is also the authorized representative of Amazon Web Services, Inc. in the EEA.
Processing.
We process your personal information on one or more of the following legal bases:
as necessary to enter into a contract with you or a legal entity you represent, to perform our contractual obligations, to provide AWS Offerings, to respond to requests from you, or to provide customer support;
where we have a legitimate interest, as described in this Privacy Notice (see How We Use Personal Information above);
as necessary to comply with relevant law and legal obligations, including to respond to lawful requests and orders; or
with your consent.
Information We Retain After Your Account is Closed.
If you decide to terminate your agreement and close your AWS account, we will retain your content for a period of up to 90 days after account closure, during which you may still access part of the AWS Management Console in order to retrieve your billing documents and to contact customer support. During this period, you may also decide to reopen your AWS account. At the end of this period, we will delete any content remaining in your account.
After account closure, we may need to keep certain information for an additional period of time for legal and legitimate business purposes. For example, we may retain personal information such as your contact information (e.g., name, email address, physical address) and any invoices that AWS has sent to you (e.g., record of purchases, applicable discounts, and tax information) for tax and accounting purposes. If applicable, AWS may also retain records of communications with you, as well as relevant logs (e.g., a log of your account closure) for dispute resolution purposes. We further may keep records for preventing fraud and ensuring security, for example in case of misuse of our services or violation of our terms.
Your Rights
. Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information; and
request portability of personal information that you have provided to us (which does not include information derived from the collected information), where the processing of such personal information is based on consent or a contract with you and is carried out by automated means.
Questions and Contacts.
If you wish to do any of these things or have a data-protection related question, and you are an AWS customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
.
The data protection officer for Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL can be contacted at aws-EU-privacy@amazon.com.
You can also lodge a complaint with our principal supervisory authority, the
Commission Nationale pour la Protection des Données in Luxembourg
, or with a local authority.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Cookies.
Please refer to our
Cookie Notice
.
Transfers outside of the EEA.
When we transfer your personal information outside the EEA we do so in accordance with the terms of this Privacy Notice and applicable data protection law.
India
For any prospective or current customers of Amazon Web Services India Private Limited (formerly known as Amazon Internet Services Private Limited), our mailing address is: Amazon Web Services India Private Limited, Block E, 14th Floor, Unit Nos. 1401 to 1421, International Trade Tower, Nehru Place, New Delhi, Delhi 110019, India, ATTN: AWS India Legal.
Japan
Controller of Personal Information
Any personal information provided to or gathered by Amazon Web Services Japan G.K. is controlled primarily by Amazon Web Services Japan G.K., 3-1-1 Kamiosaki, Shinagawa-ku, Tokyo 141-0021 JAPAN.
Any personal information collected by Amazon Web Services, Inc. is controlled primarily by Amazon Web Services, Inc.
Use of Personal Information
We jointly use your personal information for such purposes as described in this Privacy Notice with domestic and foreign affiliates that Amazon.com, Inc. controls, including Amazon Web Services, Inc., Amazon Web Services Japan G.K., Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL, and other global entities that either are subject to this Privacy Notice or follow practices at least as protective as those described in this Privacy Notice. Jointly used personal information includes personal information described under “Personal Information We Collect” and “Example of Information Collected” above. Amazon Web Services, Inc. is the business operator primarily responsible for managing jointly used personal information.
We share personal information with third parties only to the extent described under “How We Share Personal Information” above and in accordance with the Act on Protection of Personal Information.
When we share your personal information with third parties outside of Japan, such as sellers of products on AWS Marketplace and sponsors of AWS events, we require the recipients to adopt personal information security measures to protect your personal information.
Please see
here
for information on the countries where third parties may be located, and the applicable data privacy laws and data protection systems in these countries.
Your Rights
You may have the right to request access to or delete your personal information in accordance with applicable law. If you wish to submit a data subject access request, please
contact us
(for AWS customers) or contact us at our mailing address, Amazon Web Services Japan G.K., 3-1-1 Kamiosaki, Shinagawa-ku, Tokyo 141-0021 JAPAN, ATTN: AWS Japan Legal (for current or prospective customers of Amazon Web Services Japan G.K. and non-customers in Japan).
Malaysia
A Bahasa Malaysia translation of this Privacy Notice can be found
here
.
Nigeria
Controller of Personal Information.
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services Nigeria Limited, located at 3-5 Sinari Daranijo Street, Off Ajose Adeogun, Victoria Island, Lagos, Nigeria (“AWS Nigeria”), AWS Nigeria is the data controller.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information;
request portability of personal information that you have provided to us (which does not include information derived from the collected information), where the processing of such personal information is based on consent or a contract with you and is carried out by automated means; and
request information about the possibility of refusing consent and the consequences of doing so.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS Nigeria customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
.
You can also file a complaint with Nigeria’s National Information Technology Development Agency through its official channels.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Peru
Controller of Personal Information.
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services Peru S.R.L., located at Av. Jorge Basadre 349 San Isidro, Lima (“AWS Peru”), AWS Peru is the data controller and the personal data bank holder of the following data banks: customers, prospective customers, and vendors.
Personal Information.
Depending on how you engage with AWS Peru, we may process one or more of the following kinds of personal information: name, identity card number, Tax ID, contact information (such as address, telephone, email address), profession, banking and credit card details, and physical or electronic signature. For more information about the personal information that we collect, click
here
.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information; and
exercise any other rights afforded by the Peruvian Personal Data Protection Regulations.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS Peru customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or at the address under Controller of Personal Information above.
You can also file a complaint before the Peruvian National Data Protection Authority through its official channels.
Data Processors and Transfers to Third Parties.
We may share your personal information as described in this Privacy Notice and as permitted by the Peruvian Personal Data Protection Regulations, including to Amazon Web Services Inc., located at 410 Terry Avenue North, Seattle, WA 98109-5210, United States of America, for the purposes of providing services and engaging in marketing, business development, and sales efforts with respect to cloud services that Amazon Web Services, Inc. sells globally; and enabling the provision of data hosting, storage, and processing by Amazon Web Services, Inc. as AWS Peru’s data processor.
Philippines
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services Philippines, Inc. (“AWS Philippines”), you may contact the Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) and Data Compliance Officer for Privacy (“COP”)
here
if you are an AWS Philippines customer. If you are not an AWS customer, you may contact the DPO and COP at 21st floor Arthaland Century Pacific Tower, 5th Avenue 1634 Bonifacio Global City, Taguig, Philippines.
South Africa
Controller of Personal Information.
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services South Africa Proprietary Limited, located at 29 Gogosoa Street, Observatory, Cape Town, South Africa, 7925 (“AWS South Africa”), AWS South Africa is the responsible party.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
object, at any time to the processing of your personal information for purposes of direct marketing other than direct marketing by means of unsolicited electronic communications from AWS which is prohibited unless you give consent to receive such direct marketing;
object, at any time (at which point we will cease processing of your personal information), to the processing of your personal information if you feel the processing of that personal information is not necessary for protection of your legitimate interest/s; proper performance of a public law duty by a public body; or pursuance of the legitimate interests of AWS or of a third party to whom the information is supplied; and
to submit a complaint to the Information Regulator of South Africa regarding interference with the protection of your personal information.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS South Africa customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or at the address under Controller of Personal Information above.
The Information Regulator Contact Details. The Information Regulator of South Africa is located at: JD House, 27 Stiemens Street, Braamfontein, Johannesburg, 2001. P.O. Box 31533, Braamfontein, Johannesburg, 2017. You may direct general enquiries by email to:
enquiries@inforegulator.org.za
. You may direct complaints by email to:
POPIAComplaints@inforegulator.org.za
.
South Korea
AWS does not knowingly collect personal information from children under the age of 14 without the consent of the child's parent or guardian.
How We Share Personal Information
AWS may share personal information as described in this Privacy Notice, including with affiliates of Amazon Web Services, Inc.
AWS has contracts in place with the following third party service provider(s) (delegatees) to perform functions on behalf of AWS in Korea, and they may have access to your personal information as needed to perform their functions described below:
The details of delegation for event management can be found on the relevant event page.
AWS may share your personal information with the following third party service provider(s) outside of Korea as described below:
If you do not agree with the above-stated overseas transfers, please stop using AWS Services and close your AWS Account.
Deletion of Personal Information
AWS will delete your personal information (including after closure of your AWS account) as described in this Privacy Notice. When deleting personal information, AWS will take standard commercially reasonable measures to make the personal information practically irrecoverable or irreproducible. The specific manner of deletion will depend on the information being deleted, how the information was collected and stored, and your interactions with us. Electronic documents or files containing personal information will be deleted using a technical method that makes recovery or retrieval of such information practically impossible or renders the data no longer personally identifiable. Non-electronic documents or files containing personal information will be shredded, incinerated, or both.
Retention of Personal Information
AWS Korea keeps your personal information to enable your continued use of AWS Offerings, for as long as it is required in order to fulfill the relevant purposes described in this Privacy Notice, as may be required by law (including for tax and accounting purposes as may be required by the Framework Act on National Taxes of Republic of Korea or other laws), or as otherwise communicated to you. How long we retain specific personal information varies depending on the purpose for its use, and we will delete your personal information in accordance with applicable law.
If you have any privacy questions or requests please contact:
AWS Korea Privacy
Email: aws-korea-privacy@amazon.com
Korean translation of this Privacy Notice can be found
here
.
Turkey
Controller of Personal Information.
When AWS Turkey Pazarlama Teknoloji ve Danışmanlık Hizmetleri Limited Şirketi is the provider of an AWS Offering, AWS Turkey Pazarlama Teknoloji ve Danışmanlık Hizmetleri Limited Şirketi, located at Esentepe Mahallesi Bahar Sk. Özdilek/River Plaza/Wyndham Grand Hotel Apt. No: 13/52 Şişli/İstanbul, Turkey, is the data controller of personal information collected or processed through the AWS Offering.
United States
These additional disclosures are required by certain state privacy laws to the extent they apply to your use of AWS Offerings, and serve as a Notice at Collection under the California Privacy Rights Act.
Categories of personal information collected
. The personal information that we may collect, or may have collected from consumers in the preceding twelve months, fall into the following categories established by the California Privacy Rights Act and other state privacy laws, depending on how you engage with the AWS Offerings:
Identifiers, such as your name, alias, address, phone numbers, or IP address, your AWS account log-in information, or a government-issued identifier (such as a state-issued ID number, which may be required to verify your identity when completing certain AWS certification courses, or an ID you provide for identity verification, which in some cases may reflect citizenship or immigration status);
personal information as described in subdivision (e) of Section 1798.80 of the California Civil Code, such as a credit card number or other payment information;
characteristics of protected classifications under California or US federal law, such as age, race, or gender or gender identity, for example if we conduct user surveys or analysis;
commercial information, such as purchase activity;
internet or other electronic network activity information, including content interaction information, such as content downloads, streams, and playback details;
information used to prevent and detect fraud or other unauthorized activity, including informing customers if such activity were to affect them;
biometric information, such as your voice or appearance, for example if you choose to participate in a demonstration of a speech or image recognition service;
geolocation data, which may in some cases constitute precise geolocation information, such as the location of your device or computer, for example if you enable location services to enhance your experience through event applications we offer;
audio, visual, electronic or other similar information, including when you communicate with us by phone or otherwise;
professional or employment-related information, for example data you may provide about your business;
inference data, such as information about your preferences; and
education information, such as information about enrollment status, fields of study, or degrees, honors, and awards received.
We collect this information from you, automatically through your interaction with the AWS Offerings, or from third parties. For more information about the personal information we collect, click
here
. We collect this information for the business and commercial purposes described in the “How We Use Personal Information” section above.
Categories of personal information disclosed for a business purpose
. The personal information that we may have disclosed about consumers for a business purpose in the preceding twelve months fall into the following categories established by the California Privacy Rights Act and other state privacy laws, depending on how you engage with the AWS Offerings:
Identifiers, such as your name, address, or phone numbers, for example if we use a third-party carrier to deliver AWS hardware, or government identifier or certain types of ID you provide for identity verification, which may in some cases reflect your citizenship or immigration status, for example if we use a third-party service to verify your identity;
personal information as described in subdivision (e) of Section 1798.80 of the California Civil Code, such as a credit card number or other payment information, for example if we use a third-party payment processor;
information that may reveal your age, gender or gender identity, race, or other protected classifications under California or US federal law, for example if we conduct user surveys or analysis using a third-party service provider;
commercial information, such as the details of a product or service you purchased if a third-party service provider assists in providing that product or service to you;
internet or other electronic network activity information, such as if we use a third-party service provider to help us gather reports for analyzing the health of our devices and services;
information relating to our prevention and detection of unauthorized activity, such as attempted fraud;
biometric information, for example if you choose to participate in a demonstration of certain AWS services facilitated by a third-party service provider;
geolocation data, which may constitute precise geolocation data, for example if we enable transportation services from a third party in connection with an AWS event;
audio, visual, electronic or other similar information, for example if a third-party service provider reviews recordings of customer support phone calls for quality assurance purposes;
professional or employment-related information, for example if we provide information to a third-party service provider for verification or registration as part of the AWS Offerings;
education information, for example if we facilitate employment or internship recruitment activities for participants in the AWS Educate program; and
inference data, for example if we use a third-party service provider to store information about your preferences.
For more information about the personal information we may disclose for a business purpose, click
here
.
Your Data Rights
. You may have certain data rights under state privacy laws, including to request information about the collection of your personal information by us, to access your personal information in a portable format, and to correct or delete your personal information. If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, or you are an authorized agent under applicable state law, please contact us
here
or at the address under
Contacts, Notices, and Revisions
above. Additionally, you may have the right to appeal the denial of any of these rights by submitting a form that will be provided to you if we deny a data request. Depending on your data choices, certain services may be limited or unavailable.
To ensure the security of your AWS account, we will generally ask you to verify your request using the contact information you have already provided. If you are an authorized agent making a request on behalf of a consumer pursuant to applicable state law, we may ask you to provide information verifying you have proper authority to make the request on behalf of the consumer or we may ask the consumer to verify their identity with us directly.
No sale or sharing of personal information
. We do not sell or share any personal information of consumers, as those terms are defined under the California Privacy Rights Act.
De-identified Data Disclosure.
AWS may use de-identified data in some instances. AWS either maintains such data without attempting to re-identify it or treats such data as personal data subject to applicable law.
California Privacy Rights Act Sensitive Personal Information Disclosure
. The categories of data that we collect and disclose for a business purpose include “sensitive personal information” as defined under the California Privacy Rights Act. We do not use or disclose sensitive personal information for any purpose not expressly permitted by the California Privacy Rights Act.
California Privacy Rights Act Retention Disclosure
. To enable your continued use of AWS Services, we keep your personal information for as long as it is required in order to fulfill the relevant purposes described in this AWS Privacy Notice, as permitted or as may be required by law, or as otherwise communicated to you.
California Privacy Rights Act Non-Discrimination Statement
. We will not discriminate against any consumer for exercising their rights under the California Privacy Rights Act.
Colorado Privacy Act and Oregon Privacy Act Profiling Disclosure
. We do not engage in profiling of consumers in furtherance of automated decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects, as those terms are defined under the Colorado Privacy Act or the Oregon Privacy Act.
Examples of Information Collected
Information You Give Us
You provide information to us when you:
search for, subscribe to, or purchase AWS Offerings;
create or administer your AWS account (and you might have more than one account if you have used more than one email address when using AWS Offerings);
configure your settings for, provide data access permissions for, or otherwise interact with AWS Offerings;
register for or attend an AWS event;
purchase or use content, products, or services from third-party providers through the AWS Marketplace (or other similar venues operated or provided by us);
offer your content, products, or services on or through AWS Offerings or the AWS Marketplace (or other similar venues operated or provided by us);
communicate with us by phone, email, or otherwise;
complete a questionnaire, a support ticket, or other information request forms;
post on AWS websites or participate in community features; and
employ notification services.
Depending on your use of AWS Offerings, you might supply us with such information as:
your name, email address, physical address, phone number, and other similar contact information;
payment information, including credit card and bank account information;
information about your location;
information about your organization and your contacts, such as colleagues or people within your organization;
usernames, aliases, roles, and other authentication and security credential information;
content of feedback, testimonials, inquiries, support tickets, and any phone conversations, chat sessions and emails with or to us;
your image (still, video, and in some cases 3-D), voice, and other identifiers that are personal to you when you attend an AWS event or use certain AWS Offerings;
information regarding identity, including government-issued identification information;
corporate and financial information; and
VAT numbers and other tax identifiers.
Automatic Information
We collect information automatically when you:
visit, interact with, or use AWS Offerings (including when you use your computer or other device to interact with AWS Offerings);
download content from us;
open emails or click on links in emails from us; and
interact or communicate with us (such as when you attend an AWS event or when you request customer support).
Examples of the information we automatically collect include:
network and connection information, such as the Internet protocol (IP) address used to connect your computer or other device to the Internet and information about your Internet service provider;
computer and device information, such as device, application, or browser type and version, browser plug-in type and version, operating system, or time zone setting;
the location of your device or computer;
authentication and security credential information;
content interaction information, such as content downloads, streams, and playback details, including duration and number of simultaneous streams and downloads;
AWS Offerings metrics, such as offering usage, occurrences of technical errors, diagnostic reports, your settings preferences, backup information, API calls, and other logs;
the full Uniform Resource Locators (URL) clickstream to, through, and from our website (including date and time) and AWS Offerings, content you viewed or searched for, page response times, download errors, and page interaction information (such as scrolling, clicks, and mouse-overs);
email addresses and phone numbers used to contact us; and
identifiers and information contained in cookies (see our
Cookie Notice
).
Information from Other Sources
Examples of information we receive from other sources include:
marketing, sales generation, and recruitment information, including your name, email address, physical address, phone number, and other similar contact information;
subscription, purchase, support, or other information about your interactions with products and services offered by us, our affiliates (such as AWS training courses), or third parties (such as products offered through the AWS Marketplace) in relation to AWS Offerings;
search results and links, including paid listings (such as Sponsored Links); and
credit history information from credit bureaus.
Information You Can Access
Examples of information you can access through AWS Offerings include:
your name, email address, physical address, phone number, and other similar contact information;
usernames, aliases, roles, and other authentication and security credential information;
your subscription, purchase, usage, billing, and payment history;
payment settings, such as payment instrument information and billing preferences;
tax information;
email communication and notification settings; and
if you participate in the AWS Marketplace or Amazon Partner Network (or other similar venues operated or provided by us), your account, your status, subscriptions, and other information.
Customers can access the information above through AWS Offerings, such as the
AWS Management Console
(including the
My Account
,
Billing Dashboard
,
Bills
,
Payment Methods
,
Payment History
,
Preferences
and
Tax Settings
pages), the
AWS Email Preference Center
,
AWS Marketplace
, and
APN Partner Central
.
AWS support for Internet Explorer ends on 07/31/2022. Supported browsers are Chrome, Firefox, Edge, and Safari.
Learn more »
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
Login
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
Login
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Sub-policy 15
https://headwayapp.co/privacy/:
Privacy Policy
Your privacy is critically important to us. At Headway, we have a few fundamental principles:
We don't ask you for personal information unless we truly need it. (We can't stand services
        that ask you for things like your gender or income level for no apparent reason.)
We don't share your personal information with anyone except to comply with the law,
        develop our products, or protect our rights.
We don't store personal information on our servers unless required for the ongoing
        operation of one of our services.
We aim to make it as simple as possible for you to control what's visible to the public,
        seen by search engines, kept private, or permanently deleted.
This privacy policy explains how we collect, use and disclose information about you when you use the services provided
  by
Headway App, Inc.
("we", "us" or "our")
  via
headwayapp.co
(collectively, the "Service").
Headwayapp operates
headwayapp.co
.
It is Headway's policy to respect your privacy regarding any information we may collect while operating our websites.
Website Visitors
Like most website operators, Headway collects non-personally-identifying information of the sort that web browsers and servers typically make available, such as the browser type, language preference, referring site, and the date and time of each visitor request. Headway's purpose in collecting non-personally identifying information is to better understand how Headway's visitors use its website. From time to time, Headway may release non-personally-identifying information in the aggregate, e.g., by publishing a report on trends in the usage of its website.
Headway also collects potentially personally-identifying information like Internet Protocol (IP) addresses for logged in users. Headway only discloses logged in user and commenter IP addresses under the same circumstances that it uses and discloses personally-identifying information as described below.
Gathering of Personally-Identifying Information
Certain visitors to Headway choose to interact with Headway in ways that require Headway to gather personally-identifying information. The amount and type of information that Headway gathers depends on the nature of the interaction. For example, we ask visitors who sign up to provide a username and email address. Those who engage in transactions with Headway are asked to provide additional information, including as necessary the personal and financial information required to process those transactions.
In each case, Headway collects such information only insofar as is necessary or appropriate to fulfill the purpose of the visitor's interaction with Headway. Headway does not disclose personally-identifying information other than as described below. And visitors can always refuse to supply personally-identifying information, with the caveat that it may prevent them from engaging in certain website-related activities.
Aggregated Statistics
Headway may collect statistics about the behavior of visitors to its websites. For instance, Headway may monitor the most liked and viewed entries. Headway may display this information publicly or provide it to others. However, Headway does not disclose personally-identifying information other than as described below.
Protection of Certain Personally-Identifying Information
Headway discloses potentially personally-identifying and personally-identifying information only to those of its employees, contractors and affiliated organizations that (i) need to know that information in order to process it on Headway's behalf or to provide services available at Headway's website, and (ii) that have agreed not to disclose it to others. Some of those employees, contractors and affiliated organizations may be located outside of your home country; by using Headway's websites, you consent to the transfer of such information to them.
Headway will not rent or sell potentially personally-identifying and personally-identifying information to anyone. Other than to its employees, contractors and affiliated organizations, as described above, Headway discloses potentially personally-identifying and personally-identifying information only in response to a subpoena, court order or other governmental request, or when Headway believes in good faith that disclosure is reasonably necessary to protect the property or rights of Headway, third parties or the public at large.
If you are a registered user of an Headway website and have supplied your email address, Headway may occasionally send you an email to tell you about new features, solicit your feedback, or just keep you up to date with what's going on with Headway and our products. We primarily use our various product blogs to communicate this type of information, so we expect to keep this type of email to a minimum. If you send us a request (for example via a support email or via one of our feedback mechanisms), we reserve the right to publish it in order to help us clarify or respond to your request or to help us support other users. Headway takes all measures reasonably necessary to protect against the unauthorized access, use, alteration or destruction of potentially personally-identifying and personally-identifying information.
Cookies
A cookie is a string of information that a website stores on a visitor's computer, and that the visitor's browser provides to the website each time the visitor returns. Headway uses cookies to help Headway identify and track visitors, their usage of Headway website, and their website access preferences. Headway visitors who do not wish to have cookies placed on their computers should set their browsers to refuse cookies before using Headway's websites, with the drawback that certain features of Headway's websites may not function properly without the aid of cookies.
Business Transfers
If Headway, or substantially all of its assets, were acquired, or in the unlikely event that Headway goes out of business or enters bankruptcy, user information would be one of the assets that is transferred or acquired by a third party. You acknowledge that such transfers may occur, and that any acquirer of Headway may continue to use your personal information as set forth in this policy.
Promotional Communications
You may opt out of receiving promotional emails or text messages from Headway by following the instructions in those emails or text messages. If you opt out, we may still send you non-promotional communications, such as those about your account or our ongoing business relations.
Contact Us
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, please contact us at
hello@headwayapp.co
.
Privacy Policy Changes
Although most changes are likely to be minor, Headway may change its Privacy Policy from time to time, and in Headway's sole discretion. Headway encourages visitors to frequently check this page for any changes to its Privacy Policy. Your continued use of this site after any change in this Privacy Policy will constitute your acceptance of such change.
Sub-policy 16
https://webhose.io/privacy/:
Skip to content
Privacy Policy
Last Revised: February 20th, 2023
Webz.io – compliant with the GDPR
How does Webz.io comply with the GDPR?
At Webz.io, we respect your right to know how we handle personal information.
We have done a thorough review of the personal data collection practices for our users and documented the various sources of data. Automated measures have been implemented that meet GDPR compliance as well as measures that provide transparency to our users.
With the Privacy Policy, Webz.io informs users about the means and purposes of data processing, the legal basis for processing, the duration of the processing and the rights of our users / data subjects.
Representation for data subjects in the EU
We value your privacy and your rights as a data subject and have therefore appointed Prighter Group with its local partners as our privacy representative and your point of contact.
Prighter gives you an easy way to exercise your privacy-related rights (e.g. requests to access or erase personal data). If you want to contact us via our representative, Prighter or make use of your data subject rights, please visit the following website.
https://prighter.com/q/14848054768
1. General
If you visit our website from a country of the EU or the European Economic Area, the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) is applicable for the processing of your personal data.
This privacy policy serves the purpose of fulfilling our duty as a controller to inform data subjects about data protection. Webz.io will comply with all legal requirements regarding the collection, processing and use of your personal data as required by the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR).
With this privacy policy,
Webz.io
fulfils its obligations to inform data subjects about the means and purposes of data processing, the legal basis for processing, the duration of the processing and the rights of the data subjects.
In this privacy policy, we inform you in detail about:
– Who we are and how you can contact us;
– Which of our products and services are covered by this privacy policy;
– Which categories of personal data we process, from which sources we obtain data, for what purposes we process personal data and on what legal basis we do so;
– To whom we transfer personal data;
– How long we store personal information;
– Which rights you have with regard to the data we process about you;
– Which cookies are used on our websites and how they can be managed (cookie policy).
2. Controller and Scope
Webz.io offers its customers a variety of different products and services. For customers and users from the European Union or the European Economic Area (EEA), the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) is applicable when using our services.
Webz.io is a controller in accordance with Article 4 lit. 7 GDPR, determining the purposes and means of the processing of personal data in the context of providing our services.
To make it easier for you to contact us, we have set up a single contact channel for all data protection requests: You can fill out the contact form under
https://prighter.com/q/14848054768
or simply write us an email: support@webz.io Of course, you can also contact us by post:
7 Metsada St. B.S.R Tower 4, POB 195 Bnei Brak 5126112 ISRAEL
Under point 7 of this privacy policy, you can find detailed information on how you can assert your data protection rights.
3. Data categories and purpose
Data we do NOT process
We do NOT process sensitive (“special”) data of our customers and service users. Thus, we do NOT collect or process any data identifying racial and ethnic origin, political opinions, religious beliefs or trade union affiliation, as well as genetic data, biometric data to uniquely identify a natural person, health data or data about the sexual life or the sexual orientation of a natural person. We also do NOT process data on criminal convictions and offenses.
Data we process
We process personal data that you provide us in connection with the registration on our website and the use of our services. See in detail below.
For the provision of its services, we collect information (which may include identifiable information) from publically available sources (as defined in our Terms) by crawling the web. Information collected in this way is automatically extracted and organized into different categories. This is done independently of customer’s requests.
In some circumstances, we might also collect information about you from publicly available sources. For more information on publicly available data that we collect and process as part of our services, please refer to our
information notice
.
For what purpose do we process your Data?
We store the personal data you have provided and the personal data we have collected in our database. Below you will find the purposes for the processing of your personal data as well as the legal basis.
E-Mail, Newsletter Services and Payments
Our newsletter keeps you up to date with our latest news and products. To register for our newsletter, we need a valid E-mail address as well as additional information (first and last name, company and phone number) to prove that you are the owner of the e-mail address and that you have consented in receiving the newsletter.
Your information will be used exclusively for receiving the newsletter and will not be forwarded to third parties. In order to prove that no third party is abusing your e-mail address without the owner’s knowledge, the IP address and date of registration are stored.
You can revoke your consent to the newsletter dispatch at any time and adjust it if necessary. To unsubscribe, you will find a link in each of our newsletters.
To unsubscribe from receiving our e-mails, you will find a link in each of our e-mails.
When a user pays for our service, we request the credit card number which we do not store. We transfer the data to the third party Bluesnap (https://home.bluesnap.com/) in encrypted form.
The following data is collected and transferred:
– Last 4 digits of the credit card
– Card Type
– Card Expiration date
– City
– Address
– Zip/Postal Code
– State/Province (if applicable)
– VAT ID (if applicable)
To subscribe to our paid services, you may have to provide payment or other necessary information. This includes, for example, billing information, and the name of your employer, if applicable. We may also collect other personal information, such as demographic information, and information about your interests and preferences, in connection with your use of the site and our services.
The purposes of collecting data are the following:
– To issue invoices, administer accounts, collect and process payments;
– To provide tips or guidance on how to use our site and our services, inform you of new features on our site and our services, or provide other information that may be of interest to you;
– To personalize the services we provide to you and tailor your experience at our site to your interests;
– To send you e-mails, e-newsletters, personalized offers via direct messaging or other communications about our services, if you have subscribed to receive such information;
– To manage our site and our services, diagnose technical problems, improve content, and allocate the resources of our systems;
– To investigate, detect, and protect Webz.io and third parties against error, negligence, breach of contract, fraud, theft and other unlawful activities;
– In connection with the sale, merger, spin-off, or other corporate reorganization, or in the event of our bankruptcy or insolvency, in which case the information is transferred or assigned to a third party as one of our business assets;
– To audit compliance with our policies and contractual obligations;
– As permitted by, and to comply with, any legal or regulatory requirements or provisions; or
– For any other purpose to which you consent.
The above-listed data is stored as long as the user has an account with Webz.io.
4. Disclosure of Data to Third Parties
From time to time, we may disclose your Personal Information as follows:
– To third-party service providers so that they may provide services, such as payment processing services or website maintenance and security services, to us;
– To third-party services as incident to the rendition of some features of the site and our services;
– To protect our site and our services, and our rights under our Terms; to protect ourselves against liability or prevent fraudulent activity; or where we believe it is necessary to permit us to pursue available remedies or limit any damages that we may sustain;
– In connection with the sale, merger, spin-off, or other corporate reorganization, or in the event of our bankruptcy or insolvency, in which case the information is transferred or assigned to a third party as one of our business assets;
– Where the information is public;
– To our insurers and to regulatory agencies and government enforcement agencies;
– To comply with a subpoena or warrant issued by, or an order made by, a court, person, or body that we believe in good faith to have authority to compel the production of information, or to comply with the rules of any such court, person, or body relating to the production of records;
– If we believe in good faith that a law, regulation, rule, or guideline requires the disclosure of Personal Information to third parties;
– To one or more persons who needs the information because of an emergency that threatens the life, health, or security of an identifiable person or group;
– Where we deem that disclosure of Personal Information is necessary to collect monies owing to us.
5. With whom we share your personal information
Transmission to external processors
We only transfer data to external processors if we have an agreement with them that meets the legal requirements for data processing agreements. We only transfer personal data to if an appropriate level of data protection is guaranteed.
6. Data security
We use technical and organizational security measures to protect your data against accidental or intentional manipulation, loss, destruction or access by unauthorized persons. Our security measures are being constantly improved. Data processing and data transmission are carried out with the SSL method (Secure Socket Layer).
7. Rights of the data subject
What are your rights as a data subject?
The data protection law gives you the following rights:
Right to information
: Upon request, we will give you free information about the scope, origin and recipients of the stored data as well as the purpose of the processing. Please use the linked request for information. In the case of excessive requests for information (more than four times a year), we reserve the right to charge a reasonable replacement fee.
Right to Correction:
Should any inaccurate information be stored despite our efforts to be accurate and up-to-date, we will correct it at your request.
Deletion
:
If you wish to delete personal data processed by us, please let us know. We will do our best to comply with your request promptly. Under certain conditions, you have a right to deletion, for example, in connection with a contradiction or when data has been processed unlawfully.
Restriction
:
You may also request restriction of data processing for the reasons that justify a deletion claim – then the stored data must remain stored (e.g. for evidence purposes), but may no longer be used for other purposes.
Objection / Revocation
:
You have the right to object to the processing of your personal information. You can also revoke the consent for data processing in writing at any time and free of charge.
Data portability
:
If you wish to transfer your personal data you have provided us to another person or controller, we will provide it to you it in an electronically transferable format.
Right to complain to the Data Protection Authority
:
You have the right to complain to a supervisory authority, in particular in the Member State of your residence, place of work or place of alleged infringement, if you considers the processing of your personal data being a violation of this Regulation. You are also welcome to contact us directly at any time.To assert your rights, please contact us by post:
7 Metsada St. B.S.R Tower 4, POB 195 Bnei Brak 5126112 ISRAELor by e-mail to:
support@webz.io.For the safety of your personal data, we can answer requests only if we have proof of your identity. Of course, we will only use your submitted documents to verify your identity and delete them immediately after processing and fulfilling your request.
8. Cookie-Policy
Cookies
On our digital platform, Webz.io, cookies and similar technologies (“cookies”) are used. Cookies are used to analyze the user habits of users in order to continuously improve the Webz.io services. In addition, advertisements based on the individual interests of the users and the user’s usage habits can be adjusted by means of cookies.
What are Cookies?
Cookies are text files that can be stored on the computer or smartphone of the visitor of a website if allowed by the browser settings of the user. In these text files, information can be stored for further access by the website. Cookies contain information about websites visited by the user, which the browser saves while surfing the internet. If cookies are provided by the domain under which the website is being hosted, we speak of first-party cookies.
If cookies are being provided by a provider other than the controller of the website, we speak of third-party cookies. The third-party, usually an advertiser, uses such cookies to keep track of a user’s visits on all pages displaying third-party advertisements, including on the Webz.io pages.
Cookies allow the user to be recognized when visiting the website again, and can therefore be used for purposes such as to ensure that a user does not need to log in to a website again after logging in once. Furthermore, cookies are suitable for storing and transmitting information about the user’s surfing behavior. Cookies are used to improve the quality of services, including the storage of user preferences, as well as to recommend content and search results, and to track user trends. As a result, the use of digital platforms can be evaluated and valuable knowledge about the needs of users can be gained. This information helps us to further improve the quality of our digital platforms. Cookies can be viewed and deleted individually (for more details, see the following chapters). In addition, users can also disable cookies globally via the browser by selecting the appropriate browser settings.
Which Cookies do we use?
Session cookies
We use so-called session cookies on our website.
The legal basis for such processing is Art. 6 Para. 1 lit. b) GDPR, insofar as these cookies are used to collect data to initiate or process contractual relationships.
If the processing does not serve to initiate or process a contract, our legitimate interest lies in improving the functionality of our website. The legal basis is then Art. 6 Para. 1 lit. f) GDPR.
In most cases, „Session-Cookies“, which only last for the duration of your browser session and are deleted when you close your browser, are used.
Third-Party cookies
Our website may also use cookies from partner companies with whom we cooperate for the purpose of advertising, analyzing, or improving the features of our website.
Please refer to the following information for details, in particular for the legal basis and purpose of such third-party collection and processing of data collected through cookies.
The following third-party cookies are being used on the digital platform of Webz.io:
– Google Analytics
– Pardot Marketing
– Facebook Tracking (remarketing)
– Adwords Tracking (remarketing)
– Linkedin Tracking (remarketing)
Note: The listing of these cookies cannot be 100% complete for technical reasons.
Management and deletion of cookies in the browser/rejection of cookies
If you wish to block first-party cookies of Webz.io or any other third-party cookies, we recommend you do so globally by using the settings of your internet browser.
Cookies can be rejected or deleted by appropriate browser settings. In this case, however, it is possible that not all functions of our website are fully usable.
Here are instructions on how to manage and delete cookies in your browser:
Delete, activate, and manage cookies in Chrome
Cookie settings in Firefox
Manage and delete cookies in Internet Explorer
Manage cookies and other website data in Safari
Some browsers offer targeted blocking of third-party cookies:
Block third-party cookies in Firefox
9. Profiling for target group segmentation
Analytics
The Webz.io uses software to evaluate the use of its websites, allowing us to generate a visual map of the visitor’s movements on our websites. This analysis will be used to continuously improve the quality of the services offered by the Webz.io. Cookies are also used for the aforementioned analysis to recognize users during their next visit.
Google AdWords Conversion
(1) We use Google AdWords to draw attention to our attractive offers. Based on data from our advertising campaigns, we can determine how successful the individual advertising measures are. We are interested in showing you advertisements that are of interest to you, in order to make our website more interesting to you and to achieve a fair calculation of advertising costs.
(2) These advertising materials are supplied by Google via so-called “ad servers”. To do this, we use ad server cookies, which measure certain performance metrics such as user clicks. If you access our website through a Google ad, Google AdWords will save a cookie on your computer or smartphone. These cookies usually lose their validity after 30 days and are not intended to identify you personally. This cookie will typically use the unique cookie ID, number of ad impressions per placement (Frequency), last impression (relevant to post-view conversions), and opt-out information.
(3) These cookies allow Google to recognize your Internet browser. If a user visits certain pages of an advertiser’s website and the cookie stored on their computer has not yet expired, Google and the customer see that the user clicked on the ad and was redirected to that page. Each advertiser is assigned a different cookie. Cookies cannot be tracked through the websites of advertisers. We ourselves do not collect and process any personal data for those means. We receive only statistical evaluations provided by Google. On the basis of these evaluations, we can identify which of the advertising measures used are particularly effective. We do not receive any further data from the use of the adverts; in particular we cannot identify the users on the basis of this information.
(4) Due to the marketing tools used, your browser automatically establishes a direct connection to the Google server. We have no control over the extent and the further use of the data which is raised by the employment of this tool by Google and inform you therefore according to our knowledge: By the incorporation of AdWords conversion, Google receives the information that you clicked on our ad. If you are registered with a service provided by Google, Google may associate the visit with your account. Even if you are not registered with Google or have not logged in, there is a chance that the provider will find out and store your IP address.
(5) You can prevent your participation in this tracking process in several ways: a) by adjusting your browser software accordingly, in particular, the suppression of third-party cookies will prevent you from receiving any third party advertisements; b) by disabling the cookies for conversion tracking by setting your browser to block cookies from the domain “www.googleadservices.com”, https://www.google.com/settings/ads, this setting be deleted when you delete your cookies; c) by deactivating the interest-based advertisements of the providers that are part of the “About Ads” self-regulation campaign via the link
http://www.aboutads.info/choices
, this setting being deleted when you delete your cookies; d) by permanent deactivation in your browser Firefox, Internet Explorer or Google Chrome under the link
http://www.google.com/settings/ads/plugin
. We point out that in this case, you may not be able to use all the features of this offer in full.
(6) The legal basis for the processing of your data is Art. 6 paragraph 1 sentence 1 lit. f GDPR. For more information about privacy at Google, see http://www.google.com/intl/en/policies/privacy and
https://services.google.com/sitestats.html
. Alternatively, you can visit the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI) website at
http://www.networkadvertising.org
. Google has submitted to the EU-US Privacy Shield,
https://www.privacyshield.gov/EU-US
Framework.
Google Analytics
Our website uses Google Analytics, the web analytics service provided by Google Inc. (“Google”). Google Analytics uses cookies to recognize visitors of the website. The visitor usage data generated by the Google Analytics cookie is typically transmitted and stored to Google servers in the United States. Google uses the information collected on behalf of the Webz.io to evaluate your use of this website and to aggregate reports about website activity.
By activating the IP anonymization, Google will shorten its IP address beforehand within the member states of the European Union or in other contracting states of the European Economic Area Agreement. The IP anonymization process of Google Analytics sets the last octet for IPv4 user IP addresses and the last 80 bits for IPv6 addresses to zero. The Google-acquired IP address is therefore no longer traceable to a single address or user. The submitted anonymized IP address will not be merged with other data provided by Google.
The storage of cookies can be restricted or prevented by settings in the web browser. You can find out how this works and what problems this may entail in the section “Cookies”.
Furthermore, you have the option of preventing the collection of data generated by the Google cookie and related to your use of the website, including your IP address. For this Google provides a browser plug-in, which you need to install in your browser software for this purpose: http://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
10. Modification of this Privacy Policy
We may revise this privacy policy from time to time. The use of your data is subject to the latest version available
at https://webz.io/privacy/.
Ready to Explore Web Data at Scale?
Speak with a data expert to learn more about Webz.io’s solutions
Get started
Create your API account and get instant access to millions of web sources
See Demo
Sub-policy 17
https://unsplash.com/privacy/:
A X shape
Unsplash uses cookies and similar technologies to secure our site, provide useful features to free and paying users, and to ensure optimal performance. By clicking "Accept all cookies" or closing this prompt, you consent to the use of all cookies. By clicking "Accept essential only", you consent only to the use of cookies that are strictly necessary for the site to function. See our
Cookie Policy
for more info.
Manage cookies
Accept essential only
Accept all cookies
Unsplash
License
Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
Terms & Conditions
API Terms
Unsplash+ License
Unsplash+ Terms
Privacy Policy
Unsplash Inc. and its affiliates and subsidiaries (“
Unsplash
”, “
we
” or “
us
”) are committed to protecting your privacy and safeguarding your personal information. The purpose of this privacy policy (the “
Privacy Policy
”) is to inform you about our privacy practices, including how we collect, use and disclose your personal information.
This Privacy Policy applies to our website, mobile applications and related services (collectively, the “
Unsplash Services
”). By visiting, accessing, or using the Unsplash Services, you consent to the policies and practices of this Privacy Policy so please read them carefully. If any policies or practices of this Privacy Policy are unacceptable to you, please do not visit, access, or use the Unsplash Services.
What's in this Privacy Policy?
Privacy Policy Amendments
Personal Information We Collect
How We Use Personal Information
How We Share Personal Information
Information Security
Retention of Personal Information
Rights Regarding your Personal Information
Direct Marketing
Data Transfer
Third Party Websites and Services
Children’s Privacy
Contact Us
Privacy Policy Amendments
Your privacy matters to us so whether you are new to the Unsplash Services or a long-time user, please take the time to get to know and familiarize yourself with our policies and practices. Feel free to print and keep a copy of this Privacy Policy, but please understand that we reserve the right to change any of our policies and practices at any time. But don’t worry, you can always find the latest version of this Privacy Policy here on this page. Visiting, accessing, or using the Unsplash Services following any change to this Privacy Policy is considered to be your acceptance of any such changes. You should, therefore, read this Privacy Policy from time to time. If you do not agree to be bound by this Privacy Policy, you should not visit, access or use the Unsplash Services.
Personal Information We Collect
The personal information we collect about you may include the following. In each case, we identify the grounds that we rely on to process your personal information under the General Data Protection Regulation (the “
GDPR
”):
Account Profile – when you open an account, we may collect your first name, last name, email address, username and password. You may also provide additional details on your account profile, such as your profile picture, images, location data, personal website, Instagram username, Twitter username and Facebook profile.
Applicable legal grounds
: contract performance, consent, legitimate interests (to enable us to perform our obligations and provide our services);
Device Information – information that is automatically collected about your device, such as hardware, operating system, browser, etc.
Applicable legal grounds
: legitimate interests (to allow us to provide the content and services on the website), consent, contract performance;
Location Information – information that is automatically collected via analytics systems providers to determine your location, including your IP address and/or domain name and any external page that referred you to us.
Applicable legal grounds
: legitimate interests (to allow us to provide the content and services on the website), consent, contract performance;
Server Log Information – information that is generated by your use of the Unsplash Services that is automatically collected and stored in our server logs. This may include, but is not limited to, device-specific information, location information, system activity and any internal and external information related to Unsplash pages that you visit.
Applicable legal grounds
: legitimate interests (to allow us to provide the content and services on the website), consent, contract performance;
Correspondence – information that you provide to us in correspondence, such as when you submit questions or inquiries and with respect to ongoing customer support.
Applicable legal grounds
: legitimate interests (to enable us to perform our obligations and provide our services), consent, contract performance.
Payment Gateways - payment information such as your credit/debit card or financial account number is provided through a secure tunnel interface directly to a 3rd party payment processor (Stripe) and is not accessible to or collected by us. For more information check out Stripe’s Privacy Policy here.
Unsplash may also make use of the standard practice of placing tiny data files called cookies, flash cookies, pixel tags, or other tracking tools (“
Cookies
”) on your computer or other devices used to access the Unsplash Services. Cookies are small bits of information that are automatically stored on the web browser of your device that can be retrieved by us. The type of information we collect includes, but is not limited to, uniquely identifying visitor information and information related to your usage preferences. We use these technologies to help us recognize you as a user, collect information about your use of the Unsplash Services to better customize our services and content for you. By using the Unsplash Services, you acknowledge and agree that we may collect and/or transmit any data collected to our third-party service providers, such as analytics providers, which may also make use of such technologies described above. Please note that if you block or delete cookies you will not be able to use some or all of the Unsplash Services.
How We Use Personal Information
We take steps designed to ensure that only those employees who need access to your personal information to fulfil their employment duties will have access to it. We may use the personal information we collect to:
provide you with the Unsplash Services, including customer support;
optimize and enhance the Unsplash Services, including to develop new products, services, features, and functionality;
respond to inquiries and other requests;
provide you with information that we think may interest you, including in regards to our products and services;
monitor the usage of the Unsplash Services, including by conducting automated and manual security checks;
understand and analyze the usage trends and preferences of our users;
create aggregated and anonymized reporting data about the Unsplash Services;
investigate legal claims;
carry out such purposes for which we may obtain consent from time to time; and
carry out such other purposes as may be permitted or required by applicable law.
How We Share Personal Information
We may disclose your personal information to law enforcement and governmental entities when required by law or in the good-faith belief that such action is necessary to comply with applicable laws, in response to a facially valid court order, judicial or other government subpoena or warrant, or to otherwise cooperate with law enforcement or other governmental agencies. We may also disclose your personal information to a third party in the event of any potential or completed reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer or other disposition of all or any portion of our business.
We rely on third party services providers to perform a variety of services on our behalf, such as identity verification, detection of fraud or security threats, telephone or technical support, payment card processing, hosting services, and data storage or processing, and we may transfer your personal information to our service providers for such purposes. Third party service providers have access to and may collect personal information only as needed to perform their functions and are not permitted to share or use the information for any other purpose.
When we disclose your personal information to third parties, we take reasonable measures to ensure that the rules set forth in this Privacy Policy are complied with and that such third parties provide sufficient guarantees to implement appropriate technical and organisational measures to protect your personal information.
Information Security
We take your privacy very seriously and have implemented physical, organizational and technological security measures with a view to protecting your personal information from loss or theft, unauthorized access, disclosure, copying, use or modification. In particular, we encrypt the Unsplash website with SSL; we periodically review information collection, storage, and processing practices; and we restrict access to your information on a need-to-know basis for our employees, contractors, and agents who are subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Additionally, our third-party payment processor Stripe encrypts your credit card information and stores it in a secure location, which can be accessed only by authorized personnel.
Despite the measure outlined above, no method of information transmission or information storage is 100% secure or error-free, so we unfortunately cannot guarantee absolute security. If you have reason to believe that your interaction with us is no longer secure (for example, if you feel that the security of any information that you provided to us has been compromised), please contact us immediately using the contact information in the
“Contact Us” section
below.
Retention of Personal Information
We will use, disclose or retain your personal information only for as long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for which that personal information was collected and as permitted or required by law.
Rights Regarding Your Personal Information
Under certain circumstances and in accordance with the GDPR or other applicable data protection laws, you have the following rights:
Access – ask if we are processing information and, if we are, request access to your personal information. This enables you to receive a copy of the personal information we hold and certain other information about you;
Correction – request that any incomplete or inaccurate personal information about you that we hold be corrected;
Erasure – ask us to delete or remove your personal information in certain circumstances. There are certain exceptions where we may refuse a request for erasure, for example, where the personal information is required for compliance with law or in connection with legal claims;
Restriction – ask us to suspend the processing of your personal information, for example, to establish its accuracy or the reason for processing it;
Transfer – request the transfer of certain personal information to another party;
Objection – challenge our processing of personal information based on a legitimate interest (or those of a third party) or for direct marketing purposes. However, we may be entitled to continue processing information in certain circumstances;
Automated decisions – contest any automated decision made where it has a legal or similar significant effect and ask for it to be reconsidered; and
Consent – where we are processing personal information with consent, withdraw your consent.
You also have a right to make a complaint with a data protection supervisory authority, in particular in the Country (as defined below) where you normally reside, where we are based or where an alleged infringement of data protection law has taken place.
To exercise any of these rights, please contact us as set forth in the
“Contact Us” section
.
Direct Marketing
Subject to applicable laws and regulations, we may from time to time send direct marketing materials promoting services, products, facilities, or activities to you using information collected from you. If you no longer want to receive marketing-related communications from us, you may opt-out of such communications by clicking the “unsubscribe” link at the bottom of emails you receive from us. You may also opt-out by contacting us directly using the contact information in the “Contact Us” section below. We will endeavour to respond to your opt-out request promptly, but we ask that you please allow us reasonable time to process your request. We will not provide your information to third parties for direct marketing or other unrelated purposes without your written consent.
Please note that if you opt-out from receiving marketing-related communications, we may still need to send you communications about your use of our products or services, or other matters, subject to applicable laws and regulations.
Data Transfer
Your personal information may be stored and processed in any country, province or state (each a “
Country
”) where we have facilities or in which we engage third party service providers. As a result, your personal information may be transferred to Countries outside your Country of residence, which may have different data protection rules than in your Country. While such information is outside of your Country, it is subject to the laws of the Country in which it is held, and may be subject to disclosure to the governments, courts or law enforcement or regulatory agencies of such other Country, pursuant to the laws of such Country. However, our practices regarding your personal information will at all times continue to be governed by this Privacy Policy and, if applicable, we will comply with the GDPR requirements of providing adequate protection for the transfer of personal information from the EU/EEA to other countries.
Third Party Websites and Services
This Privacy Policy applies only to the Unsplash Services and does not extend to any websites or products or services provided by third parties. We do not assume responsibility for the privacy practices of such third parties, and we encourage you to review all third party privacy policies prior to using third party websites or products or services.
Children's Privacy
The Unsplash Services are not directed to children (under the age of 13 in the US and UK or 16 if you live in the EEA), and we do not knowingly collect personal information from children without obtaining parental consent. If we learn that personal information has been collected on the Unsplash Services from persons who are underage and without verifiable parental consent, then we will take the appropriate steps to delete this information. If you are a parent or guardian and discover that your under age child has provided personal information, then you may alert us as set forth in the
“Contact Us” section
and request that we delete that child’s personal information from our systems.
Contact Us
For any questions or comments about this Privacy Policy or your personal information, to make an access or correction request, to exercise any applicable rights, to make a complaint, or to obtain information about our policies and practices with respect to any service providers outside Canada, our Privacy Officer can be reached at
privacy@unsplash.com
.
This Privacy Policy was last updated on September 12th, 2022.
Sub-policy 18
https://pixabay.com/service/privacy/:
FAQ
License Summary
Terms of Service
Privacy Policy
Cookies Policy
Digital Services Act
Report Content
Privacy Policy
Last updated: May 9, 2024
We are Pixabay, a Canva Germany GmbH brand ("Pixabay"). This privacy policy applies to Pixabay’s website at pixabay.com (the "Website") and all related websites, software, mobile apps, plug-ins and other services that we provide (together, the "Service(s)").
This privacy policy explains how we and our affiliates collect, use, disclose and safeguard the information you provide while accessing and using the Service. It also explains how you can exercise your privacy rights. If you have any questions, suggestions or complaints about our use of your personal information or this privacy policy, please contact us using the details provided at the bottom of this page.
Personal information we collect
Information you provide us directly
Certain parts of the Service may ask you to provide personal information voluntarily, such as your first and last name, date of birth, gender, the city and country you live in, information about you, your PayPal address, online profiles, uploaded media and email address. This information will be displayed on your public profile page on Pixabay and can be edited and removed at any time.
We also collect personal information in any messages you send to us and other users through the Service (such as user feedback, messages and search queries), and may collect personal information in content you upload to the Service (such as photos or videos you upload and the metadata about your content). We use this information to operate, maintain, and provide the features and functionality of the Service, to correspond with you, and to address any issues you raise about our services. You must not upload photos or other content containing any personal data of third parties without their express consent.
If you don’t provide your information to us, you may not be able to access or use certain features of the Service or your experience of using the Service may not be as enjoyable.
Information we receive from third parties
We may receive information about you from third parties. For example, when you log into the Service using a third-party account (such as Facebook) we may also collect certain information from the third-party necessary to authenticate your account, such as your email address and any other information you allow the third party to share with us. You should always review, and if necessary, adjust your privacy settings on third-party websites and services before linking or connecting them to our Service. You may also unlink your third-party account from our websites by adjusting your settings on the third-party service. If you unlink your third-party account, we will no longer receive information collected about you in connection with that service.
Information we collect from you automatically
We will directly collect or generate certain information about your use of the Service (such as user activity data, analytics event data and clickstream data), for data analytics and machine learning, and to help us measure traffic and usage trends for the Service. We may also use third party analytics tools that automatically collect information sent by your browser or mobile device, including the pages you visit and other information that assists us in improving the Service. For more information, please see the paragraphs below on cookies information, log file information, clear gifs, device identifiers, and location data.
Cookies information and information taken from similar technologies
When you visit the Service, we (and our third-party partners) will send cookies — small text files containing a string of alphanumeric characters — to your computer that uniquely identifies your browser and lets us do things like help you log in faster, enhance your navigation through the site, remember your preferences and generally improve the user experience. Cookies also convey information to us about how you use the Service (e.g., the pages you view, the links you click and other actions you take on the Service), and allow us or our business partners to track your usage of the Service over time. They also allow us to measure traffic and usage trends for the Service, deliver personalized advertisements that may be of interest to you and measure their effectiveness, and find potential new users of the Service.
You can control or reset your cookies and similar technologies through your web browser, which will allow you to customize your cookie preferences and to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some features of the Service may not function properly if the ability to accept cookies is disabled. For more information on how we use cookies and other technologies and how you can control them, please read our
Cookies Policy
.
Log file information
Log file information is automatically reported by your browser or mobile device each time you access the Service. When you use our Service, our servers automatically record certain log file information. These server logs may include anonymous information such as your web request, browser type, referring / exit pages and URLs, number of clicks and how you interact with links on the Service, domain names, landing pages, pages viewed, and other such information.
Clear gifs/web beacons information
When you use the Service, we may employ clear GIFs (also known as web beacons) which are used to anonymously track the online usage patterns of our users. In addition, we may also use clear GIFs in HTML-based emails sent to our users to track which emails are opened and which links are clicked by recipients. This information allows for more accurate reporting and improvement of the Service.
Device identifiers
When you access the Service on a device (including smart-phones or tablets), we may access, collect and/or monitor one or more “device identifiers,” such as a universally unique identifier (“UUID”). Device identifiers are small data files that uniquely identify your mobile device. A device identifier may convey information to us about how you use the Service. A device identifier may remain persistently on your device, to help you log in and navigate the Service better. Some features of the Service may not function properly if use of device identifiers is impaired.
Location data
We collect information in order to understand where our users are located for a number of reasons. We may collect your precise or approximate location:
from you, when you provide, correct or confirm your location (e.g., when you purchase products from us);
by inferring your location from your IP address; and
from our third party partners.
How we use your information
We use the information we collect about you for the purposes set out below:
Providing you with the Service:
We use the information that you directly give us to provide the Service to you. This includes allowing you to log in to the Service, operating and maintaining the Service and giving you access to your Content. We may also use information we collect about you automatically to remember information about you so that you will not have to re-enter it during your visit or the next time you visit the site.
For data analytics:
We use information about you to help us improve the Service and our users’ experience, including by monitoring aggregate metrics such as total number of visitors, traffic, and demographic patterns.
For analytics and machine learning:
We may analyze your activity, Content, and related data activity in your account to provide and customize the Service, and to train our algorithms, models, products and services using machine learning to develop, improve and provide our Service. If you don’t want your Content to be used for machine learning, you can opt out by updating your preferences in your
account settings
at any time.
These activities include, but are not limited to:
labeling and detecting components in images (e.g., background, eyes);
labeling raw individual data (e.g., “man with dog”);
detecting content prohibited by our
Terms
for moderation and security purposes (e.g., pornographic or copyright protected material);
translating audio soundtracks;
predicting the most relevant product offerings for a user to tailor communications and advertising; and
search terms and corresponding search results interaction data to build an algorithm to deliver the most relevant content result.
Customizing the Service for you:
We may use and combine the information you provide us and information about you that we collect automatically and receive from other sources (including information we receive on and off our Service) and combine it with information about the behavior of other users to make sure that your use of the Service is customized to your needs. For example, to recommend content that is likely to be useful to you, we may use information derived from your prior behavior on our Service, the use of content by other people and other inferred information.
To communicate with you about the Service:
We may use your contact information to get in touch with you and to send communications about critical elements of the Service. For example, we may send you emails about technical issues, security alerts or administrative matters.
To promote and drive engagement with the Service:
We may use your contact information to get in touch with you about taking part in our surveys or about features and offers relating to the Service that we think you would be interested in. We may also use information we collect about you to make sure that you get the most relevant offers and promotions based on your use of the Service, and your preferences.
To improve the Service:
We analyze information about your use of the Service and your content to better understand how users are engaging with our Service and measure the effectiveness of the Service so we can make improvements and develop our services for users.
For advertising purposes:
We may use information about you, including cookies information and other information we (and our third-party partners) collect from you automatically about your use of the Service, to serve, personalize and measure the effectiveness of advertising on the Service and third-party sites and platforms. This includes showing you advertising we think you might find interesting as well as displaying advertising to potential new users that have similar interests. For more information about how we use your information for advertising purposes, please see the section titled “Advertising” below.
Customer service:
We use information about you, information that we collect or and from within your account, information that you provide to our customer service team, and information about your interactions with the Service to resolve technical issues you experience with the Service, and to ensure that we can repair and improve the Service for all users.
For security measures:
We use information about you and from within your account to monitor activity that we think is suspicious or potentially fraudulent, and to identify violations of this Privacy Policy or our
Terms
.
For troubleshooting, error resolution and service improvement:
We may need to review your content or information to support your request for help, correct general errors with the Service or improve our services.
For matters that we are required to use your information by law:
We will use or disclose your information where we reasonably believe that such action is necessary to (a) comply with the law and the reasonable requests of law enforcement; (b) to enforce our
Terms
or to protect the security or integrity of our Service; and/or (c) to exercise or protect the rights, property, or personal safety of Pixabay, our users or others.
Legal basis for processing personal information
If you are located in the EEA, Switzerland or UK, we need a legal basis to collect, use and disclose your personal information. Our lawful basis will depend on the information concerned and the context in which it is processed.
Generally, Pixabay will collect and use your information as follows:
Contractual necessity: We need it to provide the Service to you and fulfil our obligations to you under our
Terms of Service
. For example, this includes creating and maintaining your account, resolving issues you may experience with the Service and providing you with access to your Content.
Legitimate interests: It is necessary for our legitimate interests for example, providing a useful and customized Service, sending you relevant marketing messages, displaying advertising and tracking its effectiveness, using information we collect about you (like your platform usage and search terms) so that we can make more informed predictions, decisions and offers for our users, helping users connect with our community and enhancing our Service via research and development, data analytics, data labelling, machine learning and predictive analytics relating to your usage data. We do not rely on this lawful basis where our legitimate interests are overridden by your rights and interests.
Consent: You consent to us, and our third party partners, using your information in a certain way - for example, to hear about new features or offers, and for machine learning and predictive analysis relating to your Content.
Legal obligations: It is necessary for compliance with our legal obligations - for example, to disclose your information in response to law enforcement requests and to retain your information for our record keeping purposes.
If you consented to our use of your information, you can withdraw that consent at any time. Depending on the situation you can either withdraw your consent by emailing
info@pixabay.com
, or through your
account settings page
.
Where we use your information for our legitimate interest, you have the right to object to that use by contacting
info@pixabay.com
. However, if you do, it may diminish the quality of the Service you receive or prevent you from using the Service.
Sharing your information
We respect and are committed to protecting your privacy.
However, we may disclose your personal information to our group companies, and to our services providers and partners who provide data processing services to us (for example, to support the delivery of, provide functionality on, or help to enhance the security of our websites) or who otherwise process data for their own purposes (for example, to share your Content with our group companies) or for purposes that are described in this privacy policy or notified to you when we collect your data.
In the event of a proposed purchase, merger or acquisition of any part of our business, we may disclose your personal information to an actual or potential buyer (and its agents and advisers) provided that we inform the buyer it must use your personal information only for the purposes disclosed in this privacy policy.
We may also aggregate or otherwise strip data of all personally identifying characteristics and may share that aggregated such anonymized data with third parties.
We reserve the right to disclose your personal information as required by law (e.g., to comply with a subpoena, warrant, or court order) and when we believe that disclosure is necessary to protect our rights, avoid litigation, protect your safety or the safety of others, investigate fraud, and/or respond to a government request. We may also disclose information about you if we determine that such disclosure should be made for reasons of national security, law enforcement, or other issues of public importance.
If you have consented to the disclosure of your personal information to any other third party, we may also share the data with them.
How we transfer, store and protect your information
Your information will be stored and processed in the United States, Australia, Singapore, the European Union, United Kingdom, Philippines and New Zealand and any other country in which Pixabay, its group companies, service providers and partners maintain facilities or employ staff or contractors.
This means that your data may be transferred to and processed in countries other than the country in which you are located. These countries may have data protection laws that are different to the laws of your country (and, in some cases, may not be as protective).
However, we always take steps to ensure that your data will remain protected in accordance with this privacy policy and applicable data protection laws. These measures include transferring your data to a country that the European Commission or UK authorities (as applicable) have determined provides an adequate level of protection for personal data, or by implementing standard contractual clauses with our group companies, service providers and partners.
Keeping your information safe
We take commercially reasonable security measures designed to protect the security of the personal data, including protection against unauthorized or unlawful processing and against accidental loss, destruction or damage, using appropriate technical or organisational measures. To protect your privacy and security, we take reasonable steps (such as requesting a unique password) to verify your identity before granting you access to your account. You are responsible for maintaining the secrecy of your unique password and account information, and for controlling access to your account, at all times. However, we cannot ensure or warrant the security of any information you transmit to us or guarantee that information on the Service may not be accessed, disclosed, altered, or destroyed.
Your rights
You have the right to access the data we process about you, obtain rectification of inaccurate data, request deletion of your data, restrict our processing of your data, request portability of your data, and/or object to unreasonable processing. If we process your data on the basis of your consent, you have the option to withdraw your consent at any time. Doing so will not affect the lawfulness of the processing we carried out based on your consent up to the time of withdrawal.
You can exercise any of these rights by contacting us using the contact details provided at the bottom of this page under the “Contact us” heading. We respond to all requests we receive in accordance with applicable data protection laws. In some circumstances we will not be able to comply with your request regarding your personal data. If we are unable to remove any of your information, we will explain why.
You also have the right to opt-out of marketing communications we send you at any time. You can exercise this right by clicking on the “unsubscribe” or “opt-out” link in the marketing emails we send you or in your user profile page. You can also opt out of having your Content used for machine learning by updating your preferences in your
account settings
at any time. You can also contact us using the contact details provided at the bottom of this page under the “Contact us” heading.
If we are unable to resolve your request, or if you are concerned about a potential violation, you also have the option to report the issue or make a complaint to the data protection authority in your jurisdiction.
Data retention
We will retain your personal information for as long as your account is active or as needed to provide you with the Service or as necessary to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, and enforce our agreements.
When we have no ongoing legitimate business need to process your information, we will either delete or anonymise it or, if this is not possible (for example, because your information has been stored in backup archives), then we will securely store your information and isolate it from any further processing until deletion is possible.
Children
As set out in our Terms, Children may not access or use the Service unless their use is directly authorized by their parent, guardian or another authorized adult who agrees to be bound by these Terms. For the purposes of these Terms, a child is a person under the age of 13 (or the minimum legal age required to provide consent for processing of personal data in the country where the child is located, noting 16 is the minimum legal age in Germany).
The Service and our content are not directed at children. Children are not permitted to sign up for the Service by themselves. We do not knowingly collect or solicit personal information from Children. If we learn that we have collected personal information from a child without verification of parental consent where this is required, we will delete that information as quickly as possible.
Third-party service-based information
Pixabay is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC Associates Program, an affiliate advertising program designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to Amazon.com.
Advertising
We partner with third-party ad servers, ad networks and social media platforms (like Facebook, Instagram, Google, Amazon Services LLC Associates and BuySellAds) to deliver personalized advertisements (“ads”) on our Service and other sites that may be of interest to you and/or to measure their effectiveness, and/or to identify potential new users of our Service.
We may share certain information with our third-party advertising partners, such as your email address, location, cookie information and information relating to your use of our Service, and allow partners to perform a match of your information against information from other third-party networks or sites to serve ads either on the Service or on third-party sites (including, but not limited to Facebook, Google) and to measure the effectiveness of these ads. We also share certain information with social media platforms, such as Facebook and TikTok, to display advertising to potential new users whose demographics and behaviour look like those of our existing users.
In addition, these third-party ad servers or ad networks may use technology to send, directly to your browser or mobile device, these personalized ads and ad links directly to your browser or mobile device, and will automatically receive your IP address when they do so. They may also use other technologies (such as cookies, JavaScript, device identifiers, location data, and clear gifs) to compile information about your browser’s or device’s visits and usage patterns on the Service, and to measure the effectiveness of their ads and to personalize the advertising content. Please see our
Cookies Policy
for more information about how we and our third-party partners use cookies and other technologies to deliver ads to you.
We do not sell or rent the information we collect about you with these third-party ad servers or ad networks for such parties’ own marketing purposes.
Please note that an advertiser may ask us to show an ad on the Service to a certain audience of users (e.g., based on demographics or other interests). In that situation, we determine the target audience and we serve the advertising to that audience and only provide anonymous aggregated data to the advertiser. If you respond to such an ad, the advertiser or ad server may conclude that you fit the description of the audience they are trying to reach.
The Pixabay Privacy Policy does not apply to, and we cannot control the activities of, third-party advertisers. Please consult the respective privacy policies of such advertisers or contact such advertisers for more information.
Changes to this policy
We may update this privacy policy from time to time to reflect our current practice and ensure compliance with applicable laws. When we post changes to this policy, we will revise the “Last Updated” date at the top of this policy. If we make any material changes to the way we collect, use, store and/or share your personal data, we will take appropriate measures to notify you. We recommend that you check this page from time to time to inform yourself of any changes.
Contact us
The data controller responsible for your personal data is Pixabay, a Canva Germany GmbH brand.
Our local representative in the United Kingdom is the European Data Protection Office UK (EDPO UK) with a registered address at 8 Northumberland Avenue, London WC2N 5BY, United Kingdom.
The EDPO UK can be contacted at privacy@edpo.com. If you are in the UK, data subject request forms can be accessed at
https://edpo.com/uk-gdpr-data-request/
.
If you have any questions, suggestions or concerns about our use of your personal data or this privacy policy, please contact us at:
Email: info@pixabay.com
Write: Pixabay, a Canva Germany GmbH brand
Pappelallee 78/79
10437 Berlin
Germany
Sub-policy 19
https://feedly.com/i/legal/privacy/:
Skip to Content
Sub-policy 20
https://firebase.google.com/support/privacy/:
Skip to main content
firebase.google.com uses cookies from Google to deliver and enhance the quality of its services and to analyze traffic.
Learn more
.
OK, got it
Build
More
Run
More
Solutions
Pricing
Docs
More
Community
More
Support
Go to console
Developer Support
Contact Support
Scope of no-cost support
Support Guides
Overview
FAQ
Security checklist
Launch checklist
Firebase-related service accounts
Troubleshoot initialization options
Enable the AdSupport framework
Dynamic Links deprecation
Deprecation FAQ
Export Dynamic Links metadata
Migrate to App Links & Universal Links
Migrate from Parse
Android
iOS+
Cloud Audit Logs
Firebase Management
Cloud Storage for Firebase
Firebase Cloud Messaging
Firebase App Check
Firebase Security Rules
Firebase Realtime Database
Android Device Streaming
Recent Changes and Updates
Release Notes
iOS Release Notes
Android Release Notes
JavaScript Release Notes
Flutter Release Notes
C++ Release Notes
Unity Release Notes
Admin Node.js Release Notes
Admin Java Release Notes
Admin Python Release Notes
Admin Go Release Notes
Admin .
NET Release Notes
Security Rules Release Notes
Firebase CLI Release Notes
Policies for changes and versioning
Overview
Introducing and communicating changes
Versioning and maintenance
Legal Information
Terms of Service
Paid Services Terms
Data Processing and Security Terms
Firebase: Standard Contractual Clauses
Service Level Agreement for Hosting and Realtime Database
Cloud Storage for Firebase Service Level Agreement
Firebase App Indexing User Data Policy
Crashlytics and App Distribution Terms
Firebase Subprocessors
Privacy and Security Information
Privacy and Security in Firebase
Designate Data Protection Officers and EU Representatives
Firebase Data Privacy Inquiries
Manage Instance ID data
Clear and export users' data
Storing privacy settings with Firebase
Build
Go to Build
Build Products
App Check
App Hosting
Authentication
Cloud Functions
Cloud Storage
Data Connect
Extensions
Firebase ML
Firestore
Genkit
Hosting
Realtime Database
Vertex AI in Firebase
Generative AI
Run
Go to Run
Run Products
A/B Testing
App Distribution
Cloud Messaging
Crashlytics
Google Analytics
In-App Messaging
Performance Monitoring
Remote Config
Test Lab
Overview
Fundamentals
Build
Run
Reference
Samples
Learn
Events
Stories
Firebase
Support
Send feedback
Privacy and Security in Firebase
bookmark_border
bookmark
Stay organized with collections
Save and categorize content based on your preferences.
On this page
Data protection
Firebase support for GDPR and CCPA
Firebase Data Processing and Security Terms
Firebase is certified under major privacy and security standards
Data processing information
Examples of end-user data processed by Firebase
Guides for enabling opt-in for end-user data processing
Data storage and processing locations
Security information
Data encryption
Security practices
Firebase Service Data
Examples of how Firebase Service Data is processed by Firebase
Firebase Service Data use by non-Firebase Google services
This page outlines Firebase's key security and privacy information. Whether
you're looking to kick off a new project with Firebase, or curious about how
Firebase works with your existing project, read on to see how Firebase can help
protect you and your users.
Last modified: February 20, 2025
Data protection
Firebase support for GDPR and CCPA
On May 25th, 2018, the EU General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) replaced the
1995 EU Data Protection Directive. On January 1, 2020, the California Consumer
Privacy Act (CCPA) took effect. On January 1, 2023, the California Privacy
Rights Act (CPRA), which is a data privacy law that amends and expands upon the
CCPA, took effect. Google is committed to helping our customers succeed under
these privacy regulations, whether they are large software companies or
independent developers.
The GDPR imposes obligations on data controllers and data processors, and the
CCPA/CPRA imposes obligations on businesses and their service providers.
Firebase customers typically act as the "data controller" (GDPR) or "business"
(CCPA/CPRA) for any personal data or information about their end-users they
provide to Google in connection with their use of Firebase, and Google generally
operates as a "data processor" (GDPR) or "service provider" (CCPA/CPRA).
This means that data is under the customer's control. Customers are
responsible for obligations like fulfilling an individual's rights with respect
to their personal data or information.
Firebase Data Processing and Security Terms
When customers use Firebase, Google is generally a data processor under GDPR and
processes personal data on their behalf. Similarly, when customers use Firebase,
Google generally operates as a service provider under the CCPA/CPRA handling
personal information on their behalf. Firebase terms include
Data Processing
and Security Terms
detailing these
responsibilities.
Certain Firebase services governed by the
Google Cloud Platform (GCP) Terms of Service
are already covered by associated data processing terms, the
Cloud Data Processing Addendum
.
A complete list of Firebase services currently governed by the GCP Terms of
Service is available in the
Terms of Service for Firebase Services
.
Google Analytics is a separate service that can be used together with Firebase,
and is subject to separate
terms
.
Firebase is certified under major privacy and security standards
ISO and SOC compliance
All Firebase services (aside from App Indexing) have successfully completed the
ISO
27001
and
SOC
1
,
SOC
2
,
and
SOC 3
evaluation
process, and some have also completed the
ISO
27017
and
ISO
27018
certification
process. Compliance reports and certificates for Firebase services governed by
the GCP Terms of Service may be requested via the
Compliance Reports
Manager
.
Service name
ISO 27001
ISO 27017
ISO 27018
SOC 1
SOC 2
SOC 3
Cloud Firestore
check
check
check
check
check
check
Cloud Functions for Firebase
check
check
check
check
check
check
Cloud Storage for Firebase
check
check
check
check
check
check
Firebase A/B Testing
check
check
check
check
Firebase App Check
check
check
check
check
Firebase App Distribution
check
check
check
check
Firebase Authentication
check
check
check
check
check
check
Firebase Cloud Messaging
check
check
check
check
Firebase Crashlytics
check
check
check
check
Firebase Dynamic Links
check
check
check
check
Firebase Hosting
check
check
check
check
Firebase In-App Messaging
check
check
check
check
Firebase ML
check
check
check
check
Firebase Performance Monitoring
check
check
check
check
Firebase Platform
check
check
check
check
Firebase Realtime Database
check
check
check
check
Firebase Remote Config
check
check
check
check
Firebase Test Lab
check
check
check
check
check
check
Gemini in Firebase
check
check
check
check
Vertex AI in Firebase
check
check
check
check
International Data Transfers
As described in our
Data Privacy Framework
certification
,
we comply with the EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Frameworks (DPF) and the
UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF as set forth by the US Department of Commerce
regarding the collection, use and retention of personal information from the
EEA, Switzerland and the UK, respectively. Google LLC (and its wholly-owned US
subsidiaries unless explicitly excluded) has certified that it adheres to the
DPF Principles. Google remains responsible for any of your personal information
that is shared under the Onward Transfer Principle with third parties for
external processing on our behalf, as described in the
"Sharing your
information" section of our Privacy
Policy
. To learn more about
the DPF, and to view Google's certification, please visit the
DPF
website
.
If you have an inquiry regarding our privacy practices in relation to our DPF
certification, we encourage you to
contact
us
. Google is
subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the US Federal Trade
Commission. You may also refer a complaint to your local data protection
authority and we will work with them to resolve your concern. In certain
circumstances, the DPF provides the right to invoke binding arbitration to
resolve complaints not resolved by other means, as described in
Annex I to the
DPF
Principles
.
Data processing information
Examples of end-user data processed by Firebase
Some Firebase services process your end users' data to provide their service.
The chart below has examples of how various Firebase services use and handle
end-user data that may potentially be identifying. In addition, many Firebase
services offer the ability to request deletion of specific data or control how
data is handled.
Firebase service
End-user data
How data helps provide the service
Cloud Functions for Firebase
IP addresses
How it helps:
Cloud Functions uses IP addresses to
            execute event-handling functions and HTTP functions based on end-user actions.
Retention:
Cloud functions only saves IP addresses temporarily, to
            provide the service.
Firebase App Check
Attestation material from supported attestation providers
App Check tokens from successful attestations
How it helps:
Firebase App Check uses attestation
            material required by the corresponding attestation provider and
            received from end-user's devices to help establish the integrity of
            the device and/or the app. Attestation materials are sent to the
            corresponding attestation provider for validation based on the
            developer's configuration. App Check tokens obtained from successful
            attestations are sent with every request to supported Firebase
            services to access resources protected by App Check.
Retention:
Attestation material is not retained by
            App Check, but when it is sent to attestation providers, it is
            subject to the terms of those attestation providers. App Check
            tokens returned from successful attestations are valid throughout
            their TTL duration, which cannot be longer than 7 days. For
            developers who use replay protection features, App Check stores the
            App Check tokens used with these features for at most 30 days. Other
            App Check tokens not used with replay protection features are not
            retained by Firebase services.
Firebase App Distribution
Users' names
Email addresses
iOS UDIDs
Secure Android IDs
Firebase
installation IDs
Tester feedback (screenshots and text)
How it helps:
Firebase App Distribution uses the data to distribute
            app builds to testers, monitor tester activity, enable tester features like in-app
            feedback, and associate data with tester devices.
Retention:
Firebase App Distribution retains user information
            until the Firebase customer requests its deletion, after which data is removed from live
            and backup systems within 180 days.
Firebase Authentication
Passwords
Email addresses
Phone numbers
User agents
IP addresses
How it helps:
Firebase Authentication uses the data to enable end-user
            authentication, and facilitate end-user account management. It also uses user-agent
            strings and IP addresses to provide added security and prevent abuse during sign-up and
            authentication.
Retention:
Firebase Authentication keeps logged IP addresses for a few
            weeks. It retains other authentication information until the Firebase customer initiates
            deletion of the associated user, after which data is removed from live and backup
            systems within 180 days.
Firebase Cloud Messaging
Firebase
installation IDs
How it helps:
Firebase Cloud Messaging uses
Firebase
installation IDs to determine which devices to deliver messages to.
Retention:
Firebase retains
Firebase
installation IDs
            until the Firebase customer
            makes an API call to delete the ID. After the call, data is removed from live and backup
            systems within 180 days.
Firebase Crashlytics
Crashlytics Installation UUIDs
Firebase installations ID
Crash traces
Breakpad minidump formatted data
(NDK crashes only)
How it helps:
Firebase Crashlytics uses crash stack
            traces to associate crashes with a project, send email alerts to
            project members and display them in the Firebase Console, and help
            Firebase customers debug crashes. It uses Crashlytics Installation
            UUIDs to measure the number of users impacted by a crash and
            minidump data to process NDK crashes. The minidump data is stored
            while the crash session is being processed and then discarded. The
            Firebase installation ID enables upcoming features that will enhance
            crash reporting and crash management services. Refer to
Examples of stored device information
for more detail on the types of user information gathered.
Retention:
Firebase Crashlytics keeps crash stack traces,
            extracted minidump data, and associated identifiers (including
            Crashlytics Installation UUIDs and Firebase installation IDs) for 90 days before
            starting the process of removing it from live and backup systems.
Note:
Firebase Crashlytics stores minidump data only temporarily in order to
            process NDK crashes.
Firebase Dynamic Links
Device specs (iOS)
IP Addresses (iOS)
How it helps:
Dynamic Links uses device specs and IP addresses on iOS to open
            newly-installed apps to a specific page or context.
Retention:
Dynamic Links only stores device specs and IP addresses temporarily, to
            provide the service.
Firebase Hosting
IP addresses
How it helps:
Hosting uses IP addresses of incoming requests to detect
            abuse and provide customers with detailed analysis of usage data.
Retention:
Hosting retains IP data for a few months.
Firebase In-App Messaging
Firebase
installation IDs
How it helps:
Firebase In-App Messaging
uses
Firebase
installation IDs to determine which devices to deliver messages to.
Retention:
Firebase retains
Firebase
installation IDs
            until the Firebase customer
            makes an API call to delete the ID. After the call, data is removed from live and backup
            systems within 180 days.
Firebase ML
Uploaded Images
installation auth tokens
How it helps:
The Cloud based APIs store uploaded images temporarily,
            to process and return the analysis to you. Stored images are typically deleted within a
            few hours. See the Cloud Vision
Data Usage FAQ
for more
            information.
installation auth tokens
are used by
Firebase ML
for device authentication when interacting with app
            instances, for example, to distribute developer models to app instances.
Retention:
installation auth tokens remain valid until their
            expiration date. The default token lifetime is one week.
Firebase Performance Monitoring
Firebase
installation IDs
IP addresses
How it helps:
Performance Monitoring
uses
Firebase
installation IDs
            to calculate the number of unique Firebase installations that access network resources,
            to ensure that access patterns are sufficiently anonymous. It also uses
Firebase
installation IDs with
Firebase Remote Config
to manage the rate of performance event reporting. Additionally, it uses IP
            addresses to map performance events to the countries they originate from. For more
            information, see
Data collection
.
Retention:
Performance Monitoring
keeps IP-associated
            events for 30 days, and it keeps installation-associated and de-identified performance
            data for 60 days before starting the process of removing it from live and backup
            systems.
Firebase Realtime Database
IP addresses
User agents
How it helps:
Realtime Database uses IP addresses and user agents to
            enable the
profiler
            tool
, which helps Firebase customers understand usage trends and platform
            breakdowns.
Retention:
Realtime Database keeps IP addresses and user agent
            information for a few days, unless a customer chooses to save it for longer.
Firebase Remote Config
Firebase
installation IDs
How it helps:
Remote Config
uses
Firebase
installation IDs
            to select configuration
            values to return to end-user devices.
Retention:
Firebase retains
Firebase
installation IDs until the Firebase customer makes an API call to delete the
          ID. After the call, data is removed from live and backup systems within 180 days.
Vertex AI in Firebase
Customer's inputs and outputs data sent and received from the AI model
How it helps:
Vertex AI in Firebase
uses Vertex AI's Generative AI
            API to predict content.
Retention:
During prediction, Google doesn't log Customer Data to
            generate a customer's output or train foundation models. By default, Google caches a
            customer's inputs and outputs for the Gemini models to accelerate responses to
            subsequent prompts from the customer.
See more details at
Generative
              AI and Data Governance | Generative AI on Vertex AI | Google Cloud
.
Examples of information collected by Crashlytics
An RFC-4122 UUID which permits us to deduplicate crashes
The Crashlytics Installation UUID
The Firebase installations ID (FID)
The Firebase session ID, which is a random UUID generated to tag events
      with a session
The timestamp of when the crash occurred
The app's bundle identifier and full version number
The device's operating system name and version number
A boolean indicating whether the device was jailbroken/rooted
The device's model name, CPU architecture, amount of RAM and disk
      space
The uint64 instruction pointer of every frame of every currently running
      thread
If available in the runtime, the plain-text method or function name
      containing each instruction pointer.
If an exception was thrown, the plain-text class name and message value
      of the exception
If a fatal signal was raised, its name and integer code
For each binary image loaded into the application, its name, UUID, byte
      size, and the uint64 base address at which it was loaded into RAM
A boolean indicating whether or not the app was in the background at the
      time it crashed
An integer value indicating the rotation of the screen at the time of
      crash
A boolean indicating whether the device's proximity sensor was
      triggered
The contents of
version-control-info.textproto
(only for Android apps
configured
        to use the version control system (VCS) integration
)
Examples of information collected by Performance Monitoring
The Firebase installations ID (FID)
The Firebase session ID, which is a random UUID generated to tag events
      with a session
General device information, such as model, OS, and orientation
RAM and disk size
CPU usage
Carrier (based on Mobile Country and Network Code)
Radio/Network information (for example, WiFi, LTE, 3G)
Country (based on IP address)
Locale/language
App version
App foreground or background state
App package name
Firebase
installation IDs
Duration times for automated traces
Network URLs (not including URL parameters or payload content)
      and the following corresponding information:
Response codes (for example, 403, 200)
Payload size in bytes
Response times
See a
full list
of the
    automatic traces collected by
Performance Monitoring
.
Note:
For more info on deleting data associated with installations, see
Delete a Firebase installation
.
Guides for enabling opt-in for end-user data processing
Services in the table above need some amount of end-user data to function. As a
result, it's not possible to entirely disable data collection while using those
services.
If you're a customer who would like to offer users a chance to opt-in to a
service, and the data collection that comes with it, in most cases that just
requires adding a dialog or settings toggle before using the service.
Some services, however, start up automatically when included in an app. To give
users a chance to opt-in before using those services, you can choose to disable
auto-initialization for each service, and manually initialize them at run time
instead. To find out how, read the guides below:
Cloud Messaging
:
Prevent Auto-initialization (Android)
or
Prevent Auto-initialization (iOS+)
Crashlytics
:
Enable Opt-in Reporting (iOS+)
or
Enable Opt-in Reporting (Android)
Performance Monitoring
:
Enable Opt-in Monitoring
If you integrate Firebase with Google Analytics, learn how to
configure Analytics data collection
.
Data storage and processing locations
Unless a service or feature offers data location selection, Firebase may process
and store your data anywhere Google or its agents maintain facilities. Potential
facility locations vary by service.
US-only services
The
Firebase Authentication
service is run only from US data centers. As a result,
Firebase Authentication
processes data exclusively in the United States.
Global services
The majority of Firebase services run on global Google infrastructure.
They could process data at any of the
Google Cloud Platform locations
or
Google data center locations
.
For some services, you can make a specific data location selection, which
restricts processing to that location (for more information, see the
service specific terms
of the Google Cloud Platform Terms of Service).
Cloud Firestore
Firebase Crashlytics
Firebase ML
Cloud Functions for Firebase
Firebase Dynamic Links
Firebase Performance Monitoring
Cloud Storage for Firebase
Firebase Hosting
Firebase Remote Config
Firebase App Check
Firebase App Distribution
Firebase In-App Messaging
Firebase Test Lab
Firebase Cloud Messaging
Security information
Data encryption
Firebase services encrypt data in transit using HTTPS and logically isolate
customer data.
In addition, several Firebase services also encrypt their data at rest:
Cloud Firestore
Firebase Authentication
Firebase Performance Monitoring
Cloud Functions for Firebase
Firebase Cloud Messaging
Firebase Realtime Database
Cloud Storage for Firebase
Firebase Crashlytics
Firebase Test Lab
Firebase App Check
Firebase App Distribution
Security practices
To keep personal data safe, Firebase employs extensive security measures to
minimize access:
Firebase restricts access to a select employees who have a business purpose to access personal data.
Firebase logs employee access to systems that contain personal data.
Firebase only permits access to personal data by employees who sign in with Google Sign-In and
2-factor authentication
.
Firebase Service Data
Firebase Service Data is personal information that Google collects and generates
during the provision and administration of the Firebase services
*
,
excluding Customer Data
**
as defined in our customer agreements
covering Firebase services and
Google Cloud Service Data
.
Examples of Firebase Service Data include information about service usage,
resource identifiers like application IDs and package name/bundle IDs, technical
and operational details of usage such as IP addresses, and direct communications
with developers from feedback and support related conversations.
*Services covered include Firebase A/B Testing, Firebase App Distribution,
  Firebase Cloud Messaging, Firebase Crashlytics, Firebase Dynamic Links,
  Firebase Hosting, Firebase In-App Messaging, Firebase ML,
  Firebase Performance Monitoring, Firebase Realtime Database,
  Firebase Remote Config, and Firebase User Segmentation Storage.
**For more information about how we process Customer Data, see our
Firebase Data Processing and Security
  Terms
.
Examples of how Firebase Service Data is processed by Firebase
Google uses Firebase Service Data in accordance with our
privacy policy
and applicable terms.
Firebase Service Data is used, for example, to:
Provide Firebase services you request
Make recommendations to optimize use of Firebase services
Maintain and improve Firebase services
Provide and improve other services you request
Understand your use of Firebase and other Google services
Provide better support to and communicate with you
Protect you, our users, the public and Google
Comply with legal obligations
Firebase Service Data use by non-Firebase Google services
You can control whether your Firebase Service Data may be used by Google to
provide more in depth analysis, insights, and recommendations about
non-Firebase
Google services and improve
non-Firebase
Google services.
You can configure this in your Firebase data privacy settings page.
If this control is disabled, Firebase Service Data will continue to be used
for other purposes, such as those mentioned above, in accordance with our
privacy policy
and applicable terms, including
to make recommendations about and improve
Firebase
services, and to deliver
and improve other services you request, such as Google products you link to your
Firebase project.
Still have questions? Contact us
For any privacy-related questions you have that aren't covered here,
reach out to Firebase Support
. If you're a Firebase developer, include your Firebase App ID. Find your Firebase App ID in the
Your apps
card of your
settings
Project
settings
.
Send feedback
Except as otherwise noted, the content of this page is licensed under the
Creative Commons Attribution 4.0 License
, and code samples are licensed under the
Apache 2.0 License
. For details, see the
Google Developers Site Policies
. Java is a registered trademark of Oracle and/or its affiliates.
Last updated 2025-03-04 UTC.
Info
Chat
Sub-policy 21
https://support.giphy.com/hc/en-us/articles/360020028332-GIPHY-Privacy-Policy/:
Sign in to GIPHY
Switch to agent sign-in
Email
Password
Forgot password?
Missing the following required fields:
Sign in
Emailed us for support?
Get a password
New to GIPHY?
Sign up
Sub-policy 22
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/:
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
Please wait while application initialize...
;
Sub-policy 23
http://www.google.com/policies/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or